Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on Hbrary shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http : //books . google . com/| 



- I 




* . T 



V t*'- . ^ ._ * ^ 



% 



— i 



• * 



■» • 




Book No.C|"rp| -- / /^ (;V> 



Date due back 



•. 




.r 




J 



9l 






^^^^B^m 



THE 



SENSATIONS OF TONE 



BY THE SAME AUTHOR. 



POPULAR LECTUKES ON 
SCIENTIFIC SUBJECTS. 

TBAN8LATED BY 

E. ATKINSON, Ph.D., P.O.S. 
With 68 Illustrations. 2 vols. Grown Svo, 8s. 6d. each. 

CONTBNTS. 

Vol. I. — The Relation of Natural Science to Science in 
Generals-Goethe's Scientific Researches— The Physiological 
Causes of Harmony in Music — Ice and Glaciers — The Inter- 
action of the Natural Forces— The Recent Progress of the Theory 
of Vision — The Conservation of Force — The Aim and Progress 
of Physical Science. 

Vol. II. — Gustav Magnus — In Memoriani — The Origin and 
Significance of Geometrical Axioms — The Relation of Optics to 
Painting — The Origin of the Planetary System — Thought in 
Medicine — Academic Freedom in German Universities — 
Hermann von Helmholtz : an Autobiographical Sketch. 



LONGMANS, GREEN AND CO., 

LONDON, NEW TOBK, BOMBAY AND CALCUTTA. 



ON THE 



SENSATIONS OF TONE, 



AS A PHYSIOLOGICAL BASIS FOR THE 



THEOBY OF MUSIC 



BY 

HERMANN L. F. HELMHOLTZ, M.D., 

LATE FOBBIGN MSMBKR OF THB BOTAL SOCtBTIBS OF LONDON AND BDINBUBOH, 

FROFBSaOR OF FHY8I0L06Y IN THB UNIVBRBITT OF HBroBLBBBO, AND 

PBOFBBSOB OF PHT8IC8 IN TBE UNIVBB8ITY OF BBBLIN 



Translcited^ thoroughly Revised and Corrected, rendered conformabU to the Fourth 

(and las() German Edition of 1877, wUh numerous additional Notes and a 

New additional Appendix bringing doton information to 1885 

and especially adapted to the use of Musical Students 

BY 

ALEXANDER J. ELLIS 

B.A., P.R.S., F.S.A., F.C.P.S., F.C P. 

TWICE PRBSIDBNT OF THB PHILOLOGICAL SOCIBTT, MBMBBB OF THB MATHEMATICAL 80CIBTY, 

FOBMBBLY 8CH0LAB OF TRINITY COLLEGE, CAMBBIDGE, 
AUTHOR OF *BABLY ENGLISH PBONUNCIATION ' AND '^LOBBBA IDENTIFIED WITH GEOMETBY ' 



FOURTH EDITION 



LONGMANS, GREEN, AND CO. 

39 PATERNOSTEB BOW, LONDON 
NEW YORK, BOMBAY AND CALCUTTA 

1912 

All rights reserved 



l4H7q7- 






c^4'(^3 



Bibliographical Note. 

First English Edition, June, 1875 ; 

Second Edition, revised and Appendix added, August, 1885 ; 

Third Edition, reprinted from Second Edition, June, 1895 ; 

Fourth Edition, reprinted from Third Edition, November, 
1912. 



)^>9 



:iC 






TRANSLATOR'S NOTICE 

TO THE 

SECOND ENGLISH EDITION. 

In preparing a new edition of this translation of Professor Helmholtz's great work 
on the Sensations of Tone, which was originally made from the third German 
edition of 1870, and was finished in June, 1875, my first care was to make it 
exactly conform to the fourth German edition of 1877 (the last which has 
appeared). The numerous alterations made in the fourth edition are specified in 
the Author's preface. In order that no merely verbal changes might escape me, 
every sentence of my translation was carefully re-read with the German. This 
has enabled me to correct several misprints and mistranslations which had escaped 
my previous very careful revision, and I have taken the opportxmity of improving 
the language in many places. Scarcely a page has escaped such changes. 

Professor Helmholtz's book having taken its place as a work which all candi- 
dates for musical degrees are expected to study, my next care was by supple- 
mentary notes or brief insertions, always carefully distinguished from the Author's 
by being inclosed in [ ], to explain any difficulties which the student might feel, 
and to shew him how to acquire an insight into the Author's theories, which were 
quite strange to musicians when they appeared in the first German edition of 
1863, but in the twenty-two years which have since elapsed have been received as 
essentially valid by those competent to pass judgment. 

For this purpose I have contrived the Harmonical, explained on pp. 466-469, 
by which, as shewn in numerous footnotes, almost every point of theory can be 
illustrated ; and I have arranged for its being readily procurable at a moderate 
charge. It need scarcely be said that my interest in this instrument is purely 
scientific. 

My own Appendix has been entirely re-written, much has been rejected and 
the rest condensed, but, as may be seen in the Contents, I have added a consider- 
able amount of information about points hitherto little known, such as the Deter- 
mination and History of Musical Pitch, Non-Harmonic scales. Tuning, &c., and in 
especial I have given an account of the work recently done on Beats and Com- 
binational Tones, and on Vowel Analysis and Synthesis, mostly since the fourth 
German edition appeared. 

Finally, I wish gratefully to acknowledge the assistance, sometimes very grea^i, 
which I have received from Messrs. D. J. Blaikley, R. H. M. Bosanquet, Colin 
Brown, A. Cavaill6-Ooll, A. J. Hipkins, W. Huggins, F.R.S., Shuji Isawa, H. 
Ward Poole, R. S. Rockstro, Hermann Smith, Stein way, Augustus Stroh, and 
James Paul White, as will be seen by referring to their names in the Index. 



ALEXANDER J. ELLIS. 



25 Argyll Road, Kensington: 
July, 1885. 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 

TO THE 

FIEST GERMAN EDITION. 

In laying before the Public the result of eight years' labour, I must first pay a 
debt of gratitude. The following investigations could not have been accomplished 
without the construction of new instruments, which did not enter into the inventory 
of a Physiological Institute, and which far exceeded in cost the usual resources of 
a German philosopher. The means for obtaining them have come to me from 
unusual sources. The apparatus for the artificial construction of vowels, described 
on pp. 121 to 126, I owe to the munificence of his Majesty King Maximilian of 
Bavaria, to whom German science is indebted, on so many of its fields, for ever- 
ready sympathy and assistance. For the construction of my Harmonium in 
perfectly natural intonation, described on p. 316, 1 was able to use the Soemmering 
prize which had been awarded me by the Senckenberg Physical Society {die 
Senckenbergische naturforschende Gesellschaft) at Frankfurt-on-the-Main. While 
publicly repeating the expression of my gratitude for this assistance in my investi- 
gations, I hope that the investigations themselves as set forth in this book will 
prove far better than mere words how earnestly I have endeavoured to make a 
worthy use of the means thus placed at my command. 

H. HELMHOLTZ. 
Hbidblbbrq: October, 1862. 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 

TO THE 

THIED GEEMAN EDITION. 

The present Third Edition has been much more altered in some parts than the 
second. Thus in the sixth chapter I have been able to make use of the new 
physiological and anatomical researches on the ear. This has led to a modifica- 
tion of my view of the action of Gorti's arches. Again, it appears that the peculiar 
articulation between the auditory ossicles called ' hammer ' and ' anvil ' might easily 
cause within the ear itself the formation of harmonic upper partial tones for simple 
tones which are sounded loudly. By this means that peculiar series of upper 
partial tones, on the existence of which the present theory of music is essentially 
founded, receives a new subjective value, entirely independent of external altera- 
tions in the quality of tone. To illustrate the anatomical descriptions, I have been 
able to add a series of new woodcuts, principally from Henle's Manual of Anatomy, 
with the author's permission, for which I here take the opportunity of publicly 
thanking him. 

vi 



PREFACE. vii 

I have made many changes in re-editing the section on the History of Music, 
and hope that I have improved its connection. I must, however, request the 
reader to regard this section as a mere compilation from secondary sources; I 
have neither time nor preliminary knowledge sufficient for original studies in this 
extremely difficult field. The older history of music to the commencement of 
Discant, is scarcely more than a confused heap of secondary subjects, while we 
can only make hypotheses concerning the principal matters in question. Of 
course, however, every theory of music must endeavour to bring some order into 
this chaos, and it cannot be denied that it contains many important facts. 

For the representation of pitch in just or natural intonation, I have abandoned 
the method originally proposed by Hauptmann, which was not sufficiently clear in 
involved cases, and have adopted the system of Herr A. von Oettingen [p. 276], 
as had already been done in M. 6. Gu^roult's French translation of this book. 

[A comparison of the Third with the Second editions, shewing the changes and additions 
individually, is here omitted.] 

If I may be allowed in conclusion to add a few words on the reception expe- 
rienced by the Theory of Music here propounded, I should say that published 
objections almost exclusively relate to my Theory of Consonance, as if this were 
the pith of the matter. Those who prefer mechanical explanations express their 
regret at my having left any room in this field for the action of artistic invention 
and esthetic inclination, and they have endeavoured to complete my system by 
new numerical speculations. Other critics with more metaphysical proclivities 
have rejected my Theory of Consonance, and with it, as they imagine, my whole 
Theory of Music, as too coarsely mechanical. 

I hope my critics will excuse me if I conclude from the opposite nature of 
their objections, that I have struck out nearly the right path. As to my Theory 
of Consonance, I must claim it to be a mere systematisation of observed facts 
(with the exception of the functions of the cochlea of the ear, which is moreover 
an hypothesis that may be entirely dispensed with). But I consider it a mistake 
to make the Theory of Consonance the essential foundation of the Theory of 
Music, and I had thought that this opinion was clearly enough expressed in my 
book. The essential basis of Music is Melody. Harmony has become to Western 
Europeans during the last three centuries an essential, and, to our present taste, 
indispensable means of strengthening melodic relations, but finely developed 
music existed for thousands of years and still exists in ultra-European nations, 
without any harmony at all. And to my metaphysico-esthetical opponents I must 
reply, that I cannot think I have undervalued the artistic emotions of the human 
mind in the Theory of Melodic Construction, by endeavouring to establish the 
physiological facts on which esthetic feeling is based. But to those who think I 
have not gone far enough in my physical explanations, I answer, that in the first 
place a natural philosopher is never bound to construct systems about everything 
he knows and does not know ; and secondly, that I should consider a theory which 
claimed to have shewn that all the laws of modern Thorough Bass were natural 
necessities, to stand condemned as having proved too much. 

Musicians have found most fault with the manner in which I have character- 
ised the Minor Mode. I must refer in reply to those very accessible documents, 
the musical compositions of a.d. 1500 to a.d. 1750, during which the modern 
Minor was developed. These will shew how slow and fluctuating was its develop- 
ment, and that the last traces of its incomplete state are still visible in the works 
of Sebastian Bach and Handel. 

HEiDEiiBKBO : May, 1870. 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 

TO THE 

FOURTH GERMAN EDITION. 

In the essential conceptions of musical relations I have found nothing to alter in 
this new edition. In this respect I can hut maintain what I have stated in the 
chapters containing them and in my preface to the third [German] edition. In 
details, however, much has been remodelled, and in some parts enlarged. As a 
guide for readers of former editions, I take the liberty to enumerate the following 
places containing additions and alterations.* 

P. 16d, Dote*. — On the French system of counting vibrations. 

P. 18a. — Appunn and Preyer, limits of the highest audible tones. 

Pp. 596 to 656. — On the circumstances under which we distinguish compound sensations. 

P. 76a, 6, c. — Comparison of the upper partial tones of the strings on a new and an old 
grand pianoforte. 

P. 88, note f. — Herr Clement Neumann's observations on the vibrational form of violin 
strings. 

Pp. 89a to 986. — The action of blowing organ-pipes. 

P. 1106. — Distinction of Ou from U. 

Pp. 1116 to 116a. — The various modifications in the sounds of vowels. 

P. 145a. — The ampullae and semicircular canals no longer considered as parts of the organ 
of hearing. 

P. 1476. — Waldeyer's and Preyer's measurements adopted. 

Pp. 1506 to 151d. — On the parts of the ear which perceive noise. 

P. 1596. — Koenig*s observations on combinational tones with tuning-forks. 

P. 176(2, note. — Preyer's observations on deepest tones. 

P. 179c. — Preyer's observation on the sameness of the quality of tones at the highest pitches. 

Pp. 208o to 204a. — Beats between upper partials of the same compound tone condition the 
preference of musical tones with harmonic upper partials. 

Pp. 828c to 8296. — Division of the Octave into 58 degrees. Bosanquet's harmonium. 

Pp. 888c to 8896. — Modulations through chords composed of two major Thirds. 

P. 865, note f. — Oettingen and Riemann's theory of the minor mode. 

P. 872. — Improved electro-magnetic driver of the siren. 

P. 878a. — Theoretical formulse for the pitch of resonators. 

P. 874c. — Use of a soap-bubble for seeing vibrations. 

Pp. S89d to 8966. — Later use of striking reeds. Theory of the blowing of pipes. 

Pp. 40dc to 4056. — Theoretical treatment of sympathetic resonance for noises. 

P. 417d. — A. Mayer's experiments on the audibility of vibrations. 

P. 428c. d, — Against the defenders of tempered intonation. 

P. 429. — Plan of Bosanquet's harmonium. 



Berlin : April, 1877. 



H. HELMHOLTZ. 



* [The pages of this edition are substituted first edition of this translation are mostly 
for the Qerman throughout these prefaces, pointed out in footnotes as they arise. — Trans- 
and omissions or alterations as respects the lator.] 



vui 



CONTENTS. 

*«* All passages and notes in [ ] are due to the Translator, and the Author Is in no 

way responsible for their contents. 

TbaisbiiATOb's NoncB to the Second English Edition, p. v. 
Authob's "Bbjeflgb to thb Fibst Qsbman Edition, p. vi. 
Authob's Pbbfacs to thb Thibd Gsbman Edition, pp. vi.-vii. 
Authob's Pbbface to the Fourth Gbbman Edition, p. viii. 

COKTSNTS, p. iz. 

List of Figubes, p. zv. 

liiBT OF Passages in Musical Notes, p. xvi. 

Ijist of Tables, p. xvii. 

INTRODUCTION, pp. 1-6. 

Belation of Musical Science to Acoustics, 1 

Distinction between Physical and Physiological Acoustics, 3 

Plan of the Investigation, 4 

PART I. (pp. 7-151). 

OH THE COMPOSITION OF TIBBATIONB. 

Upper Partial Tones, and Qtudities of Tone. 

CHAPTEE I. On the Sensation of Sound in General, pp. 8-25. 

Distinction between Noise and Musical Tone, 8 

Musical Tone due to Periodic, Noise to non- Periodic Motions in the air, 8 

General Property of Undulatory Motion : while Waves continually advance, the Panicles 

of the Medium through which they pass execute Periodic Motions, 9 
Difierences in Musical Tones due to Force, Pitch, and Quality, 10 
Force of Tone depends on Amplitude of Oscillation, Pitch on the length of the Period of 

Oscillation, 10-14 
Simple relations of Vibrational Numbers for the Consonant Intervals, 14 
Vibrational Numbers of Consonant Intervals calculated for the whole Scale, 17 
Quality of Tone must depend on Vibrational Form, 19 
Conception of and Graphical Representation of Vibrational Form, 20 
Harmonic Upper Partial Tones, 22 
Terms explained : Tone, Musical Tone, Simple Tone, Partial Tone, Compound Tone, Pitch 

of Compound Tone, 23 

CHAPTEE II. On the Composition of Vibrations, pp. 25-36. 

Composition of Waves illustrated by waves of water, 25 

The Heights of superimposed Waves of Water are to be added algebraically, 27 
Corresponding Superimposition of Waves of Sound in the air, 28 

ix 



X CONTENTS. 

A Composite Mass of Musical Tones will give rise to a Periodic Vibration when their Pitch 

Numbers are Multiples of the same Number, 80 
Every such Composite Mass of Tones may be considered to be composed of Simple 

Tones, 88 
This Composition corresponds, according to G. S. Ohm, to the Composition of a Musioai 

Tone from Simple Partial Tones, 88 

CHAPTEE III. Analysis of Musical Tones by Sympathetic Eb- 

soNANCE, pp. 36-49. 

Explanations of the Mechanics of Sympathetic Vibration, 86 

Sympathetic Besonance occurs when the exciting vibrations contain a Simple Vibration 

corresponding to one of the Proper Vibrations of the Sympathising Body, 88 
Difference in the Sympathetic Besonance of Tuning-forks and Membranes, 40 
Descriptions of Besonators for the more accurate Analysis of Musical Tones, 48 
Sympathetic Vibration of Strings, 45 
Objective Existence of Partial Tones, 48 

CHAPTEE IV. On the Analysis of Musical Tones by the Ear, 

pp. 49-65. 

Methods for observing Upper Partial Tones, 49 

Proof of G. S. Ohm's Law by means of the tones of Plucked Strings, of the Simple Tones 

of Tuning-forks, and of Resonators, 51 
Difference between Compound and Simple Tones, 56 
Seebeck's Objections against Ohm's Law, 58 
The Difficulties experienced in perceiving Upper Partial Tones analytically depend upon a 

peculiarity common to all human sensations, 59 
We practice observation on sensation only to the extent necessary for clearly apprehending 

the external world, 62 
Analysis of Compound Sensations, 68 

CHAPTEE V. On the Differences in the Quality of Musical 

Tones, pp. 65-119. 

Noises heard at the beginning or end of Tones, such as Consonants in Speech, or during 
Tones, such as Wind rushes on Pipes, not included in the Musical Quality of Tone» 
which refers to the uniformly continuous musical sound, 65 

Limitation of the conception of Musical Quality of Tone, 68 

Investigation of the Upper Partial Tones which are present in different Musical Qualities 
of Tone, 69 

1. Musical Tones without Upper Partial s, 69 

2. Musical Tones with Inharmonic Upper Partials, 70 

3. Musical Tones of Strings, 74 

Strings excited by Striking, 74 

Theoretical Intensity of the Partial Tones of Strings, 79 

4. Musical Tones of Bowed Instruments, 80 

5. Musical Tones of Flute or Flue Pipes, 88 

6. Musical Tones of Reed Pipes, 95 

7. Vowel Qualities of Tone, 108 

Results for the Character of Musical Tones in general, 118 

CHAPTEE VI. On the Apprehension of Qualities of Tone, 

pp. 119-151. 

Does Quality of Tone depend on Difference of Phase ? 119 

Electro-magnetic Apparatus for answering this question, 121 

Artificial Vowels produced by Tuning-forks, 123 

How to produce Difference of Phase, 125 

Musical Quality of Tone independent of Difference of Phase, 126 

Artificial Vowels produced by Organ Pipes, 128 

The Hypothesis that a Series of Sympathetical Vibrators exist in the ear, explains its 
peculiar apprehension of Qualities of Tone, 129 

Description of the parts of the internal ear which are capable of vibrating sympa- 
thetically, 129 

Damping of Vibrations in the Ear, 142 

Supposed Function of the Cochlea, 145 



CONTENTS. xi 



PART 11. (pp. 152-233). 

ON THE INT BBRUPTIONS OP HARMONY. 

Combinatumfd Tones and Beats, Consonance and Dissonance. 

CHAPTEE VIL Combinational Tones, pp. 152-159. 

Combinational Tones arise when Vibrations which are not of infinitesimal magnitude are 

combined, 152 
Description of Combinational Tones, 158 
Law determining their Pitch Numbers, 154 
Combinational Tones of different orders, 155 

Difference of the strength of Combinational Tones on different instruments, 157 
Occasional Generation of Combinational Tones in the ear itself, 158 

CHAPTEE VIII. On the Beats of Simple Tones, pp. 159-173. 

Interference of Two Simple Tones of the same pitch, 160 
Description of the Polyphonic Siren, for experiments on Interference, 161 
Reinforcement or Enteeblement of Sound, due to difference of Phtkse. 168 
Interference gives rise to Beats when the Pitch of the two Tones is slightly different, 164 
Law for the Number of Beats, 165 
Visible Beats on Bodies vibrating sympathetically, 166 
Limits of Rapidity of Audible Beats, 167 

• 

CHAPTEE IX. Deep and Deepest Tones, pp. 174-179. 

Former Investigations were insufficient, because there was a possibility of the ear being 
deceived by Upper Partial Tones, as is shewn by the number of Beats on the Siren, 174 

Tones of less than thirty Vibrations in a second fall into a Drone, of which it is nearly 
or quite impossible to determine the Pitch, 175 

Beats of the Higher Upper Partials of one and the same Deep Compound Tone, 178 

CHAPTEE X. Beats of the Upper Partial Tones, pp. 179-197. 

Any two Partial Tones of any two Compound Tones may beat if they are sufficiently 
near in pitch, but if they are of the same pitch there will be consonance, 179 

Series of the different Consonances, in order of the Distinctness of their Delimitation, 183 

Number of Beats which arise from Mistuning Consonances, and their effect in producing 
Roughness, 184 

Discurbance of any Consonance by the adjacent Consonances, 186 

Order of Consonances in respect to Harmoniousness, 188 

CHAPTEE XI. Beats dub to Combinational Tones, pp. 197-211. 

The Differential Tones of the first order generated by two Partial Tones are capable of 
producing very distinct beats, 197 

Differential Tones of higher orders produce weaker beats, even in the case of simple gener- 
ating tones, 199 

Influence of Quality of Tone on the Harshness of Dissonances and the Harmoniousness 
of Consonances, 205 

CHAPTEE XII. Chords, pp. 211-233. 

Consonant Triads, 211 

Major and Minor Triads distinguished by their Combinational Tones, 214 
Relative Harmoniousness of Chords in different Inversions and Positions, 218 
Retrospect on Preceding Investigations, 226 



xii CONTENTS. 



PART III. (pp. 234-371). 

THE RELATIONSHIP OF MUSICAL TONES. 

Scales and Tonality. 

CHAPTEE XIII. General View of the Different Principles 

OF Musical Style in the Development of 
Music, pp. 234-249. 

Difference between the Physical and the Esthetical Method, 234 

Scales, Keys, and Harmonic Tissues depend upon esthetic Principles of Style as well as 

Physical Causes, 235 
Illustration from the Styles of Architecture, 285 
Three periods of Music have to be distinguished, 236 

1. Homophonic Music, 287 

2. Polyphonic Music, 244 
8. Harmonic Music, 246 

CHAPTER XIV. The Tonality of Homophonic Music, pp. 250-290. 

Esthetical Reason for Progression by Intervals, 250 

Tonal Relationship in Melody depends on the identity of two partial tones, 258 

The Octave, FHfth, and Fourth were thus first discovered, 253 

Variations in Thirds and Sixths, 255 

Scales of Five Tones, used by Chinese and Gaels, 258 

The Chromatic and Enharmonic Scales of the Greeks, 262 

The Pythagorean Scales of Seven tones, 266 

The Greek and Ecclesiastical Tonal Modes, 267 

Early Ecclesiastical Modes, 272 

The Rational Construction of the Diatonic Scales by the principle of Tonal Relationship in 

the first and second degrees gives the five Ancient Melodic Scales, 272 
Introduction of a more Accurate Notation for Pitch, 276 

Peculiar discovery of natural Thirds in the Arabic and Persian Tonal Systems, 280 
The meaning of the Leading Note and consequent alterations in the Modem Scales, 285 

CHAPTER XV The Consonant Chords of the Tonal Modes, pp. 

290-309. 

Chords as the Representatives of compound Musical Tones with peculiar qualities, 290 
Reduction of all Tones to the closest relationship in the popular harmonies of the Major 

Mode, 292 
Ambiguity of Minor Chords, 294 

The Tonic Chord as the centre of the Sequence of Chords, 296 
Relationship of Chords of the Scale, 297 
The Major and Minor Modes are best suited for Harmonisation of all the Ancient Modes, 

298 
Modem Remnants of the old Tonal Modes, S06 

CHAPTER XVI. The System of Keys, pp. 310-330. 

Relative and Absolute Character of the different Keys, 310 

Modulation leads to Tempering the Intonation of the Intervals, 312 

Haupt'mann's System admits of a Simplification which makes its Realisation more Prao 

ticable, 315 , 

Description of an Harmonium with Just Intonation, 816 
Disadvantages of Tempered Intonation, 822 
Modulation for Just Intonation, 327 



CONTENTS. xiii 

CHAPTEE XVn. Of Discords, pp. 330-350. 

Enumeration of the Diasonant Intervals in the Soale, 831 

Dissonant Triads, 838 

Chords of the Seventh, 841 

Conception of the Dissonant Note in a Discord, 346 

Discoi^s as representatives of compound tones, 847 

CHAPTER XVIII. Laws of Progression of Parts, pp. 350-362. 

The Musical Connection of the Notes in a Melody, 850 

Consequent Rules for the Progression of Dissonant Notes, 358 

Resolution of Discords, 854 

Choral Sequences and Resolution of Chords of the Seventh, 355 

Prohibition of Consecutive Fifths and Octaves, 859 

Hidden Fifths and Octaves, 861 

False Relations, 861 

CHAPTER XIX. EsTHETicAL Relations, pp. 362-371. 

Review of Results obtained, 362 

Law of Unconscious Order in Works of Art, 866 

The Law of Melodic Succession depends on Sensation, not on Consciousness, 868 

And similarly for Consonance and Dissonance, 869 

Conclusion, 871 



APPENDICES, pp. 327-556. 

I. On an Electro-Magnetic Driving Machine for the Siren, 872 

IL On the Size and Construction of Resonators, 872 

III. On the Motion of Plucked Strings, 874 

IV. On the Production of Simple Tones by Resonance, 877 
y. On the Vibrational Forms of Pianoforte Strings, 880 

VI. Analysis of the Motion of Violin Strings, 884 

VII. On the Theory of Pipes, 888 

A. Influence of Resonance on Reed Pipes, 388 

B. Theory of the Blowing of Pipes, 890 

I. The Blowing of Reed Pipes, 390 
[I. The Blowing of Flue Pipes, 894 
[Additions by Translator, 896] 

Vin. Practical Directions for Performing the Experiments on the Composition of Vowels, 
898 

IX. On the Phases of Waves caused by Resonance, 400 

X. Relation between the Strength of Sympathetic Resonance and the Length of Time 
required for the Tone to die away, 405 

XI. Vibrations of the Membrana Basilaris in the Cochlea, 406 

Xn. Theory of Combinational Tones, 411 

XIII. Description of the Mechanism employed for opening the several Series of Holes in 
the Polyphonic Siren, 418 

XrV. Variation in the Pitch of Simple Tones that Beat, 414 

XV. Calculation of the Intensity of the Beats of Different Intervals, 415 

XVI. On Beats of Combinational Tones, and on Combinational Tones in the Siren and 
Harmonium, 418 

XVII. Plan for Justly-Toned Instruments with a Single Manual, 421 

XVIII. Just Intonation in Singing, 422 

XIX. Plan of Mr. Bosanquet's Manual, 429 

[XX. Additions by the Translator, 430-556 

*«* See separate Tables of Contents prefixed to each Section. 
[Sbct. a. On Temperament, 430 
[Sect. B. On the Determination of Pitch Numbers, 441 



1 



xiT CONTENTS. 

[App. XX. Additions by the Translator — conUnued. 

*«* See separate Tablet of Contents prefixed to each Section. 

[SscT. C. On the Galcalation of Gents from Interval Ratios, 446 

[Sbct. D. Musical Intervals, not exceeding an Octave, arranged in order of Width, 

461 

[SscT. £. On Musical Duodenes, or the Development of Jost Intonation for 

Harmony, 457 

[Skct. F. Experimental Instruments for exhibiting the effects of Just Intonation, 

466 

[Skct. G. On Tuning and Intonation, 483 

[Sbct. H. The History of Musical Pitch in Europe, 498 

[SscT. K. Non-Harmonic Scales, 514 

[Skct. L. Recent Work on Beats and Combinational Tones, 527 

[Sbct. M. Analysis and Synthesis of Vowel Sounds, 588 

[Sbct. N. Miscellaneous Notes, 544 

[INDEX, 567-576] 



LIST OF FIGURES. 



1. Seebeck*8 Siren, lie 

2, 3, 4. Gagniard de la Tour's Siren, 126 

5. Tuning-fork tracing its Curve, 206 

6. Curve traced in Phonautograph, 20d 

7. Curve of Simple Vibration, 216 

8. Curve of Motion of Hammer moved by 

Water-wheel, 21c 

9. Curve of Motion of Ball struck up on 

its descent, 21c 
10. Reproduction of fig. 7, 23(2. 
IL Curve shewing the Composition of a 

simple note and its Octave in two 

different phases, 306, c 

12. Curve shewing the Composition of a 

simple note and its Twelfth in two 
different phases, 326 

13. Tuning-fork on Resonance Box, 40a 

14. Forms of Vibration of a Circular Mem- 

brane, 40c, d 

15. Pendulum excited by a membrane 

covering a bottle, 42a 

16. a. Spherical Resonator, 436 
b. Cylindrical Resonator, 43c 

17. Forms of Vibration of Strings, 46a, 6 

18. Forms of Vibration of a String de- 

flected by a Point, 54a. 6 

19. Action of such a String on a Sounding- 

board, 54c 

20. Bottle and Blow-tube for producing a 

simple Tone, 60c 
2L. Sand figures on circular elastic plates, 

71c 
22. The Vibration Microscope, 816 
28. Vibrations as seen in the Vibration 

Microscope, 826 

24. Vibrational Forms for the middle of a 

violin string, 886 

25. Crumples on the vibrational form of a 

violin string, 846 

26. Gradual development of Octave on a 

violin string bowed near the bridge, 
856 

27. An open wooden and stopped metal 

organ flue-pipe, 88 

28. Free reed or Harmonium vibrator, 956 

29. Free and striking reed on an organ 

pipe partly in section, 96a, 6 
80. Membranous double reed, 97a 
31. Reproduction of fig. 12, 120a, 6 
S2. Fork with electro-magnetic exciter, and 

sliding resonance box with a lid 

(artificial vowels), 1216 



33. Fork with electro-magnet to serve as 

interrupter of the current (artificial 
vowels), 1226 

34. Appearance of figures seen through the 

vibration microscope by two forks 
when the phase changes but the 
tuning is correct, 126d 

35. The same when the tuning is slightly 

altered, 127a 
86. Construction of the ear, general view, 
with meatus auditorius, labyrinth, 
cochlea, and Eustachian tube, 129c 

37. The three auditory ossicles, hammer, 

anvil, and stirrup, in their relative 
positions, 130c 

38. Two views of the hammer of the ear, 

1316 
89. Left temporal bone of a newly-bom 
child with the auditory ossicles in 
situ, 131c 

40. Right drumskin with hammer seen 

from the inside, 131c 

41. Two views of the right anvil, 133a 

42. Three views of the right stirrup, 134a 

43. A, left labyrinth from without. B, 

right labyrinth from within. C, 
left labyrinth from above, 1366, c 

44. Utriculus and membranous semicir- 

cular canals (left side) seen from 
without, lS7a 

45. Bony cochlea (right side) opened in 

front, 137c, d 

46. Transverse section of a spire of a 

cochlea which has been softened 
in hydrochloric acid, 138a, 6 

47. Max Schultze's hairs on the internal 

surface of the epithelium in the 
ampullcB, 138c, d 

48. Expansion of the coohlean nerve, 139c 

49. Corti's membrane, 140a, 6, c 

50. Corti's rods or arches separate, 140d 

51. Corti's rods or arches in situ, 1416, c 

52. Diagram of the law of decrease of sym- 

pathetic resonance, 144c, d 

53. Interference of similarly disposed 

waves, 1606 

54. Interference of dissimilarly disposed 

waves, 160c 

55. Lines of silence of a tuning-fork, 

161c 

56. The Polyphonic Siren, 162 

57. Diagram of origin of beats, 165a 



XV 



XVI 



LIST OF PASSAGES IN MUSICAL NOTES. 



5S. Phonautographio representation of 
beats, 166a 

59. Identical with fig. 62 but now taken to 

shew the intensity of beats excited 
by tones making different intervals, 
172c 

60. A and B. Diagram of the comparative 

roughness of intervals in the first 
and second octaves, 1986, c 

61. Diagram of the roughness of dissonant 

intervals, SSSa 

62. Reproduction of fig. 24 A, p. 8856 

68. Diagram of the motion of a violin 
string, 387c 



64. Diagram of the ambngements for the 

experiments on the composition of 
vowels, 8995, c 

65. Mechanism for opening the several 

series of holes in the Polyphonic 
Siren, 414a 

66. Section, Elevation, and Plan of Mr. 

Bosanquet^s Manual, 429 

In Additions by Translator, 

67. Perspective view of Mr. Colin Brown's 

Fingerboard, 47id 

68. Perspective view, 69 plan, 70 section 

of Mr. H. W. Poole's Keyboard, 475 



LIST OF PASSAGES IN MUSICAL NOTES. 



The small octave. 15d 

The once and twice accented octave, 16a, b 

The great octave, 166 

The first 16 Upper Partials of C66, 22c 

The first 8 Upper Partials of C132, 50a 

Prof. Helmholtz's Vowel Besonances, llQib 

First differential tones of the usual har- 
monic intervals, 1546 

Differential tones of different orders of the 
usual harmonic intervals, 1556, c 

Summational tones of the usual harmonic 
intervals, 156a 

Examples of beating partials, 180c 

Coincident partials of the principal con- 
sonant intervals, IQSd 

Coincident converted into beating partials 
by altering pitch of upper tone, 186c 

Examples of intervals in which a pair of 
partials beat 38 times in a second, 192a 

Major Triads with their Combinational 
Tones, 215a 

Minor Triads with their Combinational 
Tones, 2156 

Consonant Intervals and their Combina- 
tional Tones, 218c 

The most Perfect Positions of the Major 
Triads, 219c 

The less Perfect Positions of the Major 
Triads, 220c 

The most Perfect Positions of the Minor 
Triads, 2216 

The less Perfect Positions of the Minor 
Triads, 221c 



The most Perfect Positions of Major 

Tetrads within the Compass of Two 

Octaves, 228c 
Best Positions of Minor Tetrads with their 

false Combinational Tones, 224a 
Ich bin spatzieren gegangen^ 2886 
Sic canta commas 2896 
Palestrina's Stabat Mater, first 4 bar*), 

247c 
Chinese air after Barrow, 260a 
Cockle Shells, older form, 2606 
Blythe, blythe, and merry are we, 261a 
Chinese temple hymn after Bitschurin, 2616 
Braes of BaXquhidder, 261c 
Five Forms of Closing Chords, 291c 
Two complete closes, 29dc 
Mode of the Fourth, three forms of com- 
plete cadence, S02(j 
Concluding bars of S. Bach's Chorale, Woa 

mein Ootl will, das gescheh" allzeit, 8046 
End of S. Bach's Hymn, Veni redemptor 

gentium, 305a 
Doric cadence from Aiid with His stripes 

we are healed, in Haudel's Messiah, 307a 
Doric cadence from Hear, Jacob's God, in 

Handel's Samson, 3076 
Examples of False Minor Triad, 340a 
Examples of Hidden Fifths, S6ld 
Example of Duodenals, 465c 
Mr. H. W. Poole's method of fingering and 

treatment of the harmonic Seventh, 477a 
Mr. H. W. Poole's Double Diatonic or Di- 

chordal Scale in G with accidentals, 478a 



LIST OF TABLES. 



Pitch Numbers of Notes in Just Major 

Scale, 17a 
[Scale of Harmonica], 17c, d] 
[Analogies of notes of the piano and colours 

of the Spectrum, ISd'] 
Pitch of the different forms of vibration of 

a circular membrane, 41c 
Relative Pitch Numbers of the prime and 
proper tones of a rod free at both ends, 
56a 
Proper Tones of circular elastic plates, 72a 
Proper Tones of Bells, 72c 
Proper Tones of Stretched Membranes, 736 
Theoretical Intensity of the Partial Tones 

of Strings, 79c 
[Velocity in Sound in tubes of different 

diameters — Blaikley, 90d] 
[Partials of B^ Clarinet— Blaikley, 99c] 
[Harmonics of E\f horn, 99d] 
[Ck>mpa88 of Registers of male and female 

voices — Behnke, lOld] 
Vowel trigram — Du Bois Raymond, senior, 

1056 
Vowel Resonances according to Helmholtz 

and Donders, 1096 
[Vowel Resonances according to (1) Reyher, 
(2) Hellwag, (8) Fldrcke, (4) Donders after 
Helmholtz, (5) Donders after Merkel, 
(6) Helmholtz, (7) Merkel, (8) Koenig, 
(9) Trautmann, 109d] 
Willis's Vowel Resonances, 117c 
[Relative force of the partials for producing 

different vowels, 124dJ 
Relation of Strength of Resonance to 

Alterations of Phase, 125a 
Difference of pitch, &c., necessary to reduce 
sympathetic vibration to ^ of that pro- 
duced by perfect unisonance, 14da 
Numbers from which fig. 52 was constructed, 

145a 
Measurements of the basilar membrane in 

a new-bom child, 145c 
Alteration of size of Gorti^s rods as they 
approach the vertex of the cochlSa, 145d 
[Preyer*s distinguishable and undistin- 

guishable intervals, 147(2] 
First differential tones of the usual har- 
monic intervals, 154a 
[Differential tones of different orders of the 

usual harmonic intervals, 156d] 
Different intervals which would give 88 
beats of their primes, 172a 



[Pitch numbers of Appunn*8 bass reeds, 

1776] 
[Experiments on audibility of very deep 

tones, 177c] 
(Coincident partials for the principal con- 
sonances, 188a 
Pitch numbers of the primes which make 

consonant intervals with a tone of 800 

vib., 184c 
Beating partials of the notes in the last 

table with a note of 801 vib., and number 

of beats, IQid 
Disturbance of a consonance by altering 

one of its tones by a Semitone, 18tc 
Influence of different consonances on each 

other, 1876 
[Upper partials of a just Fifth, lB8d] 
[Upper partials of an altered Fifth, 169c] 
[Comparison of the upper partials of a 

Fourth and Eleventh, major Sixth and 

major Thirteenth, minor Sixth and 

minor Thirteenth, 189d and 1906, c] 
[Comparison of the upper partials of a 

major and a minor Third, 190d] 
[Comparison of the upper partials of all 

the usual consonances, pointing out 

those which beat, 1916, c] 
[Comparison of the upper partials of 

septimal consonances, involving the 

seventh partial, and pointing out which 

beat, 195c, d] 
[General Table of the first 16 harmonics of 

C66, shewing how they affect each other 

in any combination, 197c, d] 
Table of partials of 200 and 801, shewing 

their differential tones, 198c 
Table of possible triads, shewing consonant, 

dissonant, and septimal intervals, 2126, c 
Table of consonant triads, 214a 
[The first 16 harmonics of C, 2Ud] 
[Calculation of the Combinational Tones of 

the Major Triads, 214^1 
[Most of the first 40 harmonics of A^^}y, 215c] 
[Calculation of the Combinational Tones of 

the Minor Triads, 215d] 
[Calculation of the Differential Tones of 

the Major Triads in their most perfect 

Positions, 219(2] 
[Calculation of the Combinational Tones 

of the Major Triads in the less Perfect 

Positions, 220d] 
[Calculation of the Combinational Tones of 



zvii 



XVUl 



LIST OF TABLES. 



the Minor Triads in the most and less 

Perfect Positions of the Minor Triads, 

221d, d'] 
[Calculation of the false Combinational 

Tones of Minor Tetrads in their best 

positions, 22id] 
Ecclesiastioal Modes, 245c, d 
Partial Tones of the Tonic, 257a 
[Pentatonic Scales, 269c, d] 
[Tetrachords 1 to 8, with intervals in 

cents, 268^'] 
Greek Diatonic Scales, 267c 
[Greek Diatonic Scales with the intervals 

in cents, 268c] 
[Greek Diatonic Scales reduced to begin- 
ning with c, with the intervals in cents, 

2e8d'] 
Greek Modes with the Greek Ecclesiastical 

and Helmholtzian names, 269a 
Later Greek Scale, 270a 
Tonal Keys, 270c 
Ecclesiastical Scales of Ambrose of Milan, 

2716, c 
The Five Melodic Tonal Modes, 2726 
[The Seven Ascending and Descending 

Scales, compared with Greek, with inter- 
vals in cents, 274c, d] 
[The different scales formed by a dif- 
ferent choice of the intercalary tones, 

277c', d'] 
The Five Modes with variable intercalary 

tones, 276a, 6 
[J. Curwen*s characters of the tones in 

the major scale, 2796, c] 
[Arabic Scale in relation to the major 

Thirds. 281<J'J 
Arabic Scales, 2d26-263c 
[Prof. Land's account of the 12 Arabic 

Scales, 284 note] 
Five Modes as formed from three chords 

each, 298<2, 294a 
The same with double intercalary tones, 

297c, d 
The same, final form, 2986, c 
Triohordal Relations of the Tonal Modes, 

809d 
[Thirds and Sixths in Just, Equal, and 

Pythagorean Intonation compared, 818c] 
[Combinational Tones of Just, Equal, and 

Pythagorean Intonation compared, 8 L4(2] 
The Chordal System of Prof. Helmholtz's 

Just Harmonium, S16c 
[Duodenary statement of the tones on Prof. 

Helmholtz's Just Harmonium, 817c, d] 
The Chordal System of the minor keys 

on Prof. Helmholtz's Just Harmonium, 

818a, 6, d 
[Table of the relation of the Cycle of 53 to 

Just Intonation, 8296, c] 
[Tabular Expression of the Diagram, fig. 

61, 882] 
[Table of Roughness, 3SBd] 



Measurements of Glass Resonatois, 878c 

Measurements of resonance tubes men- 
tioned on p. 55a, 877d 

Table of tones of a conical pipe of zino, 
calculated from formula 898c [with sub- 
sidiary tables, 39Bd and 894c] 

Table of Mayer's observations on numbers 
of beats, 418a 

Table of four stops for a single manual 
justly intoned instrument, 421c 

Table of five stops for the same, 422a 

In the Additions by Translator. 

Table of Pythagorean Intonation, 4886, c 
Table of Meantone Intonation, 4846 
Table of Equal Intonation, 4S7c, d 
Synonymity of Equal Temperament, 4886 
Synonymity of Mr. Bosanquet's Notes in 

Fifths, 439a 
Notes of Mr. Bosanquet's Cycle of 58 in 

order of Pitch, 4896, c, d 
Expression of Just Intonation in the Cycle 

of 1200. p. 440 
Principal Table for calculation of cents, 

450a, Auxiliary Tables, 451a 
Table of Intervals not exceeding one Octave, 

4586 
Unevenly numbered Harmonics up to the 

63rd, 467a 
Number of any Interval not exceeding a 

Tritone, contained in an Octave, 457c 
Harmonic Duodene or Unit of Modulation, 

461a 
The DuodenarTum, 468a 
Fingerboard of the Harmonical, first four 

Octaves, with scheme, 4676, fifth Octave, 

468c^ 
Just Harmonium scheme, 470a 
Just English Concertina scheme, 4706 
Mr. Colin Brown's Voice Harmonium 

Fingerboard and scheme, 471a 
Rev. Henry Listen's Organ and scheme, 

4736 
Gen. Perronet Thompson's Organ scheme, 

478d 
Mr. H. Ward Poole's 100 tones, 474c 
Mr. H. W. Poole's scheme for keys of F, 

C, G, 476a 
Mr. Bosanquet's Generalised Keyboard, 

480 
Expression of the degrees of the 58 divi- 
sion by multiples of 2, 5 and 7, p. 481c 
Typographical Plan of Mr. J. Paul White's 

Fingerboard, 4826 
Specimens of tuning in Meantone Tem- 
perament, 484c 
Specimens of tuning in Equal Tempera- 
ment, 4856 
Pianoforte Tuning— Fourths and Fifths 

485<2 
Cornu and Mercadier's observation on 

Violin Intonation, 486c to 4876 



LIST OF TABLES. 



Scheme for tuning in Equal Temperament, 
4896 

Proof of rule for tuning in Equal Tempera- 
ment, 490c, d 

Proof of rule for tuning in Meantone Tem- 
perament, 492a 

Historical Pitches in order from Lowest to 
Highest, 495a to 604a 

Classified Index to the last Table, 5046 to 
5116 

Effects of the length of the foot in differ- 
ent countries on the pitch of organs, 
512a 

Non-harmonic scales, 514e to 519c 



Vowel sound * Oh t ' Analysis at various 

pitches by Messrs. Jenkin & Ewing, 539d 

to 5416 
Vowel sounds * oo,* * awe,' * ah,* analysis at 

various pitches by Messrs. Jenkin & 

Ewing, p. 541c, d 
Mean and actual Compass of the Human 

Voice, 545a, 6, c 
True Tritonic, False Tritonic, Zarlino's, 

Meantone and Equal Temperaments, 

compared, 548a 
Presumed Characters of Major and Minor 

Keys, 551a, b 



INTRODUCTION. 



In the present work an attempt will be made to connect the boundaries 
of two sciences, which, although drawn towards each other by many 
natural affinities, have hitherto remained practically distinct — I mean the 
boundaries of physical and physiological acoustics on the one side, and of 
musical science and esthetics on the other. . The class of readers addressed 
will, consequently, have had very different cultivation, and will be affected 
by very different interests. It will therefore not be superfluous for the 
author at the outset distinctly to state his intention in undertaking the 
work, and the aim he has sought to attain. The horizons of physics, 
philosophy, and art have of late been too widely separated, and, as a 
consequence, the language, the methods, and the aims of any one of these 
studies present a certain amount of difficulty for the student of any other U 
of them ; and possibly this is the principal cause why the problem here 
undertaken has not been long ago more thoroughly considered and advanced 
towards its solution. 

It is true that acoustics constantly employs conceptions and names 
borrowed from the theory of harmony, and speaks of the * scale,' ' intervals,* 
' consonances,' and so forth ; and similarly, manuals of Thorough Bass 
generally begin with a physical chapter which speaks of * the numbers of 
vibrations,' and fixes their * ratios ' for the different intervals ; but, up to 
the present time, this apparent connection of acoustics and music has been 
wholly external, and may be regarded rather as an expression given to the 
feeling that such a connection must exist, than as its actual formulation. 
Physical knowledge may indeed have been useful for musical instrument 
makers, but for the development and foundation of the theory of harmony H 
it has hitherto been totally barren. And yet the essential facts within the 
field here to be explained and turned to account, have been known from the 
earliest times. Even Pythagoras (fl. circa B.C. 540-510) knew that when 
strings of different lengths but of the same make, and subjected to the 
same tension, were used to give the perfect consonances of the Octave, 
Fifth, or Fourth, their lengths must be in the ratios of 1 to 2, 2 to 3, or 
3 to 4 respectively, and if, as is probable, his knowledge was partly derived 
from the Egyptian priests, it is impossible to conjecture in what remote 
antiquity this law was first known. Later physics has extended the law of 
Pythagoras by passing from the lengths of strings to the number of vibra- 
tions, and thus making it appUcable to the tones of all musical instruments, 
and the numerical relations 4 to 5 and 5 to 6 have been added to the above 



2 PLAN OF THE WORK. introd. 

for the less perfect consonances of the major and minor Thirds, but I am 
not aware that any real step was ever made towards answering the ques- 
tion : What have musical consonances to do with the ratios of the first six 
numbers f Musicians, as well as philosophers and physicists, have generally 
contented themselves with saying in effect that human minds were in some 
unknown manner so constituted as to discover the numerical relations of 
musical vibrations, and to have a peculiar pleasure in contemplating simple 
ratios which are readily comprehensible. 

Meanwhile musical esthetics has made unmistakable advances in those 
points which depend for their solution rather on psychological feehng than 
on the action of the senses, by introducing the conception of movement in 

H the examination of musical works of art. E. Hanslick, in his book On the 
Beautiful in Music {Ueber das musikalisch Schone), triumphantly attacked 
the false standpoint of exaggerated sentimentality, from which it was 
fashionable to theorise on music, and referred the critic to the simple 
elements of melodic movement. The esthetic relations for the structure of 
musical compositions, and the characteristic differences of individual forms 
of composition are explained more fully in Vischer's Esthetics (Aesthetik), 
In the inorganic world the kind of motion we see, reveals the kind of moving 
force in action, and in the last resort the only method of recognising and 
measuring the elementary powers of nature consists in determining the 
motions they generate, and this is also the case for the motions of bodies 
or of voices which take place under the influence of human feelings. Hence 

iT the properties of musical movements which possess a graceful, dallying, or 
a heavy, forced, a dull, or a powerful, a quiet, or excited character, and so 
on, evidently chiefly depend on psychological action. In the same way 
questions relating to the equilibrium of the separate parts of a musical 
composition, to their development from one another and their connection 
as one clearly intelligible whole, bear a close analogy to similar questions 
in architecture. But all such investigations, however fertile they may have 
been, cannot have been otherwise than imperfect and uncertain, so long as 
they were without their proper origin and foundation, that is, so long as 
there was no scientific foundation for their elementary rules relating to the 
construction of scales, chords, keys and modes, in short, to all that is 
usually contained in works on * Thorough Bass '. In this elementary region 

fl we have to deal not merely with unfettered artistic inventions, but with the. 
natural power of immediate sensation. Music stands in a much closer 
connection with pure sensation than any of the other arts. The latter 
rather deal with what the senses apprehend, that is with the images of 
outward objects, collected by psychical processes from immediate sensation. 
Poetry aims most distinctly of all at merely exciting the formation of 
images, by addressing itself especially to imagination and memory, and it 
is only by subordinate auxiliaries of a more musical kind, such as rhythm, 
and imitations of sounds, that it appeals to the immediate sensation of 
hearing. Hence its effects depend mainly on psychical action. The plastic 
arts, although they make use of the sensation of sight, address the eye 
almost in the same way as poetry addresses the ear. Their main purpose 
is to excite in us the image of an external object of determinate form and 
colour. The spectator is essentially intended to interest himself in this 



nrcBOD. 



PLAN OF THE WORK. 3 



image, and enjoy its beauty ; not to dwell upon the means by which it was 
created. It must at least be allowed that the pleasure of a connoisseur or 
virtuoso in the constructive art shown in a statue or a picture, is not an 
essential element of artistic enjoyment. 

It is only in painting that we fijid colour as an element which is directly 
appreciated by sensation, without any intervening act of the intellect. On 
the contrary, in music, the sensations of tone are the material of the art. 
So far as these sensations are excited in music, we do not create out of 
them any images of external objects or actions. Again, when in hearing a 
concert we recognise one tone as due to a violin and another to a clarinet, 
our artistic enjoyment does not depend upon our conception of a violin or 
clarinet, but solely on our hearing of the tones they produce, whereas the ^ 
artistic enjoyment resulting from viewing a marble statue does not depend 
on the white light which it reflects into the eye, but upon the mental image 
of the beautiful human form which it calls up. In this sense it is clear 
that music has a more immediate connection with pure sensation than any 
other of the fine arts, and, consequently, that the theory of the sensations 
of hearing is destined to play a much more important part in musical 
esthetics, than, for example, the theory of chiaroscuro or of perspective in 
painting. Those theories are certainly useful to the artist, as means for 
attaining the most perfect representation of nature, but they have no part 
in the artistic effect of his work. In music, on the other hand, no such 
perfect representation of nature is aimed at ; tones and the sensations of 
tone exist for themselves alone, and produce their effects independently f 
of anything behind them. 

This theory of the sensations of hearing belongs to natural science, and 
comes in the first place xmAer physiological acoustics. Hitherto it is the 
physical part of the theory of sound that has been almost exclusively treated 
at length, that is, the investigations refer exclusively to the motions produced 
by sohd, liquid, or gaseous bodies when they occasion the sounds which the 
ear appreciates. This physical acoustics is essentially nothing but a section 
of the theory of the motions of elastic bodies. It is physically indifferent 
whether observations are made on stretched strings, by means of spirals of 
brass wire (which vibrate so slowly that the eye can easily follow their 
motions, and, consequently, do not excite any sensation of sound), or by 
means of a violin string (where the eye can scarcely perceive the vibrations f 
which the ear readily appreciates). The laws of vibratory motion are pre- 
cisely the same in both cases ; its rapidity or slowness does not affect the 
laws themselves in the slightest degree, although it compels the observer to 
apply different methods of observation, the eye for one and the ear for 
the other. In physical acoustics, therefore, the phenomena of hearing are 
taken into consideration solely because the ear is the most convenient and 
handy means of observing the more rapid elastic vibrations, and the physi- 
cist is compelled to study the peculiarities of the natural instrument which 
he is employing, in order to control the correctness of its indications. In 
this way, although physical acoustics, as hitherto pursued, has, undoubtedly, 
collected many observations and much knowledge concerning the action 
of the ear, which, therefore, belong to physiological a^coustics, these results 
were not the principal object of its investigations ; they were merely second- 

b2 



4 PLAN OF THE WORK. nrrROD. 

ary and isolated facts. The only justification for devoting a separate chapter 
to acoustics in the theory of the motions of elastic bodies, to which it 
essentiaUy belongs, is, that the application of the ear as an instrument 
of research influenced the nature of the experiments and the methods of 
observation. 

But in addition to dkphysical there is a physiological theory of acoustics^ 
the aim of which is to investigate the processes that take place within the 
ear itself. The section of this science which treats of the conduction of the 
motions to which sound is due, from the entrance of the external ear to the 
expansions of the nerves in the labyrinth of the inner ear, has received 
much attention, especially in Germany, since ground was broken by 

f Johannes Mueller. At the same time it must be confessed that not many 
results have as yet been established with certainty. But these attempts 
attacked only a portion of the problem, and left the rest untouched. 
Investigations into the processes of each of our organs of sense, have in 
general three different parts. First we have to discover how the agent 
reaches the nerves to be excited, as light for the eye and sound for the ear. 
This may be called the physical part of the corresponding physiological 
investigation. Secondly we have to investigate the various modes in which 
the nerves themselves are excited, giving rise to their various sensationsj 
and finally the laws according to which these sensations result in mental 
images of determinate external objects, that is, ia perceptions. Hence we 
have secondly a specially physiological investigation for sensations, and 

f thirdly, a B^^vSkWy psychological investigation for perceptions. Now whilst 
the physical side of the theory of hearing has been already frequently 
attacked, the results obtained for its physiological and psychological 
sections are few, imperfect, and accidental. Yet it is precisely the physio- 
logical part in especial — the theory of the sensations of hearing — to which 
the theory of music has to look for the foundation of its structure. 

In the present work, then, I have endeavoured in the first place to collect 
and arrange such materials for the theory of the sensations of hearing as 
already existed, or as I was able to add from my own personal investigations. 
Of course such a first attempt must necessarily be somewhat imperfect, and 
be limited to the elements and the most interesting divisions of the subject 
discussed. It is in this light that I wish these studies to be regarded. 

% Although in the propositions thus collected there is little of entirely new 
discoveries, and although even such apparently new facts and observations 
as they contain are, for the most part, more properly speaking the imme- 
diate consequences of my having more completely carried out known 
theories and methods of investigation to their legitimate consequences, 
and of niy having more thoroughly exhausted their results than had here- 
tofore been attempted, yet I cannot but think that the facts frequently 
receive new importance and new illumination, by being regarded from a 
fresh point of view and in a fresh connection. 

The First Part of the following investigation is essentially physical and 
physiological. It contains a general investigation of the phenomenon of 
harmonic upper partial tones. The nature of this phenomenon is estab- 
lished, and its relation to quality of tone is proved. A series of qualities of 
tone are analysed in respect to their harmonic upper partial tones, and it 



i2ffTROD. PLAN OF THE WORK. 6 

results that these upper partial tones are not, as was hitherto thought, iso- 
lated phenomena of small importance, but that, with very few exceptions, 
they determine the qualities of tone of aknost all instruments, and are of the 
greatest importance for those qualities of tone which are best adapted for 
musical purposes. The question of how the ear is able to perceive these 
harmonic upper partial tones then leads to an hypothesis respecting the 
mode in which the auditory nerves are excited, which is well fitted to 
reduce all the facts and laws in this department to a relatively simple 
mechanical conception. 

The Second Part treats of the disturbances produced by the simultaneous 
production of two tones, namely the combinational tones and beats. The 
physiologico-physical investigation shows that two tones can be simul-11 
taneously heard by the ear without mutual disturbance, when and only 
when they stand to each other in the perfectly determinate and well-known 
relations of intervals which form musical consonance. We are thus imme- 
diately introduced into the field of music proper, and are led to discover 
the physiological reason for that enigmatical numerical relation announced 
by Pythagoras. The magnitude of the consonant intervals is independent 
of the quality of tone, but the harmoniousness of the consonances, and the 
distinctness of their separation from dissonances, depend on the quality of 
tone. The conclusions of physiological theory here agree precisely with the 
musical rules for the formation of chords ; they even go more into par- 
ticulars than it was possible for the latter to do, and have, as I believe, the 
authority of the best composers in their favour. ^ 

In these first two Parts of the book, no attention is paid to esthetic 
considerations. Natural phenomena obeying a blind necessity, are alone 
treated. The Third Part treats of the construction of musical scales and 
notes, ^ere we come at once upon esthetic ground, and the differences of 
national and individual tastes begin to appear. Modern music has especially 
developed the principle of tonality, which connects all the tones in a piece 
of music by their relationship to one chief tone, called the tonic. On 
admitting this principle, the results of the preceding investigations furnish 
a method of constructing our modem musical scales and modes, from 
which all arbitrary assumption is excluded. 

I was unwilling to separate the physiological investigation from its 
musical consequences, because the correctness of these consequences must U 
be to the physiologist a verification of the correctness of the physical and 
physiological views advanced, and the reader, who takes up my book for its 
musical conclusions alone, cannot form a perfectly clear,iriew of the meaning 
and bearing of these consequences, unless he has endeavoured to get at 
least some conception of their foundations in natural science. But in 
order to facilitate the use of the book by readers who have no special 
knowledge of physics and mathematics, I have transferred to appendices, 
at the end of the book, all special instructions for performing the more 
compUcated experiments, and also all mathematical investigations. These 
appendices are therefore especially intended for the physicist, and contain 
the proofs of my assertions.* In this way I hope to have consulted the 
interests of both classes of readers. 

*[The additional Appendix XX. by the Translator is intended especially for the use of 
moaical students. — Translator.] 



6 



PLAN OP THE WORK. 



IKTROD. 



It is of course impossible for any one to understand the investigations 
thoroughly, who does not take the trouble of becoming acquainted by per- 
sonal observation with at least the fundamental phenomena mentioned. 
Fortunately with the assistance of common musical instruments it is easy 
for any one to become acquainted with harmonic upper partial tones, com- 
binational tones, beats, and the like.* Personal observation is better than 
the exactest description, especially when, as here, the subject of investiga- 
tion is an analysis of sensations themselves, which are always extremely 
difficult to describe to those who have not experienced them. 

In my somewhat unusual attempt to pass from natural philosophy into 
the theory of the arts, I hope that I have kept the regions of physiology 

IT and esthetics sufficiently distinct. But I can scarcely disguise from myself, 
that although my researches are confined to the lowest grade of musical 
grammar, they may probably appear too mechanical and unworthy of the 
dignity of art, to those theoreticians who are accustomed to summon the 
enthusiastic feehngs called forth by the highest works of art to the scientific 
investigation of its basis. To these I would simply remark in conclusion, 
that the following investigation really deals only with the analysis of 
actually existing sensations — that the physical methods of observation 
employed are almost solely meant to facilitate and assure the work of this 
analysis and check its completeness — and that this analysis of the sensations 
would suffice to furnish all the results required for musical theory, even 
independently of my physiological hypothesis concerning the mechanism of 

^ hearing, already mentioned (p. 5a), but that I was unwilling to omit that 
hypothesis because it is so well suited to furnish an extremely simple con- 
nection between all the very various and very complicated phenomena 
which present themselves in the course of this investigation.! 



*[But the use of the Harmonical, described 
in App. XX. sect. F. No. 1, and invented for 
the purpose of illustrating the theories of this 
work, is recommended as greatly superior for 
students and teachers to any other instrument. 
— Translator.] 

t Readers unaccustomed to mathematical 
and physical considerations will find an 
abridged account of the essential contents of 
this book in Sedley Taylor, Sound and Musics 



London, MsMsmillan, 1878. Such readers will 
also find a clear exposition of the physical 
relations of sound in J. Tyndall, On Sound, 
a course of eight lectures, London, 1867, (the 
last or fourth edition 1888) Longmans, Qreen, 
k Oo. A German translation of this work, 
entitled Der SchaU, edited by H. Helmholtz 
and G. Wiedemann, was published at Bruns- 
wick in 1874. 



♦ ♦ 



[The marks IT in the outer margin of each page, separate the page into 
4 sections, referred to as a, b, c, d, placed after the number of the page. If any 
section is in double columns, the letter of the second column is accented, as 
p. \M\] 



PART I. 

ON THE COMPOSITION OF VIBRATIONS. 



UPPEE PARTIAL TONES, AND QUALITIES OF TONE. 



CHAPTER I. 

ON THB SBNSATION OF SOUND IN GBNBRAL. 

Sensations result from the action of an external stimulus on the sensitive apparatus 
of our nerves. Sensations differ in kind, partly with the organ of sense excited, 
and partly with the nature of the stimulus employed. Each organ of sense pro- 
duces peculiar sensations, which cannot be excited by means of any other ; the 
eye gives sensations of light, the ear sensations of sound, the skin sensations of 
touch. Even when the same sunbeams which excite in the eye sensations of light, 
impinge on the skin and excite its nerves, they are felt only as heat, not as light. IT 
In the same way the vibration of elastic bodies heard by the ear, can also be felt 
by the skin, but in that case produce only a whirring fluttering sensation, not 
sound. The sensation of sound is therefore a species of reaction against external 
stimulus, peculiar to the ear, and excitable in no other organ of the body, and is 
completely distinct from the sensation of any other sense. 

As our problem is to study the laws of the sensation of hearing, our first 
business will be to examine how many kinds of sensation the ear can generate, and 
what differences in the external means of excitement or sound, correspond to these 
differences of sensation. 

The first and principal difference between various sounds experienced by our ear, 
is that between noises and musical tones. The soughing, howling, and whistling 
of the wind, the splashing of water, the rolling and rumbUng of carriages, are 
examples of the first kind, and the tones of all musical instruments of the second. 
Noises and musical tones may certainly intermingle in very various degrees, and IT 
pass insensibly into one another, but their extremes are widely separated. 

The nature of the difference between musical tones and noises, can generally 
be determined by attentive aural observation without artificial assistance. We 
perceive that generally, a noise is accompanied by a rapid alternation of different 
kinds of sensations of sound. Think, for example, of the rattling of a carriage 
over granite paving stones, the splashing or seething of a waterfall or of the waves 
of the sea, the rustling of leaves in a wood. In all these cases we have rapid, 
irregular, but distinctly perceptible alternations of various kinds of sounds, which 
crop up fitfully. When the wind howls the alternation is slow, the sound slowly 
and gradually rises and then falls again. It is also more or less possible to separate 
restlessly alternating sounds in case of the greater number of other noises. We 
shaU hereafter become acquainted with an instrument, called a resonator, which 
will materially assist the ear in making this separation. On the other hand, a 
musical tone strikes the ear as a perfectly undisturbed, uniform sound which 



8 NOISE AND MUSICAL TONE. paet i. 

remains unaltered as long as it exists, and it presents no alternation of various 
kinds of constituents. To this then corresponds a simple, regular kind of sensation, 
whereas in a noise many various sensations of musical tone are irregularly mixed 
up and as it were tumbled about in confusion. We can easily compound noises 
out of musical tones, as, for example, by simultaneously striking all the keys con- 
tained in one or two octaves of a pianoforte. This shows us that musical tones 
are the simpler and more regular elements of the sensations of hearing, and that 
we have consequently first to study the laws and peculiarities of this class of 
sensations. 

Then comes the further question : On what difference in the external means of 
excitement does the difference between noise and musical tone depend? The 
normal and usual means of excitement for the human ear is atmospheric vibration. 
H The irregularly alternating sensation of the ear in the case of noises leads us to 
conclude that for these the vibration of the air must also change irregularly. For 
musical tones on the other hand we anticipate a regular motion of the air, con- 
tinuing uniformly, and in its turn excited by an equally regular motion of the 
sonorous body, whose impulses were conducted to the ear by the air. 

Those regular motions which produce musical tones have been exactly investi- 
gated by physicists. They are oscillations, vibrations^ or swings, that is, up and 
down, or to and fro motions of sonorous bodies, and it is necessary that these 
oscillations should be regularly periodic. By a periodic motion we mean one which 
constantly returns to the same condition after exactly equal intervals of time. The 
length of the equal intervals of time between one state of the motion and its next 
exact repetition, we call the length of the oscillation^ vibration, or swing, or the 
period of the motion. In what manner the moving body actually moves during 
one period, is perfectly indifferent. As illustrations of periodical motion, take the 
H motion of a clock pendulum, of a stone attached to a string and whirled round in 
a circle with uniform velocity, of a hammer made to rise and fall uniformly by its 
connection with a water wheel. All these motions, however different be their 
form, are periodic in the sense here explained. The length of their periods, which 
in the cases adduced is generally from one to several seconds, is relatively long in 
comparison with the much shorter periods of the vibrations producing musical 
tones, the lowest or deepest of which makes at least 30 in a second, while in other 
cases their number may increase to several thousand in a second. 

Our definition of periodic motion then enables us to answer the question pro- 
posed as follows : — The sensation of a musical tone is diie to a rapid periodic 
motion of the sonorous body : the sensation of a noise to non-periodic motions. 

The musical vibrations of solid bodies are often visible. Although they may 
be too rapid for the eye to follow them singly, we easily recognise that a sounding 
string, or tuning-fork, or the tongue of a reed-pipe, is rapidly vibrating between two 
51 fixed limits, and the regular, apparently immovable image that we see, notwith- 
standing the real motion of the body, leads us to conclude that the backward and 
forward motions are quite regular. In other cases we can feel the swinging motions 
of sonorous solids. Thus, the player feels the trembling of the reed in the mouth- 
piece of a clarinet, oboe, or bassoon, or of his own lips in the mouthpieces of 
trumpets and trombones. 

The motions proceeding from the sounding bodies are usually conducted to our 
ear by means of the atmosphere. The particles of air must also execute periodic- 
ally recurrent vibrations, in order to excite the sensation of a musical tone in our 
ear. This is actually the case, although in daily experience sound at first seems 
to be some agent, which is constantly advancing through the air, and propagating 
itself further and further. We must, however, here distinguish between the motion 
of the individual particles of air — which takes place periodically backwards and 
forwards within very narrow limits — and the propagation of the sonorous tremor. 
The latter is constantly advancing by the constant attraction of fresh particles into 
its sphere of tremor. 



CHAP. I. PROPAGATION OF SOUND. 9 

This is a peculiarity of all so-called undulatory motions. Suppose a stone to 
be thrown into a piece of calm water. Bound the spot struck there forms a little 
ring of wave, which, advancing equally in all directions, expands to a constantly 
increasing circle. Corresponding to this ring of wave, sound also proceeds in the 
air from the excited point and advances in all directions as far as the limits of the 
mass of air extend. The process in the air is essentially identical with that on the 
surface of the water. The principal difiference consists in the spherical propagation 
of sound in all directions through the atmosphere which fills all surrounding space, 
whereas the waves of the water can only advance in rings or circles on its surface. 
The crests of the waves of water correspond in the waves of sound to spherical./ 
shells where the air is condensed, and the troughs to shells where it is rarefied. . 
On the free surface of the water, the mass when compressed can slip upwards and 
so form ridges, but in the interior of the sea of air, the mass must be condensed, 
as there is no unoccupied spot for its escape. ^ 

The waves of water, therefore, continually advance without returning. But 
we must not suppose that the particles of water of which the waves are composed 
advance in a similar manner to the waves themselves. The motion of the particles 
of water on the surface can easily be rendered visible by floating a chip of wood 
upon it. This will exactly share the motion of the adjacent particles. Now, such 
a chip is not carried on by the rings of wave. It only bobs up and down and 
finally rests on its original spot. The adjacent particles of water move in the same 
manner. When the ring of wave reaches them they are set bobbing ; when it has 
passed over them they are still in their old place, and remain there at rest, while 
the ring of wave continues to advance towards fresh spots on the surface of the 
water, and sets new particles of water in motion. Hence the waves which pass 
over the surface of the water are constantly built up of fresh particles of water. 
What really advances as a wave is only the tremor, the altered form of the surface, 
while the individual particles of water themselves merely move up and downH 
transiently, and never depart far from their original position. 

The same relation is seen still more clearly in the waves of a rope or chain. 
Take a flexible string of several feet in length, or a thin metal chain, hold it at one 
end and let the other hang down, stretched by its own weight alone. Now, move 
the hand by which you hold it quickly to one side and back again. The excursion 
which we have caused in the upper end of the string by moving the hand, will run 
down it as a kind of wave, so that constantly lower parts of the string will make a 
sidewards excursion while the upper return again into the straight position of rest. 
But it is evident that while the wave runs down, each individual particle of the 
string can have only moved horizontally backwards and forwards, and can have 
taken no share at aH in the advance of the wave. 

The experiment succeeds still better with a long elastic line, such as a thick 
piece of india-rubber tubing, or a brass- wire spiral spring, from eight to twelve feet 
in length, fastened at one end, and slightly stretched by being held with the hand IT 
at the other. The hand is then easily able to excite waves which will run very 
regularly to the other end of the line, be there reflected and return. In this case 
it is also evident that it can be no part of the line itself which runs backwards and 
forwards, but that the advancing wave is composed of continually fresh particles 
of the line. By these examples the reader will be able to form a mental image of 
the kind of motion to which sound belongs, where the material particles of the 
body merely make periodical oscillations, while the tremor itself is constantly 
propagated forwards. 

Now let us return to the surface of the water. We have supposed that one of 
its points has been struck by a stone and set in motion. This motion has spread 
out in the form of a ring of wave over the surface of the water, and having reached 
the chip of wood has set it bobbing up and down. Hence by means of the wave, 
the motion which the stone first excited in one point of the surface of the water 
has been communicated to the chip which was at another point of the same surface. 



10 POBCE, PITCH, AND QUALITY. part i. 

The process which goes on in the atmospheric ocean about ns, is of a precisely 
similar natare. For the stone snbstitate a soonding body, which shakes the air ; 
for the chip of wood snbstitate the homan ear, on which impinge the waves of air 
excited by the shock, setting its movable parts in vibration. The waves of air 
proceeding from a soonding body, transport the tremor to the human ear exactly 
in the same way as the water transports the tremor produced by the stone to the 
floating chip. 

In this way also it is easy to see how a body which itself makes periodical 
oscillations, will necessarily set the particles of air in periodical motion. A falling 
stone gives the surface of the water a single shock. Now replace the stone by a 
regular series of drops falling from a vessel with a small orifice. Every separate 
drop will excite a ring of wave, each ring of wave will advance over the surface of 
the water precisely like its predecessor, and will be in the same way followed by 

^ its successors. In this manner a regular series of concentric rings will be formed 
and propagated over the surface of the water. The number of drops which fall 
into the water in a second will be the number of waves which reach our floating 
chip in a second, and the number of times that this chip will therefore bob up and 
down in a second, thus executing a periodical motion, the period of which is equal 
to the interval of time between the falling of consecutive drops. In the same way 
for the atmosphere, a periodically oscillating sonorous body produces a similar 
periodical motion, first in the mass of air, and then in the drumskin of our ear, 
and the period of these vibrations must be the same as that of the vibration in the 
sonorous body. 

Having thus spoken of the principal division of sound into Noise and Musical 
Tones, and then described the general motion of the air for these tones, we pass 
on to the peculiarities which distinguish such tones one from the other. We are 
acquainted with three points of difference in musical tones, confining our attention 

^ in the first place to such tones as are isolatedly produced by our usual musical 
instruments, and excluding the simultaneous soimding of the tones of different 
instruments. Musical tones are distinguished : — 

1. By their /orce, 

2. By their pitchf 

3. By their quality. 

It is unnecessary to explain what we mean by the force and pitch of a tone. 
By the quality of a tone we mean that peculiarity which distinguishes the musical 
tone of a violin from that of a flute or that of a clarinet, or that of the human 
voice, when all these instruments produce the same note at the same pitch. 

We have now to explain what peculiarities of the motion of sound correspond 
to these three principal differences between musical tones. 

First, We easily recognise that the farce of a musical tone increases and dimin- 
ishes with the extent or so-called amptittide of the oscillations of the particles of 
^ the sounding body. When we strike a string, its vibrations are at first sufficiently 
large for us to see them, and its corresponding tone is loudest. The visible 
vibrations become smaller and smaller, and at the same time the loudness 
diminishes. The same observation can be made on strings excited by a violin 
bow, and on the reeds of reed-pipes, and on many other sonorous bodies. The 
same conclusion results from the diminution of the loudness of a tone when we 
increase our distance from the sounding body in the open air, although the pitch 
and quality remain unaltered ; for it is only the amplitude of the oscillations of 
the particles of air which diminishes as their distance from the sounding body 
increases. Hence loudness must depend on this amplitude, and none other of the 
properties of sound do so.* 

* Mechanically the force of the oBcillations no measure can be found for the intensity of 

for tones of different pitch is measured by the sensation of sound, that is, for the loudness 

their vis viva, that is, by the square of the of sound which will hold all pitches. [See 

greatest velocity attainea by the oscillating the addition to a footnote on p. 75d, referring 

particles. But the ear has different degrees of especially to this passage. — Translator,] 
sensibility for tones of different pitch, so that 



ir= 



■^S^^XS.. 







l^wSMDcft^SftttW'O^S^c&l tones of the same pitch can 

T^iM^^^cl^^jygraana of moat diverBe mechanical 

t^' Jv B"^^,^ ^^ Ijudness. All the motions of the 

r'^v'tfVil |lj{iragbuld not otherwise excite in us 

iMl^S^V'^^H of motion within eaoh single 

.f ^^^j7|B||[|^i|;th of the periodic time of two 

'^^■^^B CftjESjitoh. Hence: Pitch depends 

^jUk * ■ 8*5 *3i^H I'ibration is executed, or, which 

I "1 Bt M^aJtjy B^'fifltow completed in a given time. 
""jfw^l^lJwbMlrCO g of time, and shall ooneequently 
! ^ySif'tt ' JiHJ^^ W^^ the number of vihratioDS which 1l 
ItS^ W'V^ '&mfi'>°^'>l time.* It ie self-evident 
!l8wfW#8tBPB^> ^^^ IB Ifiogth of time which 
' ** -*^i(BaffitJft?arda and forwards, by dividing 

their pitch numbers, that is, 

. . __ ir BUch elastic bodies as prodnce 

|tt39St^>phy8ici9t9 had to contrive many 

'*qS{e2*o solve this problem for each 

'^ ' " ,us experiments had to render 

inient for the demonstration of 

mledge, to be able to apply a 

■i — the Bo-called siren — which is 

the pitch number of the tone 

parts of the simplest form of 

H 

h can be set in rapi^ rotation 

^aases over a latf^r wheel. On 

^^ieTM^^^oles at equal intervals : of these 

b^.&*^-e twelve in the figure; one or 

ipiWp ^nilar series of holes at' equal 
Uvn^u^^s are introduced on concentric 
S i^^te^^ere is one such of eight holes 
uf ^^A*)^>figure), is a pipe which is 
^■b^^^ over one of the holes. Now, 
^i^^eWdg the disc in rotation and blow- 
'^ic'i^^gb the pipe c, the air will pass 
^p^ijC^henever one of the holes comes 
£^t^r^*te end of the pipe, but will be 
•%^i)i^ whenever an unpierced portion ^ 
- •S^'fo'^^A'^^ oomes under it. Each hole 
'pi^Vlets a single puEE of air escape. 
_ ^>3jMd the pipe to be directed to the 

[C' i'T^^^'Ph'"'' BiinaBioal inBtniment is the pitch 

^'.ViSlgeclSii^ by which It is tailed. But m pitch 

' ' '~^(^S*'7 ^ lentation. It is Decesaary here 

|i£!§%<iiBh from this aenaation the pitch 

„. „ . ^^i^!^^ frequtncs at vibratioQ by which it 

V'^ivEfi^^'M. The larger the pitch number, 

d>£JjffS*tg»*' or (^•iTF"' ti>e pitch ia said to be. 

-'~~'3v$rWB«t the pitch number the deeper or 

fMmSSab pitch. Thne are all metaphorical 

££S^a"fti£iB which moat be takaa atrictl; in 

t'&AP^.—Tranaltiicr.J 

t (oSt^^ account of the more exact modem 

S**iS>sW^^'llSi3»Je||k)ta|o.ii™Vo«Jf. ia given in App. XX. eect. B.— 

f*--3('"3(' ■&*■»• ■»■ *g* ■** •»' - ' "tt* •»• 





HE StREK. PART I- 

correapoQding to the twelve holes ; but 

'6 have only eight puffe. If the disc is 

the outer circle will produce 120 puEfe 

weak aud deep musical tone, and the 

.FflMi) know the number oF revolutions which 

'ilfil^ber of boles in the series to which the 

numbers evidently gives the number of 

'tquently far easier to determine exactly 

*d sirens are accordingly extremely well 

LCal tones resulting from the alterations 

inly a weak tone. I have placed it first 
iderstood, and, by changing the disc, it 



« 





■y diEferent descriptions. A stronger tone 

Stfour, shown in figures 2, 3, and i, above. 

~ie upper surface is shown in fig. 3, and 

placed over a windchest A A, which is 

The cover of the windchest A A, 

ig disc s 8. is pierced with precisely the 

direction of the holes pierced in the 

holes in the disc, as shown in fig. 4, 

through the line n n in fig. 3. This 

hping from A A to set the disc s s in 

the bellows, as much as 60 or 60 

fiinoe all the holes of one circle are blown 

much more powerful tone is produced 

[Teoord the revolutions, a counter z z is 



CHAP. I. 



PITCH AND INTERVAL. 



13 



introduced, connected with a toothed wheel which works in the screw t, and 
advances one tooth for each revolution of the disc s s. By the handle h this 
counter may he moved slightly to one side, so that the wheelwork and screw may 
be connected or disconnected at pleasure. If they are connected at the beginning 
of one second, and disconnected at the beginning of another, the hand of the 
counter shows how many revolutions of the disc have been made in the corre- 
sponding number of seconds.* 

Dove t introduced into this siren several rows of holes through which the wind 
might be directed, or from which it might be cut ofi^ at pleasure. A polyphonic 
siren of this description with other peculiar arrangements will be figured and 
described in Chapter YIII., fig. 56. 

It is clear that when the pierced disc of one of these sirens is made to revolve 
with a uniform velocity, and the air escapes through the holes in puffs, the motion 
of the air thus produced must be periodic in the sense already explained. The ^ 
holes stand at equal intervals of space, and hence on rotation follow each other at 
equal intervals of time. Through every hole there is poured, as it were, a drop of 
air into the external atmospheric ocean, exciting waves in it, which succeed each 
other at uniform intervals of time, just as was the case when regularly falling 
drops impinged upon a surface of water (p. 10a). Within each separate period, 
each individual puff will have considerable variations of form in sirens of different 
construction, depending on the different diameters of the holes, their distance from 
each other, and the shape of the extremity of the pipe which conveys the air ; but 
in every case, as long as the velocity of rotation and the position of the pipe remain 
unaltered, a regularly periodic motion of the air must result, and consequently the 
sensation of a musical tone must be excited in the ear, and this is actually the 
case. 

It results immediately from experiments with the siren that two series of the 
same number of holes revolving with the same velocity, give musical tones of the f 
same pitch, quite independently of the size and form of the holes, or of the pipe. 
We even obtain a musical tone of the same pitch if we allow a metal point to 
strike in the holes as they revolve instead of blowing. Hence it follows firstly that 
the pitch of a tone depends only on the number of puffs or swings, and not on 
their form, force, or method of production. Further it is very easily seen with 
this instrument that on increasing the velocity of rotation and consequently the 
number of puffs produced in a second, the pitch becomes sharper or higher. The 
same result ensues if, maintaining a uniform velocity of rotation, we first blow into 
a series with a smaller and then into a series with a greater number of holes. 
The latter gives the sharper or higher pitch. 

With the same instrument we also very easily find the remarkable relation 
which the pitch numbers of two musical tones must possess in order to form a 
consonant interval. Take a series of 8 and another of 16 holes in a disc, and 
blow into both sets while the disc is kept at uniform velocity of rotation. Two f 
tones will be heard which stand to one another in the exact relation of an Octave. 
Increase the velocity of rotation ; both tones will become sharper, but both will 
continue ait the new pitch to form the interval of an Octave. J Hence we conclude 
that a musical tone which is an Octave higher than another, makes exactly twice 
as many vibrations in a given time as the latter. 



* See Appendix I. 

t [Pronounce Ddh-vehf in two syllables. — 
TranslatorJ] 

ttWhen two notes have different pitch 
nnmbeiB, there is said to be an interval 
between them. This gives rise to a sensa- 
tion, very differently appreciated by different 
individuals, but in all oases the interval is 
measured by the ratio of the pitch numherst 
and, for some purposes, more conveniently by 
other numbers called cents ^ derived from these 
ratios, as explained in App. XX. sect. 0. The 



names of all the intervals usually distinguished 
are also given in App. XX. sect. D., with the 
corresponding ratios and cents. These names 
were in the first place derived from the ordinal 
number of the note in the scales, or succes- 
sions of contiuually shaiper notes. The Octave 
is the eighth note in the major scale. An octave 
is a set of notes lying within an Octave. Ob- 
serve that in this translation all names of in- 
tervals commence with a capital letter, to 
prevent ambiguity, as almost all such woids 
are also used in other senses. — Trarwlator.] 



14 PITCH AND INTERVAL. part i. 

The disc shown in fig. 1, p. lie, has two oiroles of 8 and 12 holes respectively. 
Each, blown successively, gives two tones which form with each other a perfect 
Fifth, independently of the velocity of rotation of the disa Hence, two musical 
tones stand in the relation of a so-called Fifth when the higher tone makes three 
vibrations in the same time as the lower makes two. 

If we obtain a musical tone by blowing into a circle of 8 holes, we require a 
circle of 16 holes for its Octave, and 12 for its Fifth. Hence the ratio of the 
pitch numbers of the Fifth and the Octave is 12 : 16 or 3 : 4. But the interval 
between the Fifth and the Octave is the Fourth, so that we see that when two 
mtisical tones form a Fourth, the higher makes four vibratioTis while the lower 
makes three. 

The polyphonic siren of Dove has usually four circles of 8, 10, 12 and 16 holes 
respectively. The series of 16 holes gives the Octave of the series of 8 holes, and 
H the Fourth of the series of 12 holes. The series of 12 holes gives the Fifth of the 
series of 8 holes, and the minor Third of the series of 10 holes. While the series of 
10 holes gives the major Third of the series of 8 holes. The four series con- 
sequently give the constituent musical tones of a major chord. 

By these and similar experiments we find the following relations of the pitch 
numbers : — 

1 : 2 Octave 

2 : 3 Fifth 

3 : 4 Fourth 

4 : 5 major Third 

5 : 6 minor Third 

When the fundamental tone of a given interval is taken an Octave higher, the 
interval is said to be inverted. Thus a Fourth is an inverted Fifth, a minor Sixth 
^ an inverted major Third, and a major Sixth an inverted minor Third. The corre- 
sponding ratios of the pitch numbers are consequently obtained by doubling the 
smaUer number in the original interval. 

From 2:3 the Fifth, we thus have 3:4 the Fourth 
„ 4:5 the major Third ... 5:8 the minor Sixth 
„ 5:6 the minor Third, 6 : 10 = 3 : 5 the major Sixth. 

These are all the consonant intervals which lie within the compass of an 
Octave. With the exception of the minor Sixth, which is really the most imperfect 
of the above consonances, the ratios of their vibrational numbers are all expressed 
by means of the whole numbers, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6. 

Comparatively simple and easy experiments with the siren, therefore, corrobo- 
rate that remarkable law mentioned in the Introduction (p. ld)y according to which 
the pitch numbers of consonant musical tones bear to each other ratios expressible 
f by small whole numbers. In the course of our investigation we shall employ the 
same instrument to verify more completely the strictness and exactness of this 
law. 

Long before anything was known of pitch numbers, or the means of counting 
them, Pythagoras had discovered that if a string be divided into two parts by a 
bridge, in such a way as to give two consonant musical tones when struck, the 
lengths of these parts must be in the ratio of these whole numbers. If the bridge 
is so placed that f of the string lie to the right, and ^ on the left, so that the two 
lengths are in the ratio of 2 : 1, they produce the interval of an Octave, the greater 
length giving the deeper tone. Placing the bridge so that ^ of the string lie on 
the right and § on the left, the ratio of the two lengths is 3 : 2, and the interval 
is a Fifth. 

These measurements had been executed with great precision by the Greek 
musicians, and had given rise to a system of tones, contrived with considerable 
art. For these measurements they used a peculiar instrument, the monochord^ 



CHAP. I. PITCH NUMBERS IN JUST MAJOR SCALE. 15 

oonaisting of a sounding board and box on whioh a single string was stretched 
^th a scale below, so as to set the bridge oorreotly.* 

It was not till much later that, through the investigations of Galileo (1638), 
Newton,! Euler (1729), and Daniel Bemouilli (1771), the law governing the 
motions of strings became known, and it was thus found that the simple ratios of 
the lengths of the strings existed also for the pitch numbers of the tones they pro- 
duced, and that they consequently belonged to the musical intervals of the tones 
of all instruments, and were not confined to the lengths of strings through which 
the law had been first discovered. 

This relation of whole numbers to musical consonances was from all time 
looked upon as a wonderful mystery of deep significance. The Pythagoreans 
themselves made use of it in their speculations on the harmony of the spheres. 
From that time it remained partly the goal and partly the starting point of the 
strangest and most venturesome, fantastic or philosophic combinations, till in ^ 
modem times the majority of investigators adopted the notion accepted by Euler 
himself, that the human mind had a peculiar pleasure in simple ratios, because it 
could better understand them and comprehend their bearings. But it remained 
uninvestigated how the mind of a listener not versed in physics, who perhaps was 
not even aware that musical tones depended on periodical vibrations, contrived to 
recognise and compare these ratios of the pitch numbers. To show what pro- 
cesses taking place in the ear, render sensible the difference between consonance 
and dissonance, will be one of the principal problems in the second part of this 
work. 

Calculation of the Pitch Numbbbs fob all the Tones of the 

Musical Scale. 

By means of the ratios of the pitch numbers already assigned for the consonant 
intervals, it is easy, by pursuing these intervals throughout, to calculate the ratios H 
for the whole extent of the musical scale. 

The major triad or chord of three tones, consists of a major Third and a Fifth. 
Hence its ratios are : 



C : E : G 
1 
or 4 



1 . « . s 



If we associate with this triad that of its dominant G \ B \ D, and that of its 
sub-dominant F : A : G, each of which has one tone in common with the triad of 
the tonic G : E : G, we obtain the complete series of tones for the major scale of 
C, with the following ratio of the pitch numbers : 

G : D : E : F : G : A : B : c 

' 1>0 •S '4 . A . S .15. Q 

[or 24 : 27 : 30 : 32 : 36 : 40 : 45 : 48] H 

In order to extend the calculation to other octaves, we shall adopt the following 
notation of musical tones, marking the higher octaves by accents, as is usual in 
Germany,"|- as follows : 

1. The unaccented or small octave (the 4-foot octave on the organ J) : — 



» : ^^ o.^ -a—^ "- 



-& Q 



c d e f g ah 

* [As the monochord is very liable to error, below the letters, which are typographically 

these results were happy generalisations from inconvenient. Hence the German notation is 

liecessarily imperfect experiments. — TroM- retained.— TVonaZa^.] 
lator.l $[The note C in the small octave was 

t [Bnglish works use strokes above and once emitted by an organ pipe 4 feet in length : 



16 



PITCH NUMBERS IN JUST MAJOR SCALE. 



PART I. 



2. The once-accented octave (2-foot) : — 



P 



s: 



:js7. 



___ ^ ^ — 

c' d' e f 

3. The twice-accented octave (1-foot) : 



a 



V 




c" d" e" /' g" a" h" 

And so on for higher octaves. Below the small octaVe lies the great octave, 
written with unaccented capital letters ; its G requires an organ pipe of eight feet 
^ in length, and hence it is called the 8-foot octave. 

4. Great or 8-foot octave : — 



C 



irr 
D 



E 



F 



:q: 



G- 



G 



A 



Below this follows the 1^-foot or contra-octave ; the lowest on the pianoforte 
and most organs, the tones of which may be represented by G^ D, E, F^ G^ A^ B,, 
with an inverted accent. On great organs there is a still deeper, 32-foot octave, the 
tones of which may be written G^ D^^ E^^ F^^ G,^ A,^ B^,^ with two inverted accents, 
but they scarcely retain the character of musical tones. (See Chap. IX.) 

Since the pitch numbers of any octave are always twice as great as those for 
IT the next deeper, we find the pitch numbers of the higher tones by multiplying 
those of the small or unaccented octave as many times by 2 as its symbol has 
upper accents. And on the contrary the pitch numbers for the deeper octaves are 
found by dividing those of the great octave, as often as its symbol has lower 
accents. 

Thus c"-2x 2x c=2x2x2C 
G,, =^x|xC = ^xix^c. 

For the pitch of the musical scale German physicists have generally adopted 
that proposed by Scheibler, and adopted subsequently by the German Association 
of Natural Philosophers {die deutsche NaturforscherversamnUung) in 1834. This 
makes the once-accented a' execute 440 vibrations in a second.* Hence results the 



thus B^os [UArt du Facteur d'Orgues, 1766) 
^made it 4 old French feet, which gave a 
note a full Semitone flatter than a pipe of 
4 English feet. But in modem organs not even 
so much as 4 English feet are used. Organ 
builders, however, in all countries retain the 
names of the octaves as here given, which 
must be considered merely to determine the 
place on the stafE, as noted in the text, inde- 
pendently of the precise pitch. — Translatar,] 
* The Paris Academy has lately fixed the 
pitch number of the same note at 435. This 
is called 870 by the Academy, because French 
physicists have adopted the inconvenient 
habit of counting the forward motion of a 
swinging body as one vibration, and the back- 
ward as another, so that the whole vibra- 
tion is counted as two. This method of 
counting has been taken from the seconds 
pendulum, whioh ticks once in going forward 
and once again on returning. For symmetrical 



backward and forward motions it would be 
indifferent by which method we counted, bat 
for non-symmetrical musical vibrations which 
are of constant occurrence, the French method 
of counting is veiy inconvenient. The number 
440 gives fewer fractions for the first [just] 
major scale of C, than a' = 435. The difference 
of pitch is less than a comma. [The practical 
settlement of pitch has no relation to such 
arithmetical considerations as are here sug- 
gested, but depends on the compass of the 
human voice and the music written for it at 
different times. An Abstract of my History 
of Musical Pitch is given in Appendix XX. 
sect. H. Scheibler*s proposal, named in the 
text, was chosen, as he tells us (Der Tonmesser^ 
1834, p. 53), as being the mean between the 
limits of pitch within which Viennese piano- 
fortes at that time rose and fell by heat and 
cold, which he reckons at f vibration either 
way. That this proposal had no reference to the 



CRAP. I. 



PITCH NUMBERS IN JUST MAJOR SCALE. 



17 



following table for the scaJe of C major, whioh will serve to determine the pitch 
of all tones that are defined by their pitch nmnbers in the following work. 









Unaccented 

Octave 

<;to& 

4 foot 


Once- 


Twice- 


Thrice- 


Four-times 




Contra Octave 


Great Octave 


accented 


accented 


accented 


accented 


Notes. 


0,to^, 


Cto-B 


Octave 


Octave 


Octave 


Octave 




16 foot 


8 foot 


c/to V 


c"to V 


c"' to V" 


&"' to 6"" 








2 foot 


Ifoot 


ifoot 


ifoot 


C 


83 


66 


182 


264 


528 


1056 


2112 


D 


87-125 


74-25 


148-5 


297 


594 


1188 


2376 


E 


41-26 


82-5 


165 


880 


660 


1820 


2640 


F 


44 


88 


176 


852 


704 


1406 


2816 


Q 


49-6 


99 


198 


896 


792 


1584 


8168 


A 


55 


110 


220 


440 


880 


1760 


3520 


B 


61-875 


128-76 


247-6 


495 


990 


1980 


3960* 



The lowest tone on orchestral instrmnents is the E^ of the double bass, making 
41i vibrations in a second.f Modem pianofortes and organs usually go down to C, H 



ezpzesBion of the just major aoale in whole 
numbers, is shown by the fact that he 
propoeed it for an eqaally tempered scale, 
tor which he calculated tne pitch numbers 
io four places of decimals, and for which, of 
course, none but the octaves of a' are ex- 
pressible by whole numbers. — Trantlaior.l 

* [As it is important that students should 
be able to hear the exact intervals and pitches 
spoken of throughout this book, and as it is 
quite impossible to do so on any ordinary in- 
strument, I have contrived a specially-tuned 
harmonium, called an Harmonical, fully de- 
scribed in App. XX. sect. F. No. 1, which 
Mes8rs.Moore a Moore, 104 Bishopsgate Street, 
will, in the interests of science, supply to order, 
for the moderate sum of 165s. The follow- 
ing are the pitch numbers of the first four 
octayes, the tuning of the fifth octave will be 



explained in App. XX. sect. F. The names of 
the notes are in the notation of the latter part 
of Chap. XIY. below. Bead the sign D\ as 

* D one,' W^ as * one J7 fiat,* and ^Bk as 

• seven B fiat '. In playins observe that D\ is 
on the ordinary D)^ or &t digl^, and that 
^jB|^ is on the ordinary Q)^ or F^ digital, and 
that the onW keys in which cnords can be 
played are C major and O minor, with the 
minor chord D\ FA\ and the natural chord of 
the Ninth GBh G''B^. The mode of measuring 
intervals by raUoi and cents is fully explained 
hereafter, and the results are added for con- 
venience of reference. The pitches of d' 528, 
a' 440, a'^l^ 422*4 and "^'^ 462, were taken from 
forks very carefully tuned by myself to these 
numbers of vibrations, by means of my unique 
series of forks described in App. Xa., at the ^ 
end of sect. B. 



SOALB OF THB HaBKONICAL. 



Pitch Numbers. 


Batios. 


Cents 


• 


Notes. 


8 foot 


4 foot 


2 foot 


Ifoot 


Note to Note 


C to Note 


Note to Note 


(7 to Note 


C 


66 


182 


264 


528 


9 : 10 


1 : 1 


182 





A 


78i 


1461 


293i 


5861 


80 : 81 


9 : 10 


22 


182 


D 


74J 


148i 


297 


594 


15 : 16 


8 : 9 


112 


204 


^b 


m 


158| 


816* 


688| 


24 : 25 


5 : 6 


70 


816 


Sx 


82it 


165 


880 


660 


15 : 16 


4 : 5 


112 


886 


F 


88 


176 


852 


704 


8 : 9 


8 : 4 


204 


498 


G 


99 


198 


896 


792 


15 : 16 


2 : 8 


112 


702 


^'b 


105t 


211i 


422| 


844* 


24 : 25 


5 : 8 


70 


814 


A\ 


110 


220 


440 


880 


20 : 21 


8 : 5 


85 


884 


'Bb 


115} 


281 


462 


924 


85 : 86 


4 : 7 


49 


969 


J5'b 


118* 


287* 


475i 


950* 


24 : 25 


5 : 9 


70 


1018 


B, 


123i 


247} 


495 


990 


15 : 16 


8 : 15 


112 


1088 





182 


264 


528 


1056 


— 


1 : 2 


— 


1200 



IT 



t [The following account of the actual tones 
used is adapted from my History of Musical 



TranslaUiTJ] 

Fitch. C„y commencement of the 82-foot oc- 
tave, the lowest tone of very large organs, two 

O 



18 



COMPASS OF INSTRUMENTS. 



PA&T I. 



with 33 vibrations, and the latest grand pianos even down ix> A,^ with 27-^ vibra- 
tions. On larger organs, as already mentioned, there is also a deeper Octave reach- 
ing to C,f with 16^ vibrations. But the musical character of all these tones below E^ 
is imperfect, because we are here near to the Umit of the power of the ear to combine 
vibrations into musical tones. These lower tones cannot therefore be used musically 
except in connection with their higher octaves to which they impart a character 
of greater depth without rendering the conception of the pitch indeterminate. 

Upwards, pianofortes generally reach a'"' with 3520, or even c^ with 4224 vibra- 
tions. The highest tone in the orchestra is probably the five-times accented d' of the 
piccolo flute with 4752 vibrations. Appunn and W. Preyer by means of small 
tuning-forks excited by a violin bow have even reached the eight times accented e ^" 
with 40,960 vibrations in a second. These high tones were very painfully unplea- 
sant, and the pitch of those which exceed the boundaries of the musical scale was 
^ very imperfectly discriminated by musical observers.'**' More on this in Chap. IX. 

The musical tones which can be used with advantage, and have clearly dis- 
tinguishable pitch, have therefore between 40 and 4000 vibrations in a second, 
extending over 7 octaves. Those which are audible at all have from 20 to 40,000 
vibrations, extending over about 11 octaves. This shows what a great variety of 
different pitch numbers can be perceived and distinguished by the ear. In this 
respect the ear is far superior to the eye, which likewise distinguishes light of dif- 
ferent periods of vibration by the sensation of different colours, for the compass of 
the vibrations of light distinguishable by the eye but slightly exceeds an Octave, f 

Force and pitch were the two first differences which we found between musical 
tones ; the third was quality of tone, which we have now to investigate. When 



Octaves below the lowest tone of the Violon- 
cello. A„t the lowest tone of the largest 
pianos. C7„ commencement of the 16-foot 
octave, the Jowest note assigned to the Double 

II Bass in Beethoven's Pastoral Symphony. E,^ 
the lowest tone of the German four-stringed 
Double Bass, the lowest tone mentioned in 
the text. F,^ the lowest tone of the English 
four^stringed Double Bass. G^, the lowest tone 
of the Italian three-stringed Double Bass. A,^ 
the lowest tone of the English three-stringed 
Double Bass. C, commencement of the 8-foot 
octave, the lowest tone of the Violoncello, 
written on the second leger line below the bass 
staff. G, the tone of the third open string of 
the Violoncello, c, commencement of the 
4-foot octave * tenor C,' the lowest tone of the 
Vi61a, written on the second space of the bass 
staff, d, the tone of the second open string of 
the Violoncello. /, the tone signified by the 
bass or ^-clef. gr, the lowest tone of the 
Violin, a, the tone of the highest open string 
of the Violoncello. c\ commencement of the 

% 2-foot octave, * middle C,* written on the leger 
line between the bass and treble staves,the tone 
signified by the tenor or C-clef . d\ the tone of 
the third open string of the Violin. g\ the tone 
signified by the treble or G-clef. a', the tone of 
the second open string of the Violin, the * tuning 
note' for orchestras. c'\ commencement of the 
1-foot octave, the usual 'tuning note* for pianos. 
e'\ the tone of the first or highest open string of 
the Violin, c"', commencement of the }-foot 
octave. g"\ the usual highest tone of the 
Flute, c^*, commencement of the J-foot octave. 
0'^ the highest tone on the Violin, being the 
double Octave harmonic of the tone of the 
highest open string. a*% the usual highest 
tone of large pianos, d^, the highest tone of 
the piccolo flute. 6^"^, the highest tone reached 
byAppunn's forks, see next note. — Tranilaior.l 
* [Copies of these forks, described in Prof. 
Preyer's essay *0n the Limits of the Perception 



of Tone,* (ilher die OreriMen der TonwahmBh- 
mung, 1876, p. 20), are in the South Kensing- 
ton Museum, Scientific Collection. I have 
several times tried them. I did not myself 
find the tones painful or cutting, probiabbly 
because there was no beating of inharmonic 
upper partials. It is best to sound them with 
two violin bows, one giving the octave of the 
other. The tones can be easily heard at a 
distance of more than 100 feet in the gallery 
of the museum. — TranslatorJ] 

t [Assuming the undulatory theory, which 
attributes the sensation of light to the vibra- 
tions of a supposed luminous * ether,* resem- 
bling air but more delicate and mobile, then 
the phenomena of * interierence * enables us 
to calculate the lengths of waves of light in 
empty space, !&c., hence the numbers of vibra- 
tions In a second, and consequently the ratios 
of these numbers, which will then clearly 
resemble the ratios of the pitch numbers that 
measure musical intervals. Assuming, then, 
that the yellow of the spectrum answers to the 
tenor c in music, and Fraunhofer*s * line A * 
corresponds to the O below it, Prof. Helm- 
holtz in his Physiological Optict (Hand- 
huch der physiologischen Optiky 1867, p. 287), 
gives the following analogies between the notes 
of the piano and the colours of the spectrum : — 



JP it end of the Bed. 

G, Red. 

O jL Red. 

A, Red, 

A ^, Orange-red. 

Bt Orange. 

c, Yellow. 

c jt. Green. 

df Greenish-blue. 

d jL Cyanogen-blue. 

e, Indigo-blue. 

/, Violet. 



If 



It 



II 



/ 1 Violet, 
o. Ultra-violet. 

h 

at, 

6, end of the solar 
spectrum. 
The scale there- 
fore extends to 
about a Fourth 
beyond the oc- 
tave. — Trunsla- 
tor.] 



CHAP. 1. QUALITY OF TONE AND FORM OF VIBRATION. 19 

we hear notes of the same force and same pitch sounded successively on a piano- 
forte, a violin, clarinet, oboe, or trunapet, or by the human voice, the character of 
the musical tone of each of these instruments, notwithstanding the identity of force 
and pitch, is so dififerent that by means of it we recognise with the greatest ease 
which of these instruments was used. Varieties of quality of tone appear to be 
infinitely numerous. Not only do we know a long series of musical instruments 
which could each produce a note of the same pitch ; not only do di£ferent individual 
instruments of the same species, and the voices of different individual singers show 
certain more dehcate shades of quality of tone, which our ear is able to distinguish ; 
but notes of the same pitch can sometimes be sounded on the same instrument with 
several qualitative varieties. In this respect the * bowed ' instruments (i.e. those 
of the violin kind) are distinguished above all other. But the human voice is still 
richer, and human speech employs these very qualitative varieties of tone, in order 
to distinguish different letters. The different vowels, namely, belong to the class ^ 
of sustained tones which can be used in music, while the character of consonants 
mainly depends upon brief and transient noises. 

On inquiring to what external physical difference in the waves of sound the 
different qualities of tone correspond, we must remember that the amplitude of 
the vibration determines the force or loudness, and the period of vibration the 
pitch. Quality of tone can therefore depend upon neither of these. The only 
possible hypothesis, therefore, is that the quality of tone should depend upon the 
manner in which the motion is performed within the period of each single vibra- 
tion. For the generation of a musical tone we have only required that the motion 
should be periodic, that is, that in any one single period of vibration exactly the 
same state should occur, in the same order of occurrence as it presents itself in any 
other single period. As to the kind of motion that should take place within any 
single period, no hypothesis was made. In this respect then an endless variety of 
motions might be possible for the production of sound. m 

Observe instances, taking first such periodic motions as are performed so slowly 
that we can follow them with the eye. Take a pendulum, which we can at any 
time construct by attaching a weight to a thread and setting it in motion. The 
pendulum swings from right to left with a uniform motion, uninterrupted by jerks. 
Near to either end of its path it moves slowly, and in the middle fast. Among 
sonorous bodies, which move in the same way, only very much faster, we may 
mention tuning-forks. When a tuning-fork is struck or is excited by a violin bow, 
and its motion is allowed to die away slowly, its two prongs oscillate backwards 
and forwards in the same way and after the same law as a pendulum, only they 
make many hundred swings for each single swing of the pendulum. 

As another example of a periodic motion, take a hammer moved by a water- 
wheel. It is slowly raised by the millwork, then released, and falls down suddenly, 
is then again slowly raised, and so on. Here again we have a periodical backwards 
and forwards motion ; but it is manifest that this kind of motion is totally different ^ 
from that of the pendulum. Among motions which produce musical sounds, that of 
a violin string, excited by a bow, would most nearly correspond with the hammer's, 
as will be seen from the detailed description in Chap. V. The string chngs for a 
time to the bow, and is carried along by it, then suddenly releases itself, like the 
hammer in the mill, and, like the latter, retreats somewhat with much greater 
velocity than it advanced, and is again caught by the bow and carried forward. 

Again, imagine a ball thrown up vertically, and caught on its descent with a 
blow which sends it up again to the same height, and suppose this operation to be 
performed at equal intervals of time. Such a ball would occupy the same time in 
rising as in falling, but at the lowest point its motion would be suddenly interrupted, 
whereas at the top it would pass through gradually diminishing speed of ascent 
into a gradually increasing speed of descent. This then would be a third kind of 
alternating periodic motion, and would take place in a manner essentially different 
from the other two. 

c2 



20 



FORM OF VIBRATION. 



PAKT. I. 



H 



To render the law of such motions more comprehensible to the eye than is 
possible by lengthy verbal descriptions, mathematicians and physicists are in the 
habit of applying a graphical method, which must be frequently employed in this 
work, and should therefore be well understood. 

To render this method intelligible suppose a drawing point b, fig. 5, to be 
fastened to the prong A of a tuning-fork in such a manner as to mark a surface 
of paper B B. Let the tuning-fork be moved with a uniform velocity in the direc- 
tion of the upper arrow, or else the paper be drawn under it in the opposite 
direction, as shown by the lower arrow. When the fork is not sounding, the point 
will describe the dotted straight line d c. But if the prongs have been first set in 
vibration, the point will describe the undulating line d c, for as the prong vibrates, 
the attached point b will constantly move backwards and forwards, and hence be 

Pia. 6. 




sometimes on the right and sometimes on the left of the dotted straight line d c, as 
is shown by the wavy line in the figure. This wavy line, once drawn, remains as a 
permanent image of the kind of motion performed by the end of the fork during 
^ its musical vibrations. As the point b is moved in the direction of the straight 
line d c with a constant velocity, equal sections of the straight line d c will corre- 
spond to equal sections of the time during which the motion lasts, and the distance 
of the wavy line on either side of the straight line will show how far the point b 
has moved from its mean position to one side or the other during those sections of 
time. 

In actually performing such an experiment as this, it is best to wrap the paper 
over a cylinder which is made to rotate uniformly by clockwork. The paper is 
wetted, and then passed over a turpentine flame which coats it with lampblack, 
on which a fine and somewhat smooth steel point will easily trace delicate lines. 

FiQ. 6. 



U 




Kg. 6 is the copy of a drawing actually made in this way on the rotating cylinder 
of Messrs. Scott and Eoenig's Phonautograph. 

Fig. 7 shows a portion of this curve on a larger scale. It is easy to see the 
meaning of such a curve. The drawing point has passed with a uniform velocity 
in the direction e h. Suppose that it has described the section e g in y^ of a 
second. Divide e g into 12 equal parts, as in the figure, then the point has been 
yj^ of a second in describing the length of any such section horizontally, and 
the curve shows us on what side and at what distance from the position of 
rest the vibrating point will be at the end of yj^, yIj^i ^^^ so on, of a second, 
or, generally, at any given short interval of time since it left the point e. 
We see, in the figure, that after ^^^ of a second it had reached the height 1, 
and that it rose gradually till the end of ^f ^ of a second ; then, however, it began 
to descend gradually till, at the end of j^ = ^V seconds, it had reached its mean 



CHAP. I. 



FORM OF VIBRATION. 



21 



position f, and then it continued desoending on the opposite side till the end of 
yI ]f of a second and so on. We can also easily determine where the vibrating 
point was to be found at the end of any fraction of this hundred-and-twentieth of 
a second. A drawing of this kind consequently shows immediately at what point of 
its path a vibrating partide is to be found at any given instant, and hence gives a 
complete image of its motion. If the reader wishes to reproduce the motion of the 
vibrating point, he has only to cut a narrow vertical slit in a piece of paper, and 
place it over fig. 6 or fig. 7, so as to show a very small portion of the curve through 
the vertical slit, and draw the book slowly but uniformly under the slit, from right 
to left ; the white or black point in the slit will then appear to move backwards and 
forwards in precisely the same manner as the original drawing point attached to 
the fork, only of course much more slowly. 

We are not yet able to make all vibrating bodies describe their vibrations 

Pig. 7. 



H 







i 


u^ 


2 


1 


L^ 


k 








>/ 


^ \» '/ 
















V 








\. 


., 




• 




w '\ 






/ 


iK 






Ji i\ 






/» 




J 


t — ■■ 


M 










8 


' 


r 







directly on paper, although much progress has recently been made in the 
methods required for this purpose. But we are able ourselves to draw such 
curves for sJl sounding bodies, when the law of their motion is known, that is, 
when we know how far the vibrating point will be from its mean position at any 
given moment of time. We then set off on a horizontal line, such as e f, fig. 7, 
lengths corresponding to the interval of time, and let fall perpendiculars to it on 51 
either side, making their lengths equal or proportional to the distance of the vibrat- 
ing point from its mean position, and then by joining the extremities of these per- 
pendiculars we obtain a curve such as the vibrating body would have drawn if it 
had been possible to make it do so. 

Thus fig. 8 represents the motion of the hammer raised by a water-wheel, or of 
a point in a string excited by a violin bow. For the first 9 intervals it rises slowly 
and uniformly, and during the 10th it faUs suddenly down. 



Pig. 8. 



Pig. 9. 





Fig. 9 represents the motion of the ball which is struck up again as soon as it H 
comes down. Ascent and descent are performed with equal rapidity, whereas in 
fig. 8 the ascent takes much longer time. But at the lowest point the blow suddenly 
changes the kind of motion. 

Physicists, then, having in their mind such curvilinear forms, representing the 
law of the motion of sounding bodies, speak briefly of the form of vibration of a 
sounding body, and assert that the quality of tone depends on the form of vibration. 
This assertion, which has hitherto been based simply on the fact of our knowing 
that the quality of the tone could not possibly depend on the periodic time of a 
vibration, or on its amplitude (p. 10c), will be strictly examined hereafter. It 
will be shown to be in so far correct that every different quality of tone requires a 
different form of vibration, but on the other hand it will also appear that different 
forrfis of vibration may correspond to the same quality of tone. 

On exactly and carefully examining the effect produced on the ear by different 
forms of vibration, as for example that in fig. 8, corresponding nearly to a violin 



22 



COMPOUND AND PARTIAL TONES. 



PAST I. 



string, we meet with a strange and unexpected phenomenon, long known indeed to 
individual musicians and physicists, but commonly regarded as a mere curiosity, 
its generality and its great significance for all matters relating to musical tones not 
having been recognised. The ear when its attention has been properly directed to 
the effect of the vibrations which strike it, does not hear merely that one musical 
tone whose pitch is determined by the period of the vibrations in the manner 
already explained, but in addition to this it becomes aware of a whole series of 
higher musical tones, which we will call the harmonic upper partial tones, and 
sometimes simply the upper partials of the whole musical tone or note, in contra- 
distinction to the fundamental or prime partial tone or simply the j^rtm^, as it may 
be called, which is the lowest and generally the loudest of all the partial tones and 
by the pitch of which we judge of the pitch of the whole compound musical tone 
itself. The series of these upper partial tones is precisely the same for all com- 
11 pound musical tones which correspond to a uniformly periodical motion of the air. 
It is as follows : — 

The first upper partial tone or second partial tone] is the upper Octave of the 
prime tone, and makes double the number of vibrations in the same time. If we 
call the prime C, this upper Octave will be c. 

The second upper partial tone [or third partial tone] is the Fifth of this Octave, 
or ^, making three times as many vibrations in the same time as the prime. 

The third upper partial tone [or fourth partial tone] is the second higher Octave 
or c\ making four times as many vibrations as the prime in the same time. 

The fourth upper partial tone [or fifth partial tone] is the major Third of this 
second higher Octave, or e\ with five times as many vibrations as the prime in the 
same time. 

The fifth upper partial tone [or sixth partial tone] is the Fifth of the second 
higher Octave, or g\ making six times as many vibrations as the prime in the 
f same time. 

And thus they go on, becoming continually fainter, to tones making 7, 8, 9, 
&c., times as many vibrations in the same time, as the prime tone. Or in musical 
notation 



m 



12: 



G 

Ordinal number of i 



^P^ 



^^fe 



'&. 






c 

2 



g 

3 



partialii 
Pitch number. 66132198 



c' e' g' 76'b c" d" e" ^Y 9" ^*^" '^^"\> *" c'"- 

4 6 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 16 16 
264 830 396 462 528 694 660 726 792 868 924 990 1064^ 



where the figures [in the first line] beneath show how many times the corresponding 
pitch number is greater than that of the prime tone [and, taking the lowest note 
to have 66 vibrations, those in the second line give the pitch numbers of all the 

pother notes]. 

The whole sensation excited in the ear by a periodic vibration of the air we 



* [This diagram has been slightly altered to 
introduce all the first 16 harmonic partials 
of C 66 (which, excepting 11 and 13, are 
given on the Harmonical as harmonio notes), 
and to show the notation, symbolising, both in 
letters and on the staff, the 7th, 11th, and 
13th harmonic partials, which are not used in 
general music. It is easy to show on the 
Harmonical that its lowest note, C of this 
series, contains all these partials, after the 
theory of the beats of a disturbed unison 
has been explained in Chap. VIII. Keep 
down the note C, and touch in succession the 
notes c, g, c\e\ g'.&c, but in touching the latter 
press the finger-key such a little way down 
that the tone of the note is only just audible. 



This slightly flattens each note, and slow beats 
can be produced in every case (except, of 
course, 11 and 13, which are not on the 
instrument) up to 16. It should also be ob- 
served that the pitch of the beat is very nearly 
that of the upper (not the lower) note in each 
case. The wnole of these 16 harmonics of C 66 
(except the 11th and 13th) can be played 
at once on the Harmonical by means of the 
harmonical bar, first without and then with 
the 7th and 14th. The whole series will be 
found to sound like a single fine note, and the 
7th and 14th to materially increase its rich- 
ness. The relations of the partials in this case 
may be studied from the tables in the footnotes 
to Chap. y;.,—TraniLaXor:\ 



CHAP. I. 



DEFINITION OP TERMS EMPLOYED. 



23 



have called a mtcsical tone. We now find that this is compound, containing a 
series of different tones, which we distinguish as the constituents or pa/rtidl tones 
of the compound. The first of these constituents is the prime partial tone of the 
compound, and the rest its harmonic upper partial tones. The numJ)er which 
shows the order of any partial tone in the series shows how many times its 
vibrational number exceeds that of the prime tone.* Thus, the second partial 
tone makes twice as many, the third three times as many vibrations in the same 
time as the prime tone, and so on. 

G. S. Ohm was the first to declare that there is only one form of vibration 
which will give rise to no harmonic upper partial tones, and which will therefore 
consist solely of the prime tone. This is the form of vibration which we have 
described above as peculiar to the pendulum and tuning-forks, and drawn in figs. 6 
and 7 (p. 10). We will call these pendular vibrations, or, since they cannot be 
analysed into a compound of different tones, simple vibrations. In what sense not H 
merely other musical tones, but all other forms of vibration, may be considered 
as compound, will be shown hereafter (Chap. IV.). The terms simple or pendular 
vibration f , will therefore be used as synonymous. We have hitherto used the 
expression tone and musical tone indifferently. It is absolutely necessary to dis- 
tinguish in acoustics first, a mtbsical tone, that is, the impression made by any 
periodical vibration of the air ; secondly a simple tone, that is, the impression 
produced by a simple or pendular vibration of the air ; and thirdly a compound 
tone, that is, the impression produced by the simultaneous action of several simple 
tones with certain definite ratios of pitch as already explained. A musical tone 
may be either simple or compound. For the sake of brevity, tone will be used in 



*[The ordinal number of a partial tone 
in general, must be distinguished from the 
ordinal number of an upper partial tone in 
particular. For the same tone the former 
number is always greater by unity than the 
latter, because the partials in general include 
the prime, which is reckoned as the first, and 
the upper-'paxtials exclude the prime, which 
being the' lotuest partial is of course not an 
upper partial at all. Thus the partials gene- 
rally numbered 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 are the 
same as the upper partials numbered 1*2 3 
4 5 6 7 8 respectively. As even the 
Author has occasionally failed to carry out 
this distinction in the original German text, 
and other writers have constantly neglected it, 
too much weight cannot be here laid upon it. 
The presence or absence of the word upper 
before the word partial must always be care- 



fully observed. It is safer never to speak of 
an upper partial by its ordinal number, but to 
caU the fifth upper partial the sixth partial, 
omitting the word upper and increasing the 51 
ordinal number by one place. And so in 
other cases. — Translator,] 

t The laW/ of these vibrations may be 
popxilarly explained by means of the construc- 
tion in fig. 10. Suppose a point to describe 
the circle of which c is the centre with a 
uniform velocity, and that an observer stands 
at a considerable distance in the prolongation 
of the line e h, so that he does not see the 
surface of the circle but only its edge, in 
which case the point will appear merely to 
move up and down along its diameter a b. 
Thia up and down motion would take place 
exactly according to the law of pendular 
vibration. To represent this motion graphio- 



FiG. 10. 




^ 



ally by means of a curve, divide the length 
e g, supposed to correspond to the time of a 
single period, into as many (here 12) equal 
parts as the circumference of the circle, and 
draw the perpendiculars 1, 2, 3, &c., on the 
dividing points of the line e g, in order, equal 
in length to and in the same direction with, 
those drawn in the circle from the correspond- 
ing points 1, 2, 3, &c. In this way we obtain 
the curve drawn in fig. 10, which agrees in 



form with that drawn by the tuning-fork, 
fig. 6, p. 206, but is of a larger size. Mathe- 
matically expressed, the distance of the vibrat- 
ing point from its mean position at any time 
is equal to the sine of an arc proportional to 
the corresponding time, and hence the form of 
simple vibrations are also called the sine- 
vibrcUions [and the above curve is also known 
as the curve of sines]. 



24 



DEFINITION OF TERMS EMPLOYED. 



PART I. 



ihe general sense of a musical tone, leaving the context or a prefixed qualification 
to determine whether it is simple or compomid. A compound tone will often be 
briefly called a note, and a simple tone will also be frequently called Skpa/rticU, when 
used in connection with a compound tone ; otherwise, the full expression simple 
tone will be employed. A note has, properly speaking, no single pitch, as it is 
made up of various partials each of which has its own pitch. By the pitch of a 
note or compound tone then we shall therefore mean the pitch of its lowest partial 
or prime tone. By a chord or conibination of tones we mean several musical tones 
(whether simple or compound) produced by different instruments or different parts 
of the same instrument so as to be heard at the same time. The facts here adduced 
show us then that every musical tone in which harmonic upper partial tones can 
be distinguished, although produced by a single instrument, may really be con- 
sidered as in itself a chord or combination of various simple tones.* 



If 



*[The above paragraph relating to the 
English temiB used in this translation, neces- 
sarily differs in many respects from the original , 
in whioh a justification is given of the use 
made by the Author of certain German ex- 
pressions. It has been my object to employ 
terms which should be thoroughly English, 
and should not in any way recall the German 
words. The word tone in English is extremely 
ambiguous. Prof. Tjmdall {Lectures on Sounds 
2nd mL 1869, p. 117) has ventured to define a 
tone as a simple tone, in agreement with £hK>f. 
Helmholtz, who in the present passage limits 
the German word Ton in the same way. But 
I felt that an English reader could not be 
safely trusted to keep this very peculiar and 
important class of musical tones, which he 
has very rarely or never heard separately, 
invariably distinct from those musioiBbl tones 

Hwith which he is familiar, unless the word 
tone were uniformly qualified by the epithet 
simple. The only exception I could make was 
in the case of a particUtone, which is received 
at once as a new conception. Even Prof. 
Helmholtz himself has not succeeded in using 
his word Ton consistently for a simple tone 
only, and this was an additional warning to 
me. English musicians have been also in 
the habit of using tone to signify a certain 
musical interval, and semitone for half of that 
interval, on the equally tempered scale. In 
this case I write Tone and Semitone with 
capital initials, a practice which, as already 
explained (note, p. ISd'), I have found con- 
venient for the names of all intervals, as 
Thirds, Fifths, &o. Prof. Helmholtz uses the 
word Klang for a musiccU tone, which gener- 

il ally, but not always, means a oompouna tone. 
Prof. Tyndall {ibid.) therefore proposes to use 
the English word dang in the same sense. 
But dang has aJready a meaning in English, 
thus denned by Webster: *a sharp shrill 
sound, made by striking together metaUic 
substances, or sonorous bodies, as the dang 
of arms, or any like sound, as the dang of 
trumpets. This word implies a degree of 
harshness in the sound, or more harshness 
than clink.* Interpreted scientifically, then, 
clang according to this definition, is either 
noise or one of those musical tones with in- 
harmonic upper partials which will be sub- 
sequently explained. It is therefore totally 
unadapted to represent a musical tone in 
general, for which the simple word ton^ seems 
eminently suited, being of course originally 
the tone produced by a stretched string. The 
common word note, properly the mark by 



which a musical tone is written, will also, in 
accordance with the general practice of musi- 
cians, be used for a musical tone, which is 
genenJlv compound, without necessarily im- 
plying that it is one of the few recognised 
tones in our musical scale. Of course, if 
dang could not be used. Prof. Tyndall's 
suggestion to translate Prof. Helmholtz's 
Klangfarbe by dangtini {ibid.) fell to the 
ground. I can find no valid reason for sup- 
planting the tima-honoured expression qualiiy 
of tone. Prof. Tyndall {ibid.) quotes Dr. 
Young to the effect that ' this quality of sound 
is sometimes called its register, colour, or 
timbre *. Register has a distinct meaning in 
vocal music which must not be disturbed. 
Timbre, properly a kettledrum, then a helmet, 
then the coat of arms surmounted with a 
helmet, then the official stamp bearing that 
coat of arms (now used in France for a 
postage label), and then the mark which 
declarod a thing to be what it pretends to be, 
Bums's 'guinea's stamp,* is a foreign word, 
often odiously mispronounced, and not worth 
preserving. Colour I have never met with 
as applied to music, except at most as a 
passing metaphorical expression. But the 
difference of tones in quality is familiar to 
our language. Then as to the Partial Tones, 
Prof. Helmholtz uses TheiUdne and Partial- 
tone, which are aptly Englished by partial 
simple tones. The words simple and tone, 
however, may be omitted when partials is 
employed, as partials are necessarily both 
tones and simple. The oonstitvant tones of a 
chord may be either simple or compound. 
The Orundtm or fundamental tone of a 
compound tone then becomes its prime tone, 
or briefly its prime. The Qrundtan or root of 
a chord will be further explained hereaiter. 
Upper partial (simple) tones, that is, the 
partials exclusive of the prime, even when 
harmonic (that is, for the most part, belong- 
ing to the first six partial tones), must be 
distinguished from the sounds usually called 
harmonics when produced on a violin or harp 
for instance, for such harmonics are not neces- 
sarily simple tones, but are more generally 
compounds of some of the complete series of 
partial tones belonging to the musical tone of 
the whole string, selected by damping the 
remainder. The fading harmofiics heard in 
listening to the sound of a pianoforte string, 
struck and undamped, as the sound dies away, 
are also compound and not simple partial 
tones, but as they have the successive partials 
for their successive primes, they have the 



OHAPB. I. II. COEXISTENCE OF DISTINCT WAVES OF SOUND. 



25 



Now, sinoe quality of tone, as we have seen, depends on the form of vibration, 
which also determines the oooorrenoe of upper partial tones, we have to inquire 
how far differences in quality of tone depend on different force or loudness of upper 
partials. This inquiry will be found to give a means of clearing up our concep- 
tions of what has hitherto been a perfect enigma, — ^the nature of quality of tone. 
And we must then, of course, attempt to explain how the ear manages to analyse 
every musical tone into a series of partial tones, and what is the meaning of this 
analysis. These investigations wiU engage our attention in the following chapters. 



CHAPTBB II. 



ON THR G0MF08ITI0N OF VIBBATIONS. 



H 



At the end of the last chapter we came upon the remarkable fact that the human 
ear is capable, under certain conditions, of separating the musical tone produced 
by a single musical instrument, into a series of simple tones, namely, the prime 
partial tone, and the various upper partial tones, each of which produces its own 
separate sensation. That the ear is capable of distinguishing from each other 
tones proceeding from different sources, that is, which do not arise from one and 
the same sonorous body, we know from daily experience. There is no difficulty 
during a concert in following the melodic progression of each individual instru- 
ment or voice, if we direct our attention to it exclusively ; and, after sonve practice, 
most persons can succeed in following the simultaneous progression of several 
imited parts. This is true, indeed, not merely for musical tones, but also for 
noises, and for mixtures of music and noise. When several persons are speaking 
at once, we can generally listen at pleasure to the words of any single one of them, H 
and even understand those words, provided that they are not too much overpowered 
by the mere loudness of the others. Hence it follows, first, that many different 
trains of waves of sound can be propagated at the same time through the same 
mass of air, without mutual disturbance; and, secondly, that the human ear is 
capable of again analysing into its constituent elements that composite motion of 
the air which is produced by the simultaneous action of several musical instru- 
ments. We will first investigate the nature of the motion of the air when it is 
produced by several simultaneous musical tones, and how such a compound motion 
is distinguished from that due to a single musical tone. We shall see that the ear 
has no decisive test by which it can in all cases distinguish between the effect of a 



pitch of those partials. But these fading 
harmonics are not regular compound tones of 
the kind described on p. 22a, because the lower 
partials are absent one after another. Both 
sets of harmonics serve to indicate the exist- 
ence and place of the partials. But they are 
no more those upper partial tones themselves, 
than the ori^nal compound tone of the string 
is its ovni prime. Great confusion of thought 
having, to my own knowledge, arisen from 
confounding such harmonics with upp&rparticU 
toneSt I have generally avoided using the am- 
biguous substantive harmonic. Properly speak- 
ing the harmonics of any compound tone are 
other compound tones of which the primes are 
partials of the original compound tone of 
which they are said to be harmonics. Prof. 
Helmholtz's term OberWne is merely a con- 
traction for OberpartialUiTie, but the casual 
resemblance of the sounds of ober and over, has 
led Prof. Tyndall to the erroneous translation 
overtones. The German ober is an adjective 



meaning upper, but the English preposition 
over is equivalent to the German preposition 
lU>er, Compare Oberzahn, an * upper tooth,' U 
i.e., a tooth in the upper jaw, with Ueberzahn, 
an * overtooth,' i.e., one grown over another, 
a projecting tooth. The continual recurrence 
of such words as clang, clangtint, overtone, 
would combine to give a strange un-English 
appearance to a translation from the German. 
On the contrary I have endeavoured to put it 
into as straightforward English as possible. 
But for those acquainted with the original and 
with Prof. Tyndall's work, this explanation 
seemed necessary. Finally I would caution 
the reader against using overtones for partial 
tones in general, as almost every one who 
adopts Prof. Tyndall's word is in the habit of 
doing. Indeed I have in the course of this 
translation observed, that even Prof. Helmholtz 
himself has been occasionally misled to em- 
ploy OberWne in the same loose manner. See 
my remarks in note, p. 23c, — Translator.] 



26 COMPOSITION OF WAVES. part i. 

motion of the air caused by several dififerent musieal tones arising from different 
sources, and that caused by the musical tone of a single sounding body. Hence 
the ear has to analyse the composition of single musical tones, under proper con- 
ditions, by means of the same faculty which enabled it to analyse the composition 
of simultaneous musical tones. We shall thus obtain a clear conception of what 
is meant by analysing a single musical tone into a series of partial simple tones, 
and we shall perceive that this phenomenon depends upon one of the most 
essential and fundamental properties of the human ear. 

We begin by examining the motion of the air which corresponds to several 
simple tones acting at the same time on the same mass of air. To illustrate this 
kind of motion it will be' again convenient to refer to the waves formed on a calm 
surface of water. We have seen (p. 9a) that if a point of the surface is agitated by a 
stone thrown upon it, the agitation is propagated in rings of waves over the surface 

U to more and more distant points. Now, throw two stones at the same time on to 
different points of the surface, thus producing two centres of agitation. Each will 
give rise to a separate ring of waves, and the two rings gradually expanding, will 
finally meet. Where the waves thus come together, the water will be set in 
motion by both kinds of agitation at the same time, but this in no wise prevents 
both series of waves from advancing further over the surface, just as if each were 
alone present and the other had no existence at all. As they proceed, those 
parts of both rings which had just coincided, again appear separate and unaltered 
in form. These little waves, caused by throwing in stones, may be accompanied 
by other kinds of waves, such as those due to the wind or a passing steamboat. 
Our circles of waves will spread out over the water thus agitated, with the same 
quiet regularity as they did upon the calm surface. Neither will the greater waves 
be essentially disturbed by the less, nor the less by the greater, provided the waves 
never break ; if that happened, their regular course would certainly be impeded. 

IT Indeed it is seldom possible to survey a large surface of water from a high 
point of sight, without perceiving a great multitude of different systems of waves 
mutually overtopping and crossing each other. This is best seen on the surface of 
the sea, viewed from a lofty clif^ when there is a lull after a stiff breeze. We first 
see the great waves, advancing in far-stretching ranks from the blue distance, here 
and there more clearly marked out by their white foaming crests, and following 
one another at regular intervals towards the shore. From the shore they rebound, 
in different directions according to its sinuosities, and cut obliquely across the 
advancing waves. A passing steamboat forms its own wedge-shaped wake of 
waves, or a bird, darting on a fish, excites a small circular system. The eye of the 
spectator is easily able to pursue each one of these different trains of waves, great 
and small, wide and narrow, straight and curved, and observe how each passes 
over the surface, as undisturbedly as if the water over which it flits were not 
agitated at the same time by other motions and other forces. I must own that 

If whenever I attentively observe this spectacle it awakens in me a peculiar kind of 
intellectual pleasure, because it bares to the bodily eye, what the mind's eye grasps 
only by the help of a long series of complicated conclusions for the waves of the 
invisible atmospheric ocean. 

We have to imagine a perfectly similar spectacle proceeding in the interior of a 
ball-room, for instance. Here we have a number of musical instruments in action, 
speaking men and women, rustling garments, gliding feet, clinking glasses, and so 
on. All these causes give rise to systems of waves, which dart through the mass 
of air in the room, are reflected from its walls, return, strike the opposite wall, are 
again reflected, and so on till they die out. We have to imagine that from the 
mouths of men and from the deeper musical instruments there proceed waves of 
from 8 to 12 feet in length [c to F]y from the lips of the women waves of 2 to 4 
feet in length [c" to c'], from the rustling of the dresses a fine small crumple of 
wave, and so on ; in short, a tumbled entanglement of the most different kinds of 
motion, complicated beyond conception. 



CHAF. n. ALGEBRAICAL ADDITION OF WAVES. 27 

And yet, as the ear is able to distingaish all the separate oonstituent parts of ' 
this confused whole, we are forced to conclude that all these different systems of 
wave coexist in the mass of air, and le^ve one another mutually undisturbed. 
But how is it possible for them to coexist, since every individual train of waves has 
at any particular point in the mass of air its own particular degree of condensa- 
tion and rarefaction, which determines the velocity of the particles of air to this 
side or that ? It is evident that at each point in the mass of air, at each instant 
of time, there can be only one single degree of condensation, and that the particles 
of air can be moving with only one single determinate kind of motion, having only 
one single determinate amount of velocity, and passing in only one single deter- 
minate direction. 

What happens under such circumstances is seen directly by the eye in the 

waves of v^ater. If where the water shows large waves we throw a stone in, the 

waves thus caused wiU, so to speak, cut into the larger moving surface, and this H 

surface will be partly raised, and partly depressed, by the new waves, in such a 

way that the fresh crests of the rings will rise just as much above, and the troughs 

sink just as much below the curved surfaces of the previous larger waves, as they 

would have risen above or sunk below the horizontal surface of calm water. 

Hence where a crest of the smaller system of rings of waves comes upon a crest 

of the greater system of waves, the surface of the water is raised by the sum of 

the two heights, and where a trough of the former coincides with a trough of the 

latter, the surface is depressed by the sum of the two depths. This may be 

expressed more briefly if we consider the heights of the crests above the level of 

the surface at rest, as positive magnitudes, and the depths of the troughs as negative 

magnitudes, and then form the so-called algebraical sum of these positive and 

negative magnitudes, in which case, as is well known, two positive magnitudes 

(heights of crests) must be added, and similarly for two negative magnitudes (depths 

of troughs) ; but when both negative and positive concur, one is to be subtracted H 

from the other. Performing the addition then in this algebraical sense, we can 

express our description of the surface of the water on which two systems of waves 

concur, in the following simple manner : The distance of the surface of the water 

at any point from its position of rest is at any moment eqtuil to the [algebraical] 

sum of the distances at which it would have stood had each wave acted separately 

at the same place and at the samie tims. 

The eye most clearly and easily distinguishes the action in such a case as has 
been just adduced, where a smaller circular system of waves is produced on a large 
rectilinear system, because the two systems are then strongly distinguished from 
each other both by the height and shape of the waves. But with a little attention 
the eye recognises the same fact even when the two systems of waves have but 
slightly different forms, as when, for example, long rectilinear waves advancing 
towards the shore concur with those reflected from it in a slightly different 
direction. In this case we observe those well-known comb-backed waves where U 
the crest of one system of waves is heightened at some points by the crests of the 
other system, and at others depressed by its troughs. The multiplicity of forms 
is here extremely great, and any attempt to describe them would lead us too 
far. The attentive observer will readily comprehend the result by examining 
any disturbed surface of water, without further description. It will suffice for our 
purpose if the first example has given the reader a clear conception of what is 
meant by adding waves together* 

Hence although the surface of the water at any instant of time can assume 
only one single form, while each of two different systems of waves simultaneously 
attempts to impress its own shape upon it, we are able to suppose in the above 

* The velocities and displacements of the addition of waves as is spoken of in the text, 

particles of water are also to be added accord- is not perfectly correct, unless the heights of 

ing to the law of the so-called paiallelogxam the waves are infinitely small in comparison 

of forces. Strictly speaking, such a simple with their lengths. 



28 ALGEBRAICAL ADDITION OP WAVES. part i. 

sense that the two systems ooezist and are saperimposed, by considering the 
actual elevations and depressions of the surface to be suitably separated into two 
parts, each of which belongs to one of the systems alone. 

In the same sense, then, there is also a superimposition of different systems of 
sound in the air. By each train of waves of sound, the density of the air and the 
velocity and position of the particles of air, are temporarily altered. There are 
places in the wave of sound comparable with the crests of the waves of water, in 
which the quantity of the air is increased, and the air, not having free space to 
escape, is condensed ; and other places in the mass of air, comparable to the 
troughs of the waves of water, having a diminished quantity of air, and hence 
diminished density. It is true that two different degrees of density, produced by 
two different systems of waves, cannot coexist in the same place at the same time ; 
nevertheless the condensations and rarefactions of the air can be (algebraically) 
added, exactly as the elevations and depressions of the surface of the water in the 
former case. Where two condensations are added we obtain increased condensation, 
where two rarefactions are added we have increased rarefaction ; while a concur- 
rence of condensation and rarefaction mutually, in whole or in part, destroy or 
neutralise each other. 
5[ The displacements of the particles of air are compounded in a similar manner. 
If the displacements of two different systems of waves are not in the same direc- 
tion, they are compounded diagonally ; for example, if one system would drive a 
particle of air upwards, and another to the right, its real path will be obliquely 
upwards towards the right. For our present purpose there is no occasion to enter 
more particularly into such compositions of motion in different directions. We 
are only interested in the effect of the mass of air upon the ear, and for this we 
are only concerned with the motion of the air in the passages of the ear. Now the 
passages of our ear are so narrow in comparison vrith the length of the waves of 
IT sound, that we need only consider such motions of the air as are parallel to the 
axis of the passages, and hence have only to distinguish displacements of the 
particles of air outwards and inwards, that is towards the outer air and towards 
the interior of the ear. For the magnitude of these displacements as well as for 
their velocities with which the particles of air move outwards and inwards, the 
same (algebraical) addition holds good as for the crests and troughs of waves of 
water. 

Hence, when several sonorous bodies in the surrounding atmosphere, simul' 
taneously excite different systems of waves of sound, the changes of density of the 
air, and the displacements and velocities of the particles of the air within the 
passages of the ear, are each equal to the (algebraical) sum of the corresponding 
changes of density, displacements, and velocities, which each system of waves 
would have separately produced, if it had acted independently ; * and in this sense 
we can say that all the separate vibrations which separate waves of sound would 
IT have produced, coexist undisturbed at the same time within the passages of our ear. 
After having thus in answer to the first question explained in what sense it is 
possible for several different systems of waves to coexist on the same surface of 
water or within the same mass of air, we proceed to determine the means possessed 
by our organs of sense, for analysing this composite whole into its original consti- 
tuents. 

I have already observed that an eye which surveys an extensive and disturbed 
surface of water, easily distinguishes the separate systems of waves from each 
other and follows their motions. The eye has a great advantage over the ear in 
being able to survey a large extent of surface at the same moment. Hence the 
eye readily sees whether the individual waves of water are rectilinear or curved, 
and whether they have the same centre of curvature, and in what direction they 

* The same is true for the whole mass of according to the law of the parallelogram of 
external air, if only the addition of the dis- forces, 
placements in different directions i^ made 



CHAP. n. ETE AND EAB CONTRASTED. 29 

are advaacing. All these observations assist it in determining whether two systems 
of waves are connected or not, and hence in discovering their corresponding parts. 
Moreover, on the surface of the water, waves of unequal length advance with 
unequal velocities, so that if they coincide at one moment to such a degree as to 
be difficult to distinguish, at the next instant one train pushes on and the other 
lags behind, so that they become again separately visible. In this way, then, the 
observer is greatly assisted in referring each system to its point of departure, and 
in keeping it distinctly visible during its further course. For the eye, then, two 
systems of waves having different points of departure can never coalesce; for 
example, such as arise from two stones thrown into the water at different points. 
If in any one place the rings of waves coincide so closely as not to be easily 
separable, they always remain separate during the greater part of their extent. 
Hence the eye could not be easily brought to confuse a compound with a simple 
undulatory motion. 'Yet this is precisely what the ear does under similar drcum- H 
stances when it separates the musical tone which has proceeded from a single 
source of sound, into a series of simple partial tones. 

But the ear is much more unfavourably situated in relation to a system of waves 
of sound, than the eye for a system of waves of water. The ear is affected only 
by the motion of that mass of air which happens to be in the immediate neigh- 
bourhood of its tympanum within the aural passage. Since a transverse section 
of the aural passage is comparatively small in comparison with the length of waves 
of sound (which for serviceable musical tones varies from 6 inches to 32 feet),* it 
corresponds to a single point of the mass of air in motion. It is so small that 
distinctly different degrees of density or velocity could scarcely occur upon it, 
because the positions of greatest and least density, of greatest positive and nega- 
tive velocity, are always separated by half the length of a wave. The ear is 
therefore in nearly the same condition as the eye would be if it looked at one point 
of the surface of the water, through a long narrow tube, which would permit of ^ 
seeing its rising and falling, and were then required to undertake an analysis 
of the compound waves. It is easily seen that the eye would, in most cases, 
completely fail in the solution of such a problem. The ear is not in a condition 
to discover how the air is moving at distant spots, whether the waves which strike 
it are spherical or plane, whether they interlock in one or more circles, or in what 
direction they are advancing. The circumstances on which the eye chiefly de- 
pends for forming a judgment, are all absent for the ear. 

If, then, notwithstanding all these difficulties, the ear is capable of distin- 
guishing musical tones arising from different sources — ^and it really shows a 
marvellous readiness in so doing — it must employ means and possess properties 
altogether different from those employed or possessed by the eye. But whatever 
these means may be — and we shall endeavour to determine them hereafter — it 
is dear that the analysis of a composite mass of musical tones must in the first 
place be closely connected with some determinate properties of the motion of the ^ 
air, capable of impressing themselves even on such a very minute mass of air as 
that contained in the aural passage. If the motions of the particles of air in this 
passage are the same on two different occasions, the ear will receive the same 
sensation, whatever be the origin of those motions, whether they spring from one 
or several sources. 

We have already explained that the mass of air which sets the tympanic 
membrane of the ear in motion, so far as the magnitudes here considered are 
concerned, must be looked upon as a single point in the surrounding atmosphere. 
Are there, then, any peculiarities in the motion of a single particle of air which 
would differ for a single musical tone, and for a combination of musical tones ? 
We have seen that for each single musical tone there is a corresponding periodical 

* [These are of coorae rather more than flae oigan pipes. See Ohap. V. sect. 6, and 
twice the length of the corresponding open compare p. 26d. — Translator.'] 



30 



COMPOSITION OF SIMPLE WAVES. 



PART I. 



motion of the air, and that its pitch is determined by the length of the periodic 
time, but that the kind of motion daring any one single period is perfectly arbitrary, 
and may indeed be infinitely various. If then the motion of the air lying in the 
aural passage is not periodic, or if at least its periodic time is not as short as that 
of an audible musical tone, this fact will distinguish it from any motion which 
belongs to a musical tone ; it must belong either to noises or to several simultaneous 
musical tones. Of this kind are really the greater number of cases where the dif- 
ferent musical tones have been only accidentally combined, and are therefore not 
designedly framed into musical chords ; nay, even where orchestral music is per- 
formed, the method of tempered tuning which at present prevails, prevents an 
accurate fulfilment of the conditions under which alone the resulting motion of 
the air can be exactly periodic. Hence in the greater number of cases a want 
of periodicity in the motion might furnish a mark for distinguishing the presence 
H of a composite mass of musical tones. 

But a composite mass of musical tones may also give rise to a purely periodic 
motion of the air^ namely, when all the musical tones which intermingle^ have 
pitch numbers which are all multiples of one and the same old number, or which 

Fig. 11. 



B 



11 



D 




comes to the same thing, when all these musical tones, so far as their pitch is 
concerned, may be regarded as the upper partial tones of the same prime tone. It 
f was mentioned in Chapter I. (p. 22a, b) that the pitch numbers of the upper partial 
tones are multiples of the pitch number of the prime tone. The meaning of this 
rule will be clear from a particular example. The curve A, fig. 11, represents a 
pendular motion in the manner explained in Chap. I. (p. 21b), as produced in the 
air of the aural passage by a tuning-fork in action. The horizontal lengths in the 
curves of fig. 11, consequently represent the passing time, and the vertical heights 
the corresponding displacements of the particles of air in the aural passage. Now 
suppose that with the first simple tone to which the curve A corresponds, there is 
sounded a second simple tone, represented by the curve B, an Octave higher than 
the first. This condition requires that two vibrations of the curve B should be 
made in the same time as one vibration of the curve A. In A, the sections of the 
curve d^S and S 5^ are perfectly equal and similar. The curve B is also divided 
into equal and similar sections e c and c c^ by the points e, c, c^. We could cer- 
tainly halve each of the sections e c and c c^, and thus obtain equal and similar 
sections, each of which would then correspond to a single period of B. But by 



CHAP. n. COMPOSITION OF SIMPLE WAVES. 31 

taking sections consisting of two periods of B, we divide B into larger sections, 
each of which is of the same horizontal length, and hence corresponds to the same 
duration of time, as the sections of A. 

Ify then, both simple tones are heard at once, and the times of the points e and 
d^ € and 8, cj and S^ coincide, the heights of the portions of the section of curve 
e c have to be [algebraically] added to heights of the section of curve dg^, and 
similarly for the sections c c^ and 8 3^. The result of this addition is shown in the 
curve C. The dotted line is a duplicate of the section d^S in the curve A. Its 
object is to make the composition of the two sections immediately evident to the 
eye. It is easily seen that the curve G in every place rises as much above or sinks 
as much below the curve A, as the curve B respectively rises above or sinks 
beneath the horizontal line. The heights of the curve G are consequently, in ac- 
cordance with the rule for compounding vibrations, equal to the [algebraical] sum 
of the corresponding heights of A and B. Thus the perpendicular c^ in G is the f 
sum of the perpendiculars a| and b^ in A and B ; the lower part of this perpen- 
dicular Cj, from the straight line up to the dotted curve, is equcJ to the perpen- 
dicular a^, und the upper part, from the dotted to the continuous curve, is equal to 
the perpendicular b^^. On the other hand, the height of the perpendicular c^ is 
equal to the height a, diminished by the depth of the fall b^. And in the same 
. way all other points in the curve G are found.* 

It is evident that the motion represented by the curve G is also periodic, and 
that its periods have the same duration as those of A. Thus the addition of the 
section d^S of A and e c of B, must give the same result as the addition of the 
perfectly equal and similar sections 8 B^ and c c^, and, if we supposed both curves 
to be continued, the same would be the case for all the sections into which they 
would be divided. It is also evident that equal sections of both curves could not 
continually coincide in this way after completing the addition, unless the curves thus 
added could be also separated into exactly equal and similar sections of the same il 
length, as is the case in fig. 11, where two periods of B last as long or have the 
same horizontal length as one of A. Now the horizontal lengths of our figure 
represent time, and if we pass from the curves to the real motions, it results that 
the motion of air caused by the composition of the two simple tones, A and B, is 
also periodic, just because one of these simple tones makes exactly twice as many 
vibrations as the other in the same time. 

It is easily seen by this example that the peculiar form of the two curves A 
and B has nothing to do with the fact that their sum G is also a periodic curve. 
Whatever be the form of A and B, provided that each can be separated into equal 
and similar sections which have the same horizontal lengths as the equal and 
similar sections of the other — no matter whether these sections correspond to one 
or two, or three periods of the individual curves — ^then any one section of the curve 
A compounded with any one section of the curve B, will always give a section 
of the curve G, which will have the same length, and will be precisely equal and ^ 
similar to any other section of the curve G obtained by compounding any other 
section of A with any other section of B. 

When such a section embraces several periods of the corresponding curve (as in 
fig. 11, the sections e c and c e^ each consist of two periods of the simple tone B), 
then the pitch of this second tone B, is that of an upper partial tone of a prime 
(as the simple tone A in fig. 11), whose period has the length of that principal 
section, in accordance with the rule above cited. 

In order to give a slight conception of the multiplicity of forms producible by 
comparatively simple compositions, I may remark that iJie compound curve would 

* Readers not used to geometrical con- spending perpendiculars in A and B in proper 

Btructions are strongly recommended to trace directions, and joining the extremities of the 

the two curves A and B, and to construct the lengths thus found by a curved line. In this 

curve G from them, by drawing a number of way only can a clear conception of the com* 

perpendiculars to a straight line, and then position of vibrations be rendered sufficietitly 

setting off upon them the lengths of the corre- familiar for subsequent use. — Tratulaior*] 



32 



DIFFERENCE OF PHASE. 



PARS I. 



receive another form if the onrves B, fig. 11, were displaoed a little with respect to 
the curve A before the addition were commenced. Let B be displaced by being 
slid to the right until the point e falls under d^ in A, and the composition will then 
give the curve D with narrow crests and broad troughs, both sides of the crest 
being, however, equally steep ; whereas in the curve C one side is steeper than the 
other. If we displace the curve B still more by sliding it to the right tQl e falls 
under d^, the compound curve would resemble the reflection of G in a mirror : 
that is, it would have the same form as G reversed as to right and left ; the steeper 
inclination which in G lies to the left would now lie to the right. Again, if we 
displace B till e falls under d, we obtain a curve similar to D, fig. 11, but reversed 
as to up and down, as may be seen by holding the book upside-down, the crests 
being broad and the troughs narrow. 



H 



Fig. 12. 



If 




All these curves with their various transitional forms are periodic curves. 
Other composite periodic curves are shown at G, D, fig. 12 above, where they are 
compounded of the two curves A and B, having their periods in the ratio of 1 to 3. 
The dotted curves are as before copies of the first complete vibration or period 
of the curve A, in order that the reader may see at a glance that the compound 
curve is always as much higher or lower than A, as B is higher or lower than the 
horizontal line. In G, the curves A and B are added as they stand, but for D the 
curve B has been first slid half a wave's length to the right, and then the addition 

51 has been effected. Both forms differ from each other and from all preceding ones. 
G has broad crests and broad troughs, D narrow crests and narrow troughs. 

In these and similar cases we have seen that the compound motion is perfectly 
and regularly periodic, that is, it is exactly of the same kind as if it proceeded 
from a single musical tone. The curves compounded in these examples correspond 
to the motions of single simple tones. Thus, the motions shown in fig. 11 (on 
p. 306, c) might have been produced by two tuning-forks, of which one sounded an 
Octave higher than the other. But we shall hereafter see that a flute by itself 

I when gently blown is sufi&cient to create a motion of the air corresponding to that 
shown in G or D of fig. 11. The motions of fig. 12 might be produced by two 
tuning-forks of which one sounded the twelfth of the other. Also a single closed 

'. organ pipe of the narrower kind (the stop called Qmntaten*) would give nearly the 

. same motion as that of G or D in fig. 12. 

* [The names of the stops on Gennan English organs. I find it best, therefore, not 
organs do not always agree with those on to translate them, but to give their ezplana- 



CHAP. n. 



ANALYSIS INTO SIMPLE VIBRATIONS. 



33 



Here, then, the motion of the air in the aural passage has no property by which 
the composite * musical tone can be distinguished from the single musical tone. 
If the ear is not assisted by other accidental circumstances, as by one tuning-fork 
beginning to sound before the other, so that we hear them struck, or, in the other 
case, the rustling of the wind against the mouthpiece of the flute or lip of the 
organ pipe, it has no means of deciding whether the musical tone is simple or 
composite. 

Now, in what relation does the ear stand to such a motion of the air? Does 
it analyse it or does it not ? Experience shows us that when two tuning-forks, an 
Octave or a Twelfth apart in pitch, are sounded together, the ear is quite able to 
distinguish their simple tones, although the distinction is a little more difficult 
with these than with other intervals. But if the ear is able to analyse a compo- 
site musical tone produced by two tuning-forks, it cannot but be in a condition to 
carry out a similar analysis, when the same motion of the air is produced by a H 
single flute or organ pipe. And this is really the case. The single musical tone 
of such instruments, proceeding from a single source, is, as we have already men- 
tioned, analysed into partial simple tones, consisting in each case of a prime tone, 
and one upper partial tone, the latter being different in the two cases. 

The analysis of a single musical tone into a series of partial tones depends, 
then, upon the same property of the ear as that which enables it to distinguish 
different musical tones from each other, and it must necessarily effect both ansJyses 
by a rule which is independent of the fact that the waves of sound are produced 
by one or by several musical instruments. 

The rule by which the ear proceeds in its analysis was first laid down as 
generally true by G. S. Ohm. Part of this rule has been already enunciated in 
the last chapter (p. 23a), where it was stated that only that particular motion of 
the air which we have denominated a simple vibration^ for which the vibrating 
particles swing backwards and forwards according to the law of pendular motion, H 
is capable of exciting in the ear the sensation of a single simple tone. Every 
motion of the air, then, which corresponds to a composite mass of musical tones, 
is, according to Ohm's law, capable of being analysed into a sum of simple pen- 
dular vibrations, and to each such single simple vibration corresponds a simple 
tone, sensible to the ear, and having a pitch determine by the periodic time of the 
corresponding motion of the air. 

The proofs of the correctness of this law, the reasons why, of all vibrational 
forms, only that one which we have called a simple vibration plays such an 
important part, must be left for Chapters IV. and VI. Our present business is 
only to gain a clear conception of what the rule means. 

The simple vibrational form is inalterable and always the same. It is only its 
amplitude and its periodic time which are subject to change. But we have seen 
in figs. 11 and 12 (p. 306 and p. 32b) what varied forms the composition of only two 
simple vibrations can produce. The number of these forms might be greatly in- ^ 
creased, even without introducing fresh simple vibrations of different periodic 
times, by merely changing the proportions which the heights of the two simple 



tions from E. J. Hopkins's The Organ^ its 
History and Construction, 1870, pp. 444-448. 
In this case ..Mr. Hopkins, following other 
authorities, prints the word * quintaton/ and 
defines it, in 16 feet tone, as 'double stopped 
diapason, of rather small scale, producing the 
Twelfth of the fundamental sound, as well as 
the ground-tone itself, that is, sounding the 
16 and 5| ft. tones ' which means sounding the 
notee beginning with C„ simultaneously with 
the notes beginning with G, which is called the 
54^ foot tone, because according to the organ- 
niakers' theory (not practice) the length of the 
O pipe is I of the length of tne C pipe, and ^ of 
16 is 5^. [See p. 15a, note^] And similarly, 



in other cases, * a pipe for sounding the Twelfth 
in addition to the fundamental tone \ It seems 
to be properly the English stop * Twelfth, 
Octave Quint, Duodecima,' No. 611, p. 141 of 
Hopkins. — Translator.] 

*[The reader must distinguish between 
single and simple musical tones. A single tone 
may be a compound tone inasmuch as it may 
be compounded of several simple musical tones, 
but it is single because it is produced by one 
sounding body. A composite musical tone is 
necessarily compound, but it is called composite 
because it is made up of tones (simple or com- 
pound) produced by several sounding bodies. — 
Translator,] 



34 ANALYSIS INTO SIMPLE VIBRATIONS. paet i. 

vibrational curves A and B bear to each other, or displacing the curve B by other 
distances to the right or left, than those already selected in the figures. By these 
simplest possible examples of such compositions, the reader will be able to form 
some idea of the enormous variety of forms which would result from using more 
than two simple forms of vibration, each form representing an upper partial tone 
of the same prime, and hence, on addition, always producing fresh periodic curves. 
We should be able to make the heights of each single simple vibrational curve 
greater or smaller at pleasure, and displace each one separately by any amount in 
respect to the prime, — or, in physical language, we should be able to alter their 
amplitudes and the difference of their phases ; and each such alteration of ampli- 
tude and difference of phase in each one of the simple vibrations would produce a fresh 
change in the resulting composite vibrational form. [See App. XX. sect. M. No. 2.] 
The multiplicity of vibrational forms which can be thus produced by the com- 
H position of simple pendular vibrations is not merely extraordinarily great : it is so 
great that it cannot be greater. The French mathematician Fourier has proved 
the correctness of a mathematical law, which in reference to our present subject 
may be thus enunciated: Any given regular periodic form of vibration can 
< I always be prodtLced by the addition of simple vibrations, having pitch numbers 
\ I which are once, twice, thrice, four times, &c,, as great as the pitch numbers of the 
given motion. 

The amplitudes of the elementary simple vibrations to which the height of our 
wave-curves corresponds, and the difference of phase, that is, the relative amount 
of horizontal displacement of the wave-curves, can always be found in every given 
case, as Fourier has shown, by peculiar methods of calculation (which, however, 
do not admit of any popular explanation), so that any given regularly periodic 
motion can always be exhibited in one single way, and in no other way whatever, 
as the sum of a certain number of pendular vibrations, 
H Since, according to the results already obtained, any regularly periodic motion 
corresponds to some musical tone, and any simple pendular vibration to a simple 
musical tone, these propositions of Fourier may be thus expressed in acoustical 
terms : 

Any vibrational motion of the air in the entrance to the ear, corresponding to a 
musical tone, may be always, and for each case only in one single way, exhibited as 
the sum of a number of simple vibrational motions, corresponding to the partials 
of this musical tone. 

Since, according to these propositions, any form of vibration, no matter what 
shape it may take, can be expressed as the sum of simple vibrations, its analysis 
into such a sum is quite independent of the power of the eye to perceive, by looking 
at its representative curve, whether it contains simple vibrations or not, and if it 
does, what they are. I am obliged to lay stress upon this point, because I have by 
no means unfrequently found even physicists start on the false hypothesis, that the 
^vibrational form must exhibit little waves corresponding to the several audible 
upper partial tones. A mere inspection of the figs. 11 and 12 (p. 306 and p. 326) 
will suffice to show that although the composition can be easily traced in the parts 
where the curve of the prime tone is dotted in, this is quite impossible in those 
parts of the curve C and D in each figure, where no such assistance has been 
provided. Or, if we suppose that an observer who had rendered himself thoroughly 
familiar with the curves of simple vibrations imagined that he could trace the com- 
position in these easy cases, he would certainly utterly fail on attempting to dis- 
cover by his eye alone the composition of such curves as are shown in figs. 8 
and 9 (p. 21c). In these will be found straight lines and acute angles. Perhaps 
it will be asked how it is possible by compounding such smooth and uniformly 
rounded curves as those of our simple vibrational forms A and B in figs. 11 and 
12, to generate at one time straight lines, and at another acute angles. The 
answer is, that an infinite number of simple vibrations are required to generate 
curves with such discontinuities as are there ghown. But when a great many 



CHAP. n. ANALYSIS INTO SIMPLE VIBRATIONS. 36 

such carves are combined, and are so chosen that in certain places they all bend 
in the same direction, and in others in opposite directions, the curvatures mutually 
strengthen each other in the first case, finally producing an infinitely great curva- 
ture, that is, an acute angle, and in the second case they mutually weaken each 
other, so that ultimately a straight line results. Hence we can generally lay iti 
down as a rule that the force or loudness of the upper partial tones is the greater, | 
the sharper the discontinuities of the atmospheric motion. When the motion, 
alters uniformly and gradually, answering to a vibrational curve proceeding in 
smoothly curved forms, only the deeper partial tones, which lie nearest to the . 
prime tone, have any perceptible intensity. But where the motion alters by jumps, ^ 
and hence the vibrational curves show angles or sudden changes of curvature, the ; 
upper partial tones will also have sensible force, although in all these cases the \ 
amplitudes decrease as the pitch of the upper partial tones becomes higher.* ' \ 

We shall become acquainted with examples of the analysis of given vibrational IT 
forms into separate partial tones in Chapter Y. 

The theorem of Fourier here adduced shows first that it is mathematically 
possible to consider a musical tone as a sum of simple tones, in the meaning we 
have attached to the words, and mathematicians have indeed always found it 
convenient to base their acoustic investigations on this mode of analysing vibrations. 
But it by no means follows that we are obliged to consider the matter in this way. 
We have rather to inquire, do these partial constituents of a musical tone, such as 
the mathemathical theory distinguishes and the ear perceives, really exist in the 
mass of air external to the ear ? Is this means of analysing forms of vibration 
which Fourier's theorem prescribes and renders possible, not merely a mathematical 
fiction, permissible for facilitating calculation, but not necessarily having any 
corresponding actual meaning in things themselves ? What makes us hit upon 
pendular vibrations, and none other, as the simplest element of all motions pro- 
ducing sound ? We can conceive a whole to be split into parts in very different 
and arbitrary ways. Thus we may find it convenient for a certain calculation to f 
consider the number 12 as the sum 8-(- 4, because the 8 may have to be cancelled, 
but it does not follow that 12 must always and necessarily be considered as merely 
the sum of 8 and 4. In another case it might be more convenient to consider 12 
as the sum of 7 and 5. Just as little does the mathematical possibility, proved by 
Fourier, of compounding all periodic vibrations out of simple vibrations, justify 
us in concluding that this is the only permissible form of analysis, if we cannot in 
addition establish that this analysis has also an essential meaning in nature. That 
this is indeed the case, that this analysis has a meaning in nature independently 
of theory, is rendered probable by the fact that the ear really efifects the same 
analysis, and also by the circumstance already named, that this kind of analysis 
has been found so much more advantageous in mathematical investigations than 
any other. Those modes of regarding phenomena that correspond to the most 
intimate constitution of the matter under investigation are, of course, also always 
those which lead to the most suitable and evident theoretical treatment. But it H 
would not be advisable to begin the investigation with the functions of the ear, 
because these are very intricate, and in themselves require much explanation. 
In the next chapter, therefore, we shall inquire whether the analysis of compound 
into simple vibrations has an actually sensible meaning in the external world, 
independently of the action of the ear, and we shall really be in a condition to 
show that certain mechanical effects depend upon whether a certain partial tone 

* Supposing n to be the number of the a sudden jump, and hence the curve has an 
order of a partial tone, and n to be very larce, ^ , /«v 1 i. i^i. 

then the amplit^cle of the upper partial tones »°"t« "^S^® '» (3) ^ ;n;^» ^^^n the curvature 

decreases : (1) as -, when the amplitude of the f?^f^« suddenly ; (4) when none of the differen- 
^ n '^ tial quotients are discontinuous, they must 

vibrations themselves makes a sudden jump ; ^ x i i. x i. -^ 

2 J r > decrease at least as fast as e . 

(2) as — .when their difiereoti?*! quotient makes 

d2 



36 MECHANICS OF SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE. part i. 

is or is not contained in a composite mass of musical tones. The existence 
of partial tones will thus acquire a meaning in nature, and our knowledge of 
their mechanical effects will in turn shed a new light on their relations to the 
human ear. 



CHAPTER III. 

ANALYSIS OF MUSICAL TONES BT 8TMPATHBTI0 BESONANCE. 

We proceed to show that the simple partial tones contained in a composite mass 
of musical tones, produce peculiar mechanical effects in nature, altogether inde- 
pendent of the human ear and its sensations, and also altogether independent of 

U merely theoretical considerations. These effects consequently give a peculiar objec- 
tive significance to this peculiar method of analysing vibrational forms. 

Such an effect occurs in the phenomenon of sympathetic resonance. This 
phenomenon is always found in those bodies which when once set in motion by 
any impulse, continue to perform a long series of vibrations before they come to 
rest. When these bodies are struck gently, but periodically, although each blow 
may be separately quite insufficient to produce a sensible motion in the vibratory 
body, yet, provided the periodic time of the gentle blows is precisely the same as 
the periodic time of the body's own vibrations, very large and powerful oscilla- 
tions may result. But if the periodic time of the regular blows is different from 
the periodic time of the oscillations, the resulting motion will be weak or quite 
insensible. 

Periodic impulses of this kind generally proceed from another body which is 
already vibrating regularly, and in this case the swings of the latter in the course 

^ of a little time, call into action the swings of the former. Under these circum- 
stances we have the process called sympathetic oscillation or sympathetic resonance. 
The essence of the mechanical effect is independent of the rate of motion, which 
may be fast enough to excite the sensation of sound, or slow enough not to produce 
anything of the kind. Musicians are well acquainted with sympathetic resonance. 
When, for example, the strings of two violins are in exact unison, and one string is 
bowed, the other will begin to vibrate. But the nature of the process is best seen 
in instances where the vibrations are slow enough for the eye to follow the whole 
of their successive phases. 

Thus, for example, it is known that the largest church-bells may be set in motion 
by a man, or even a boy, who pulls the ropes attached to them at proper and regular 
intervals, even when their weight of metal is so great that the strongest man could 
scarcely move them sensibly, if he did not apply his strength in determinate 
periodical intervals. When such a bell is once set in motion, it continues, like a 

^ struck pendulum, to oscillate for some time, until it gradually returns to rest, even 
if it is left quite by itself, and no force is employed to arrest its motion. The 
motion diminishes gradually, as we know, because the friction on the axis and the 
resistance of the air at every swing destroy a portion of the existing moving force. 
As the bell swings backwards and forwards, the lever and rope fixed to its axis 
rise and fall. If when the lever falls a boy clings to the lower end of the bell-rope, 
his weight will act so as to increase the rapidity of the existing motion. This 
increase of velocity may be very small, and yet it will produce a corresponding 
increase in the extent of the bell's swings, which again will continue for a while, 
until destroyed by the friction and resistance of the air. But if the boy clung to the 
bell-rope at a wrong time, while it was ascending, for instance, the weight of his 
body would act in opposition to the motion of the bell, and the extent of swing 
would decrease. Now, if the boy continued to cling to the rope at each swing so 
long as it was falling, and then let it ascend freely, at every swing the motion of 
the bell would be only increased in speed, and its swings would gradually become 



CHIP. in. MECHANICS OF SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE. 37 

greater and greater, until by their increase the motion imparted on every oscillation 
of the bell to the walls of the belfry, and the external air would become so great 
as exactly to be covered by the power exerted by the boy at each swing. 

The success of this process depends, therefore, essentially on the boy's applying 
his force only at those moments when it will increase the motion of the bell. That 
is, he must employ his strength periodically, and the periodic time must be equal 
to that of the bell's swing, or he will not be successful. He would just as easily 
bring the swinging bell to rest, if he dung to the rope only during its ascent, and 
thus let his weight be raised by the bell. 

A simUar experiment which can be tried at any instant is the following. Con- 
struct a pendulum by hanging a heavy body (such as a ring) to the lower end of a 
thread, holding the upper end in the hand. On setting the ring into gentle pen- 
dular vibration, it will be found that this motion can be gradually and considerably 
increased by watching the moment when the pendulum has reached its greatest IT 
departure from the vertical, and then giving the hand a very small motion in the 
opposite direction. Thus, when the pendulum is furthest to the right, move the 
hand very slightly to the left ; and when the pendulum is furthest to the left, move 
the hand to the right. The pendulum may be also set in motion from a state of 
rest by giving the hand similar very slight motions having the same periodic time 
as the pendulum's own swings. The displacements of the hand may be so small 
under these circumstances, that they can scarcely be perceived with the closest 
attention, a circumstance to which is due the superstitious application of this 
little apparatus as a divining rod. If namely the observer, without thinking of' 
his hand, follows the swings of the pendulum with his eye, the hand readily follows 
the eye, and involuntarily moves a little backwards or forwards, precisely in the 
same time as the pendulum, after this has accidentally begun to move. These 
involuntary motions of the hand are usually overlooked, at least when the observer 
is not accustomed to exact observations on such unobtrusive influences. By this H 
means any existing vibration of the pendulum is increased and kept up, and any 
accidental motion of the ring is readily converted into pendular vibrations, 
which seem to arise spontaneously without any co-operation of the observer, 
and are hence attributed to the influence of hidden metals, running streams, and 
so on. 

If on the other hand the motion of the hand is intentionally made in the con- 
trary direction, the pendulum soon comes to rest. 

The explanation of the process is very simple. When the upper end of the 
thread is fastened to an immovable support, the pendulum, once struck, continues 
to swing for a long time, and the extent of its swings diminishes very slowly. We 
can suppose the extent of the swings to be measured by the angle which the thread 
makes with the vertical on its greatest deflection from it. If the attached body 
at the point of greatest deflection lies to the right, and we move the hand to the 
lefty we manifestly increase the angle between the string and the vertical, and con- ^ 
sequently also augment the extent of the swing. By moving the upper end of the 
string in the opposite direction we should decrease the extent of the swing. 

In this case there is no necessity for moving the hand in the same periodic time 
as the pendulum swings. We might move the hand backwards and forwards only 
at every third or flfth or other swing of the pendulum, and we should still produce 
large swings. Thus, when the pendulum is to the right, move the hand to the 
left, and keep it still, till the pendulum has swung to the left, then again to the 
right, and then once more to the left, and then return the hand to its first position, 
afterwards wait till the pendulum has swung to the right, then to the left, and 
again to the right, and then recommence the first motion of the hand. In this 
way three complete vibrations, or double excursions of the pendulum, will corre- 
spond to one left and right motion of the hand. In the same way one left and 
right motion of the hand may be made to correspond with seven or more swings 
of the pendulum. The meaning of this process is always that the motion of the 



38 MECHANICS OF SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE. part i. 

hand must in each case be made at such a time and in such a direction as to be 
opposed to the deflection of the pendulum and consequently to increase it. 

By a slight alteration of the process we can easily make two, four, six, Ac, 
swings of the pendulum correspond to one left and right motion of the hand ; for 
a sudden motion of the hand at the instant of the pendulum's passage through the 
vertical has no influence on the size of the swings. Hence when the pendulum 
lies to the right move the hand to the left, and so increase its velocity, let it swing 
to the left, watch for the moment of its passing the vertical line, and at that instant 
return the hand to its original position, allow it to reach the right, and then again 
the left and once more the right extremity of its arc, and then recommence the 
flrst motipn of the hand. 

We are able then to communicate violent motion to the pendulum by very 
small periodical vibrations of the hand, having their periodic time exactly as great, 
U or else two, three, four, &c., times as great as that of the pendular oscillation. We 
have here considered that the motion of the hand is backwards. This is not 
necessary. It may take place continuously in any other way we please. When it 
moves continuously there will be generally portions of time during which it will 
increase the pendulum's motion, and others perhaps in which it will diminish the 
same. In order to create strong vibrations in the pendulum, then, it will be 
necessary that the increments of motion should be permanently predominant, and 
should not be neutralised by the sum of the decrements. 

Now if a determinate periodic motion were assigned to the hand, and we wished 
to discover whether it would produce considerable vibrations in the pendulum, we 
could not always predict the result without calculation. Theoretical mechanics 
would, however, prescribe the following process to be pursued : Analyse the periodic 
motion of the hand into a sum of simpte pendular vibrations of the hand — exactly 
in the same way as was laid down in the last chapter for the periodic motions of 
\J 11 the particles of air, — then, if the periodic time of one of these vibrations is equal 
\ to the periodic tims of the pendulum's own oscillations, the pendulum will be set 
into violent motion, but not otherwise. We might compound small pendular 
motions of the hand out of vibrations of other periodic times, as much as we liked, 
but we should fail to produce any lasting strong swings of the pendulum. Hence 
the analysis of the motion of the hand into pendular swings has a real meaning in 
nature, producing determinate mechanical effects, and for the present purpose no 
other analysis of the motion of the hand into any other partial motions can be 
substituted for it. 

In the above examples the pendulum could be set into sympathetic vibration, 
when the hand moved periodically at the same rate as the pendulum ; in this case 
the longest partial vibration of the hand, corresponding to the prime tone of a 
resonant vibration, was, so to speak, in unison with the pendulum. When three 
swings of the pendulum went to one backwards and forwards motion of the hand, 
fl it was the third partial swing of the hand, answering as it were to the Twelfth of 
its prime tone, which set the pendulum in motion. And so on. 

The same process that we have thus become acquainted with for swings of long 
periodic time, holds precisely for swings of so short a period as sonorous vibrations. 
Any elastic body which is so fastened as to admit of continuing its vibrations for 
some length of time when once set in motion, can also be made to vibrate sym- 
pathetically, when it receives periodic agitations of comparatively small amounts, 
having a periodic time corresponding to that of its own tone. 

Gently touch one of the keys of a pianoforte without striking the string, so as 
to raise the damper only, and then sing a note of the corresponding pitch forcibly 
directing the voice against the strings of the instrument. On ceasing to sing, the 
note will be echoed back from the piano. It is easy to discover that this echo is 
caused by the string which is in unison with the note, for directly the hand is 
removed from the key, and the damper is allowed to fall, the echo ceases. The 
sympathetic vibration of the string is still better shown by putting little paper 



CHAP. III. DIFFERENT EXTENT OF SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE. 39 

riders upon it, which are jerked ofi as soon as the string vibrates. The more 
exactly the singer hits the pitch of the string, the more strongly it vibrates. A 
very little deviation from the exact pitch fails in exciting sympathetic vibration. 

In this experiment the sounding board of the instrument is first struck by the 
vibrations of the air excited by the human voice. The sounding board is well 
known to consist of a broad flexible wooden plate, which, owing to its exten- 
sive surface, is better adapted to convey the agitation of the strings to the air, 
and of the air to the strings, than the small surface over which string and air are 
themselves directly in contact. The sounding board first communicates the agita- 
tions which it receives from the air excited by the singer, to the points where the 
string is fastened. The magnitude of any single such agitation is of course infini- 
tesimally small. A very large number of such effects must necessarily be aggre- 
gated, before any sensible motion of the string can be caused. And such a con- 
tinuous addition of effects really takes place, if, as in the preceding experiments with ^ 
the bell and the pendulum, the periodic time of the small agitations which are com- 
municated to the extremities of the string by the air, through the intervention of the 
sounding board, exactly corresponds to the periodic time of the string's own vibra- 
tions. When this is the case, a long series of such vibrations will really set the 
string into motion which is very violent in comparison with the exciting cause. 

In place of the human voice we might of course use any other musical instru- 
ment. Provided only that it can produce the tone of the pianoforte string accu- 
rately and sustain it powerfully, it will bring the latter into sympathetic vibration. 
In place of a pianoforte, again, we can employ any other stringed instrument 
having a sounding board, as a violin, guitar, harp, &c., and also stretched mem- 
branes, bells, elastic tongues or plates, &c., provided only that the latter are so 
fastened as to admit of their giving a tone of sensible duration when once made 
to sound. ^ 

When the pitch of the original sounding body is not exactly that of the sym- 
pathising body, or that which is meant to vibrate in sympathy with it, the latter 
will nevertheless often make sensible sympathetic vibrations, which will diminish 
in amplitude as the difference of pitch increases. But in this respect different 
sounding bodies show great differences, according to the length of time for which 
they continue to sound after having been set in action before communicating their 
whole motion to the air. 

Bodies of small mass, which readily communicate their motion to the air, and. / 
quickly cease to sound, as, for example, stretched membranes, or violin strings, are < / 
readily set in sympathetic vibration, because the motion of the air is conversely ' 
readily transferred to them, and they are also sensibly moved by sufficiently strong , , 
agitations of the air, even when the latter have not precisely the same periodic ' i 
time as the natural tone of the sympathising bodies. The limits of pitch capable 
of exciting sympathetic vibration are consequently a little wider in this case. By 
the comparatively greater influence of the motion of the air upon light elastic ^ 
bodies of this kind which offer but little resistance, their natural periodic time can 
be slightly altered, and adapted to that of the exciting tone. Massive elastic 
bodies, on the other hand, which are not readily movable, and are slow in com- 
municating their sonorous vibrations to the air, such as bells and plates, and con- 
tinue to sound for a long time, are also more difficult to move by the air. A much 
longer addition of effects is required for this purpose, and consequently it is also 
necessary to hit the pitch of their own tone with much greater nicety, in order to 
make them vibrate sympathetically. Still it is well known that bell-shaped glasses 
can be put into violent motion by singing their proper tone into them ; indeed it is / 
related that singers with very powerful and pure voices, have sometimes been able ^ 
to crack them by the agitation thus caused. The principal difficulty in this experi- 
ment is in hitting the pitch with sufficient precision, and retaining the tone at that 
exact pitch for a sufficient length of time. 

Tuning-forks are the most difficult bodies to set in sympathetic vibration. To 



[iSn^tlS'JIi'&'II^^P ATRETIC 




RESONANCE, paet i. 



boxes whioh have been exactly tuned to 
[ve two auch forks of exactly the same 



j&it to produce a aeneible diminution in 
i.^pce of wax to one prong of the second 
ii^ second less than the first — a difference 
leslbar — the sympathetic vibration will be 

..ji^lWQomeDon of sympathetic vibration In 

jIl^BieQce exerted in sympathetic resoQanoe 

il tone. 

jslastic bodies which have been set into 

=*^^ periodically, are (with a few exceptions 




■swing in pendular vibrations. But tbey 
,1 kinds of auch vibration with different 

iribution over the various parts of the 
ingtha of the periodic times correspond 
AD elastic body. These are its so-called 
lOnally, as in strings and the narrower 
ines correspond in pitch with the har- 



CHAP. m. INFLUENCE OP PARTIALS ON SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE. 41 

monic upper partial tones of a musical tone already mentioned. They are for the 
most part inharmonic in relation to the prime tone. 

In many cases the vibrations and their mode of distribution over the vibrating 
bodies can be rendered visible by strewing a little fine sand over the latter. Take, 
for example, a membrane (as a bladder or piece of thin india-rubber) stretched over 
a circular ring. In fig. 14 are shown the various forms which a membrane can 
assume when it vibrates. The diameters and circles on the surface of the mem- 
brane mark those points which remain at rest during the vibration, and are known 
as nodcU lines. By these the surface is divided into a number of compartments 
which bend alternately up and down, in such a way that while those marked ( + ) 
rise, those marked ( - ) fall. Over the figures a, b, c, are shown the forms of a 
section of the membrane during vibration. Only those forms of motion are drawn 
which correspond with the deepest and most easily producible tones of the mem- 
brane. The number of circles and diameters can be increased at pleasure by ^ 
taking a sufficiently thin membrane, and stretching it with sufficient regularity, 
and in this case the tones would continually sharpen in pitch. By strewing sand 
on the membrane the figures are easily rendered visible, for as soon as it begins 
to vibrate the particles of sand collect on the nodal lines. 

In the same way it is possible to render visible the nodal lines and forms of 
vibration of oval and square membranes, and of differently-shaped plane elastic 
plates, bars, and so on. These form a series of very interesting phenomena dis- 
covered by Chladni, but to pursue them would lead us too far from our proper 
subject. It will suffice to give a few details respecting the simplest case, that of a 
circular membrane. 

In the time required by the membrane to execute 100 vibrations of the form a, 
fig. 14 (p. 40c), the number of vibrations executed by the other forms is as 
follows : — fl 



Form of Vibration 


Pitch Number 


Cents • 


Notes nearly 


a without nodal lines .... 

b with one circle 

with two circles 

d with one diameter 

e with one diameter and one circle . 

{ with two diameters 


100 

229-6 

859-9 

169 

292 

214 



1489 
2217 
805 
1858 
1317 


c 

d' + 

i 



The prime tone has been here arbitrarily assumed as c, in order to note the inter- 
vals of the higher tones. Those simple tones produced by the membrane which are 
slightly higher than those of the note written, are marked (+) ; those lower, by 
( - ). In this case there is no commensurable ratio between the prime tone and 
the other tones, that is, none expressible in whole numbers. 

Strew a very thin membrane of this kind with sand, and sound its prime tone 
strongly in its neighbourhood ; the sand will be driven by the vibrations towards f 
the edge, where it collects. On producing another of the tones of the membrane, 
the sand collects in the corresponding nodal lines, and we are thus easily able to 
determine to which of its tones the membrane has responded. A singer who 
knows how to hit the tones of the membrane correctly, can thus easily make the 



* [Cents are hundredths of an equal Semi- 
tone, and are exceedingly valuable as measures 
of any, especially unusual, musical intervals. 
They are fully explained, and the method of 
calculating them from the Interval Ratios is 
given in App. XX. sect. C. Here it need only 
be said that the number of hundreds of cents 
is the number of equalf that is, pianoforte 
Semitones in the interval, and these may be 
counted on the keys of any piano, while the 
units and tens show the number of hundredths 
of a Semitone in excess. Wherever cents are 



spoken of in the text (as in this table), they 
must be considered as additions by the transla- 
tor. In the present case, they give the inter- 
vals exactly, and not roughly as in the column 
of notes. Thus, 1489 cents is sharper than 14 
Semitones above c, that is, sharper than d' by 
39 hundredths of a Semitone, or about | of a 
Semitone.and 1858 is flatter than 19 Semitones 
above c, that is flatter than g' by 42 hun- 
dredths of a Semitone, or nearly } a Semitone. 
— Translator,] 




I^YMPATHETIC RESONANCE, parti. 
I 

pr the other, by singing the correapond- 

;eneral the simpler figures of the deeper 

complicated figures of the upper tones. 

■general motion by sounding its prime 

[Sdn much used in oooustica to prove the 

^fae determinate spot of the surrounding 

^SBBonDect the membrane with an inclosed 



t^tj^ pendulum is violently agitated. Such 

' ife have no reason to apprehend any con- 

' itb any other of ita proper tones. There 

therefore always in order. But to decide 

^ting the membrane, we must after all 

and strew sand on the membrane. 

;ht size, and the membrane uniformly 

tone of the membrane (slightly altered 

»^ass of air in the bottle) which is easily 

^eper by increasing the size of the mem- 

iSfiRminishing the tension of the membrane 

^nether it is or is not attached to the bot- 
ition by musical tones of the same pitch 

lusical tones as contain the proper tone 
tones. Generally, given a number of 
membrane will vibrate sympathetically, 
the given place to be mathematically 
If there is one such vibration among 

. le as that of any one of the proper tones 

igtonal form of the membrane will be super- 
'■fnone sufficiently powerful, the membrane 

;0e analysis of the motion of the air into 

srtain vibrations of this kind, are decis- 

Sembrane, and for this purpose no other 

be substituted for its analysis into 

ions into which the composite motion of 

Ives capable of producing mechanical 

Iff the ear, and independently of mathe- 

infirmed, that the theoretical view which 

of analysing compound vibrations, is 

IsC^iSription of a single experiment : — 

above was covered with a thin vulcan- 
vibrating surface was 49 millimetres 
140 millimetres (o'51 inches) high, and 



(he calculation of one sel 

the other. Koughly we ma; assume '25 mi 

,to be 1 inch. But whenetor dimeosioDs a 







43 






letres (-51 inches) in diameter. 

circle near the edge of the 

iqiviDg the same tone f'jf on an 

■r Twelfth B. Both i% and D 

membrane is the prime 

f(^ the third of B, the 

i>eiag sounded set the membrane 

smaller circle, 19 millimetres 

brane by b' and the same more 

leper Twelfth e, that is, for simple 



l*^«»£aLi9.^b<!At9''t ol the I 

/£T^i,tlSthat of b'.\ 

1^ A Hftjft^fiWvenient for these and similar 



Z^ 




They have the great advantage 

dependent of the ear, but they^ 

a^ ^^^ sensitive for the fainter simple 
M I'gg'i*? -^^■' '" sensitiveness is far inferior to 
I'^^QijSr'^'''^''^^ ^^'''^ ^ '^^^ intro- 
•Bd^^A^^flpi^Be are hollow spheres of glass 
'^•^p^w<clcpi* tubes, with two openings as 
iib^'e^E^SB. 16 a and 16 b. One opening 
'S*I^^^f^>rp edges, the other (b) is funnel- 
'S*'^^pli^^^ adapted for insertion into the 
'S'^*illi'^ smaller end I neoally coat with 
:l;'^t|^»^ing wax, and when the was has 
iS'ai^&^r^ivn enough not to hurt the linger 
!tf^2'x^b^^)ening into the entrance of my 
r^S^Khape of the inner surface of this 
'^iviSStor, it fits easily and is air-tight. H 
bottle already described, fig. 15 
(p. 42a), for which the observer's 
w ympa m mbian has 
be mad to p ace th 
m fi m mbra 



Th 



h wi h ba 



th 





as 


m wh 


h capab 


I. 


h p 


to 


ph™ 


pe to 


ca be 


to ry 




wh h 


mm 


d teco ec 


a 


gm tedto b 


d ec ac 


■o 


seal g 


w m 


d d to h ^ 


»£ 


n to to 


h b 


mos h 


«0 


d rab 


damped if h 




to h 


ea m 
rpose 


pow rf 




ad 


ra 


ecesaarjrto 






44 RESONATORS. part i. 

Hence any one, even if he has no ear for music or is quite unpractised in detecting 
musical sounds, is put in a condition to pick the required simple tone, even if com- 
paratively faint, from out of a great number of others. The proper tone of the 
resonator may even be sometimes heard cropping up in the whistling of the wind, 
the rattling of carriage wheels, the splashing of water. For these purposes such 
resonators are incomparably more sensitive than tuned membranes. When the 
simple tone to be observed is faint in comparison with those which accompany it, 
it is of advantage to alternately apply and withdraw the resonator. We thus easily 
feel whether the proper tone of the resonator begins to sound when the instrument 
is applied, whereas a uniform continuous tone is not so readily perceived. 

A properly tuned series of such resonators is therefore an important instrument 
for experiments in which individual faint tones have to be distinctly heard, although 
accompanied by others which are strong, as in observations on the combinational 

IT and upper partial tones, and a series of other phenomena to be hereafter described 
relating to chords. By their means such researches can be carried out even by 
ears quite untrained in musical observation, whereas it had been previously 
impossible to conduct them except by trained musical ears, and much strained 
attention properly assisted. These tones were consequently accessible to the 
observation of only a very few individuals ; and indeed a large number of physi- 
cists and even musicians had never succeeded in distinguishing them. And again 
even the trained ear is now able, with the assistance of resonators, to carry the 
analysis of a mass of musical tones much further than before. Without their help, 
indeed, I should scarcely have succeeded in making the observations hereafter 
described, with so much precision and certainty, as I have been enabled to attain 
at present.* 

It must be carefully noted that the ear does not hear the required tone with 
augmented force, unless that tone attains a considerable intensity within the mass 

^ of air enclosed in the resonator. Now the mathematical theory of the motion of 
the air shows that, so long as the amplitude of the vibrations is sufficiently small, 
the enclosed air will execute pendular oscillations of the same periodic time as 
those in the external air, and none other, and that only those pendular oscillations 
whose periodic time corresponds with that of the proper tone of the resonator, 
have any considerable strength ; the intensity of the rest diminishing as the differ- 
ence of their pitch from that of the proper tone increases. All this is independent 
of the connection of the ear and resonator, except in so far as its tympanic mem- 
brane forms one of the enclosing walls of the mass of air. Theoretically this 
apparatus does not differ from the bottle with an elastic membrane, in fig. 15 
(p. 42a), but its sensitiveness is amazingly increased by using the drumskin of the ear 
for the closing membrane of the bottle, and thus bringing it in direct connection 
with the auditory nerves themselves. Hence we cannot obtain a powerful tone in 
the resonator except when an analysis of the motion of the external air into 

^ pendular vibrations, would show that one of them has the same periodic time as 
the proper tone of the resonator. Here again no other analysis but that into 
pendular vibrations would give a correct result. 

It is easy for an observer to convince himself of the above-named properties of 
resonators. Apply one to the ear, and let a piece of harmonised music, in which 
the proper tone of the resonator frequently occurs, be executed by any instruments. 
As often as this tone is struck, the ear to which the instrument is held, will hear 
it violently contrast with all the other tones of the chord. 

This proper tone will also often be heard, but more weakly, when deeper 
musical tones occur, and on investigation we find that in such cases tones have 
been struck which include the proper tone of the resonator among their upper 
partial tones. Such deeper musical tones are called the harmonic under tories of 
the resonator. They are musical tones whose periodic time is exactly 2, 3, 4, 5, 
and so on, times as great as that of the resonator. Thus if the proper tone of 

* See Appendix II. for the measures and different forms of these Resonators. 



CHAP. nL SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE OF STRINGS. 46 

the resonator is c", it will be heard when a musical instrument sounds c',/, c, A\^, 
Fj Df C, and so on.* In this case the resonator is made to sound in sympathy 
with one of the harmonic upper partial tones of the compound musical tone which 
is vibrating in the external air. It must, however, be noted that by no means all 
the harmonic upper partial tones occur in the compound tones of every instrument, 
and that they have very dilSerent degrees of intensity in different instruments. In 
the musical tones of violins, pianofortes, and harmoniums, the first five or six are 
generally very distinctly present. A more detailed account of the upper partial 
tones of strings will be given in the next chapter. On the harmonium the un- 
evenly numbered partial tones (1, 3, 5, &c.) are generally stronger than the evenly 
numbered ones (2, 4, 6, &o.). In the same way, the upper partial tones are clearly 
heard by means of the resonators in the singing tones of the human voice, but 
differ in strength for the different vowels, as wiU be shown hereafter. K 



Among the bodies capable of strong sympathetic vibration must be reckoned 
stretched strings which are connected with a sounding board, as on the pianoforte. 

The principal mark of distinction between strings and the other bodies which 
vibrate sympathetically, is that different vibrating forms of strings give simple 
tones corresponding to the harmonic upper partial tones of the prime tone, whereas 
the secondary simple tones of membranes, bells, rods, &c., are inharmonic with the 
prime tone, and the masses of air in resonators have generally only very high 
upper partial tones, also chiefly inharmonic with the prime tone, and not capable 
of being much reinforced by the resonator. 

The vibrations of strings may be studied either on elastic chords loosely 
stretched, and not sonorous, but swinging so slowly that their motion may be 
followed with the hand and eye, or else on sonorous strings, as those of the piano- 
forte, guitar, monochord, or violin. Strings of the first kind are best made of thin IT 
spirals or brass wire, six to ten feet in length. They should be gently stretched, 
and both ends should be fastened. A string of this construction is capable of 
making very large excursions with great regularity, which are easily seen by a large 
audience. The swings are excited by moving the string regularly backwards and 
forwards by the finger near to one of its extremities. 

A string may be first made to vibrate as in fig. 17, a (p. 466), so that its appear- 
ance when displaced from its position of rest is always that of a simple half wave. 
The string in this case gives a single simple tone, the deepest it can produce, and 
no other harmonic secondary tones are audible. 

But the string may also during its motion assume the forms fig. 17, b, c, d. * 
In this case the form of the string is that of two, three, or four half waves of a 
simple wave-curve. In the vibrational form b the string produces only the upper 
Octave of its prime tone, in the form c the Twelfth, and in the form d the second 
Octave. The dotted lines show the position of the string at the end of half its ^ 
periodic time. In b the point P remains at rest, in c two points y^ and yj remain 
at rest, in d three points S^i ^st ^a- These points are called Twdes. In a swinging 
spiral wire the nodes are readily seen, and for a resonant string they are shown by 
little paper riders, which are jerked off from the vibrating parts and remain sitting 
on the nodes. When, then, the string is divided by a node into two swinging 
sections, it produces a simple tone having a pitch number double that of the prime 

*[The c" occurs as the 2nd, 3rd, 4th, the 7th being rather flat. The partials are 
5th, 6th, 7th, 8th partials of these notes, in fact : — 



c' c" 

f r c" 

c c' f c" 

F / c' f a' c" 

D d a d' f% a d' 

C c f c' e' f 6'^ g'\— Translator.] 



46 



SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE OF STRINGS. 



PART I. 



tone. For three seotions the pitch number is tripled, for four sections quadrupled, 
and so on. 

To bring a spiral wire into these different forms of vibration, we move it 
periodically with the finger near one extremity, adopting the period of its slowest 
swings for a, twice that rate for b, three times for c, and four times for d. Or else 
we just gently touch one of the nodes nearest the extremity with the finger, and pluck 
the string half-way between this node and the nearest end. Hence when y^ in c, 
or Si in d, is kept at rest by the finger, we pluck the string at c The other nodes 
then appear when the vibration commences. 

Fia. 17. 



H 



X-" 





f 







For a sonorous string the vibrational forms of fig. 17 above are most purely 
produced by applying to its sounding board the handle of a tuning-fork which has 
been struck and gives the simple tone corresponding to the form required. If only 
a determinate number of nodes are desired, and it is indifferent whether the indi- 
vidual points of the string do or do not execute simple vibrations, it is sufficient to 
touch the string very gently at one of the nodes and either pluck the string or rub 
. it with a violin bow. By touching the string with the finger all those simple vibra- 
tions are damped which have no node at that point, and only those remain which 
allow the string to be at rest in that place. 

The number of nodes in long thin strings may be considerable. They cease to 
be formed when the sections which lie between the nodes are too short and stiff to 
f be capable of sonorous vibration. Very fine strings consequently give a greater 
number of higher tones than thicker ones. On the violin and the lower pianoforte 
strings it is not very difficult to produce tones with 10 sections ; but with extremely 
fine wires tones with 16 or 20 sections can be made to sound. [Also compare p. 7Sd.] 

The forms of vibration here spoken of are those in which each point of the 
string performs pendular oscillations. Hence these motions excite in the ear the 
sensation of only a single simple tone. In all other vibrational forms of the 
strings, the oscillations are not simply pendular, but take place according to a differ- 
ent and more complicated law. This is always the case when the string is plucked 
in the usual way with the finger (as for guitar, harp, zither) or is struck with a 
hammer (as on the pianoforte), or is rubbed with a violin bow. The resulting motions 
may then be regarded as compounded of many simple vibrations, which, when 
taken separately, correspond to those in fig. 17. The multiplicity of such com- 
posite forms of motion is infinitely great, the string may indeed be considered 
as capable of assuming any given form (provided we confine ourselves in all cases 



CHAP. ui. SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE OF STRINGS. 47 

to very small deviations from the position of rest), because, acoording to what was 
said in Chapter II., any given form of wave can be compounded out of a number 
of simple waves such as those indicated in fig. 17, a, b, c, d. A plucked, struck, 
or bowed string therefore allows a great number of harmonic upper partial tones to 
be heard at the same time as the prime tone, and generally the number increas es 
with tha thinness of the striug. The peculiar tinkling sound of very fine metallic 
strings is clearly due to these very high secondary tones. It is easy to distinguish 
the upper simple tones up to the sixteenth by means of resonators. Beyond the 
sixteenth they are too close to each other to be distinctly separable by this means. 

Hence when a string is S3^npathetically excited by a musical tone in its neigh- 
bourhood, answering to the pitch of the prime tone of the string, a whole series of 
different simple vibrational forms will generally be at the same time generated in 
the string. For when the prime of the musical tone corresponds to the prime of 
the string all the harmonic upper partials of the first correspond to those of the f 
second, and are hence capable of exciting the corresponding vibrational forms in 
the string. Generally the string will be brought into as many forms of sympa- 
thetic vibration by the motion of the air, as the analysis of that motion shows that 
it possesses simple vibrational forms, having a periodic time equal to that of some 
vibrational form, that the string is capable of assuming. But as a general rule 
when there is one such simple vibrational form in the air, there are several such, 
and it will often be difficult to determine by which one, out of the many possible 
simple tones which would produce the effect, the string has been excited. Conse- 
quently the usual unweighted strings are not so convenient for the determination 
of the pitch of any simple tones which exist in a composite mass of air, as the 
membranes or the inclosed air of resonators. 

To make experiments with the pianoforte on the sympathetic vibrations of 
strings, select a flat instrument, raise its lid so as to expose the strings, then press 
down the key of the string (for c' suppose) which you wish to put into sympathetic 
vibration, but so slowly that the hammer does not strike, and place a little chip of If 
wood across this d string. You will find the chip put in motion, or even thrown 
off, when certain other strings are struck. The motion of the chip is greatest when 
one of the unier tones of c' (p. 44d) is struck, as c, F, C, A,\^t F,, D^, or G^, Some, 
but much less, motion also occurs when one of the upper partial tones of & is 
struck, as c'\ g*\ or c"\ but in this last case the chip will not move if it has been 
placed over one of the corresponding nodes of the string. Thus if it is laid across 
the middle of the string it will be still for c" and c'", but will move iorg". Placed 
at one third the length of the string from its extremity, it will not stir for g", but 
will move for c" or c'". Finally the string c' will also be put in motion when an 
under tone of one of its upper partial tones is struck; for example, the note/, of which 
the third partial tone c" is identical with the second partial tone of c'. In this case 
also the chip remains at rest when put on to the middle of the string c\ which is 
its node for c". In the same way the string c' will move, with the formation of ^ 
two nodes, for g', g, or e|j, all which notes have g" as an upper partial tone, which 
is also the third partial of c^'^ 

Observe that on the pianoforte, when one end of the strings is commonly 
concealed, the position of the nodes is easily found by pressing the string gently 
on both sides and striking the key. If the finger is at a node the corresponding 
upper partial tone will be heard purely and distinctly, otherwise the tone of the 
string is dull and bad. 

As long as only one upper partial tone of the string c' is excited, the corre- 
sponding nodes can be discovered, and hence the particular form of its vibration 
determined. But this is no longer possible by the above mechanical method when 

* [These experiments can of course not be struck and damped. And this sounding of c\ 

conducted on the usual upright cottage piano. although unstruck, is itself a very interesting 

But the experimenter can at least hear the phenomenon. But of course, as it depends on 

tone of c\ if c, F, C, &c., are struck and the ear, it does not establish the results of the 

immediately damped, or if c", g'\ c'" are text. — Tran8laior.'\ 



48 OBJECTIVE EXISTENCE OF PABTIALS. part i. 

two upper partial tones are excited, such as c" and ^'', as would be the case if both 
these notes were struck at once on the pianoforte, because the whole string of c' 
would then be in motion. 

Although the relations for strings appear more complicated to the eye, their 
sympathetic vibration is subject to the same law as that which holds for resonators, 
membranes, and other elastic bodies. The sympathetic vibration is always deter- 
mined by the analysis of whatever sonorous motions exist, into simple pendular 
vibrations. If the periodic time of one of these simple vibrations corresponds to 
the periodic time of one of the proper tones of the elastic body, that body, whether 
it be a string, a membrane, or a mass of air, will be put into strong sympathetic 
vibration. 

These facts give a real objective value to the analysis of sonorous motion into 
simple pendular vibration, and no such value would attach to any other analysis. 
IT Every individual single system of waves formed by pendular vibrations exists as 
an independent mechanical unit, expands, and sets in motion other elastic bodies 
having the corresponding proper tone, perfectly undisturbed by any other simple 
tones of other pitches which may be expanding at the same time, and which may 
proceed either from the same or any other source of sound. Each single simple 
tone, then, can, as we have seen, be separated from the composite mass of tones, 
by mechanical means, namely by bodies which will vibrate sympathetically with 
it. Hence every individual partial tone exists in the compound musical tone 
produced by a single musical instrument, just as truly, and in the same sense, as the 
different colours of the rainbow exist in the white light proceeding from the sun 
or any other luminous body. light is also only a vibrational motion of a peculiar 
elastic medium, the luminous ether, just as sound is a vibrational motion of the 
air. In a beam of white light there is a species of motion which may be repre- 
sented as the sum of many oscillatory motions of various periodic times, each of 
II which corresponds to one particular colour of the solar spectrum. But of course 
each particle of ether at any particular moment has only one determinate velocity, 
and only one determinate departure from its mean position, just like each particle 
of air in a space traversed by many systems of sonorous waves. The really exist- 
ing motion of any particle of ether is of course only one and individual ; and our 
theoretical treatment of it as compound, is in a certain sense arbitrary. But the 
undulatory motion of light can also be analysed into the waves corresponding to 
the separate colours, by external mechanical means, such as by refraction in a 
prism, or by transmission through fine gratings, and each individual simple wave 
of light corresponding to a simple colour, exists mechanically by itself, indepen- 
dently of any other colour. 

We must therefore not hold it to be an illusion of the ear, or to be mere 
imagination, when in the musical tone of a single note emanating from a musical 
instrument, we distinguish many partial tones, as I have found musicians inclined 
II to think, even when they have heard those partial tones quite distinctly with their 
own ears. If we admitted this, we should have also to look upon the colours of 
the spectrum which are separated from white light, as a mere illusion of the eye. 

The real outward existence of partial tones in nature can be established at any 
moment by a sympathetically vibrating membrane which casts up the sand strewn 
upon it. 

Finally I would observe that, as respects the conditions of sympathetic vibra- 
tion, I have been obliged to refer frequently to the mechanical theory of the 
motion of air. Since in the theory of sound we have to deal with well-known 
mechanical forces, as the pressure of the air, and with motions of material 
particles, and not with any hypothetical explanation, theoretical mechanics have 
an unassailable authority in this department of science. Of course those readers 
who are unacquainted with mathematics, must accept the results on faith. An 
experimental way of examining the problems in question will be described in the 
next chapter, in which the laws of the analysis of musical tones by the ear have 



CHAFi. ni. IV. METHODS OF OBSERVING PARTIAL TONES. 49 

to be established. The experimental proof there given for the ear, caoi also be 
carried out in precisely the same way for membranes and masses of air which 
vibrate sympathetically, and the identity of the laws in both cases will result from 
those investigations.* 



CHAPTER IV. 

ON THB ANALYSIS OF VUBICAL T0NB8 BT THB BAR. 

It was frequently mentioned in the preceding chapter that musical tones could be 
resolved by the ear alone unassisted by any peculiar apparatus, into a series of 
partial tones corresponding to the simple pendular vibrations in a mass of air, thatH 
is, into the same constituents as those into which the motion of the air is resolved 
by the sympathetic vibration of elastic bodies. We proceed to show the correctness 
of this assertion. 

Any one who endeavours for the first time to distinguish the upper partial 
tones of a musical tone, generally finds considerable difficulty in merely hearing 
them. 

The analysis of our sensations when it cannot be attached to corresponding 
difiPerences in external objects, meets with peculiar difficulties, the nature and 
significance of which will have to be considered hereafter. The attention of the 
observer has generally to be drawn to the phenomenon he has to observe, by 
peculiar aids properly selected, until he knows precisely what to look for ; after he 
has once succeeded, he will be able to throw aside such crutches. Similar diffi- 
culties meet us in the observation of the upper partials of a musical tone. I shall 
first give a description of such processes as will most easily put an untrained H 
observer into a position to recognise upper partial tones, and I will remark in 
passing that a musically trained ear will not necessarily hear upper partial tones 
with greater ease and certainty than au untrained ear. Success depends rather 
upon a peculiar power of mental abstraction or a peculiar mastery over attention, 
than upon musical training. But a musically trained observer has an essential 
advantage over one not so trained in his power of figuring to himself how the 
simple tones sought for ought to sound, whereas the untrained observer has con- 
tinually to hear these tones sounded by other means in order to keep their efifect 
fresh in his mind. 

First we must note, that the unevenly numbered partials, as the Fifths, Thirds, 
Sevenths, &c., of the prime tones, are usually easier to hear than the even ones, 
which are Octaves either of the prime tone or of some of the upper partials which 
lie near it, just as in a chord we more readily distinguish whether it contains 
Fifths and Thirds than whether it has Octaves. The second, fourth, and eighth iT 
partials are higher Octaves of the prime, the sixth partial an Octave above the 
third partial, that is, the Twelfth of the prime ; and some practice is required for 
distinguishing these. Among the uneven partials which are more easily dis- 
tinguished, the first place must be assigned, from its usual loudness, to the third 
partial, the Twelfth of the prime, or the Fifth of its first higher Octave. Then 
follows the fifth partial as the major Third of the prime, and, generally very faint, 
the seventh partial as the minor Seventh f of the second higher Octave of the 
prime, as will be seen by their following expression in musical notation, for the 
compound tone c. 

* Optical means for rendering visible weak f [Or more correctly sub-minor Seventh ; 

sympathetic motions of sonoroas masses of as the reiU minor Seventh, formed by taking 

air, are described in App. II. These means two Fifths down and then two Octaves up) is 

are valuable for demonstrating the facts to sharper by 27 cents, or in the ratio of 68 : 64 

hearers unaccustomed to the observing and — Translator.] 
diBtinguishing musical tones. 



60 



METHODS OF OBSERVING PARTIAL TONES. 



PART I. 



or 



12^ 



I 
C 



[Gents. 



-Gh 



2 

c' 

1200 



3 
1902 



4 

C" 
2400 



72: 



5 

e" 
2786 



g 



0*=- 



6 

g" 

8102 



, 7 
8869 



Si 



8 
3600]» 



In commencing to observe upper partial tones, it is advisable just before pro- 
ducing the musical tone itself which you wish to analyse, to sound the note you 
wish to distinguish in it, very gently, and if possible in the same quality of tone 
as the compound itself. The pianoforte and harmonium are well adapted for 
these experiments, because they both have upper partial tones of considerable 
power. 

^ First gently strike on a piano the note g\ as marked above, and after letting 
the digital f rise so as to damp the string, strike the note c, of which g* is the 
third partial, with great force, and keep your attention directed to the pitch of the 
g^ which you had just heard, and you will hear it again in the compound tone of 
c. Similarly, first strike the fifth partial e'' gently and then strongly. These 
upper partial tones are often more distinct as the sound dies away, because they 
appear to lose force more slowly than the prime. The seventh and ninth partials 
6"|> and (2'" are mostly weak, or quite absent on modem pianos. If the same ex- 
periments are tried with an harmonium in one of its louder stops, the seventh 
partial will generally be well heard, and sometimes even the ninth. 

To the objection which is sometimes made that the observer only imagines he 
hears the partial tone in the compound, because he had just heard it by itself, I 

I need only remark at present that if 6" is first heard as a partial tone of c on a 
good piano, tuned in equal temperament, and then &" is struck on the instrument 

f itself, it is quite easy to perceive that the latter is a little sharper. This follows 
from the method of tuning. But if there is a difference in pitch between the two 
tones, one is certainly not a continuation of the mental effect produced by the 
other. Other facts which completely refute the above conception, will be subse- 
quently adduced. 

A still more suitable process than that just described for the piano, can be 
adopted on any stringed instrument, as the piano, monochord, or violin. It con- 
sists in first producing the tone we wish to hear, as an harmonic [p. 25e^, note] by 
touching the corresponding node of the string when it is struck or rubbed. The 
resemblance of the tone first heard to the corresponding partial of the compound 
is then much greater, and the ear discovers it more readily. It is usual to place a 
divided scale by the string of a monochord, to facilitate the discovery of the nodes. 
Those for the third partial, as shown in Chap. III. (p. 45(i), divide the string into 
three equal parts, those for the fifth into five, and so on. On the piano and violin 

f the position of these points is easily found experimentally, by touching the string 
gently with the finger in the neighbourhood of the node, which has been approxi- 
matively determined by the eye, then striking or bowing the string, and moving 
the finger about till the required harmonic comes out strongly and purely. By 
then sounding the string, at one time with the finger on the node, and at another 
without, we obtain the required upper partial at one time as an harmonic, and at 
another in the compound tone of the whole string, and thus learn to recognise the 
existence of the first as part of the second, with comparative ease. Using thin 
strings which have loud upper partials, I have thus been able to recognise the 



*[The cents (see p. 41(2, note), reckoned 
from the lowest note, are assigned on the 
supposition that the harmonics are perfect, 
as on the Harmonical, not tempered as on 
the pianoforte. See also diagram, p. 22c. — 

•|-[The keys played by the fingers on a 



piano or organ, are best called digitals or 
finger-keys, on the analogy of pedals and foot- 
keys on the organ. The word key having 
another musical sense, namely, the scale in 
which a piece of music is written, will without 
prefix be confined to this meaning. — Trans- 
lator,] 



CHAP. IV. METHODS OF OBSERVING PARTIAL TONES. 61 

partials separately, up to the sixteenth. Those which lie still higher are too near 
to each other in pitch for the ear to separate them readily. 

In such experiments I recommend the following process. Touch the node of 
the string on the pianoforte or monochord with a camel's hair pencil, strike the 
note, and immediately remove the pencil from the string. If the pencil has heen 
pressed tightly on the string, we either continue to hear the required partial as an 
harmonic, or else in addition hear the prime tone gently sounding with it. On 
repeating the excitement of the string, and continuing to press more and more 
lightly with the camel's-hair pencO, and at last removing the pencil entirely, the 
prime tone of the string will be heard more and more distinctly with the harmonic 
till we have finally the full natural musical tone of the string. By this means 
we obtain a series of gradual transitional stages between the isolated partial and 
the compound tone, in which the first is readily retained by the ear. By applying 
this last process I have generally succeeded in making perfectly untrained ears ^ 
recognise the existence of upper partial tones. 

It is at first more difficult to hear the upper partials on most wind instruments 
and in the human voice, than on stringed instruments, harmoniums, and the more 
penetrating stops of an organ, because it is then not so easy first to produce the 
upper partial softly in the same quality of tone. But still a little practice suffices 
to lead the ear to the required partial tone, by previously touching it on the piano. 
The partial tones of the human voice are comparatively most difficult to distinguish 
for reasons which will be given subsequently. Nevertheless they were distin- 
guished even by Bameau * without the assistance of any apparatus. The process 
is as follows : — 

Get a powerful bass voice to sing e}^ to the vowel 0, in sore [more like aw 
in saw than o in so], gently touch b'\^ on the piano, which is the Twelfth, or 
third partial tone of the note e|>, and let its sound die away while you are listening 
to it attentively. The note b'\^ on the piano will appear really not to die away, ^ 
but to keep on sounding, even when the string is damped by removing the finger 
from the digital, because the ear unconsciously passes from the tone of the piano 
to the partial tone of the same pitch produced by the singer, and takes the latter 
for a continuation of the former. But when the finger is removed from the key, 
and the damper has fallen, it is of course impossible that the tone of the string 
should have continued sounding. To make the experiment for g" the fifth partial, 
or major Third of the second Octave above e\f, the voice should sing to the vowel 
A in farther. 

The resonators described in the last chapter furnish an excellent means for 
this purpose, and can be used for the tones of any musical instrument. On apply- 
ing to the ear the resonator corresponding to any given upper partial of the com- 
pound c, such as g\ this g' is rendered much more powerful when c is sounded. 
Now hearing and distinguishing g' in this case by no means proves that the ear 
alone and without this apparatus would hear g' as part of the compound c. But ^ 
the increase of the loudness of g' caused by the resonator may be used to direct 
the attention of the ear to the tone it is required to distinguish. On gradually 
removing the resonator from the ear, the force of g' will decrease. But the 
attention once directed to it by this means, remains more readily fixed upon 
it, and the observer continues to hear this tone in the natural and unchanged 
compound tone of the given note, even with his unassisted ear. The sole office 
of the resonators in' this case is to direct the attention of the ear to the required 
tone. 

By frequently instituting similar experiments for perceiving the upper partial 
tones, the observer comes to discover them more and more easily, till he is finally 
able to dispense with any aids. But a certain amount of undisturbed concentration 
is always necessary for analysing musical tones by the ear alone, and hence the 
use of resonators is quite indispensable for an accurate comparison of different 

* Nouveau Systime de Musique th4oriqtte, Paris : 1726. Pr^ace. 

B 2 



52 PROOF OF OHM'S LAW. paet i. 

qualities of tone, especially in respect to the weaker upper partials. At least, I 
must confess, that my own attempts to discover the upper partial tones in the 
human voice, and to determine their differences for different vowels, were most 
unsatisfactory until I applied the resonators. 

We now proceed to prove that the himian ear really does analyse musical 
tones according to the law of simple vibrations. Since it is not possible to insti- 
tute an exact comparison of the strength of our sensations for different simple 
tones, we must confine ourselves to proving that when an analysis of a composite 
tone into simple vibrations, effected by theoretic calculation or by sympathetic 
resonance, shows that certain upper partial tones are absent, the ear also does 
not perceive them. 

The tones of strings are again best adapted for conducting this proof, because 
they admit of many alterations in their quality of tone, according to the manner 
^ and the spot in which they are excited, and also because the theoretic or experi- 
mental analysis is most easily and completely performed for this case. Thomas 
Young * first showed that when a string is plucked or struck, or, as we may add, 
bowed at any point in its length which is the node of any of its so-called 
harmonics, those simple vibrational forms of the string which have a node in that 
point are not contained in the compound vibrational form. Hence, if we attack 
the string at its middle point, all the simple vibrations due to the evenly numbered 
partials, each of which has a note at that point, will be absent. This gives the 
sound of the string a peculiarly hollow or nasal twang. If we excite the string at 
^ of its length, the vibrations corresponding to the third, sixth, and ninth partials 
will be absent ; if at ^, then those corresponding to the fourth, eighth, and twelfth 
partials will fail ; and so on.f 

This result of mathematical theory is confirmed, in the first place, by analys- 
ing the compound tone of the string by sympathetic resonance, either by the 
^resonators or by other strings. The experiments may be easily made on the 
pianoforte. Press down the digitals for the note c and c', without allowing the 
hammer to strike, so as merely to free them from their dampers, and then pluck 
the string c with the nail till it sounds. On damping the c string the higher c* 
will echo the sound, except in the particular case when the c string has been 
plucked exactly at its middle point, which is the point where it would h^ve to be 
touched in order to give its first harmonic when struck by the hammer. 

If we touch the c string at |^ or f its length, and strike it with the hammer, 
we obtain the harmonic g' ; and if the damper of the g' is raised, this string echoes 
the sound. But if we pluck the c string with the nail, at either ^ or ^ its length, 
g* is not echoed, as it will be if the c string is plucked at any other spot. 

In the same way observations with the resonators show that when the c string 

is plucked at its middle the Octave c' is missing, and when at ^ or | its length the 

Twelfth g' is absent. The analysis of the sound of a string by the sympathetic 

m resonance of strings or resonators,' consequently fully confirms Thomas Young's 

law. 

But for the vibration of strings we have a more direct means of analysis than 
that furnished by sympathetic resonance. If we, namely, touch a vibrating string 
gently for a moment with the finger or a camel's-hair pencil, we damp all those 
simple vibrations which have no node at the point touched. Those vibrations, 
however, which have a node there are not damped, and hence will continue to 
sound without the others. Consequently, if a string has been made to speak in 
any way whatever, and we wish to know whether there exists among its simple 
vibrations one corresponding to the Twelfth of the prime tone, we need only touch 
one of the nodes of this vibrational form at ^ or § the length of the string, in 
order to reduce to silence all simple tones which have no such node, and leave the 
Twelfth sounding, if it were there. If neither it, nor any of the sixth, ninth, 

* London. Philosophical Transactions, 1800, vol. i. p. 187 j 
t See Appendix III. 



CHAP. IV. PROOF OF OHirS LAW. 53 

twelfth, &c., of the partial tones were present, giving oorresponding harmonics, 
the string will he reduced to absolute silence by this contact of the finger. 

Press down one of the digitals of a piano, in order to free a string from its 
damper. Pluck the string at its middle point, and immediately touch it there. 
The string will be completely silenced, showing that plucking it in its middle ex- 
cited none of the evenly numbered partials of its compound tone. Pluck it at I or I 
its length, and immediately touch it in the same place ; the string will be silent, 
proving the absence of the third partial tone. Pluck the string anywhere else 
than in the points named, and the second partial vnll be heard when the middle is 
touched, the third when the string i^ touched at ^ or | of its length. 

The agreement of this kind of proof with the results from sympathetic reso- 
nance, is well adapted for the experimental establishment of the proposition based 
in the last chapter solely upon the results of mathematical theory, namely, that 
sympathetic vibration occurs or not, according as the corresponding simple IT 
vibrations are or are not contained in the compound motion. In the last described 
method of analysing the tone of a string, we are quite independent of the theory 
of sympathetic vibration, and the simple vibrations of strings are exactly charac- 
terised and recognisable by their nodes. If the compound tones admitted of being 
analysed by sympathetic resonance according to any other vibrational forms except 
those of simple vibration, this agreement could not exist. 

If, after having thus experimentally proved the correctness of Thomas Young's 
law, we try to analyse the tones of strings by the unassisted ear, we shall continue 
to find complete agreement.* If we pluck or strike a string in one of its nodes, 
all those upper partial tones of the compound tone of the string to which the node 
belongs, disappear for the ear also, but they are heard if the string is plucked at 
any other place. Thus, if the string c be plucked at ^ its length, the partial tone 
g* cannot be heard, but if the string be plucked at only a little distance from this 
point the partial tone g' is distinctly audible. Hence the ear analyses the sound f 
of a string into precisely the same constituents as are found by sympathetic reso- 
nance, that is, into simple tones, according to Ohm's definition of this conception 
These experiments are also well adapted to show that it is no mere play of imagina- 
tion when we hear upper partial tones, as some people believe on hearing them for 
the first time, for those tones are not heard when they do not exist. 

The following modification of this process is also very well adapted to make 
the upper partial tones of strings audible. First, strike alternately in rhythmical 
sequence, the third and fourth partial tone of the string alone, by damping it in the 
corresponding nodes, and request the listener to observe the simple melody thus 
produced. Then strike the undamped string alternately and in the same rhythmical 
sequence, in these nodes, and thus reproduce the same melody in the upper partials, 
which the listener will then easily recognise. Of course, in order to hear the 
third partial, we must strike the string in the node of the fourth, and conversely. 

The compound tone of a plucked string is also a remarkably striking example ^ 
of the power of the ear to analyse into a long series of partial tones, a motion 
which the eye and the imagination are able to conceive in a much simpler manner. 
A string, which is pulled aside by a sharp point, or the finger nail, assumes the 
form, fig. 18, A (p. 54 a), before it is released. It then passes through the series of 
forms, fig. 18, B, C, D, B, F, till it reaches G, which is the inversion of A, and 
then returns, through the same, to A again. Hence it alternates between the forms 
A and G. All these forms, as is clear, are composed of three straight lines, and 
on expressing the velocity of the individual points of the strings by vibrational 
curves, these would have the same form. Now the string scarcely imparts any 
perceptible portion of its own motion directly to the air. Scarcely any audible 
tone results when both ends of a string are fastened to immovable supports, as 
metal bridges, which are again fastened to the walls of a room. The sound of 

* See Biandt in Poggendorff's Annalen der Physik^ vol. cxii. p. 824, where this fact is 
proved* 



54 



PROOF OF OHM'S LAW. 



PABT I. 



FiQ. 18. 





C - 





the string reaches the air through that one of its extremities which rests upon 
a bridge standing on an elastic sounding board. Hence the sound of the string 
essentially depends on the motion of this 
extremity, through the pressure which it 
exerts on the sounding board. The magni- 
tude of this pressure, as it alters periodically 
with the time, is shown in fig. 19, where 
the height of the line h h corresponds to 
the amount of pressure exerted on the bridge 
by that extremity of the string when the 
string is at rest. Along h h suppose 
lengths to be set off corresponding to con- 
secutive intervals of time, the vertical 

If heights of the broken line above or below 
h h represent the corresponding augmenta- 
tions or diminutions of pressure at those 
times. The pressure of the string on the 
sounding board consequently alternates, as 
the figure shows, between a higher and a 
lower value. For some time the greater 
pressure remains unaltered ; then the lower 
suddenly ensues, and likewise remains for a 
time unaltered. The letters a to g in fig. 19 
correspond to the times at which the string 
assumes the forms A to G in fig. 18. It is this alteration between a greater and 
a smaller pressure which produces the sound in the air. We cannot but feel 
astonished that a motion produced by means so simple and so easy to comprehend, 

IT should be analysed by the ear into such a complicated sum of simple tones. For 
the eye and the understanding the action of the string on the sounding board can 
be figured with extreme simplicity. What has the simple broken line of fig. 19 
to do with wave-curves, which, in the course of one of their periods, show 



E 



F 





Fia. 19. 



h+-H 



a 1) c d 



■I- |-.-^--i.-.^,..|...4--|--|- 



ret 




3, 4, 5, up to 16, and more, crests and troughs ? This is one of the most striking 
examples of the different ways in which eye and ear comprehend a periodic 
motion. 

There is no sonorous body whose motions under varied conditions can be so 
f completely calculated theoretically and contrasted with observation as a string. 
The following are examples in which theory can be compared with analysis by 
ear : — 

I have discovered a means of exciting simple pendular vibrations in the air. A 
tuning-fork when struck gives no harmonic upper partial tones, or, at most, traces 
of them when it is brought into such excessively strong vibration that it no longer 
exactly follows the law of the pendulum.* On the other hand, tuning-forks have 
some very high inharmonic secondary tones, which produce that peculiar sharp 



* [On all ordinary tuning-forks between a 
and d" in pitch, I have been able to hear the 
second partial or Octave of the prime. In 
some low forks this Octave is so powerful that 
on pressing the handle of the fork against the 
table, the prime quite disappears and the 
Octave only is heard, and this has often 
proved a source of embarrassment in tuning 
the forks, or in counting beats to determine 



pitch numbers. But the prime can always be 
heard when the fork is held to the ear or over 
a properly turned resonance jar, as described in 
this paragraph. I tune such jars by pouring 
water in or ou^mntil the resonance is strongest, 
and then I register the height of the water 
and pitch of the fork for future use on a slip 
of paper gummed to the side of the jar. I 
have found that it is not at all necessary to 



GHAP. rv. 



PKOOF OF 0HM»8 LAW. 



65 



tinkling of the fork at the moment of being strack, and generally beoome rapidly 
inaudible. If the tuning-fork is held in the fingers, it imparts very little of its 
tone to the air, and cannot be heard unless it is held dose to the ear. Instead of 
holding it in the fingers, we may screw it into a thick board, on the under side of 
which some pieces of india-rubber tubing have been fastened. When this is laid 
upon a table, the india-rubber tubes on which it is supported convey no sound to 
the table, and the tone of the tuning-fork is so weak that it may be considered in- 
audible. Now if the prongs of the fork be brought near a resonance chamber * of 
a bottle-form of such a size and shape that, when we blow over its mouth, the air 
it contains gives a tone of the same pitch as the fork's, the air within this chamber 
vibrates sympathetically, and the tone of the fork is thus conducted with great 
strength to the outer air. Now the higher secondary tones of such resonance 
chambers are also inharmonic to the prime tone, and in general the secondary , 
tones of the chambers correspond neither with the harmonic nor the inharmonic U 
secondary tones of the forks ; this can be determined in each particular case by 
producing the secondary tones of the bottle by stronger blowing, and discovering 
those of the forks with the help of strings set into sympathetic vibration, as will 
be presently described. If, then, only one of the tones of the fork, namely, the 
prime tone, corresponds with one of the tones of the chamber, this alone will be 
reinforced by sympathetic vibration, and this alone will be communicated to the 
external air, and thus conducted to the observer's ear. The examination of the 
motion of the air by resonators shows that in this case, provided the tuning-fork be 
not set into too violent motion, no tone but the prime is present, and in such case 
the unassisted ear hears only a single simple tone, namely, the common prime of the 
tuning-fork and of the chamber, without any accompanying upper partial tones. 

The tone of a tuning-fork can also be purified from secondary tones by placing 
its handle upon a string and moving it so near to the bridge that one of the proper 
tones of the section of string lying between the fork and the bridge is the same as IT 
that of the tuning-fork. The string then begins to vibrate strongly, and conducts 
the tone of the tuning-fork with great power to the sounding board and surround- 
ing air, whereas the tone is scarcely, if at all, heard as long as the above-named 
section is not in unison with the tone of the fork. In this way it is easy to find ; 
the lengths of string which correspond to the prime and upper partial tones of the 
fork, and accurately determine the pitch of the latter. If this experiment is con- 
ducted with ordinary strings which are uniform throughout their length, we shield 
the ear from the inharmonic secondary tones of the fork, but not from the harmonic 
upper partials, which are sometimes faintly present when the fork is made to 
vibrate strongly. Hence to conduct this experiment in such a way as to create 
purely pendular vibrations of the air, it is best to weight one point of the string, if 
only so much as by letting a drop of melting sealing-wax fall upon it. This causes 
the upper proper tones of the string itself to be inharmonic to the prime tone, and 
hence there is a distinct interval between the points where the fork must be placed f 
to bring out the prime tone and its audible Octave, if it exists. 

In most other cases the mathematical analysis of the motions of sound is not 
nearly far enough advanced to determine with certainty what upper partials will 
be present and what intensity they will possess. In circular plates and stretched 
membranes which are struck, it is theoretically possible to do so, but their inhar- 



put the fork into excessively strong vibration 
in order to make the Octave sensible. Thus, 
taking a fork of 232 and another of 468 vibra- 
tions, after striking them both, and letting the 
deeper fork spend most of its energy until I 
could not see the vibrations with the eye at all, 
the beats were heard distinctly, when I pressed 
both on to a table, and conllliued to be heard 
even after the forks themselves were separately 
inaudible. See also Prof. Helmholtz's experi- 
ments on a fork of 64 vibrations at the close 



of Chap. VII., and Prof. Preyer's in App. XX. 
sect. L. art. 4, c. The conditions according 
to Koenig that tuning-forks should have no 
upper partials are given in App. XX. sect. L. 
art. 2, o. — Translator.] 

* Either a bottle of a proper size, which 
can readily be more accurately tuned by pour- 
ing oil or water into it, or a tube of pasteboard 
quite closed at one end, and having a small 
round opening at the other. See the proper 
sizes of such resonance chambers in App. IV. 



56 



PROOF OF OHM'S LAW. 



PART I. 



nomio secondary tones are so numerous and so nearly of the same pitoh that most 
observers would probably fail to separate them satisfactorily. On elastic rods, how- 
ever, the secondary tones are very distant from each other, and are inharmonic, so 
that they can be readily distinguished from each other by the ear. The following 
are the proper tones of a rod which is free at both ends ; the vibrational number 
of the prime tone taken to be c, is reckoned as 1 :- 





Pitch Number 


Cental 


Notation 


Prime tone 

Second proper tone 

Third proper tone 

Fourth proper tone 


1*0000 

2-7676 

6-4041 

18-8444 




1200 + 666 

2400+621 

8600 + 886 


/ +0-2 
/' +0-1 
a!" -0-1 



The notation is adapted to the equal temperament, and the appended fractions 

T are parts of the interval of a complete tone. 

Where we are unable to execute the theoretical analysis of the motion, we can, 
at any rate, by means of resonators and other sympathetically vibrating bodies, 
analyse any individual musical tone that is produced, and then compare this 
analysis, which is determined by the laws of sympathetic vibration, vdth that 
efiFected by the unassisted ear. The latter is naturally much less sensitive than 
one armed with a resonator ; so that it is frequently impossible for the unarmed 
ear to recognise amongst a number of other stronger simple tones those which the 
resonator itself can only faintly indicate. On the other hand, so far as my ex- 
perience goes, there is complete agreement to this extent : the ear recognises with- 
out resonators the simple tones which the resonators greatly reinforce, and perceives 
no upper partial tone which the resonator does not indicate. To verify this con- 
clusion, I performed numerous experiments, both with the human voice and the 
harmonium, and they all confirmed it.*!* 

f By the above experiments the proposition enunciated and defended by O. S. 
Ohm must be regarded as proved, viz. that the human ear perceives pendular vibra- 
Hons alone as simple tones, and resolves all other periodic motions of the ear into a 
series of pendular vibrations, hearing the series of simple tones which correspond with 
these simple vibrations. 

Galling, then, as already defined (in pp. 23, 24 and note), the sensation excited 
in the ear by any periodical motion of the air a musical tone, and the sensation 
excited by a simple pendular vibration a simple tone, the rule asserts that the 
sensation of a musical tone is compounded out of the sensations of several simple 
tones. In particular, we shall henceforth call the sound produced by a single 
sonorous body its (simple or compound) tone, and the sound produced by several 
musical instruments acting at the same time a composite tone, consisting generally 
of several (simple or compound) tones. If, then, a single note is sounded on a 



«- * [For oents see note p. Hd. As a Tone is 
200 ct., 0-1 Tonea20ct., these would give for 
the Author^s notation/ +40 ct.,/" + 20 ct., a'" 
•^ 10 ct., whereas the column of oents shows 
that they are more accurately f + 56 ct., /" + 
21 ct., a'" - 14 ct. For convenience, the cents 
for Octaves are separated, thus 1200+666 in 
place of 1756, but this separation is quite 
unnecessary. The cents again show the inter- 
vals of the inharmonic partial tones without 
any assumption as to the value of the prime. 
By a misprint in all the German editions, 
followed in the first English edition, the second 
proper tone was made f - 0*2 in place of / + 
0-2— Translator.'] 

t [In my * Notes of Observations on Musi- 
cal Beats,' Proceediv/gs of the Royal Society, 
May, 1880, vol. xzx. p. 581, largely cited in 
App. XX. sect. B. No. 7, 1 showed that I was 
able to determine the pitch numbers of deep 



reed tones, by the beats (Chap. VIII.) that their 
upper partials made with the primes of a set of 
Scheioler's tuning-forks. The correctness of 
the process was proved by the fact .that the 
results obtained from difierent partials of the 
same reed tone, which were made to beat with 
different forks, gave the same pitch numbers 
for the primes, within one or two nundredths of 
a vibration in a second. I not only employed 
such low partials as 8, 4, 6 for one tone, and 
4, 6, 6 for others, but I determine the pitch 
number 81*47, by partials 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 
18, and the pitch number 16*94 by partials 26 
and 27. Tne objective reality of these ex- 
tremely high upper partials, and their inde- 
pendence of resonators or resonance jars, was 
therefore conclusively shown. On the Har- 
monical the beats of the 16th partial of G 66, 
with c'' ',when slightly flattened by pressing the 
note lightly down, are very clear. — Translator.] 



CHAP. IV. 



DIFFICULTIES IN OBSERVING PARTIALS. 



67 



musical instrument, as a violin, trumpet, organ, or by a singing voice, it must be 
called in exact language a tone of tbe instrument in question. Tbis is also the 
ordinary language, but it did not then imply that the tone might be compound. 
When the tone is, as usual, a compound tone, it will be distinguished by this term, 
or the abridgment, a compound ; while tone is a general term which includes both 
simple and compound tones.* The prime tone is generally louder than any of the 
upper partial tones, and hence it alone generally determines the pitch of the com- 
pound. The tone produced by any sonorous body reduces to a single simple tone 
in very few cases indeed, as the tone of tuning-forks imparted to the air by reso- 
nance chambers in the manner already described. The tones of wide-stopped 
organ pipes when gently blown are almost free from upper partials, and are accom- 
panied only by a rush of wind. 

It is well known that this union of several simple tones into one compound 
tone, which is naturally effected in the tones produced by most musical instruments, f 
is artificially imitated on the organ by peculiar mechanical contrivances. The 
tones of organ pipes are comparatively poor in upperpartials. When it is desirable 
to use a stop of incisive penetrating quality of tone and great power, the wide pipes 
{principal register and weitgedacht f) are not sufficient ; their tone is too soft, too 
defective in upper partials ; and the narrow-pipes {geigen-register and qiUntatenl) 
are also unsuitable, because, although more incisive, their tone is weak. For such 
occasions, then, as in accompanying congregational singing, recourse is had to the 
compound stops,^ In these stops every key is connected with a larger or smaller 
series of pipes, which it opens simultaneously, and which give the prime tone and 
a certain number of the lower upper partials of the compound tone of the note in 
question. It is very usual to connect the upper Octave with the prime tone, and 
after that the Twelfth. The more complex compounds {comet §) give the first six 
partial tones, that is, in addition to the two Octaves of the prime tone and its 
Twelfth, the higher major Third, and the Octave of the Twelfth. This is as much IT 
of the series of upper partials as belongs to the tones of a major chord. But 
to prevent these compound stops from being insupportably noisy, it is necessary 
to reinforce the deeper tones of each note by other rows of pipes, for in all natural 
tones which are suited for musical purposes the higher partials decrease in force as 
they rise in pitch. This has to be regarded in their imitation by compound stops. 
These compound stops were a monster in the path of the old musical theory ; which 
was acquainted only with the prime tones of compounds ; but the practice of 
organ-builders and organists necessitated their retention, and when they are 
suitably arranged and properly applied, they form a very effective musical apparatus. 



* [Here, again, as on pp. 23, 2i, I have, in 
the translation, been necessarily obliged to 
deviate slightly from the original. Klang, as 
here defined, embraces Ton as a particular 
case. I use tone for the general term, and 
compound tone and eimple tone for the two 
particular cases. Thus, as presently mentioned 
in the text, the tone produced by a tuning-fork 
held over a proper resonance chamber we know, 
on analysis, to be simple, but before analysis it 
is to us only a (musical) tone like any other, 
and hence in this case the Author's Klang 
becomes the Author's Ton. 1 believe that the 
language used in my translation is best adapted 
for the constant accurate distinction between 
compound and simple tones by English readers, 
as I leave nothing which runs counter to old 
habits, and by the use of the words simple and 
compound, constantly recall attention to this 
newly discovered and extremelyimportant rela- 
tion . — Translator. ] 

^PrinnpaX — double open diapason. Gross- 
gedackt — double slopped diapason. Hopkins, 
Organ, p. 444-6. — Translator.] 

t [ * Geigen Principal — violin or crisp- 



toned diapason, eight feet.' Hopkins, Organ, 
p. 445. * A manual stop of eight feet, produc- 
mg a pungent tone very like that of the 
Gamba, except that the pipes, being of larger 
scale, speak quicker and produce a fuller tone. 
Examples of the stop exist at Doncaster, If 
the Temple Church, and in -the Exchange 
Or^n at Northampton.' Ibid. p. 188. For 
qutntaten, see supra, p. 88(2, note. — Translator.] 
§ [As described in Hopkins, Organ, p. 142, 
these are the sesquialtera ' of five, four, three, 
or two ranks of open metal pipes, tuned 
in Thirds, Fifths, and Octaves to tne Diapa- 
son '. The mixture, consisting of five to two 
ranks of open metal pipes smaller than the 
last, is in England the second, in Germany tbe 
first, compound stop (p. 148). The Furniture of 
five to two sets of small open pipes, is variable. 
(1) The Comet, mounted, has five ranks of veiy 
large and loudlv voiced pipes, (2) the echo is 
similar, but light and delicate, and is enclosed 
in a box. In German organs the comet is also 
a pedal reed stop of four and two feet (ibid.). — 
Translator,] 



68 DIFFICULTIES IN OBSERVING PARTIALS. pabt i. 

The nature of the case at the same time fully justifies their use. The musician is 
hound to regard the tones of all musical instruments as compounded in the same 
way as the compound stops of organs, and the important part this method of com- 
position plays in the construction of musical scales and chords will he made evident 
in subsequent chapters. 

We have thus been led to an appreciation of upper partial tones, which differs 
considerably from that previously entertained by musicians, and even physicists, 
and must therefore be prepared to meet the opposition which will be raised. The 
upper partial tones were indeed known, but almost only in such compound tones as 
those of strings, where there was a favourable opportunity for observing them ; 
but they appear in previous physical and musical works as an isolated accidental 
phenomenon of small intensity, a kind of curiosity, which was certainly occasion- 
ally adduced, in order to give some support to the opinion that nature had pre- 

ir figured the construction of our major chord, but which on the whole remained 
almost entirely disregarded. In opposition to this we have to assert, and we shall 
prove the assertion in the next chapter, that upper partial tones are, with a few 
exceptions already named, a general constituent of all musical tones, and that a 
certain stock of upper partials is an essential condition for a good musical quality 
of tone. Finally, these upper partials have been erroneously considered as weak, 
because they are difl&cult to observe, while, in point of fact, for some of the best 
musical qualities of tone, the loudness of the first upper partials is not far inferior 
to that of the prime tone itself. 

There is no difficulty in verifying this last fact by experiments on the tones of 
strings. Strike the string of a piano or monochord, and immediately touch one of 
its nodes for an instant with the finger ; the constituent partial tones having this 
node will remain with unaltered loudness, and the rest will disappear. We might 
also touch the node in the same way at the instant of striking, and thus obtain the 

IT corresponding constituent partial tones from the first, in place of the complete 
compound tone of the note. In both ways we can readily convince ourselves that the 
first upper partials, as the Octave and Twelfth, are by no means weak and difficult 
to hear, but have a very appreciable strength. In some cases we are able to assign 
numerical values for the intensity of the upper partial tones, as will be shown in 
the next chapter. For tones not produced on strings this d posteriori proof is not 
so easy to conduct, because we are not able to make the upper partials speak 
separately. But even then by means of the resonator we can appreciate the in- 
tensity of these upper partials by producing the corresponding note on the same 
or some other instrument until its loudness, when heard through the resonator, 
agrees with that of the former. 

The difficulty we experience in hearing upper partial tones is no reason for 
considering them to be weak ; for this difficulty does not depend on their intensity, 
but upon entirely different circumstances, which could not be properly estimated 

IT until the advances recently made in the physiology of the senses. On this diffi- 
culty of observing the upper partial tones have been founded the objections which 
A. Seebeck * has advanced against Ohm's law of the decomposition of a musical 
tone ; and perhaps many of my readers who are unacquainted with the physiology 
of the other senses, particularly with that of the eye, might be inclined to adopt 
Seebeck 's opinions. I am therefore obliged to enter into some details concerning 
this difference of opinion, and the peculiarities of the perceptions of our senses, 
on which the solution of the difficulty depends. 

Seebeck, although extremely accomplished in acoustical experiments and 
observations, was not always able to recognise upper partial tones, where Ohm's 
law required them to exist. But we are also bound to add that he did not apply 
the methods already indicated for directing the attention of his ear to the upper 
partials in question. In other cases when he did hear the theoretical upper 

* In Poggendorff'fl AnnaUn der Physik, vol. Ix. p. 449, vol. Ixiii. pp. 353 and 368.— 0/iw, 
ibid, vol. lix. p. 513, and vol. Ixii. p. 1. 



CHAP. IV. DIFFICULTIES IN OBSERVING PARTIALS. 59 

partials, they were weaker than the theory required. He concluded that the defi- ' 
nition of a simple tone as given by Ohm was too limited, and that not only pen- 
dular vibrations, but other vibrational forms, provided they were not too widely '* 
separated from the pendular, were capable of exciting in the ear the sensation of 
a single simple tone, which, however, had a variable quality. B^ consequently 
asserted that when a musical tone was compounded of several simple tones, part 
of the intensity of the upper constituent tones went to increase the intensity of 
the prime tone, with which it fused, and that at most a small remainder excited in 
the ear the sensation of an upper partial tone. He. did not formulate any deter- 
nainate law, assigning the vibrational forms which would give the impression of 
a simple and those which would give the impression of a compound tone. The 
experiments of Seebeck, on which he founded his assertions, need not be here 
described in detail. Their object was only to produce musical tones for which 
either the intensity of the simple vibrations corresponding to the upper partials IT 
could be theoretically calculated, or in which these upper partials could be 
rendered separately audible. For the latter purpose the siren was used. We have 
just described how the same object can be attained by means of strings. Seebeck 
shows in each case that the simple vibrations corresponding to the upper partials 
have considerable strength, but that the upper partials are either not heard at all, 
or heard with difficulty in the compound tone itself. This fact has been already 
mentioned in the present chapter. It may be perfectly true for an observer who 
has not applied the proper means for observing Tipper partials, while another, or 
even the first observer himself when properly assisted, can hear them perfectly well.* 
Now there are many circumstances which assist us first in separating the 
musical tones arising from different sources, and secondly, in keeping together the 
partial tones of each separate source. Thus when one musical tone is heard for 
some time before being joined by the second, and then the second continues after 
the first has ceased, the separation in sound is facilitated by the succession of time. IT 
We have already heard the first musical tone by itself, and hence know imme- 
diately what we have to deduct from the compound effect for the effect of this first 
tone. Even when several parts proceed in the same rhythm in polyphonic music, 
the mode in which the tones of different instruments and voices commence, the 
nature of their increase in force, the certainty with which they are held, and the 
manner in which they die off, are generally slightly different for each. Thus the 
tones of a pianoforte commence suddenly with a blow, and are consequently 
strongest at the first moment, and then rapidly decrease in power. The tones of 
brass instruments, on the other hand, commence sluggishly, and require a small 
but sensible time to develop their full strength. The tones of bowed instruments 
are distinguished by their extreme mobility, but when either the player or the ' 
instrument is not unusually perfect they are interrupted by little, very short, 
pauses, producing in the ear the sensation of scraping, as will be described more 
in detail when we come to analyse the musical tone of a violin. When, then, such IT 
instruments are sounded together there are generally points of time when one or 
the other is predominant, and it is consequently easily distinguished by the ear. 
But besides all this, in good part music, especial care is taken to facilitate the 
separation of the parts by the ear. In polyphonic music proper, where each part 
has its own distinct melody, a principal means of clearly separating the progres- 
sion of each part has always consisted in making them proceed in different rhythms 
and on different divisions of the bars ; or where this could not be done, or was at 
any rate only partly possible, as in four-part chorales, it is an old rule, contrived 
for this purpose, to let three parts, if possible, move by single degrees of the scale, 
and let the fourth leap over several. The small amount of alteration in the pitch 
makes it easier for the listener to keep the identity of the several voices distinctly 
in mind. 

*[Here from 'Upper partial tones,' p. 94 to 'former analysis,' p. 100 of the Ist English 
edition are omitted, in accordance with the 4th German edition. — Translator,] 






) A COMPOUND. PAKT I. 

masioal tonsB iDto their constituent 
to Eiound, oil its partial tonee 
strength ; when it swells, all of them 
tall oease simultaneously. Hence no 
lem separately and Independently. In 
,' connected partial tones form a single 
>und stop on the organ fuse into one, as 
move in the same melodic progression 

I, -3,9 IW^JSf iP fJB^M^'B ' M 1^ '^'^ usually accompanied by charac- 

3E|ffijSVhSiu*sC|IB^ttAcai?vB "IQid rubbing of the violin bow, the rush 

B> JE B ' ■ fm riMi ttr&}S|lt4ting of reeds, ka. These noises, with 

l«W H tRnFlVMilVi'f^iwkttlt^riBing the instruments, materially 

^^^ m^XSit^l — .■nj.^i.B&,i__.« a composite mass of sounds. The 

such characteristio marks. 

1 that the resolution of a compound 

t the ear to accomplish, as the resolu- 

^ fffunds of many instruments into their 

I ^ t T !£'^^(^^^^!^^I^''|'^^'^^ musical ear requires the appHoa- 

'^ ''f -^^^■<^fc^4^e^ql&hen it undertakes the former problem. 

f_i^ ' ^ ^R^^^^k^i^ril^M^^mstanoes already named do not always 

■nes. In uniformly sustained musical 

[as an upper partial of another, our 

___ his is really the case. G. 8. Ohm 

'fig» show this, Qsing the tones of a violin. 

lent to use simple tones, as those of a 

however, is a glass bottle of the form 

'■and 

FiQ. 20. 




[tCsg#ith 

IS able to make any required little 

to by and a smaller one to b'f> and 

when used both began to speak at the 

a musical tone of the pitch of the 

the vowel oa in toad, instead of 00 in 

the india-rubber tubes and then the 

separately, and in connection, I was 

Im sounded together, but I could not 

ir the upper tone gradually fused with 



CHAP. IV. 



SEPARATION OF THE PARTIALS. 



61 



the lower. This fusion takes place even when the upper tone is somewhat stronger 
than the lower. The alteration in the quality of tone which takes place during 
this fusion is characteristic. On producing the upper tone first sind then letting / 
the lower sound with it, I found that I at first continued to hear the upper tone 
with its full force, and the under tone sounding below it in its natural quality of 
00 in too. But by degrees, as my recollection of the sound of the isolated upper 
tone died away, it seemed to become more and more indistinct and weak, while 
the lower tone appeared to become stronger, and sounded like oa in toad. This 
weakening of the upper and strengthening of the lower tone was also observed by 
Ohm on the vioUn. As Seebeck remarks, it certainly does not always occur, and 
probably depends on the liveliness of our recollections of the tones as heard 
separately, and the greater or less uniformity in the simultaneous production of 
the tones. But where the experiment succeeds, it gives the best proof of the 
essential dependence of the result on varying activity of attention. With the tones f 
produced by bottles, in addition to the reinforcement of the lower tone, the altera- 
tion in its quality is very evident and is characteristic of the nature of the process. 
This alteration is less striking for the penetrating tones of the violin.^ 

This experiment has been appealed to both by Ohm and by Seebeck as a 
corroboration of their different opinions. When Ohm stated that it was an 
* illusion of the ear ' to apprehend the upper partial tones wholly or partly as a 
reinforcement of the prime tone (or rather of the compound tone whose pitch is 
determined by that of its prime), he certainly used a somewhat incorrect expression, 
although he meant what was correct, and Seebeck was justified in replying that 
the ear was the sole judge of auditory sensations, and that the mode in which it 
apprehended tones ought not to be called an ' illusion '. However, our experiments 
just described show that the judgment of the ear differs according to the liveliness 
of its recollection of the separate auditory impressions here fused into one whole, 
and according to the intensity of its attention. Hence we can certainly appeal from IT 
the sensations of an ear directed without assistance to external objects, whose 
interests Seebeck represents, to the ear which is attentively observing itself and 
is suitably assisted in its observation. Such an ear really proceeds according to 
the law laid down by Ohm. 

Another experiment should be adduced. Baise the dampers of a pianoforte so 
that all the strings can vibrate freely, then sing the vowel a in father^ a/rt, loudly 
to any note of the piano, directing the voice to the sounding-board ; the sym- 
pathetic resonance of the strings distinctly re-echoes the same a. On singing oe 
in toty the same oe is re-echoed. On singing a in fare^ this a is re-echoed. For ee 
in see the echo is not quite so good. The experiment does not succeed so well if 
the damper is removed only from the note on which the vowels are sung. The 
vowel character of the echo arises from the re-echoing of those upper partial tones 
which characterise the vowels. These, however, will echo better and more 
clearly when their corresponding higher strings are free and can vibrate sym- f 
pathetically. In this case, then, in the last resort, the musical effect of the 
resonance is compounded of the tones of several strings, and several separate 
partial tones combine to produce a musical tone of a peculiar quality. In addition 
to the vowels of the human voice, the piano will also quite distinctly imitate the 
quality of tone produced by a clarinet, when strongly blown on to the sounding 
board. 

Finally, we must remark, that although the pitch of a compound tone is, for 



*[A very convenient form of this experi- 
ment, useful even for leoture purposes, is to 
employ two tuning-forks, tuned as an Octave, 
say c' and c", and held over separate resonance 
jars. By removing first one and th en the other, 
or letting both sound together, the above effects 
can be made evident, and they even remain 
when the Octave is not tuned perfectly true. 



The tone is also brighter and unaccompanied 
by any windrush. By pressing the handle of 
the deeper fork on the table, we can excite its 
other upper partials, and thus produce a third 
quality of tone, which can be readily appre- 
ciated; thus, simple c', simple c'+ simple c'\ 
compound c'. — Translator J\ 



62 



ANALYSIS OF COMPOUND SENSATIONS. 



PART I. 



musical purposes, determined by that of its prime, the influence of the upper 
partial tones is by no means unfelt. They give the compound tone a brighter and 
higher effect. Simple tones are dull. When they are compared with compound 
tones of the same pitch, we are inclined to estimate the compound as belonging to 
a higher Octave than the simple tones. The difference is of the same kind as that 
heard when first the vowel oo in too and then a in tar are sung to the same note. 
It is often extremely difficult to compare the pitches of compound tones of different 
qualities. It is very easy to make a mistc^ke of an Octave. This has happened 
to the most celebrated musicians and acousticians. Thus it is well known that 
Tartini, who was celebrated as a violinist and theoretical musician, estimated all 
combinational tones (Chap. XI.) an Octave too high, and, on the other hand, 
Henrici'"' assigns a pitch too low by an Octave to the upper partial tones of 
tuning-forks.f 

IT The problem to be solved, then, in distinguishing the partials of a compound 
tone is that of analysing a given aggregate of sensations into elements which no 
longer admit of analysis. We are accustomed in a large number of cases where 
sensations of different kinds or in different parts of the body, exist simultaneously, 
to recognise that they are distinct as soon as they are perceived, and to direct our 
attention at will to any one of them separately. Thus at any moment we can be 
separately conscious of what we see, of what we hear, of what we feel, and dis- 
tinguish what we feel in a finger or in the great toe, whether pressure or a gentle 
touch, or warmth. So also in the field of vision. Indeed, as I shall endeavour to show 
in what follows, we readily distinguish our sensations from one another when we 
have a precise knowledge that they are composite, as, for example, when we have 
become certain, by frequently repeated and invariable experience, that our present 
sensation arises from the simultaneous action of many independent stimuli, each 
of which usually excites an equally well-known individual sensation. This induces 

IT us to think that nothing can be easier, when a number of different sensations are 
simultaneously excited, than to distinguish them individually from each other, and 
that this is an innate faculty of our minds. 

Thus we find, among others, that it is quite a matter of course to hear sepa- 
rately the different musical tones which come to our senses collectively, and expect 
that in every case when two of them occur together, we shall be able to do the 
like. 

The matter is very different when we set to work at investigating the more un- 
usual cases of perception, and at more completely understanding the conditions under 
which the above-mentioned distinction can or cannot be made, as is the case in the 
physiology of the senses. We then become aware that two different kinds or grades 
must be distinguished in our becoming conscious of a sensation. The lower grade of 
this consciousness, is that where the influence of the sensation in question makes 
itself felt only in the conceptions we form of external things and processes, and assists 

IT in determining them. This can take place without our needing or indeed being able 
to ascertain to what particular part of our sensations we owe this or that relation 
of our perceptions. In this case we will say that the impression of the sensation in 
question is perceived synthetically. The second and higher grade is when we 
immediately distinguish the sensation in question as an existing part of the sum 
of the sensations excited in us. We will say then that the sensation is perceived 
analytically, I The two cases must be carefully distinguished from each other. 



•Poggd. Ann.f vol. xcix. p. 506. The 
same difficulty is mentioned by Zamminer 
(Die Musik und die musikalisclien Instru- 
tnefite^ 1855, p. Ill) as well known to musicians. 

t [Here the passage from * The problem 
to be solved,' p. 626, to *from its simple 
tones/ p. 656, is inserted in this edition from the 
4th German edition. — Translator.] 

:^[Prof. Helmholtz uses Leibnitz's terms 
percipirt and appercipiri, alternating the latter 



with wahrgetiommeiiy and then restricting the 
meaning of this very common German word. 
It appeared to me that it would be clearer to 
an English reader not to invent now words 
or restrict the sense of old words, but to 
use perceived in both cases, and distinguish 
them (tor percipirt and appercipirt respectively) 
by the adjuncts synthetically and analytically, 
the use of which is clear from the explanations 
given in the text. — Translator.] 



CHAP. IV. ANALYSIS OF COMPOUND SENSATIONS. 63 

Seebeck and Ohm are agreed that the upper partials of a musical tone are 
perceiyed synthetically. This is acknowledged by Seebeck when he admits that 
their action on the ear changes the force or quaUty of the sound examined. The 
dispute turns upon whether in all cases they can be perceived analytically in their 
individual existence ; that is, whether the ear when unaided by resonators or other 
physical auxiliaries, which themselves alter the mass of musical sound heard by the 
observer, can by mere direction and intensity of attention distinguish whether, and 
if so in what force, the Octave, the Twelfth, &c., of the prime exists in the given 
musical sound. 

In the first place I will adduce a series of examples which show that the 
difficulty felt in analysing musical tones exists also for other senses. Let us 
begin with the comparatively simple perceptions of the sense of taste. The 
ingredients of our dishes and the spices with which we flavour them, are not so 
complicated that they could not be readily learned by any one. And yet there are f 
very few people who have not themselves practically studied cookery, that are able 
readily and directly to discover, by the taste alone, the ingredients of the dishes 
placed before them. How much practice, and perhaps also peculiar talent, belongs 
to wine tasting for the purpose of discovering adulterations is known in all wine- 
growing countries. Similarly for smell ; indeed the sensations of taste and smell 
may unite to form a single whole. Using our tongues constantly, we are scarcely 
aware that the peculiar character of many articles of food and drink, as vinegar or 
vrine, depends also upon the sensation of smell, their vapours entering the back 
part of the nose through the gullet. It is not till we meet with persons in whom 
the sense of smell is deficient that we learn how essential a part it plays in 
tasting. Such persons are constantly in fault when judging of food, as indeed any 
one can learn from his own experience, when he suffers from a heavy cold in the 
head without having a loaded tongue. 

When our hand glides unawares along a cold and smooth piece of metal we ^ 
are apt to imagine that we have wetted our hand. This shows that the sensation 
of wetness to the touch is compounded out of that of unresisting gliding and cold, 
which in one case results from the good heat-conducting properties of metal, and 
in the other from the cold of evaporation and the great specific heat of water. 
We can easily recognise both sensations in wetness, when we think over the 
matter, but it is the above-mentioned illusion which teaches us that the peculiar 
feeling of wetness is entirely resolvable into these two sensations. 

The discovery of the stereoscope has taught us that the power of seeing the 
depths of a field of view, that is, the different distances at which objects and 
their parts lie from the eye of the spectator, essentially depends on the simul- 
taneously synthetical perceptions of two somewhat different perspective images .of 
the same objects by the two eyes of the observer. If the difference of the two 
images is sufficiently great it is not difficult to perceive them analytically as 
separate. For example, if we look intently at a distant object and hold one of «r 
our fingers slightly in front of our nose we see two images of our finger against 
the background, one of which vanishes when we close the right eye, the other 
belonging to the left. But when the differences of distance are relatively small, 
and hence the differences of the two perspective images on the retina are so also„ 
great practice and certainty in the observation of double images is necessary to 
keep them asunder, yet the synthetical perception of their differences still exists, 
and makes itself felt in the apparent relief of the surface viewed. In this case 
also, as well as for upper partial tones, the ease and exactness of the analytical 
perception is far behind that of the synthetical perception. 

In the conception which we form of the direction in which the objects viewed 
seem to lie, a considerable part must be played by those sensations, mainly muscular, 
which enable us to recognise the position of our body, of the head with regard to 
the body, and of the eye with regard to the head. If one of these is altered, for 
example, if the sensation of the proper position of the eye is changed by pressing 



64 



ANALYSIS OF COMPOUND SENSATIONS. 



PART I. 



a finger against the eyeball or by injury to one of the muscles of the eye, our per- 
ception of the position of visible objects is also changed. But it is only by such 
occasional illusions that we become aware of the fact that muscular sensations form 
part of the aggregate of sensations by which our conception of the position of a 
visible object is determined. 

The phenomena of mixed colours present considerable analogy to those of com- 
pound musical tones, only in the case of colour the number of sensations reduces to 
three, and the analysis of the composite sensations into their simple elements is still 
more difficult and imperfect than for musical tones. As early as 1686 B. Waller 
mentions in the Philosophical Transactions the reduction of all colours to the 
mixture of three fundamental colours, as something already well known. This 
view could in earlier times only be founded on sensations and experiments arising 
from the mixture of pigments. In recent times we have discovered better methods, 

^ by mixing light of different colours, and hence have confirmed the correctness of 
that hypothesis by exact measurements, but at the same time we have learned that 
this confirmation only succeeds within a certain limit, conditioned by the fact that no 
kind of coloured light exists which can give us the sensation of a single one of the 
fundamental colours with exclusive purity. Even the most saturated and purest 
colours that the external world presents to us in the prismatic spectrum, may by 
the development of secondary images of the complementary colours in the eye 
be still freed as it were from a white veil, and hence cannot be considered as abso- 
lutely pure. For this reason we are unable to show objectively the absolutely pure 
fundamental colours from a mixture of which all other colours without exception 
can be formed. We only know that among the colours of the spectrum scarlet-red, 
yellow-green, and blue-violet approach to them nearer than any other objective 
colours.''^ Hence we are able to compound out of these three colours almost all the 
colours that usually occur in different natural bodies, but we cannot produce the 

^ yellow and blue of the spectrum in that complete degree of saturation which they 
reach when purest within the spectrum itself. Our mixtures are always a little 
whiter than the corresponding simple colours of the spectrum. Hence it follows 
that we never see the simple elements of our sensations of colour, or at least see 
them only for a very short time in particular experiments directed to this end, and 
consequently cannot have any such exact or certain image in our recollection, as 
would indisputably be necessary for accurately analysing every sensation of colour 
into its elementary sensations by inspection. Moreover we have relatively rare 
opportunities of observing the process of the composition of colours, and hence of 
recognising the constituents in the compound. It certainly appears to me very 
characteristic of this process, that for a century and a half, from Waller to Goethe, 
every one relied on the mixtures of pigments, and hence believed green to be a 
mixture of blue and yellow, whereas when sky-blue and sulphur- yellow beams of 
j light, not pigments^ are mixed together, the result is white. To this very cir- 
; mr cumstance is due the violent opposition of Groethe, who was only acquainted with 
the colours of pigments, to the assertion that white was a mixture of variously 
coloured beams of light. Hence we can have little doubt that the power of dis- 

'i tinguishing the different elementary constituents of the sensation is originally 
absent in the sense of sight, and that the little which exists in highly educated 
observers, has been attained by specially conducted experiments, through which of 
course, when wrongly planned, error may have ensued. 

On the other hand every individual has an opportunity of experimenting on the 



*[In his Physiological Optica^ p. 227, 
Prof. Helmholtz calls scarlet-red or Yermilion 
the part of the spectrum before reaching 
Frauahofer^s line O. He does not use apan- 
ffrUn (= OrUn'Span or verdigris, literally 
* Spanish-green ') in his Optics, but talks of 
green-yellow between the lines E and 6, and 
he says, on p. 844, that Maxwell took as one of 
the fundamental colours * a green near the line 



Ef* hence I translate sparingilm by 'yellow- 
green *. Maxwell's blue or third colour was 
between the lines JP and G, but twice as far 
from the latter as the former. This gives the 
colour which Prof. H. in his Optics calls • cya- 
nogen blue,^ or Prussian blue. The violet 
proper does not begin till after the line G. It 
IS usual to speak of these three colours, vaguely, 
as Bed, Green, and Blue. — Translator.] 



CHAPS. IV. V. ANALYSIS OF COMPOUND SENSATIONS. 65 

composition of two or more musical sounds or noises on the most extended scale, 
and the power of analysing even extremely involved compounds of musical tones, 
into the separate parts produced by individual instruments, can readily be acquired 
by any one who directs his attention to the subject. But the ultimate simple 
elements of the sensation of tone, simple tones themselves, are rarely heard alone. 
Even those instruments by which they can be produced, as tuning-forks before 
resonance chambers, when strongly excited, give rise to weak harmonic upper 
partials, partly within and partly without the ear, as we shall see in Chapters Y. 
and yn. Hence in this case also, the opportunities are very scanty for impress- 
ing on our memory an exact and sure image of these simple elementary tones. 
But if the constituents to be added are only indefinitely and vaguely known, the 
analysis of the sum into those parts must be correspondingly uncertain. If we do 
not know with certainty how much of the musical tone under consideration is to 
be attributed to its prime, we cannot but be uncertain as to what belongs to the IT 
partials. Consequently we must begin by making the individual elements which 
have to be distinguished, individually audible, so as to obtain an entirely fresh 
recollection of the corresponding sensation, and the whole business requires un- 
disturbed and concentrate attention. We are even without the ease that can be 
obtained by frequent repetitions of the experiment, such as we possess in the 
analysis of musical chords into their individual tones. In that case we hear the 
individual tones sufficiently often by themselves, whereas we rarely hear simple 
tones and may almost be said never to hear the building up of a compound from its 
simple tones. 

The results of the preceding discussion may be summed up as follows : — , 

(1) The upper partial tones corresponding to the simple vibrations of a com- 
pound motion of the air, are perceived synthetically, even when they are not always 
perceived analytically. 

(2) But they can be made objects of analytical perception without any other % ' 
help than a proper direction of attention. 

(3) Even in the case of their not being separately perceived, because they fuse 
into the whole mass of musical sound, their existence in our sensation is established 
by an alteration in the quality of tone, the impression of their higher pitch being 
characteristically marked by increased brightness and acuteness of quality. 

In the next chapter we shall give details of the relations of the upper partials 
to the quality of compound tones. 



CHAPTEB V. 

ON THE DIFFBRENOES IN THE QUALITY OF MUSICAL TONES. 

TowABDS the close of Chapter I. (p. 21d), we found that differences in the quality 
of musical tones must depend on the form of the vibration of the air. TheT 
reasons for this assertion were only negative. We have seen that force depended 
on amplitude, and pitch on rapidity of vibration : nothing else was left to distin- 
guish quality but vibrational form. We then proceeded to show that the existence 
and force of the upper partial tones which accompanied the prime depend also on 
the vibrational form, and hence we could not but conclude that musical tones of 
the same quality would always exhibit the same combination of partials, seeing 
that the peculiar vibrational form which excites in the ear the sensation of a certain 
quality of tone, must always evoke the sensation of its corresponding upper partials. 
The question then arises, can, and if so, to what extent can the differences of 
musical quality be reduced to the combination of different partial tones with dif- 
ferent intensities in different musical tones ? At the conclusion of last chapter 
(p. 60d), we saw that even artificially combined simple tones were capable of fusing 
into a musical tone of a quality distinctly different from that of either of its con- 
stituents, and that consequently the existence of a new upper partial really altered 

F 



66 



CONCEPTION OF MUSICAL QUALITY AND TONE. 



FABI I. 



the quality of a tone. By this means we gained a clue to the hitherto enigmatical 

. nature of quality of tone» and to the cause of its varieties. 

There has been a general inclination to credit quality with all possible pecu- 
liarities of musical tones that were not evidently due to force and pitch. This was 
correct to the extent that quality of tone was merely a negative conception. But 
very slight consideration will suffice to show that many of these peculiarities of 
musical tones depend upon the way in which they begin and end. The methods of 
attacking and releasing tones are sometimes so characteristic that for the human 
voice they have been noted by a series of different letters. To these belong the ex- 
plosive consonants B, D, G, and P, T, K. The effects of these letters are produced 
by opening the closed, or closing the open passage through the mouth. For B 
and P the closure is made by the lips, for D and T by the tongue and upper teeth,* 
for G and K by the back of the tongue and soft palate. The series of the mediae 

f B, D, G is distinguished from that of the tenues P, T, K, by the glottis being suffi- 
ciently narrowed, when the closure of the former is released, to produce voice, or at 
least the rustle of whisper, whereas for the latter or tenues the glottis is wide open,f 
and cannot sound. The mediae are therefore accompanied by voice, which is 
capable of commencing at the beginning of a syllable an instant before the open- 
ing of the mouth, and of lasting at the end of a syllable a moment after the closure 
of the mouth, because some air can be still driven into the closed cavity of the 
mouth and the vibration of the vocal chords in the larynx can be still maintained. 
On account of the narrowing of the glottis the influx of air is more moderate, and 
the noise of the wind less sharp for the mediae than the tenttes, which, being spoken 
with open glottis, allow of a great deal of wind being forced at once from the chest.^ 
At the same time the resonance of the cavity of the mouth, which, as we shall 
more clearly understand further on, exercises a great influence on the vowels, 
varies its pitch, corresponding to the rapid alterations in the magnitude of its volume 

IT and orifice, and this brings about a corresponding rapid variation in the quality of 
the speech sound. 

As with consonants, the differences in the quality of tone of struck strings, 
also partly depends on the rapidity with which the tone dies away. When the 
strings have little mass (such as those of gut), and are fastened to a very mobile 
sounding board (as for a violin, guitar, or zither), or when the parts on which they 
rest or which they touch are but slightly elastic (as when the violin strings, for 
example, are pressed on the finger board by the soft point of the finger), their 
vibrations rapidly disappear after striking, and the tone is dry, short, and without 
ring, as in the pizzicato of a violin. But if the strings are of metal wire, and 
hence of greater weight and tension, and if they are attached to strong heavy 
bridges which cannot be much shaken, they give out their vibrations slowly to the 



* [This is true for German, and most Con- 
tinental languages, and for some dialectal 
^ English, especially in Cumberland, Westmore- 
land, YorkBhire,Lanca8hire, the Peak of Derby- 
shire, and Ireland, but even then only in con- 
nection with the trilled B. Throughout Eng- 
land generally, the tip of the tongue is quite 
free from the teeth, except for TH in thiii and 
then^ and for T and D it only touches the hard 
palate, seldom advancing so far as the root of 
the gums. — Translator.] 

t [This again is true for Qerman, but not 
for English, French, or Italian, and not even 
for the adjacent Slavonic languages. In these 
languages the glottis is quite closed for both 
the mediae and the tenues in ordinary speech, 
but the voice begins for the mediae before 
releasing the closure of the lips or tongue and 
palate, and for the tenues at the moment of 
relecae. Although in giving vowel sounds, &c., 
I have generally contented myself with trans- 
lating the same into English symbols and 



examples, it seemed better in the present case, 
where the author was speaking especially of 
the phenomena of speech to which he was 
personally accustomed, to leave the text un- 
altered and draw attention to English pecu- 
liarities in footnotes. — Translator.] 

It [Observe again that this description of 
the rush of wind accompanying P, T, K, 
although true for German habits of speech, is 
not true for the usual English habits, which 
require the windrush between the opening of 
the mouth and sounding of the vowel to be 
entirely suppressed. The English result is a 
gliding vowel sound preceding the true vowel on 
commencing a syllable, and following the vowel 
on ending one. The difference between English 
P and German P is precisely the same (as I have 
verified by actual observation) as that between 
the simple Sanscrit tenuis P, and the postaspi- 
rated Sanscrit Ph, as now actually pronounced 
by cultivated Bengalese. See my Early Eriglish 
Pronunciation, p. 1136, col. 1.— Translator.] 



CHAP. V. OONCEPTION OF MUSICAL QUALITY AND TONE. 67 

air and the sounding board ; their vibrations continue longer, their tone is more 
durable and fuller, as in the pianoforte, but is comparatively less powerful and 
penetrating than that of gut strings, which give up their tone more readily when 
struck with the same force. Hence the pizzicato of bowed instruments when well 
executed is much more piercing than the tone of a pianoforte. Pianofortes with 
their strong and heavy supports for the strings have, consequently, for the same 
thickness of string, a less penetrating but a much more lasting tone than those 
instruments of which the supports for the strings are lighter. 

It is very characteristic of brass instruments, as trumpets and trombones, 
that their tones commence abruptly and sluggishly. The various tones in these 
instruments are produced by exciting different upper partials through different 
styles of blowing, which serve to throw the column of air into vibrating portions 
of different numbers and lengths similar to those on a string. It always requires 
a certain amount of effort to excite the new condition of vibration in place of the IT 
old, but when once established it is maintained with less exertion. On the other 
hand, the transition from one tone to another is easy for wooden wind instruments, 
as the flute, oboe, and clarinet, where the length of the column of air is readily 
changed by application of the fingers to the side holes and keys, and where the 
style of blowing has not to be materially altered. 

These examples will suffice to show how certain characteristic peculiarities in 
the tones of several instruments depend on the mode in which they begin and end. 
When we speak in what follows of musical quality of tone, we shall disregard 
these peculiarities of beginning and ending, and confine our attention to the 
peculiarities of the musical tone which continues uniformly. 

But even when a musical tone continues with uniform or variable intensity, 
it is mixed up, in the general methods of excitement, with certain noises, which 
express greater or less irregularities in the motion of the air. In wind instruments 
where the tones are maintained by a stream of air, we generally hear more or less % 
whizzing and hissing of the air which breaks against the sharp edges of the 
mouthpiece. In strings, rods, or plates excited by a violin bow, we usually hear 
a good deal of noise from the rubbing. The hairs of the bow are naturally full of 
many minute irregularities, the resinous coating is not spread over it with absolute 
evenness, and there are also little inequalities in the motion of the arm which 
holds the bow and in the amount of pressure, all of which influence the motion 
of the string, and make the tone of a bad instrument or an unskilful performer 
rough, scraping, and variable. We shall not be able to explain the nature of the 
motions of the air and sensations of the ear which correspond to these noises till 
we have investigated the conception of beats. Those who listen to music make 
themselves deaf to these noises by purposely withdrawing attention from them, but 
a slight amount of attention generally makes them very evident for all tones pro- 
duced by blowing or rubbing. It is well known that most consonants in human 
speech are characterised by the maintenance of similar noises, as F, V ; S, Z ; TH ^ 
in thin and in then ; the Scotch and German guttural CH, and Dutch G. For 
some the tone is made- still more irregular by trilling parts of the mouth, as for 
R and L. In the case of R the stream of air is periodically entirely interrupted by 
trilling the uvula* or the tip of the tongue ; and we thus obtain an intermitting 
sound to which these interruptions give a peculiar jarring character. In the case 
of L the soft side edges of the tongue are moved by the stream of air, and, without 
completely interrupting the tone, produce inequalities in its strength. 

Even the vowels themselves are not free from such noises, although they are 
kept more in the background by the musical character of the tones of the voice. 
Donders first drew attention to these noises, which are partly identical with those 
which are produced when the corresponding vowels are indicated in low voiceless 

* [In the northern parts of Germany and of There are also many other trills, into which, 
France, and in Northumberland,but not other- as into other phonetic details, it is not neces- 
wise in England, except as an organic defect, sary to enter. — Translator. "l 

F 2 



68 



CONCEPTION OF MUSICAL QUALITY AND TONE. 



PABT I. 



speech. They are strongest for ee in see, the French u in vu (which is nearly the 
same as the Norfolk and Devon oo in too), and for oo in too. For these vowels they 
can be made andible even when speaking aloud.* By simply increasing their force 
the vowel ee in see becomes the consonant y in yon, and the vowel oo in too the 
consonant w in wan,\ For a in art, a in at, e in met, there, and o in more, the 
noises appear to me to be produced in the glottis alone when speaking gently, and 
to be absorbed into the voice when speaking aloud. { It is remarkable that in 
speaking, the vowels a in art, a in at, and e in met, there, are produced with less 
musical tone than in singing. It seems as if a feeling of greater compression in 
the larynx caused the tuneful tone of the voice to give way to one of a more jarring 
character which admits of more evident articulation. The greater intensity thus 
given to the noises, appears in this case to facilitate the characterisation of the 
peculiar vowel quality. In singing, on the contrary, we try to favour the musical 

IT part of its quality and hence often render the articulation somewhat obscure. § 

Such accompanying noises and little inequalities in the motion of the air, 
furnish much that is characteristic in the tones of musical instruments, and in the 
vocal tones of speech which correspond to the different positions of the mouth ; 
but besides these there are numerous peculiarities of quality belonging to the 
musical tone proper, that is, to the perfectly regular portion of the motion of the 
air. The importance of these can be better appreciated by listening to musical 
instruments or human voices, from such a distance that the comparatively weaker 
noises are no longer audible. Notwithstanding the absence of these noises, it is 
generally possible to discriminate the different musical instruments, although it 
must be acknowledged that under such circumstances the tone of a French horn 
may be occasionally mistaken for that of the singing voice, or a violoncello may 
be confused with an harmonium. For the human voice, consonants first disappear 
at a distance, because they are characterised by noises, but M, N, and the vowels 
* T can be distinguished at a greater distance. The formation of M and N in so far 
resembles that of vowels, that no noise of wind is generated in any part of the 
cavity of the mouth, which is perfectly closed, and the sound of the voice escapes 
through the nose. The mouth merely forms a resonance chamber which alters the 
quality of tone. It is interesting in calm weather to listen to the voices of men 
who are descending from high hills to the plain. Words can no longer be recog- 
nised, or at most only such as are composed of M, N, and vowels, as Mamma, No, 
Noon. But the vowels contained in the spoken words are easily distinguished. 
Wanting the thread which connects them into words and sentences, they form a 
strange series of alternations of quality and singular inflections of tone. 

In the present chapter we shall at first disregard all irregular portions of the 
motion of the air, and the mode in which sounds commence or terminate, directing 
our attention solely to the musical part of the tone, properly so called, which 
corresponds to a uniformly sustained and regularly periodic motion of the air, 

^ and we shall endeavour to discover the relations between the quality of the sound 



* [At the Commie Fran<?ai8e I have heard 
M. Got pronounce the word oui and Mme. 
Provost-Ponsin pronounce the last syllahle of 
Tiochis entirely without voice tones, and yet 
make then audihle throughout the theatre. — 
Translator.] 

t [That this is not the whole of the pheno- 
menon is shown hy the words ye, woo. The 
whole suhject is discuseed at length in my 
Early English Pronunciation^ pp. 1092-1094, 
and 1149-1161.— Trowia^or.] 

t[By * speaking gently* {leise) seems to 
he meant either speaking absolutely without 
voice, that is with an open glottis, or in a 
whisper, with the glottis nearly closed. For 
voice the glottis is quite closed, and this is 
indicated by 'speaking aloud' {heim lauten 
Sprechen). It would lead too far to discuss 



the important phonetic observations in the 
text. — Translator.] 

§ [These observations must not be con- 
sidered as exhausting the subject of the dif- 
ference between the singing and the speak- 
ing voice, which requires a peculiar study 
here merely indicated. See^my Pronunciation 
for Singers (Curwen) and Speech in Song 
(Novello). The difference between English and 
German habits of speaking and singing must 
also be borne in mind, and allowed for by 
the reader. The English vowels given in the 
text are not the perfect equivalents of Prof. 
Helmholtz's German sounds. The noises 
which accompany the vowels are not nearly 
so marked in English as in German, but they 
differ very much locally, even in England. — 
Translator.] 



CHAP. V. 1. TONES WITH NO UPPER PARTIALS. 69 

and its composition out of individual simple tones. The peculiarities of quality 
of sound belonging to this division, we shall briefly call its musical quality. 

The object of the present chapter is, therefore, to describe the different com- 
position of musical tones as produced by different instruments, for the purpose of 
showing how different modes of combining the upper partial tones correspond to 
characteristic varieties of musical quality. Certain general rules will result for 
the arrangement of the upper partials which answer to such species of musical 
quality as are called, sojt, 'piercing^ braying^ hollow or jpoor^ full or rich, dull, 
bright, crisp, pungent, and so on. Independently of our immediate object (the 
determination of the physiological action of the ear in the discrimination of 
musical quality, which is reserved for the following chapter), the results of this 
investigation are important for the resolution of purely musical questions in later 
chapters, because they show us how rich in upper partials, good musical quaUties 
of tone are found to be, and also point out the peculiarities of musical quality ^ 
favoured on those musical instruments, for which the quality of tone has been to 
some extent abandoned to the caprice of the maker. 

Since physicists have worked comparatively little at this subject I shall be 
forced to enter somewhat more minutely into the mechanism by which the tones 
of several instruments are produced, than will be, perhaps, agreeable to many of 
my readers. For such the principal results collected at the end of this chapter will 
suffice. On the other hand, I must ask indulgence for leaving many large gaps 
in this almost unexplored region, and for confining myself principally to instru- 
ments sufficiently well known for us to obtain a tolerably satisfactory view of the 
source of their tones. In this inquiry lie rich materials for interesting acoustical 
work. But I have felt bound to confine myself to what was necessary for the 
continuation of the present investigation. 

1. Musical Tones ivithout Upper Partials. 1 

We begin with such musical tones as are not decomposable, but consist of a 
single simple tone. These are most readily and purely produced by holding a 
struck tuning-fork over the mouth of a resonance tube, as has been described in 
the last chapter (p. b^d)* These tones are uncommonly soft and free from all 
shrillness and roughness. As already remarked, they appear to lie comparatively 
deep, so that such as correspond to the deep tones of a bass voice produce the 
impression of a most remarkable and unusual depth. The musical quahty of such 
deep simple tones is also rather dull. The simple tones of the soprano pitch 
sound bright, but even those corresponding to the highest tones of a soprano voice 
are very soft, without a trace of that cutting, rasping shrillness which is displayed 
by most instruments at such pitches, with the exception, perhaps, of the flute, for 
which the tones are very nearly simple, being accompanied with very few and 
faint upper partials. Among vowels, the oo in too comes nearest to a simple tone, 
but even this vowel is not entirely free from upper partials. On comparing the ^ 
musical quality of a simple tone thus produced with that of a compound tone in 
which the first harmonic upper partial tones are developed, the latter will be found 
to be more tuneful, metallic, and brilliant. Even the vowel oo in too, although 
the dullest and least tuneful of all vowels, is sensibly more brilliant and less dull 
than a simple tone of the same pitch. The series of the first six partials of a | 
compound tone may be regarded musically as a major chord with a very predominant 
fundamental tone, and in fact the musical quality of a compound tone possessing ' 
these partials, as, for example, a fine singing voice, when heard beside a simple tone, 
very distinctly produces the agreeable effect of a consonant chord. 

Since the form of simple waves of known periodic time is completely given 
when their amplitude is given, simple tones of the same pitch can only differ 
in force and not in musical quality. In fact, the difference of quality remains 

* On possible sources of disturbance, see Appendix IV. 



70 



TONES WITH INHARMONIC UPPER PARTIALS. 



PABT I. 



perfectly indistinguishable, whether the simple tone is conducted to the external 
air in the preceding methods by a tuning-fork and a resonance tube of any given 
material, glass, metal, or pasteboard, or by a string, provided only that we guard 
against any chattering in the apparatus. 

Simple tones accompanied only by the noise of rushing wind can also be pro- 
duced, as already mentioned, by blowing over the mouth of bottles with necks 
(p. 60c). If we disregard the friction of the air, the proper musical quality of such 
tones is really the same as that produced by tuning-forks. 

2. Musical Tones with Inharmonic Upper Partials. 

Nearest to musical tones without any upper partials are those with secondary 
tones which are inharmonic to the prime, and such tones, therefore, in strictness, 

^ should not be reckoned as musical tones at all. They are exceptionally used in 
artistic music, but only when it is contrived that the prime tone should be so much 
more powerful than the secondary tones, that the existence of the latter may be 
ignored. Hence they are placed here next to the simple tones, because musically 
they are available only for the more or less good simple tones which they represent. 
The first of these are timing-forks themselves, when they are struck and applied 
to a sounding board, or brought very near the ear. The [inharmonic] upper partials 
of tuning-forks lie very high. In those which I have examined, the first made 
from 5*8 to 6*6 as many vibrations in the same time as the prime tone, and hence 
lay between its third diminished Fifth and major Sixth. The pitch numbers of 
these high upper partial tones were to one another as the squares of the odd 
numbers. In the time that the first upper partial would execute 3x3 = 9 vibra- 
tions, the next would execute 5 x 5 = 25, and the next 7 x 7 » 49, and so on. Their 
pitch, therefore, increases with extraordinary rapidity, and they are usually all 

^inharmonic with the prime, though some of them may exceptionally become 
harmonic. If we call the prime tone of the fork c, the next succeeding tones are 
nearly a"\^, d'^', c^'ij^* These high secondary tones produce a bright inharmonic 
clink, which is easily heard at a considerable distance when the fork is first struck, 
whereas when it is brought close to the ear, the prime tone alone is heard. The 
ear readily separates the prime from the upper tones and has no inclination to fuse 
them. The high simple tones usually die off rapidly, while the prime tone remains 
audible for a long time. It should be remarked, however, that the mutual relations 
of the proper tones of tuning-forks differ somewhat according to the form of the 
fork, and hence the above indications must be looked upon as merely approximate. 
In theoretical determinations of the upper partial tones, each prong of the fork 
may be regarded as a rod fixed at one end. 

The same relations hold for straight elastic rods^ which, as already mentioned, 
when struck, give rather high inharmonic upper partial tones. When such a rod 

f is firmly supported at the two nodal lines of its prime tone, the continuance of 
that tone is favoured in preference to the other higher tones, and hence the latter 
disturb the effect very slightly, more especially as they rapidly die away after the 
rod has been struck. Such rods, however, are not suitable for real artistic music, 



* [On calculating the number of cents (as 
in App. XX. sect. C), we find that the first 
tone mentioned, which vibrates from 5*8 to 
6*6 as fast as the prime, makes an interval 
with it of from 3043 to 3267 ct., so that if 
the prime is called c, the note lies between 
g"]^ + 43, and a" - 38, where g"^ and a" are 
the third diminished Fifth and major Sixth of 
the prime c mentioned in the text. This Prof. 
Helmholtz calls a' " ^, or 3200 cents. Then the 
interval between this partial and the next is 
9 : 25 or 1769 ct., and hence the interval 
with the prime is between 4812 and 5036 
cents, or lies between c'" +12 and £2'^' +36, and 



hence it is called d'" in the text. The interval 
to the next tone is 25 : 49 or 1165 cents. 
Adding this to the former numbers the interval 
with the prime must be between 5977 and 
6201 cents, or between 6'*' + 77 and d' -S, for 
which in the text c"$ is selected. The inde- 
terminacy arises from the difficulty of finding 
the pitch of the first inharmonic upper partial. 
The intervals between that and the next upper 
partials are 9 : 25 or 1769 ct., 9 : 49 or 2934 
ct., 9 : 81 or 3699 ct., and so on. The word 
* inharmonic' has been inserted in the text, 
as tuning-forks have also generally harmonic 
upper partials. See p. 64d, note.— Translator.] 






'PER PARTIALS. 



71 



litary and dance music on account 
or platas, aod wooden roda, were 

__ aon and the straw-fiddle or wood 

. jflMfegBc'B two pairs of intertwisted stringB, 

'*||g^U.jlBQ^Q^,The wooden rods in the German 
1 M > j^ilSSSByM They were Btruck with hammers 

I the quality of tone in these 

that it allows the proper tones 

tones, including the higher ones, 

|otal of fine uniform consistency, 

lency to continue in any state of 

I metals the most perfect elasticity 

and zinc, or copper and tin. In % 

iS£&^^UQrBtj^^Mpecifio gravity lengthens the duia- 

tt'^M'nBLCAifi<J^BI elasticity. Superior elasticity 

""'a*SC^^$^'^| proper tones, because imperfect 

■—-"-•'* |fli|Bipid more quickly than slow vibra- 

^•U|^ general characteristic of what is' 

^^S^e oomparatively continuous and 

The quality of tone for glass ' 
hted,'the tone is always weak and 







„ . — _i*s rapidly away, on account of the 

!^pi^*£* the mass is small, the internal 

fS'C^T^^^i^ktless interstices, and the elasticity 

""' "" «■ tones, especially the higher ones, 

-fiddle or wood harmonicon is per- 

lonicons formed of steel or glass 

iper partial tones, — at least so far 

'^^* ^tich I shall have to speak later on.* 

•ho struck, the hammers are made 

rS^is renders the highest upper 

_ e employed. Greater^ 

[ffa^ker discontinuities in the original 

the manner of striking will be 

where it is also of much impor- 

jP^^tes, cut in circular, oval, square, 

laS^^d in a great number of different 

" "" " which are mutually inharmonic 

of a circular plate. Much more 

_ additional diameters appear as 

i^T3«C^9^occur. Supposing the vibrational 

lowing proper tones : — 

) oiB laid OD the edges of boat-shaped 

like old faa h ion cheese -traja, and kept 

. Iff ™ ^» ™J^'>B ^7 nails paasing loosely through 

ITagSagr'fgflJa: See App. XX. sect. K.—TramlatoTJ] 



72 



TONES WITH INHARMONIC UPPER PARTIALS. 



PAKT I. 



Number 

of Nodal 

Circles 


Number of Diameters 




1 


2 


8 


4 


5 



1 
2 


ft* 


'b 


c 


d' 


c" 


if'-^i 




This shows that many proper tones of nearly the same pitch are produced by a 
plate of this kind. When a plate is struck, those proper tones which have no 
node at the point struck, will all sound together. To obtain a particular deter- 
minate tone it is of advantage to support the plate in points which lie in the nodal 
Unes of that tone ; because those proper tones which have no node in those points 
will then die off more rapidly. For example, if a circular plate is supported at 

f <^ points in the nodal circle of fig. 21, G (p. 71c), and is struck exactly in its middle, 
the simple tone called A in the table, which belongs to that form, will be heard, 
and all those other proper tones which have diameters as some of their nodal 
lines* will be very weak, for example, c, d\ c", g'\ 6'^ in the table. In the same 
way the tone g"^ with two nodal circles, dies off immediately, because the points 
of support fall on one of its ventral segments, and the first proper tone which can 
sound loudly at the same time is that corresponding to three nodal circles, one of 
its nodal Hues being near to that of No. 2. But this is 3 Octaves and more than 
a whole Tone higher than the proper tone of No. 2, and on account of this great 
interval does not disturb the latter. Hence a disc thus struck gives a tolerably 
good musical tone, whereas plates in general produce soimds composed of many in- 
harmonic proper tones of nearly the same pitch, giving an empty tin-kettle sort of 
quality, which cannot be used in music. But even when the disc is properly sup- 
ported the tone dies away rapidly, at least in the case of glass plates, because 

f contact at many points, even when nodal, sensibly impedes the freedom of vibra- 
tion. 

The sound of hells is also accompanied by inharmonic secondary tones, which, 
however, do not lie so close to one another as those of fiat plates. The vibrations 
which usually arise have 4, 6, 8, 10, &c., nodal lines extending from the vertex of 
the bell to its margin, at equal intervals from each other. The corresponding 
proper tones for glass bells which have approximatively the same thickness 
throughout, are nearly as the squares of the numbers 2, 3, 4, 5, so that if we call 
the lowest tone c, we have for the 



Number of nodal lines . 



Tones 
Gents 



4 


6 


8 


10 


c 



d' + 
1404 


c" 
2400 


3173 



12 



3804 



The tones, however, vary with the greater or less thickness of the wall of the 
f bell towards the margin, and it appears to be an essential point in the art of 
casting bells, to make the deeper proper tones mutually harmonic by giving the 
bell a certain empirical form. According to the observations of the organist 
Gleitz,f the bell cast for the cathedral at Erfurt in 1477 has the following proper 
tones : E, e, ^, 6, e\ g'j^ h\ c"^ The [former] bell of St. Paul's, London, gave 
a and c'i. Hemony of Ziitphen, a master in the seventeenth century, required a 
good bell to have three Octaves, two Fifths, one major and one minor Third. The 
deepest tone is not the strongest. The body of the bell when struck gives a 
deeper tone than the ' sound bow,' but the latter gives the loudest tone. Probably 
other vibrational forms of bells are also possible in which nodal circles are formed 



* Provided that the supported points do 
not happen to belong to a system of diameters 
making equal angles with each other. 

t* Historical Notes on the Great Bell 
and the other Bells in Erfurt Gathediar 



{Oeichichtliches ilb&r die grossa Olocke und 
die Ubrigen Olocken das Domes eu Erfurt). 
Erfurt, 1867. — See also Schafhautl in the 
Kunst und Oewerbeblatt filr das KOnigreich 
Bayem, 1868, liv. 825 to 350 ; 885 to 427. 



CHAP. T. 2. 



TONES WITH INHARMONIC UPPER PARTIALS. 



73 



parallel to the maigin. But these seemed to be produced with difficulty and have 
not yet been examined. 

If a bell is not perfectly symmetrical in respect to its axis, if, for example, the 
wall is a little thicker at one point of its circumference than at another, it will 
give, on being struck, two different tones of very nearly the same pitch, which will 
' beat ' together. Four points on the margin will be found, separated from each 
other by quarter-circles, in which only one of these tones can be heard without 
accompanying beats, and four others, half-way between the pairs of the others, 
where the second tone only sounds. If the bell is struck elsewhere both tones are 
heard, producing beats, and such beats may be perceived in most bells as their 
tone dies gradually away. 

Stretched membranes have also inharmonic proper tones of nearly the same 
pitch. For a circular membrane, of which the deepest tone is c, these are, in a 
vacuum and arranged in order of pitch, as follows : — 



\ 



ir 



Number of Nodal lines 


Tone 


Diameters 


Circles 




1 
2 


1 







1 
1 
2 


c 

% + 0-l» 
d'^ + 0-2 
g' -0-2 
6> + 0-1 



These tones rapidly die out. If the membranes sound in air,f or are associated 
with an air chamber, as in the kettledrum, the relation of the proper tones may 
be altered. No detailed investigations have yet been made on the secondary tones 
of the kettledrum. The kettledrum is used in artistic music, but only to mark IT 
certain accents. It is tuned, indeed, but only to prevent injury to the harmony, 
not for the purpose of filling up chords. 

The common character of the instruments hitherto described is, that, when 
struck they produce inharmonic upper partial tones. If these are of nearly the 
same pitch as the prime tone, their quahty of sound is in the highest degree un- 
musical, bad, and tinkettly. If the secondary tones are of very different pitch 
from the prime, and weak in force, the quality of sound is more musical, as for I 
example in tuning-forks, harmonicons of rods, and bells ; and such tones are applic- ^ 
able for marches and other boisterous music, principally intended to mark time. 
But for really artistic music, such instruments as these have always been rejected, 
as they ought to be, for the inharmonic secondary tones, although they rapidly die 
away, always disturb the harmony most unpleasantly, renewed as they are at every 
fresh blow. A very striking example of this was furnished by a company of bell- 
ringers, said to be Scotch, that lately travelled about GermiAny, and performed all ^ 
kinds of musical pieces, some of which had an artistic character. The accuracy 
and skill of the performance was undeniable, but the musical effect was detestable, 
on account of the heap of false secondary tones which accompanied the music, 
although care was taken to damp each bell as soon as the proper duration of its 
note had expired, by placing it on a table covered with cloth. 

Sonorous bodies with inharmonic partials, may be also set in action by violin 
bows, and then by properly damping them in a nodal line of the desired tone, the 
secondary tones which he near it can be prevented from interfering. One simple 
tone then predominates distinctly, and it might consequently be used for musical 
purposes. But when the violin bow is applied to any bodies with inharmonic 
upper partial tones, as tuning-forks, plates, bells, we hear a strong scratching ; 



V.' 



* [These decimals represent tenths of a 
tone, or 20 cents for the nrst place. As there 
can be no sounds in a vacuum, these notes 
are merely used to conveniently symbolise 



numbers of vibrations in a second. — Trans- 
lator,] 

t See J. Bourget, L'lnstitut, zxzviii., 1870, 
pp. 189, 190. 



74 MUSICAL TONES OF STRINGS. part i. 

t sound, which on investigation with resonators, is found to consist mainly of these 
' - I same inharmonic secondary tones of such bodies, not sounding continuously but 
only in short irregular Hts and starts. Intey niitfr*^"^' ^■^^**«i as I have already noted, 
produce the effect of grating or scratching. It is only when the body excited by 
the violin bow has harmonic upper partials, that it can perfectly accommodate itself 
■ to every impulse of the bow, and give a really musical quality of tone. The 
\1' ■ reason of this is that any required periodic motion such as the bow aims at pro- 
ducing, can be compounded of motions corresponding to harmonic upper partial 
tones, but not of other, inharmonic vibrations. 

3. Musical Tones of Strings, 

We now proceed to the analysis of musical tones proper, which are characterised 
IT by harmonic upper partials. These may be best classified according to their mode 
of excitement : 1. By striking. 2. By bowing. 3. By blowing against a sharp 
edge. 4. By blowing against elastic tongues or vibrators. The two first classes 
comprehend stringed instruments alone, as longitudinally vibrating rods, the only 
other instruments producing harmonic upper partial tones, are not used for musical 
purposes. The third class embraces flutes and the flute or flue pipes of organs ; 
the fourth all other wind instruments, including the human voice. 

Strings excited by Striking. — Among musical instruments at present in use, 
this section embraces the pianoforte, harp, guitar, and zither ; among physical, 
the monochord, arranged for an accurate examination of the laws controlling the 
vibrations of strings ; the pizzicato of bowed instruments must also be placed in 
this category. We have already mentioned that the musical tones produced by 
strings which are struck or plucked, contain numerous upper partial tones. We 
have the advantage of possessing a complete theory for the motion of plucked 
% strings, by which the force of their upper partial tones may be determined. In 
the last chapter we compared some of the conclusions of this theory with the 
results of experiment, and found them agree. A similarly complete theory may be 
formed for the case of a string which has been struck in one of its points by a 
hard sharp edge. The problem is not so simple when soft elastic hammers are 
used, such as those of the pianoforte, but even in this case it is possible to assign 
a theory for the motion of the string which embraces at least the most essential 
features of the process, and indicates the force of the upper partial tones.* 

The force of the upper partial tones in a struck string, depends in general 
on: — 

1. The nature of the stroke, 

2. The place struck, 

3. The density, rigidity, and elasticity of the string. 
First, as to the nature of the stroke. The string may be plucked, by drawing 

^ it on one side with the finger or a point (the plectrum, or the ring of the zither- 
player), and then letting it go. This is a usual mode of exciting a string in a great 
number of ancient and modern stringed instruments. Among the modem, I need 
only mention the harp, guitar, and zither. Or else the string may be struck with 
a hammer-shaped body, as in the pianoforte. f I have already remarked that the 
strength and number of the upper partial tones increases with the number and 
abruptness of the discontinuities in the motion excited. This fact determines the 
various modes of exciting a string. When a string is plucked, the finger, before 
quitting it, removes it from its position of rest throughout its whole length. A 
discontinuity in the string arises only by its forming a more or less acute angle at 
the place where it wraps itself about the finger or point. The angle is more acute 
for a sharp point than for the finger. Hence the sharp point produces a shriller 
tone with a greater number of high tinkling upper partials, than the finger. But 

* See Appendix V. be struck by a hammer-shaped body. See 

+ [I have here omitted a few words in pp. 77c and 78d'. — Translator.] 
which, by an oversight, the spinet was said to 



CHAP. V. 3. 



MUSICAL TONES OF STRINGS 



75 



in each case the intensity of the prime tone exceeds that of any upper partial. If 
the string is struck with a sharp-edged metallic hammer which rebounds instantly, 
only the one single point struck is directly set in motion. Immediately after the , 
blow the remainder of the string is at rest. It does not move until a wave of de-^ 
flection rises, and runs backwards and forwards over the string. This limitation; 
of the original motion to a single point produces the most abrupt discontinuities, 
and a corresponding long series of upper partial tones, having intensities * in most i 
cases equalling or even surpassing that of the prime. When the hammer is soft 
and elastic, the motion has time to spread before the hammer rebounds. When 
thus struck the point of the string in contact with such a hammer is not set in 
motion with a jerk, but increases gradually and continuously in velocity during the 
contact. The discontinuity of the motion is consequently much less, diminishing 
as the softness of the hammer increases, and the force of the higher upper partial 
tones is correspondingly decreased. IT 

We can easily convince ourselves of the correctness of these statements by 
opening the lid of any pianoforte, and, keeping one of the digitals down with a 
weight, so as to free the string from the damper, plucking the string at pleasure 
with a finger or a point, and striking it with a metallic edge or the pianoforte ham- 
mer itself. The qualities of tone thus obtained will be entirely different. When 
the string is struck or plucked with hard metal, the tone is piercing and tingling, 
and a httle attention enables us to hear a multitude of very high partial tones. 
These disappear, and the tone of the string becomes less bright, but softer, and 
more harmonious, when we pluck the string with the soft finger or strike it with 
the soft hammer of the instrument. We also readily recognise the different loud- 
ness of the prime tone. When we strike with metal, the prime tone is scarcely 
heard and the quality of tone is correspondingly poor. The peculiar quality of 
tone commonly termed poverty^ as opposed to richness, arises from th e upper 
p artials being comparatively too strong, for the prime tonOi The prime tone is^ 
heard best when the string is plucked with a soft finger, which produces a rich and 
yet harmonious quality of tone. The prime tone is not so strong, at least in the 
middle and deeper octaves of the instrument, when the strings are struck with the 
pianoforte hammer, as when they are plucked with the finger. 

This is the reason why it has been found advantageous to cover pianoforte ham- 
mers with thick layers of felt, rendered elastic by much compression. The outer 
layers are the softest and most yielding, the lower are firmer. The surface of the 
hammer comes in contact with the string without any audible impact ; the lower 
layers give the elasticity which throws the hammer back from the string. If you 
remove a pianoforte hammer and strike it strongly on a wooden table or against a 
wall, it rebounds from them like an india-rubber ball. The heavier the hammer 
and the thicker the layers of felt — as in the hammers for the lower octaves — the 
longer must it be before it rebounds from the string. The hammers for the upper 
octaves are lighter and have thinner layers of felt. Clearly the makers of these ^ 
instruments have here been led by practice to discover certain relations of the 
elasticity of the hammer to the best tones of the string. The make of the hammer 
has an immense influence on the quality of tone. Theory shows that those upper , 
partial tones are especially favoured whose periodic time is nearly equal to twice 



* When intensity is here mentioned, it is 
always measured objectively, by the vis viva 
or mechanical equivalent of work of the corre- 
sponding motion. [Mr. Bosanquet (Academy^ 
Deo. 4, 1875, p. 580, col. 1) points out that p. 
IQd, note, and Chap. IX., paragraph S, show 
this measure to be inadmissible, and adds: 
' if we admit that in similar organ pipes 
similar proportions of the wind supplied are 
employed in the production of tone, the me- 
chanical energy of notes of given intensity 
varies inversely as the vibration number,* i.e. 



as the pitch number. Messrs. Preece and 
Stroh, Froc. R. S., vol. xxviii. p. 366, think 
that * loudness does not depend upon amplitude 
of vibration only, but upon the quantity of air 
put in vibration ; and, therefore, there exists 
an absolute physical magnitude in acoustics 
analogous to that of quantity of electricity or 
quantity of heat, and which may be called 
quantity of sound,* and they illustrate this by 
the effect of differently sized discs in their 
automatic phonograph there described. See 
also App. XX. sect. Si. No. 2. — Translator.] 



76 



MUSICAL TONES OP STRINGS. 



PABTI. 



I the time during which the hammer lies on the string, and that, on the other hand, 
those disappear whose periodic time is 6, 10, 14, &c., times as great.* 

It will generally he advantageous, especially for the deeper tones, to eliminate 
from the series of upper partials, those which lie too close to each other to give a 
good compound tone, that is, from about the seventh or eighth onwards. Those 
with higher ordinal numbers are generally relatively weak of themselves. On ex- 
amining a new grand pianoforte by Messrs. Steinway of New York, which was 
remarkable for the evenness of its quality of tone, I find that the damping result- 
ing from the duration of the stroke falls, in the deeper notes, on the ninth or tenth 
partials, whereas in the higher notes, the fourth and fifth partials were scarcely to 
be got out with the hammer, although they were distinctly audible when the string 
was plucked by the nail.f On the other hand upon an elder and much used grand 
piano, which originally showed the principal damping in the neighbourhood of the 

T seventh to the fifth partial for middle and low notes, the ninth to the thirteenth 
partials are now strongly developed. This is probably due to a hardening of the 
hammers, and certainly can only be prejudicial to the quality of tone. Observa- 
tions on these relations can be easily made in the method recommended on p. 526, c. 
Put the point of the finger gently on one of the nodes of the tone of which you 
wish to discover the strength, and then strike the string by means of the digital. 
By moving the finger till the required tone comes out most purely and sounds the 
longest, the exact position of the node can be easily found.* The nodes which lie 
near the striking point of the hammer, are of course chiefly covered by the damper, 
but the corresponding partials are, for a reason to be given presently, relatively 
weak. Moreover the fifth partial speaks well when the string is touched at two- 
fifths of its length from the end, and the seventh at two-sevenths of that length. 
These positions are of course quite free of the damper. Generally we find all the 
partials which arise from the method of striking used, when we keep on striking 

f while the flnger is gradually moved over the length of the string. Touching the 
shorter end of the string between the striking point and the further bridge will thus 
bring out the higher partials from the ninth to the sixteenth, which are musically 
undesirable. 

The method of calculating the strength of the individual upper partials, when 
the duration of the stroke of the hammer is given, will be found further on. 

Secondly as to the place struck. In the last chapter, when verifying Ohm's 
law for the analysis of musical tones by the ear, we remarked that whether strings 
are plucked or struck, those upper partials disappear which have a node at the 
point excited. Conversely ; those partials are comparatively strongest which have 
a maximum displacement at that point. Generally, when the same method of 
striking is successively applied to different points of a string, the individual upper 
partials increase or decrease with the intensity of motion, at the point of excite- 
ment, for the corresponding simple vibrations of the string. The composition of 

^ the musical tone of a string can be consequently greatly varied by merely changing 
the point of excitement. 

Thus if a string be struck in its middle, the second partial tone disappears. 



* [The following paragraph on p. 123 of 
the Ist English edition has been omitted, 
and the passage from *It will generally be 
advantageous,* p 76a, to 'found further on,* 
p. 76c, has been inserted, both in accordance 
with the 4th German edition. — Translator. "[ 

t[As Prof. Helmholtz does not mention 
the striking distance of the hammer, I obtained 
permission from Messrs. Steinway & Sons, at 
their London house, to examine the c, c' and 
c" strings of one of their grand pianos, and 
found the striking distance to be ^j, ^, and 
iV of the length of the string respectively. 
I did not measure the other strings, but I 
observed that the striking distances varied 



several times. I got out the 7th and 9th \ 
harmonic of o, but on account of difficul- - 
ties due to the over-stringing and over-barring 
of the instrument and other circumstances 
I did not pursue the investigation. Mr. A. J. 
Hipkins informs me that on another occasion 
he got out of the c' string, struck at ^ the 
length, the 6th, 7th, 8th, and 9th har- 
monics, as in] the experiments mentioned in 
the next footnote, * the 6th and 7th beautifully 
strong, the 8th and 9th weaker but clear and 
unmistakable.' He struck with the hammer 
always. Observe the 9th harmonic of a string 
struck with a pianoforte hammer at its node, 
or ^ its length. — TS'amlaioT.] 



CHAP. V. 3. 



MUSICAL TONES OF STRINGS. 



77 



because it has a node at that point. But the third partial tone comes out forcibly, 
because as its nodes lie at ^ and | the length of the string from its extremities, 
the string is struck half-way between these two nodes. The fourth partial has its 
nodes at J, | ( = i), and f the length of the string from its extremity. It is not 
heard, because the point of excitement corresponds to its second node. The sixth, 
eighth, and generally the partials with even numbers disappear in the same way, but 
the fifth, seventh, ninth, and the other partials with odd numbers are heard. By 
this disappearance of the evenly numbered partial tones when a string is struck at its 
middle, the quality of its tone becomes peculiar, and essentially different from that 
usually heard from strings. It sounds somewhat hollow or nasal. The experi- 
ment is easily made on any piano when it is opened and the dampers are raised. 
The middle of the string is easily found by trying where the finger must be laid 
to bring out the first upper partial clearly and purely on striking the digital. 

If the string is struck at ^ its length, the third, sixth, ninth, &c., partials If 
vanish. This also gives a certain amount of hollowness, but less than when the 
string is struck in its middle. When the point of excitement approaches the end 
of the string, the prominence of the higher upper partials is favoured at the 
expense of the prime and lower upper partial tones, and the sound of the string 
becomes poor and tinkling. 

In pianofortes, the point struck is about | to J the length of the string from 
its extremity, for the middle part of the instrument. We must therefore assume 
that this place has been chosen because experience has shown it to give the finest 
musical tone, which is most suitable for harmonies. The selection is not due to 
theory. It results from attempts to meet the requirements of artistically trained 
ears, and from the technical experience of two centuries.* This gives particular 



* [As my friend, Mr. A. J. Hipkins, of 
Broadwoods*, author of a paper on the ' History 
of the Pianoforte,* in the Journal of the Society 
of Aria (for Maroh 9, 1888, with additions on 
Sept. 21, 1883), has paid great attention to the 
archeeology of the pianoforte, and from his 
position at Messrs. Broadwoods' has the hest 
means at his disposal for making experiments, 
I requested him to favour me with his views 
upon the suhject of the striking place and 
harmonics of pianoforte strings, and he has 
obliged me with the following observations : — 
* Harpsichords and spinets, which were set 
in vibration by quill or leather plectra, had 
no fixed point for plucking the strings. It 
was generally from about ^ to f of the vibra- 
ting length, and although it had been observed 
by Huyghens and the Antwerp harpsichord- 
maker Jan Couchet, that a difference of quality 
of tone could be obtained by varying the 
plucking place on the same string, which led 
to the so-called lute stop of the 18th century, 
no attempt appears to have been made to gain 
a uniform striking place throughout the scale. 
Thus in the latest improved spinet, a Hitch- 
cock, of early 18th century, in my possession, 
the striking place of the e's varies from A to 
1, and in the latest approved harpsichord, a 
kirkman of 1773, also in my possession, the 
striking distances vary from ^ to ^ and for 
the lute stop from ^to ^ at the string, the 
longest distances in the bass of course, but 
all without apparent rule or proportion. Nor 
was any attempt to gain a uniform striking 
place made in the first pianofortes. Stein of 
Augsburg (the favourite pianoforte-maker of 
Mozart, and of Beethoven in his virtuoso 
time) knew nothing of it, at least in his early 
instruments. The great length of the bass 
strings as carried out on the single belly- 
bridge copied from the harpisohord made a 



reasonable striking place for that part of the 
scale impossible. 

' John Broadwood, about the year 1788, was ^ 
the first to try to equalise the scale in tension 
and striking place. He called in scientific 
aid, and assisted by Signer Cavallo and the 
then Dr. Gray of the British Museum, he 
produced a divided belly-bridge, which shorten- 
ing the too great leng'th of the bass strings, 
permitted the establishment of a striking 
place, which, in intention, should be propor- 
tionate to the length of the string throughout. 
He practically adopted a ninth of the vibrating 
length of the string for his striking place, 
allowing some latitude in the treble. This 
division of the belly-bridge became universally 
adopted, and with it an approximately rational 
striking place. 

* Carl Kiitzing (Das WissenschaftUchs der 
Fortepiano Baukunst, 1844, p. 41) was enabled 
to propound from experience, that ^ of the 
length of the string was the most suitable 
distance in a pianoforte for obtaining the best ^ 
quality of tone from the strings. The love of 
noise or effect has, however, inclined makers to 
shorten distances, particularly in the trebles. 
Kntzing appears to have met with f in some 
instances, and Helmholtz has adopted that 
very exceptional measure for his table on 
p. 79c. I cannot say I have ever met with a 
striking place of this long distance from the 
wrestplank-bridge. The present head of the 
firm of Broadwc^ (Mr. Henry Fowler Broad- 
wood) has arrived at the same conclusions as 
Kiitzing with respect to the superiority of the 
^th distance, and has introduced it in his 
pianofortes. At ^th the hammers have to be 
softer to get a like quality of tone ; an equal 
system of tension being presupposed. 

' According to Young's law, which Helm- 
holtz by experiment confirms, the impact o{ 



78 



MUSICAL TONES OF STRINGS. 



PABT I. 



interest to the investigation of the composition of musical tones for this point of 
excitement. An essential advantage in the choice of this position seems to be 
that the seventh and ninth partial tones disappear or at least become very weak. 
These are the first in the series of partial tones which do not belong to the major 
chord of the prime tone. Up to the sixth partial we have only Octaves, Fifths, 
and major Thirds of the prime tone ; the seventh is nearly a minor Seventh, the 
ninth a major Second of the prime. Hence these will not fit into the major 
chord. Experiments on pianofortes show that when the string is struck by the 
hammer and touched at its nodes, it is easy to bring out the six first partial tones 
(at least on the strings of the middle and lower octaves), but that it is either not 
possible to bring out the seventh, eighth, and ninth at all, or that we obtain at 
best very weak and imperfect results. The difficulty here is not occasioned by the 
incapacity of the string to form such short vibrating sections, for if instead of striking 

IT the digital we pluck the string nearer to its end, and damp the corresponding 
nodes, the seventh, eighth, ninth, nay even the tenth and eleventh partial may be 
clearly and brightly produced. It is only in the upper octaves that the strings are 
too short and stiff to form the high upper partial tones. For these, several instru- 
ment-makers place the striking point nearer to the extremity, and thus obtain a 
brighter and more penetrating tone. The upper partials of these strings, which 
their stiffness renders it difficult to bring out, are thus favoured as against the 
prime tone. A similarly brighter tone, but at the same time a thinner and poorer 
one, can be obtained from the lower strings by placing a bridge nearer the striking 
point, so that the hammer falls at a point less than I of the effective length of the 
string from its extremity. 

While on the one hand the tone can be rendered more tinkling, shrill, and 
acute, by striking the string with hard bodies, on the other hand it can be rendered 
duller, that is, the prime tone may be made to outweigh the upper partials, by 

IT striking it with a soft and heavy hammer, as, for example, a little iron hammer 
covered with a thick sheet of india-rubber. The strings of the lower octaves then 
produce a much fuller but duller tone. To compare the different qualities of tone 
thus produced by using hammers of different constructions, care must be taken 
always to strike the string at the same distance from the end as it is struck by the 
proper hammer of the instrument, as otherwise the results would be mixed up with 
the changes of quality depending on altering the striking point. These circum- 
stances are of course well known to the instrument-makers, because they have 



the hammer aholishea the node of the striking 
place, and with it the partial belonging to it 
throughout the string. I do not find, however, 
that the hammer striking at the ^th elimi- 
nates the 8th partial. It is as audible, when 
touched as an harmonic, as the 9th and higher 
partials. It is easy, on a long string of say 
IT &om 25 to 45 inches, to obtain the series of 
upper partials up to the fifteenth. On a 
string of 45 inches I have obtained as far as 
the 28rd harmonic, the diameter of the wire 
being 1'17 mm. or '07 inches, and the tension 
being 71 kilogrammes or 156*6 lbs. The 
partials diminish in intensity with the re- 
duction of the vibrating length; the 2nd is 
stronger than the Srd, and the 8rd than the 
4th, &c. Up to the 7th a good harmonic note 
can always be brought out. After the 8th, as 
Helmholtz says, the higher partials are all 
comparatively weak and become gradually 
fainter. To strengthen them we may use a 
narrower, harder hammer. To hear them 
with an ordinary hammer it is necessary to 
excite them by a firm blow of the hand upon 
the finger-key and to continue to hold it down. 
They sing out quite clearly and last a very 
sensible time. On removing the stop imme- 



diately after production, they last much longer 
and are much brighter. 

* I do not think the treble strings are from 
shortness and stiffness incapable of forming 
high proper tones. If it were so the notes 
would be of a veiy different quality of tone to 
that which they are found to have. Owing to 
the very acute pitch of these tones our ears 
cannot follow them, but their existence is 
proved by the fact that instrument-makers 
often bring their treble striking place very 
near the wrestplank-bridge in oraer to secure 
a brilliant tone effect, or ring, by the pre- 
pondenmce of these harmonics. 

<The clavichord differs entirely from 
hammer and plectrum keyboard instruments 
in the note being started from the end, the 
tangent (brass pin) which stops the string 
being also the means of exciting the sound. 
But the thin brass wires readily break up into 
segments of short recurrence, the bass wires, 
which are most indistinct, being helped in the 
latest instruments by lighter octave strings, 
which serve to make the fundamental tones 
apparent.' See also the last note, p. 76d\ and 
App. XX. sect. N. — Translator.] 



t 



CHAP. V. 3. 



MUSICAL TONES OF STRINGS. 



79 



themselves selected heavier and softer hammers for the lower, and lighter and ! ' 
harder for the upper octaves. But when we see that they have not given more 
than a certain weight to the hammers and have not increased it sufficiently to 
reduce the intensity of the upper partial tones still further, we feel convinced that 
a musically trained ear prefers that an instrument to he used for rich comhinations 
of harmony should possess a quality of tone which contains upper partials with a 
certain amount of strength. In this respect the composition of the tones of 
pianoforte strings is of great interest for the whole theory of music. In no other 
instrument is there so wide a field for alteration of quality of tone ; in no other, 
then, was a musical ear so unfettered in the choice of a tone that would meet its 
wishes. 

As I have already ohserved, the middle and lower octaves of pianoforte strings 
generally allow the six first partial tones to be clearly produced by striking the 
digital, and the three first of them are strong, the fifth and sixth distinct, but much IT 
weaker. The seventh, eighth, and ninth are eliminated by the position of the 
striking point. Those higher than the ninth are always very weak. For closer 
comparison I subjoin a table in which the intensities of the partial tones of a string 
for different methods of striking have been theoretically calculated from the 
formulsB developed in the Appendix V. The effect of the stroke of a hammer 
depends on the length of time for whi(^ it touches the string. This time is given 
in the table in fractions of the periodic time of the prime tone. To this is added 
a calculation for strings plucked by the finger. The striking point is always 
assumed to be at | of the length of the string from its extremity. 



Theoretical Intensity of the Partial Tones of Strings, 



Striking point at f of the length of the string 



Number of 

the Partial 

Tone 



Excited by 
Plucking 




Struck by a hammer which touches the string for 

f I A I A I A 

of the periodic time of the prime tone 




9' 


C-cf 


100 


100 


189-4 


249 


107-9 


242-9 


17-3 


118-9 





261 


0-5 


1-3 









Struck by a 

perfect hard 

Hammer 



100 
285-7 
867-0 
269-8 
108-4 
18-8 




100 
324-7 
504-9 
604-9 
324-7 
100-0 




IT 



For easier comparison the intensity of the prime tone has been throughout 
assumed as 100. I have compared the calculated intensity of the upper partials 
with their force on the grand pianoforte already mentioned, and found that the 
first series, under f , suits for about the neighbourhood of c". In higher parts of ^ 
the instrument the upper partials were much weaker than in this column. On 
striking the digital for c", I obtained a powerful second partial and an almost in- 
audible third. The second column, marked ^j^, corresponded nearly to the region 
of g\ the second and third partials were very strong, the fourth partial was weak. 
The third column, inscribed -j^^^, corresponds with the deeper tones from c' down- 
wards ; here the four first partials are strong, and the fifth weaker. In the next 
column, under ^^, the third partial tone is stronger than the second ; there was 
no corresponding note on the pianoforte which I examined. With a perfectly hard 
hammer the third and fourth partials have the same strength, and are stronger 
than all the others. It results from the calculations in the above table that piano- 1' 
forte tones in the middle and lower octaves have their fundamental tone weaker 
than the first, or even than the two first upper partials. This can also be con- 
firmed by a comparison with the effects of plucked strings. For the latter the 
second partial is weaker than the first; and it will be found that the prime 



80 MUSICAL TONES OF BOWED INSTRUMENTS. pakt l 

tone is much more distinot in the tones of pianoforte strings when pluoked by the 
finger, than when struck by the hammer. 

Although, as is shown by the mechanism of the upper octaves on pianofortes, 

. it is possible to produce a compound tone in which the prime is predominant, 
makers have preferred arranging the method of striking the lower strings in such 
a way as to preserve the five or six first partials distinctly, and to give the second 
and third greater intensity than the prime. 

Thirdly, as regards the thickness and material of the strings. Very rigid 
strings will not form any very high upper partials, because they cannot readily 
assume inflections in opposite directions within very short sections. This is easily 
observed by stretching two strings of dififerent thicknesses on a monochord and 
endeavouring to produce their high upper partial tones. We always succeed much 
better with the thinner than with the thicker string. To produce very high upper 

f partial tones, it is preferable to use strings of extremely fine wire, such as gold lace 
makers employ, and when they are excited in a suitable manner, as for example by 
plucking or striking with a metal point, these high upper partials may be heard in 
the compound itself. The numerous high upper partials which lie close to each 
other in the scale, give that peculiar high inharmonious noise which we are 
accustomed to call ' tinkling '. From the eighth partial tone upwards these simple 
tones are less than a whole Tone apart, and from the fifteenth upwards less than a 
Semitone. They consequently form a series of dissonant tones. On a string of 
the finest iron wire, such as is used in the manufacture of artificial flowers, 700 
centimetres (22*97 feet) long, I was able to isolate the eighteenth partial tone. The 
peculiarity of the tones of the zither depends on the presence of these tinkling 
upper partials, but the series does not extend so far as that just mentioned, because 
the strings are shorter. 

Strings of gut are much lighter than metal strings of the same compactness, 

% and hence produce higher partial tones. The difference of their musical quality 
depends partly on this circumstance and partly on the inferior elasticity of the gut, 
which damps their partials, especially their higher partials, much more rapidly. 
The tone of plucked cat-gut strings {guitar, harp) is consequently much less 
tinkling than that of metal strings. 

4. MtLsical Tones of Bowed Instruments. 

No complete mechanical theory can yet be given for the motion of strings 
excited by the violin-bow, because the mode in which the bow affects the motion 
of the string is unknown. But by applying a peculiar method of observation, 
proposed in its essential features by the French physicist Lissajous, I have found 
it possible to observe the vibrational form of individual points in a violin string, 
and from this observed form, which is comparatively very simple, to calculate the 
% whole motion of the string and the intensity of the upper partial tones. 

Look through a hand magnifying glass consisting of a strong convex lens, at 
any small bright object, as a grain of starch reflecting a flame, and appearing as a 
fine point of light. Move the lens about while the point of light remains at rest, 
and the point itself will appear to move. In the apparatus I have employed, which 
is shown in fig. 22 opposite, this lens is fastened to the end of one prong of the 
tuning-fork G, and marked L. It is in fact a combination of two achromatic 
lenses, like those used for the object-glasses of microscopes. These two lenses 
may be used alone as a doublet, or be combined with others. When more 
magnifying power is required, we can introduce behind the metal plate A A, which 
carries the fork, the tube and eye-piece of a microscope, of which the doublet then 
forms the object-glass. This instrument may be called a vibration microscope. 
When it is so arranged that a fixed luminous point may be clearly seen through it, 
and the fork is set in vibration, the doublet L moves periodically up and down in 
pendular vibration. The observer, however, appears to see the luminous point 




INSTRUMENTS. 81 

mooeed each other 90 rapidly that 
Dg the time of a whole vibration, 
straight line, increasing in length 

be seen, is then fastened to the 

such a way that the grain 

the doublet moveB up and down 

once, the observer sees the real 

with its apparent vertical motion, 

' lear motion. The field of vision 

Uteady and nnchangeable bright 



Wlu 




.tions of the grain of starch and ^ 

itly two or three or four timea as 

lOUB point passes over exactly the 

(•vibrations. If these ratios of the 

'onrvea alter slowly, and the effect 

of a transparent cylinder which 

int of the apparent curves is not 

them in different positions. But 

' body and of the fork differs too 



electro-magnet by which the foik Is 
wnst&nt uniform vibration on passing 
ittant electrical currents through its 



b, as will be described i 



82 



MUSICAL TONES OP BOWED INSTRUMENTS. 



FA&T I. 



much £rom one expressible by small whole nombers, the motion of the curve is too 
rapid for the eye to follow it, and all becomes confusion. 

If the vibration microscope has to be used for observing the motion of a violin 
string, the Inminons point must be attached to that string. This is done by first 
blackening the required spot on the string with ink, and when it is dry, rubbing it 
over with wax, and powdering this with starch so that a few grains remain sticking. 
The violin is then fixed with its strings in a vertical direction opposite the micro- 
scope, so that the luminous reflection from one of the grains of starch can be 
clearly seen. The bow is drawn across the strings in a direction parallel to the 
prongs of the fork. Every point in the string then moves horizontally, and on 
setting the fork in motion at the same time, the observer sees the peculiar 
vibrational curves already mentioned. For the purposes of observation I used the 
a' string, which I tuned a little higher, as b*\^, so that it was exactly two Octaves 
IT higher than the tuning fork of the microscope, which sounded B\^, 

In fig. 23 are shovm the resulting vibrational curves as seen in the vibration 
microscope. The straight horizontal lines in the figures, atoa, btob, ctoc 

Fig. 23. 















show the apparent path of the observed luminous point, before it had itself been 
set in vibration ; the curves and zigzags in the same figures, show the apparent 
path of the luminous point when it also was made to move. By their side, in<A, 
B, G, the same vibrational forms are exhibited according to the methods used in 
Chapters I. and II., the lengths of the horizontal line being directly proportional 
to the corresponding lengths of time, whereas in figures a to a, b to b, c to c, the 
horizontal lengths are proportional to the eoDCursions of the vibrating microscope. 
AT A, and a to a, show the vibrational curves for a tuning-fork, that is for a simple 
pendular vibration ; B and b to b those of the middle of a violin string in unison 
with the fork of the vibration microscope ; G and c, c, those for a string which was 
tuned an Octave higher. We may imagine the figures a to a, b to b, and c to c, to 
be formed from the figures A, B, G, by supposing the surface on which these are 
drawn to be wrapped round a transparent cylinder whose circumference is of the 
same length as the horizontal line. The curve drawn upon the surface of the 
cylinder must then be observed from such a point, that the horizontal line which 
when wrapped round the cylinder forms a circle, appears perspectively as a single 
straight line. The vibrational curve A will then appear in the forms a to a, B in 
the forms b to b, C in the forms c to c. When the pitch of the two vibrating 
bodies is not in an exact harmonic ratio, this imaginary cylinder on which the 
vibrational curves are drawn, appears to revolve so that the forms a to a, &c., are 
assumed in succession. 

It is now easy to rediscover the forms A, B, G, from the forms a to a, b to b, 



CHAP. V. 4. 



MUSICAL TONES OF BOWED INSTRUMENTS. 



83 



and c to c, and as the former give a more intelligible image of the motion of the 
string than the latter, the ourves, which are seen as if they were traced on the 
surface of a cylinder, will be drawn as if their trace had been unrolled from the 
cylinder into a plane figure like A, B, G. The meaning of our vibrational curves 
will then precisely correspond to the similar curves in preceding chapters. When 
four vibrations of the violin string correspond to one vibration of the fork (as in 
our experiments, where the fork gave B\^ and the string b'\^, p. 82a), so that 
four waves seem to be traced on the surface of the imaginary cylinder, and when 
moreover they are made to rotate slowly and are thus viewed in different positions, 
it is not at all difficult to draw them from immediate inspection as if they had 
been rolled off on to a plane, for the middle jags have then nearly the same 
appearance on the cyUnder as if they were traced on a plane. 

The figures 23 B and 23 C (p. 826), immediately give the vibrational forms for 
the middle of a violin string, when the bow bites well, and the phme tone of the ^ 
string is fully and powerfully produced. It is easily seen that these vibrational 
forms are essentially different from that of a simple vibration (fig. 23, A). When 
the point is taken nearer the ends of the string the vibrational figure is shown in 
fig. 24, A, and the two sections afi, fiy, of any wave, are to one another as the two 
sections of the string which lie on either side of the observed point. In the figure 

Fia. 24. 




this ratio is 3 : 1, the point being at ^ the length of the string from its extremity. 
Close to the end of the string the form is as in fig. 24, B. The short lengths of 
line in the figure have been made faint because the corresponding motion of the «r 
luminous point is so rapid that they often become invisible, and the thicker lengths 
are alone seen.* 

These figures show that every point of the string between its two extremities 
vibrates with a constant velocity. For the middle point, the velocity of ascent is 
equal to that of descent. If the violin bow is used near the right end of the 
string descending, the velocity of descent on the right half of the string is less 
than that of ascent, and the more so the nearer to the end. On the left half of 
the string the converse takes place. At the place of bowing the velocity of descent 
appears to be equal to that of the violin bow. During the greater part of each 
vibration the string here clings to the bow, and is carried on by it ; then it suddenly 
detaches itself and rebounds, whereupon it is seized by other points in the bow and 
again carried forward, t 

Our present purpose is chiefly to determine the upper partial tones. The 
vibrational forms of the individual points of the string being known, the intensity «]- 
of each of the partial tones can be completely calculated. The necessary mathe- 
matical formulse are developed in Appendix YI. The following is the result of the 
calculation. When a string excited by a violin bow speaks well, all the upper 
partial tones which can be formed by a string of its degree of rigidity, are present, 
and their intensity diminishes as their pitch increases. The amplitude and the 
intensity of the second partial is one-fourth of that of the prime tone, that of the 



* [Dr. Huggins, F.B.S., on experimenting, 
finds it probfwle that under the bow, the 
relative velocity of descent to that of the 
rebound of the string, or ascent, is influenced 
by the tension of the hairs of the bow. — 
TransUUor.] 

t These facts suffice to determine the 
complete motion of bowed strings. See 
Appendix VI. A much simpler method of 
observing the vibrational form of a violin 



string has been given by Herr Clem. Neumann 
in the Proceedings [Sitttungsberichte) of the 
L and B, Academy at Vienna, mathematical 
and physical class, vol. Ixi. p. 89. He fastened 
bits of wire in the form of a comb to the bow 
itself. On looking through this grating at 
the string the observer sees a system of 
rectilinear zigzag lines. The conclusions as 
to the mode of motion of the string agree 
vrith those given above. 

o2 



84 



MUSICAL TONES OF BOWED INSTRUMENTS. 



PA&T I. 



Fia. 26. 



third partial a ninth, that of the fourth a sixteenth, and so on. This is the same 
scale of intensity as for the partial tones of a string plucked in its middle, with 
this exception, that in the latter case the evenly numbered partials all disappear, 
whereas they are all present when the bow is used. The upper partials in the 
compound tone of a violin are heard easily and will be found to be strong in sound 
if they have been first produced as so-called harmonics on the string, by bowing 
lightly while gently touching a node of the required partial tone. The strings of 
a violin will allow the harmonics to be produced as high as the sixth partial tone 
with ease, and with some difficulty even up to the tenth. The lower tones speak 
best when the string is bowed at from one-tenth to one-twelfth the length of the 
vibrating portion of the string from its extremity. For the higher harmonics 
where the sections are smaller, the strings must be bowed at about one-fourth or 
one-sixth of their vibrating length from the end.* 
^ The prime in the compound tones of bowed instruments is comparatively more 
powerful than in those produced on a pianoforte or guitar by striking or plucking 
the strings near to their extremities ; the first upper partials are comparatively 
weaker ; but the higher upper partials from the sixth to about the tenth are much 
more distinct, and give these tones their cutting character. 

The fundamental form of the vibrations of a violin string just described, is, 
when the string speaks well, tolerably independent of the place of bowing, at least 
in all essential features. It does not in any respect alter, like the vibrational form 
of struck or plucked strings, according to the position of the point excited. Yet 
there are certain observ- 
able differences of the 
vibrational figure which 
depend upon the bowing 
point. Little crumples are 
^usually perceived on the 
lines of the vibrational 
figure, as in fig. 25, which 
increase in breadth and height the further the bow is removed from the extremity 
of the string. When we bow at a node of one of the higher upper partials 
which is near the bridge, these crumples are simply reduced by the absence of 
that part of the normal motion of the string which depends on the partial tones 
having a node at that place. When the observation on the vibrational form is 
made at one of the other nodes belonging to the deepest tone whicb is elimi- 
nated, none of these crumples are seen. Thus if the string is bowed at ifth, 
or fths, or fths, or jths, &c., of its length from the bridge, the vibrational 
figure is simple, as in fig. 24 (p. 835). But if we observe between two nodes, 
the crumples appear as in fig. 25. Variations in the quality of tone partly 
depend upon this condition. When the violin bow is brought too near the 
«- finger board, the end of which is ^th the length of the string from the bridge, 
the 5th or 6th partial tone, which is generally distinctly audible, will be absent. 
The tone is thus rendered duller. The usual place of bowing is at about ^^^th 
of the length of the string ; for piano passages it is somewhat further from 
the bridge and for forte somewhat nearer to it. If the bow is brought near the 
bridge, and at the same time but lightly pressed, another alteration of quality 
occurs, which is readily seen on the vibrational figure. A mixture is formed of 




* [The position of the finger for producing 
the harmonic is often slightly different from 
that theoretically assigned. Dr. Huggins, 
F.R.S., kindly tried for me the poisition of 
the Octave harmonic on the four strings of 
his Stradivari, a mark with Chinese white 
being made under his finger on the finger 
board. Result, 1st and 4th string exact, 
2nd string 8 mm., and 3rd string 5 mm. too 



near the nut, out of 165 mm. the actual 
half length of the strings. These differences 
must therefore be due to some imperfec- 
tions of the strings themselves. Dr. Huggins 
finds that there is a space of a quarter of 
an inch at any point of which the Octave 
harmonic may be brought out, but the quality 
of tone is best at the points named above. — 
Translator.] 



CHAP. V. 4. MUSICAL TONES OF BOWED INSTRUMENTS. 85 

the prime tone and first harmonic of the string. By light and rapid bowing, 
namely at about ^\j^th of the length of the string from the bridge, we sometimes 
obtain the upper Octave of the prime tone by itself, a node being formed in the 
middle of the string. On bowing more firmly the prime tone immediately sounds. 
Intermediately the higher Octave may mix with it in any proportion. This is 
immediately recognised in the vibrational figure. Fig. 26 gives the corresponding 
series of forms. It is seen how a fresh crest appears on the longer side of the 
front of a wave, jutting out at first slightly, then more strongly, till at length the 
crests of the new waves are as high as those of the old, and then the vibrational 
number has doubled, and the pitch has passed into the Octave above. The quality 
of the lowest tone of the string is rendered softer and brighter, but less full and 
powerful when the intermixture commences. It is interesting to observe the 
vibrational figure while little changes are made in the style of bowing, and note 
how the resulting slight changes of quality are immediately rendered evident by IT 
very distinct changes in the vibrational figure itself. 

The vibrational forms just described may be maintained in a uniformly steady 
and unchanged condition by carefully uniform bowing. The instrument has then 
an uninterrupted and pure musical quality of tone. Any scratching of the bow is 
immediately shown by sudden jumps, or discontinuous displacements and changes 
in the vibrational figure. If the scratching continues, the eye has no longer time . 
to perceive a regular figure. The scratching noises of a violin bow must therefore | 
be regarded as irregular interruptions of the normal vibrations of the string, 
making them to recommence from a new starting point. Sudden jumps in the • 

Fio. 26. 




IT 



vibrational figure betray every little stumble of the bow which the ear alone would, 
scarcely observe. Inferior bowed instruments seem to be distinguished from good 
ones by the frequency of such greater or smaller irregularities of vibration. On 
the string of my monochord, which was only used for the occasion as a bowed 
instrument, great neatness of bowing was required to preserve a steady vibrational 
figure lasting long enough for the eye to apprehend it ; and the tone was rough in 
quality, accompanied by much scratching. With a very good modem violin made 
by Bausch it was easier to maintain the steadiness of the vibrational figure for 
some time ; but I succeeded much better with an old Italian violin of Guadanini, 
which was the first one on which I could keep the vibrational figure steady enough ^ 
to count the crumples. This great uniformity of vibration is evidently the reason ' ' 
of the purer tone of these old instruments, since every little irregularity is imme- 
diately felt by the ear as a roughness or scratchiness in the quality of tone. 

An appropriate structure of the instrument, and wood of the most perfect 
elasticity procurable, are probably the important conditions for regular vibrations 
of the string, and when these are present, the bow can be easily made to work 
uniformly. This allows of a pure flow of tone, undisfigured by any roughness. 
On the other hand, when the vibrations are so uniform the string can be more 
vigorously attacked with the bow. Good instruments consequently allow of a much 
more powerful motion of the string, and the whole intensity of their tone can be 
communicated to the air without diminution, whereas the friction caused by any 
imperfection in the elasticity of the wood destroys part of the motion. Much of 
the advantages of old violins may, however, also depend upon their age, and espe- 
cially their long use, both of which cannot but act favourably on the elasticity of 



86 



MUSICAL TONES OF BOWED INSTRUMENTS. 



PAST L 



the wood. But the art of bowing is evidently the most important condition of all. 
How delicately this must be cultivated to obtain certainty in producing a very 
perfect quality of tone and its different varieties, cannot be more clearly demon- 
strated than by the observation of vibrational figures. It is also well known that 
great players can bring out full tones from even indifferent instruments. 

The preceding observations and conclusions refer to the vibrations of the strings 
of the instrument and the intensity of their upper partial tones, solely in so far as 
they are contained in the compound vibrational movement of the string. But 
partial tones of different pitches are not equally well commimicated to the air, and 
hence do not strike the ear of the listener with precisely the same degrees of 
intensity as those they possess on the string itself. They are communicated to 
the air by means of the sonorous body of the instrument. As we have had 
already occasion to remark, vibrating strings do not directly communicate any 

IT sensible portion of their motion to the air. The vibrating strings of the violin, 
in the first place, agitate the bridge over which they are stretched. This stands 
on two feet over the most mobile part of the * belly ' between the two */ holes '. 
One foot of the bridge rests upon a comparatively firm support, namely the ' sound- 
post,' which is a solid rod inserted between the two plates, back and belly, of the 
instrument. It is only the other leg which agitates the elastic wooden plates, and 
through them the included mass of air.^ 

An inclosed mass of air, like that of the violin, vi61a, and violoncello, bounded 
by elastic plates, has certain proper tones which may be evoked by blowing 
across the openings, or '/ holes '. The violin thus treated gives o' according to 
Savart, who examined instruments made by Stradivari (Stradiuarius).f Zam- 
miner found the same tone constant on even imperfect instruments. For the 
violoncello Bavart found on blowing over the holes F, and Zamminer G.J Ac- 
cording to Zamminer the sound-box of the vi61a (tenor) is tuned to be a Tone 

IT deeper than that of the violin. § On placing the ear against the back of a violin 
and playing a scale on the pianoforte, some tones will be found to penetrate the 
ear with more force than others, owing to the resonance of the instrument. On a 



*[Thi8 account is not quite sufficient. 
Neither leg of the bridge rests exactly on 
the sound-post, because it is found that this 
position materially injures the quality of tone. 
The sound-post is a little in the rear of the 
leg of the bridge on the b" string side. The 
position of the sound-post with regard to the 
bridge has to be adjusted for each individual 
instrument. Dr. William Hugffins, F.B.S., in 
his paper * On the Function of the Sound-post, 
and on the Proportional Thickness of the 
Strings of the Violin,' read May 24, 1888, 
Proceedings of the Royal Society, vol. xxxt. 
^ pp. 241-248, has experimentally investigated 
the whole axition of the sound-post, and finds 
that its main function is to convey vibrations 
from the belly to the back of the violin, in 
addition to those conveyed by the sides. The 
(apparently ornamental) cuttings in the bridge 
of the violin, sift the two sets of vibrations, 
set up by the bowed string at right angles to 
each other and ' allow those only or mainly to 
pass to the feet which would be efficient in 
setting the body of the instrument into vibra- 
tion*. As the peculiar shape of the instru- 
ment rendered strewing of sand unavailable. 
Dr. Huggins investigated the vibrations by 
means of a * touch rod/ consisting of * a small 
round stick of straight grained deal a few 
inches long; the forefinger is placed on one 
end and the other end is put lightly in contact 
with the vibrating surface. The finger soon 
becomes very sensitive to small differences of 



agitation transmitted by the rod.* In short, 
the touch rod acts as a sound- post to the 
finger. The place of least vibration of the 
belly is exactly over the sound-post and of the 
back at the point under the sound-post. On 
removing the sound-post, or covering its ends 
with a sheet of india-rubber, which did not 
diminish the support, the tone was poor and 
thin. But an external wooden clamp connect- 
ing belly and back in the places where the 
sound post touches them, restored the tone. — 
Translator.'] 

f [Zamminer, Die Musik, 1855, vol. L 
p. 87, says c' of 256 vib. — Translator,] 

t [Zamminer, ibid. p. 41, and adds that 
judging from the violin the resonance should 
be Fjj^— Translator.] 

§ [The passage referred to has not been 
found. But Zamminer says, p. 40, *The 
length of the box of a violin is 18 Par. inches, 
and of the vi6la 14 inches 5 lines. Exactly 
in inverse ratio stand the pitch numbers 
470 (a misprint for 270 most probably) and 
241, which were found by blowing over the 
wind-holes of the two instruments.* Now the 
ratio IS : 14^ gives 182 cents, and the ratio 
241: 270 gives 197 cents, which are very 
nearly, though not * exactly * the same. This, 
however, makes the resonance of the violin 
270 vib. and not 256 vib., and agrees with the 
next note. I got a good resonance with a fork 
of 268 vib. from Dr. Huggins*s violoncello by 
Nicholas about a.d. 1792. — lyanslator.] 



CHAP. V. 4 



MUSICAL TONES OF BOWED INSTRUMENTS. 



87 



yiolin made by Bausch two tones of greatest resonance were thus discovered, one 
between c* and c'tt [between 264 and 280 vib.], and the other between a' and V\} 
[between 440 and 466 vib.]. For a yi<51a (tenor) I found the two tones about a 
Tone deeper, which agrees with Zamminer's calculation.^ 

The consequence of this peculiar relation of resonance is that those tones of 
the strings which lie near the proper tones of the inclosed body of air, must be 
proportionably more reinforced. This is clearly perceived on both the violin and 
violonceUo, at least for the lowest proper tone, when the corresponding notes are 
produced on the strings. They sound particularly full, and the prime tone of these 
compounds is especially prominent. I think that I heard this also for a' on the 
violin, which corresponds to its higher proper tone. 

Since the lowest tone on the violin is g, the only upper partials of its musical 
tones which can be somewhat reinforced by the resonance of the higher proper 
tone of its inclosed body of air, are the higher octaves of its three deepest notes. IT 
But the prime tones of its higher notes will be reinforced more than their upper 
partials, because these prime tones are more nearly of the same pitch as the 
proper tones of the body of air. This produces an efifect similar to that of the con- 
struction of the hammer of a piano, which favours the upper partials of the deep 
notes, and weakens those of the higher notes. For the violoncello, where the lowest 
string gives C, the stronger proper tone of the body of air is, as on the violin, a 
Fourth or a Fifth higher that the pitch of the lowest string. There is consequently 
a similar relation between the favoured and unfavoured partial tones, but all of 



/ f 



*[Thiou^ the kindness of Dr. Huggins, 
F.K.S., the Bey. H. B. Haweis, and the violin- 
makers, Messrs. Hart, Hill & Withers, I was 
in 1880 enahled to examine the pitch of the 
resonance of some fine old violins bv Dniffo- 
prugoar (Swiss Tyrol, Bologna, and Lyons 
1510^1538), Amati (Cremona 1696-1684), Bug- 
gieri (Cremona 1668-1720), Stradivari (Cre- 
mona 1644-1737), Giuseppe Gameri (known as 
* Joseph,' Cremona 1688-1745), Lnpot (France 
1750-1820). The method adopted was to hold 
taning-forks, of which the exact pitch had 
been determined by Scheibler's forks, in sacces- 
sion over the widest part of the / hole on the 
g string side of the violin (furthest from the 
sound-post) and observe what fork excited the 
maximum resonance. My forks form a series 
proceeding by 4 vib. in a second, and hence I 
could only tell the pitch within 2 vib., and it 
was often extremely difficult to decide on the 
fork which gave the best resonance. By far 
the strongest resonance lay between 268 and 
272 vib., but one early Stradivari (1696) had a 
fine resonance at 264 vib. There was also a 
secondary but weaker meucimum resonance at 
about 252 vib. The 256 vib. was generally 
decidedly inferior. Hence we may take 270 
vib. as the primary maximum, and 252 vib. as 
the secondary. The first corresponds to the 
highest English concert pitch c" — 540 vib., 
now used in London, and agrees with the 
lower resonance of Bausch's instrument men- 
tioned in the text. The second, which is 120 
cents, or rather more than an equal Semitone 
fiatter, gives the pitch which my researches 
show was common over all Europe at the 
time (see App. XX. sect. H.). But although 
the low pitch was prevalent, a high pitch, a 
great Semitone (117 ct.) higher, was also in 
use as a ' chamber pitch '. A violin of Mazzini 
of Brescia (1560-1640) belonging to the eldest 
daughter of Mr. Vernon Lushington, Q.C., had 
the same two maximum resonances, the higher 
being decidedly the superior. I did not ex- 



amine for the higher or a' pitches named in 
the text. Mr. Healey (of the Science and Art 
Department, South Kensington) thought this 
violin (supposed to be an Amati) sounded best 
at the low pitch c' ' — 504. Subsequently, I ex- 
amined a fine instrument, bearing inside it the 
label *Petru8 Guamerius Cremonensis fecit, 
MantuflB sub titulo S. Theresiae, anno 1701,* in 
the possession of Mr. A. J. Hipkins, who knew % 
it to be genuine. I tried this with a series 
of forks, proceeding by differences of about 
4 vibrations from 240 to 560. It was surprising 
to find that every fork was to a certain extent 
reinforced, that is, in no case was the tone 
quenched, and in no case was it reduced in 
strength. But at 260 vib. there was a good, 
and at 264 a better resonance; perhaps 262 
may therefore be taken as the best. There 
waA no secondary low resonance, but there 
were two higher resonances, one about 472, 
(although 468 and 476 were also good), and 
another at 520 (although 524 and 528 were 
also good). As this sheet was passing throush 
the press I had an opportunity of trying the 
resonance of Dr. Huggins's Stradivari of 1708, 
figured in Grove's Dictionary of Music^ iii. 
728, as a specimen of the best penod of Stradi- 
vari's work. The result was essentially thefl* 
same as the last ; every fork was more or less 
reinforced ; there was a subordinate maximum 
at 252 vib. ; a better at from 260 to 268 vib. ; 
very slight maxima at 812, 848, 884, 412, 420, 
428 (the last of which was the best, but was 
only a fair reinforcement), 472, to 480, but 520 
was decidedlv best, and 540 good. No one 
fork was reinforced to the extent it would have 
been on a resonator properly tuned to it, but 
no one note was deteriorated. Dr. Huggins says 
that * the strong feature of this violin is the 
great equality of all four strings and the per- 
sistence of the same fine quality of tone 
throughout the entire rauge of the instru- 
ment *. — Translaior,'\ 






OE FLDK PIPES. rtxt l 

^kjBlriolin. On tbe other hand, the most 
ooiresponding oearly with b', do Dot 




IT 3.' Ii^»Jk^. 






_ the bottles previously described, the 
^Ovll*^ have B. sufficiently narrow opening, 

AIbo thej take no notice oF the 
. . diunetera and depths of the pipes, 
the foice of the wind, ot ol the tempera- 



CHAP. V. 5. 



MUSICAL TONES OP FLUTE OR FLUE PIPES. 



89 



furnished with somewhat projecting sharp edges, by directing a thin flat stream of 
air across the opening and against its edges.* 

The motion of air that takes place in the inside of organ pipes, corresponds to 
a system of plane waves which are reflected backwards and forwards between the 
two ends of the pipe. At the stopped end of a cylindrical pipe the reflexion of 
every wave that strikes it is very perfect, so that the reflected wave has the same 
intensity as it had before reflexion. In any train of waves moving in a given 
direction, the velocity of the oscillating molecules in the condensed portion of the 
wave takes place in the same direction as that of the propagation of the waves, and 
in the rarefied portion in the opposite direction. But at the stopped end of a pipe 
its cover does not allow of any forward motion of the molecules of air in the 
direction of the length of the pipe. Hence the incident and reflected wave at this 
place combine so as to excite opposite velocities of oscillation of the molecules of 
air, and consequently by their superposition the velocity of the molecules of air at IT 
the cover is destroyed. Hence it follows that the phases of pressure in both will 
agree, because opposite motions of oscillation and opposite propagation, result in 
accordant pressure. 

Hence at the stopped end there is no motion, but great alteration of pressure. 
The reflexion of the wave takes place in such a manner that the phase of conden- 
sation remains unaltered, but the direction of the motion of oscillation is reversed. 

The contrary takes place at the open end of pipes, in which is also included the 
opening of their mouths. At an open end where the air of the pipe communi- 
cates freely with the great outer mass of air, no sensible condensation can take 
place. In the explanation usually given of the motion of air in pipes, it is assumed 
that both condensation and rarefaction vanish at the open ends of pipes, which is 
approximately but not exactly correct. If there were exactly no alteration of 
density at that place, there would be complete reflexion of every incident wave 
at the open ends, so that an equally large reflected wave would be generated with IT 
an opposite state of density, but the direction of oscillation of the molecules of 
air in both waves would agree. The superposition of such an incident and such a 



ture of the air. The following are adapted 
from the rules given by M. Gavaill6-Goll, the 
celebrated French organ-builder, in Comptes 
BenduSf 1860, p. 176, supposing the tempera- 
ture to be 69° F. or 15° C, and the pressure of 
the wind to be about 8^ inches, or 8 centi- 
metres (meaning that it will support a column 
of water of that height in the wind gauge). 
The pitch numbers, for double vibrations, are 
found by dividing 20,080 when the dimensions 
are given in inches, and 510,000 when in 
millimetres by the following numbers : (1) for 
cylindrical open pipes, 3 times the length 
added to 5 times the diameter ; (2) for cylirujbi- 
ceU stopped pipes, 6 times the length added to 
10 times the diameter; (3) for square open 
pipes, 3 times the length added to 6 times the 
depth (clear internal distance from mouth to 
back) ; (4) for square stopped pipes, 6 times the 
length added to 12 times the depth. 

This rule is always sufficiently accurate for 
cutting organ pipes to their approximate 
length, and piercing thom to bring out the 
Octave harmonic, and has long been used for 
these purposes in M. Gavaill^-CoU's factory. 
The rule is not so safe for the square wooden 
as for the cylindrical metal pipes. The pitch 
of a pipe of known dimensions ought to be 
first ascertained by other means. Then this 
pitch number multiplied by the divisors in (3) 
and (4) should be used in place of the 20,080 
or 610,000 of the rule, for all similar pipes. 

As to strength of wind, as pressure varies 



from 2f to 3^ inches, the pitoh number 
increases by about 1 in 800, but as pressure 
varies from 3^ to 4 inches, the pitch number 
increflbses by about 1 in 440, the whole increase 
of pressure from 2f to 4 inches increases the 
pitch number by 1 in 180. 

For temperature, I found by numerous 
observations at very different temperatures 
that the following practical rule is sufficient 
for reducing the pitch number observed at one 
temperature to that due to another. It is not 
quite accurate, for the air blown from the 
bellows is often lower than the external tem- 
perature. Let P be the pitch number observed f 
at a given temperature, and d the difference of 
temperature in degrees Fahr. Then the pitch 
number is P x (1 + -00104 dj according as the 
temperature is higher or lower. The practical 
operation is as follows : supposing P = 628, and 
d = 14 increase of temperature. To 628 add 
4 in 100, or 21-12, giving 549-12. Divide by 
1000' to 2 places of decimals, giving -55. 
Multiply hyd= 14, giving 7*70. Adding this to 
628, we get 585*7 for the pitch number at the 
new temperature. — Translator. ] 

*[Here the passage from * These edges,* 
p. 140, to * resembling a violin,' p. 141 of the 
Ist English edition, has been omitted, and the 
passage from 'The motion of air,' p. 89a, 
to * their comers are rounded off,' p. 936, has 
been inserted in accordance with the 4th 
German edition. — Translator.] 



90 



MUSICAL TONES OF FLUTE OR FLUE PIPES. 



PAKT I. 



reflected wave would indeed leave the state of density unaltered at the open ends, 
but would occasion great velocity in the oscillating molecules of air. 

In reality the assumption mside explains the essential phenomena of organ pipes. 
Consider first a pipe with two open ends. On our exciting a wave of condensation 
at one end, it runs forward to the other end, is there reflected as a wave of rare- 
faction, runs back to the first end, is here again reflected with another alteration of 
phase, as a wave of condensatioUp and then repeats the same path in the same way 
a second time. This repetition of the same process therefore occurs, after the 
wave in the tube has passed once forwards and once backwards, that is twice through 
the whole length of the tube. The time required to do this is equal to double the 
length of the pipe divided by the velocity of sound. This is the duration of the 
vibration of the deepest tone which the pipe can give. 

Suppose now that at the time when the wave begins its second forward and 
V backward journey, a second impulse in the same direction is given, say by a vibra- 
ting tuning-fork. The motion of the air will then receive a reinforcement, which 
will constantly increase, if the fresh impulses take place in the same rhythm as the 
forward and backward progression of the waves. 

Even if the returning wave does not coincide with the first following similar 
impulse of the tuning-fork, but only with the second or third or fourth and so on, 
the motion of the air will be reinforced after every forward and backward passage. 

A tube open at both ends will therefore serve as a resonator for tones whose 
pitch number is equal to the velocity of sound (332 metres)* divided by twice the 
length of the tube, or some multiple of that number. That is to say, the tones of 
strongest resonance for such a tube will, as in strings, form the complete series of 
harmonic upper partials of its prime. 

The case is somewhat different for pipes stopped at one end. If at the open 
end, by means of a vibrating tuning-fork, we excite an impulse of condensation 
IT which propagates itself along the tube, it will run on to the stopped end, will be 
there reflected as a wave of condensation, return, will be again reflected at the 
open end with altered phase as a wave of rarefaction, and only after it has been 
again reflected at the stopped end with a similar phase, and then once more at the 
open end with an altered phase as a condensation, will a repetition of the process 
ensue, that is to say, not till after it has traversed the length of the pipe four times. 
Hence the prime tone of a stopped pipe has twice as long a period of vibration as an 
open pipe of the same length. That is to say, the stopped pipe will be an Octave 
deeper than the open pipe. If, then, after this double forward and backward passage, 
the first impulse is renewed, there will arise a reinforcement of resonance. 

Partials f of the prime tone can also be reinforced, but only those which are 
unevenly numbered. For since at the expiration of half the period of vibration, 
the prime tone of the wave in the tube renews its path with an opposite phase of 
density, only such tones can be reinforced as have an opposite phase at the expira- 
% tion of half the period of vibration. But at this time the second partial has just 
completed a whole vibration, the fourth partial two whole vibrations, and so on. 



*[Thi8 is 1089-8 feet in a second, which 
is the mean of several observations in free 
air ; it is usual, however, in England to take 
the whole number 1090 feet, at freezing. At 
60° F. it is about 1120 feet per second. Mr. D. 
J. Blaikley (see note p. 97d), in two papers read 

for diameter '45 

pitch various, velocity 1064*26 
pitch 260 vib., velocity 1062-12 

The velocity in tubes is therefore always less 
than in free air. — Translator.] 

t[The original says * upper partials' 
{OberUhie), but the upper partials which are 
unevenly numbered are the 1st, 8rd, 5th, &c., 
and these are really the 2nd, 4th,6th, &o. (that 
is, the evenly numbered),partial tones(see foot- 



before the Physical Society, and published 
in the Philosophical Magatine for Dec. 1888, 
pp. 447-455, and Oct. 1884, pp. 828-884, as the 
means of many observations on the velocity 
of sound in dry air at 82° F., in tubes, obtained 



8-47 English inches. 
108818 .. feet. 
1084-88 



•75 


1-25 


2-08 


1072-58 


1078-71 


1081-78 


1072-47 


1078-78 


1082-51 



II 



It 



♦ I 



note p. 28c), but it is precisely the latter which 
are not excited in the present case. This is 
only mentioned as a warning to those who 
faultily use the faulty expression ' overtones ' 
indifferently for both partials and upper 
partials. — Translator.] 



CHAP. V. 5. 



MUSICAL TONES OF FLUTE OR FLUE PIPES. 



91 



These therefore have the same phases, and cancel their effect on the retnm of the 
wave with an opposite phase. Hence the tones of strongest resonance in stopped 
pipes correspond with the series of unevenly numbered partials of its fundamental 
tone. Supposing its pitch number is n, then Sn is the Twelfth of n, that is the 
Fifth of 2n the higher Octave, and 5n is the major Third of 4n the next higher 
Octave, and 7n the [sub] minor Seventh of the same Octave, and so on. 

Now although the phenomena follow these rules in the principal points, certain 
deviations from them occur because there is not precisely no change of pressure 
at the open ends of pipes. From these ends the motion of sound communicates 
itself to the uninclosed air beyond, and the waves which spread out from the open 
ends of the tubes have relatively very little alteration of pressure, but are not 
entirely without some. Hence a part of every wave which is incident on the open 
end of the pipe is not reflected, but runs out into the open air, while the remainder 
or greater portion of the wave is reflected, and returns into the tube. The re- 
flexion is the more complete, the smaller are the dimensions of the opening of 
the tube in comparison with the wave-length of the tone in question. 

Theory* also, agreeing with experiment, shows that the phases of the reflected 
part of the wave are the same as they would be if the reflexion did not take place 
at the surface of the opening itself but at another and somewhat different plane. 
Hence what may be called the reduced length of the pipe, or that answering to the 
pitch, is somewhat different from the real length, and the difference between the 
two depends on the form of the mouth, and not on the pitch of the notes pro- 
duced unless they are so high and hence their wave-lengths so short, that the 
dimensions of the opening cannot be neglected in respect to them. 

For cylindrical pipes of circular section, with ends cut at right angles to the 
length, the distance of the plane of reflexion from the end of the pipe is theoreti- 
cally determined to be at a distance of 0*7854 the radius of the circle, t For a 
wooden pipe of square section, of which the sides were 36 mm. (1*4 inch) internal 
measure, I found the distance of the plane of reflexion 14 mm. (*55 inch).| 

Now since on account of the imperfect reflexion of waves at the open ends of 
organ pipes (and respectively at their mouths) a part of the motion of the air must 
escape into the free air at every vibration, any oscillatory motion of its mass of air 
must be speedily exhausted, if there are no forces to replace the lost motion. In 
fact, on ceasing to blow an organ pipe scarcely any after sound is observable. 
Nevertheless the wave is frequently enough reflected forward and backward for its 
pitch to become perceptible on tapping against the pipe. 

The means usually adopted for keeping them continually sounding, is blowing. 
In order to understand the action of this process, we must remember that when 



*See my paper in Crelle'8 Journal for 
Mathematics^ vol. Ivii. 

+ Mr. Bosanquet (Proc. Mus. Assn. 1877-8, 
p. 65) is reported as saying : ' Lord Bayleigh and 
himself had gone fully into the matter, and had 
come to the oonclusion that this correction was 
much less than Helmholtz supposed. Lord Bay- 
leigh adopted the figure *6 of the radius, whilst 
he himself adopted -55.* See papers hy Lord 
Bayleigh and Mr. Bosanquet in Philosophical 
MagaHns. Mr. Blaikley hy a new process 
finds '576, which lies hetween the other two, 
see his paper in Phil. Mag. May 1879, p. 842. 

t The pipe was of wood, made by Marloye, 
the additional length being 802 mm. (11 "9 in.), 
corresponding exactly with half the length of 
wave of the pipe. The position of the nodal 
plane in the inside of the pipe was determined 
by inserting a wooden plug of the same diameter 
as of the internal opening of the pipe at its 
open end, until the pitch of the pipe, which 
had now become a closed one, was exactly the 
same as that of the open pipe before the inser- 



tion of the plug. [The sameness of the pitch 
is determined by seeing that each makes the 
same number of beats with the same fork.] 
The nodal surface lay 187 mm. (5*89 inch) 
from the end of the pipe, while a quarter of <r 
a wave-length was 151 mm. (5*94 inch). At the 
mouth end of the pipe, on the other hand, 
88 mm. (8*27 inch) were wanting to complete 
the theoretical length of the pipe. [The addi- 
tional piece being half the length of the wave, 
the pitch of the pipe before and after the 
addition of this piece remains the same, by 
which property tlie length of the additional 
piece is found. The length of the pipe from 
the bottom of the mouth to the open end was 
205 mm. = 8*07 inch ; the node, as determined, 
was 187 mm. —5*39 inch from the open end, 
and 68 mm. = 2*68 inch from the bottom of the 
mouth. These lengths had to be increased by 
14 mm. = -55 in. and 83 mm. = 3*27 in. respec- 
tively, to make up each to the quarter length 
of the wave 151 mm. = 5*95 inch. — Translator.] 



92 MUSICAL TONES OF FLUTE OR FLUE PIPES. pabt i. 

air is blown out of such a slit as that which lies below the lip of the pipe, it breaks 
through the air which lies at rest in front of the slit in a thin sheet like a blade or 
lamina, and hence at first does not draw any sensible part of that air into its own 
motion. It is not till it reaches a distance of some centimetres [a centimetre is 
nearly four-tenths of an inch] that the outpouring sheet splits up into eddies or 
vortices, which effect a mixture of the air at rest and the air in motion. This 
blade-shaped sheet of air in motion can be rendered visible by sending a stream of 
air impregnated with smoke or clouds of salammoniac through the mouth of a 
pipe from which the pipe itself is removed, such as is commonly found among 
physical apparatus. Any blade-shaped gas flame which comes from a split burner 
is also an example of a similar process. Burning renders visible the limits between 
the outpouring sheet of gas and the atmosphere. But the flame does not render 
the continuation of the stream visible. 

V Now the blade-shaped sheet of air at the mouth of the organ pipe is wafted to 
one side or the other by every stream of air which touches its surface, exactly as 
this gas flame is. The consequence is that when the oscillation of the mass of air 
in the pipe* causes the air to enter through the ends of the pipe, the blade-shaped 
stream of air arising from the mouth is also inclined inwards, and drives its whole 
mass of air into the pipe.f During the opposite phase of vibration, on the other 
hand, when the air leaves the ends of the pipe the whole mass of this blade of air 
is driven outwards. Hence it happens that exactly at the times when the air in 
the pipe is most condensed, more air stUl is driven in from the bellows, whence 
the condensation, and consequently also the equivalent of work of the vibration of 
the air is increased, while at the periods of rarefaction in the pipe the wind of the 
bellows pours its mass of air into the open space in front of the pipe. We must 
remember also that the blade-shaped sheet of air requires time in order to traverse 
the width of the mouth of the pipe, and is during this time exposed to the action 

IT of the vibrating column of air in the pipe, and does not reach the lip (that is the 
line where the two paths, inwards and outwards, intersect) until the end of this 
time. Every particle of air that is blown in, consequently reaches a phase of 
vibration in the interior of the pipe, which is somewhat later than that to which 
it was exposed in traversing the opening. If the latter motion was inwards, it 
encounters the following condensation in the interior of the pipe, and so on. 

This mode of exciting the tone conditions also the peculiar quality of tone of 
these organ pipes. We may regard the blade-shaped stream of air as very thin in 
comparison with the amplitude of the vibrations of air. The latter often amount 
to 10 or 16 millimetres ('39 to '63 inches), as may be seen by bringing small 
flames of gas close to this opening. Consequently the alternation between the 
periods of time for which the whole blast is poured into the interior of the pipe, 
and those for which it is entirely emptied outside, is rather sudden, in fact almost 
instantaneous. Hence it follows I that the oscillations excited by blowing are of 

ir a similar kind ; namely, that for a certain part of each vibration the velocity of the 
particles of air in the mouth and in free space, have a constant value directed out- 
wards, and for a second portion of the same, a constant value directed inwards. 
With stronger blowing that directed inwards will be more intense and of shorter 
duration ; with weaker blowing, the converse may take place. Moreover, the pres- 
sure in the mass of air put in motion in the pipe must also alternate between two 
constant values with considerable rapidity. The rapidity of this change will, 
however, be moderated by the circumstance that the blade- shaped sheet of air is 
not infinitely thin, but requires a short time to pass over the lip of the pipe, and 



* [It has, however, not been explained how side' the pipe is very small. A candle flame 

that * oscillation * commences. This will be held at the end of the pipe only pulsates ; 

alluded to in the additions to App. VII. sect. B. held a few inches from the lip, along the edge 

— Translator.] of the pipe, it is speedily extinguished. — Trans- 

t [The amount of air which enters fits com- lator.] 

pared with that which passes over the lip out- X See Appendix VII. [especially sect. B, II.]. 



CHAP. V. 6. 



MUSICAL TONES OF FLUTE OR FLUE PIPES. 



93 



that secondly the higher upper partials, whose wave-lengths only slightly exceed 
the diameter of the pipe, are as a general rule imperfectly developed. 

The kind of motion of the air here descnhed is exactly the same as that shown 
in fig. 23 (p. S2b), B and C, fig. 24 (p. 83b) y A and B, for the vibrating points of 
a violin string. Organ-builders have long since remarked the similarity of the 
quality of tone, for the narrower cylindrical-pipe stops when strongly blown, as 
shown by the names : Geigenprincipal, Vidla di Gamba, Violoncello, Violon-bass* 

That these conclusions from the mechanics of blowing correspond with the 
facts in nature, is shown by the experiments of Messrs. Toepler & Boltzmann,f who 
rendered the form of the oscillation of pressure in the interior of the pipe optically 
observable by the interference of light passed through a node of the vibrating mass 
of air. When the force of the wind was small they found almost a simple vibration 
(the smaller the oscillation of the air-blade at the lip, the more completely the dis- 
continuities disappear). But when the force of the wind was greater they found IF 
a very rapid alternation between two dififerent values of pressure, each of which 
remained almost unaltered for a fraction of a vibration. 

Messrs. Mach and J. Hervert's I experiments with gas flames placed before the 
end of an open pipe to make the vibrations visible, show that the form of motion ■ 
just described really occurs at the ends of the pipes. The forms of vibration which 
they deduced from the analysis of the forms of the flames correspond with those of 
a violin string, except that, for the reason given above, their comers are rounded ofif. 

By using resonators I find that on narrow pipes of this kind the partial tones 
may be clearly heard up to the sixth. 

For wide open pipes, on the other hand, the adjacent proper tones of the tube 
are all somewhat sharper than the corresponding harmonic tones of the prime, and 
hence these tones will be much less reinforced by the resonance of the tube. Wide 
pipes, having larger masses of vibrating air and admitting of being much more 
strongly blown without jumping up into an harmonic, are used for the great body % 
of sound on the organ, and are hence called principals timmen.^ For the above 
reasons they produce the prime tone alone strongly and fully, with a much weaker 
retinue of secondary tones. For wooden * principal ' pipes, I find the prime tone 
and its Octave or first upper partial very distinct ; the Twelfth or second upper 
partial is but weak, and the higher upper partials no longer distinctly perceptible. 
For metal pipes the fourth partial was also still perceptible. The quality of tone in 
these pipes is fuller and softer than that of the geigenpriTidpal* When flute or 
flue stops of the organ, and the German flute are blown softly, the upper partials 
lose strength at a greater rate than the prime tone, and hence the musical quality 
becomes weak and soft. 

Another variety is observed on the pipes which are conically narrowed at their 



* [Oeigenprincipal — yiolin or crisp-toned 
diapa&on, 8 feet, — violin principal, 4 feet. See 
supra, p. 91d, note. Violonoello — * crisp-toned 
open stop, of small scale, the Octave to the 
violone, 8 feet '. Violon-bass — this fails in 
Hopkins, but it is probably his * violone — 
donole bass, a unison open wood stop, of much 
smaller scale than the Diapason, and formed 
of pipes that are a little wider at the top than 
at the bottom, and furnished with ears and 
beard at the mouth ; the tone of the Violone 
is crisp and resonant, like that of the orches- 
tral Double Bass ; and its speech being a little 
slow, it has the Stopped Bass always drawn 
with it, 16 feet '. Oamba or viol da gcmiba — 
* bass viol, unison stop, of smaller scale, and 
thinner but more pungent tone than the violin 
diapason, 8 feet, . . . one of the most highly 
esteemed and most frequently disposed stops 
in Continental organs ; the German gamba is 
usually composed of cylindrical pipes'. In 
England till very recently it was made exclu- 



sively conical with a bell top. From Hopkins 
on the Organ, pp. 187, 446, &c. — Translator.] 

t Poggendorff 's Anndl,, vol. clxi. pp. 321- 
852. ■ f 

:;: PoggendorfTs AnnaL, vol. cxlvii. pp. 590- 
604. 

§ [Literally ' principal voices or parts ' ; 
may probably be best translated * principal 
work ' or * diapason-work,* including * all the 
open cylindrical stops of Open Diapason 
measure, or which have their scale deduced 
from that of the Open Diapason ; such stops 
are the chief, most important or ^'principal,** 
as they are aJso most numerous in an organ. 
The Unison and Double Open Diapasons, 
Principal, Fifteenth and Octave Fifteenth ; 
the Fifth, Twelfth, and Larigot ; the Tenth 
and Tierce ; and the Mixture Stops, when of 
full or proportional scale, belong to the Dia- 
pason-work.' From Hopkins on the Organ, 
p. 181. — Translator,] 




^13 EEED PIPES. rua i. 

A« A Aii^hd Id the reed stops of organs is shown 
H JlLM'd'KSOQi^Qt cup above; B is a longitu- 

MSI" • -- 










Ah ' :X: 



-"«• ■■&^T|piS&'l&3iuS&^ri.R«tl1kiDgreed 
«r ■ l|ing*i^^ifjy^ri>^tJ>S|oI voicing, a< 




oBt flap ' from the fixed extremity down on to the 
oBslit oi (be tube, it ' rollB itself dono, t,oi 
oBlieiioe groduaily covers the aperture. The art 
oBof curving the tongue io as to produce this 
BBcffeot is very difficult to acquire ; it is entirely 
^ empirical, and depends upon the keen eye tuid 
iTSne touch of the 'artist,' who notes lines and 
IjBiiurveB imperceptible to the uninitiated obser- 
■£^et, and foresees their influence on the produo- 
'T'2ionof quality of (one. Consequently, when an 
* organ-builder has the misfortune to lose his 
' reed.voicer,' he has always great difficulty 

rin replacing him. — Tranilator.] 

' ' [I( should be observed that fig. 29, A, 

showsa^fereed, andfig. 29, B, »«trilin^reed ; 

ift^nd that the tuDiognire is right in fig. 39, B, 

°'(>ecause it presses tlie reed against the edges ol 

'-'- — ooveand hence shortens it. but it is wrong 
„. 29, A, for the reed being free would strike 
'^against llie wire and rattle. For free reeds a 
l^^lipisused which graepsthereed on both sides 
.:£nd thus limits its vibrating length. 
«• Fig. 28, p. 9Sti, shows (he vibrator ol an 
>j^*iarmoniuin, not of an organ pipe. The figures 
;^^« the same as in all the Oorman editions. — 

JtratulatorA 



f^l 




_ ^^^ .^. — . „ A^iSl^fffc' ''''^y swing inwards. 

?*J*J K^B'^£*'t|^^"^ t M '^ffi <^ these tongues are beat studied 
^^'Sv^?^^^, ttiS39ft$tof a wooden or gutta-percha tube 
'6^39 5^* ** ** HtByy^S* ^^^ aides, as shown in fig. 30, 
^ '^' ss < S • _, ■ wSq^jg^-neatly rectangular points standing 
;' E^Ri'^48|two edges wMch are out obliquely. 
Sfi%!yS||IH|stretoh strips of valcanised india- 
--^-'*--**TBfne two oblique edges, 80 as to leave 



iHtlA V \ - I -ilo 



■ VlfltdSftSfetween them, and fasten them with 

1|7flJ%lr7i os'eed monthpieoe is thus oonstmcted H 
!'l)9b^)ttr connected in any way with tubes 
I Sijr^i^^^cbambers. When the membranes 
I B{^'ji|n£iS^ the slit is closed ; when outwards, 
n> ■£»•£• ■^N^ST^t^'i'MR!^^'^^'^^^ which are fastened in 
f ^^^^^^'i'W^W'iB^''^ which are laid at right angles 
*"" ~ ■" """^^ ^^posed, for in the latter case they 
i^Ba^iihey can begin to open and shut 
"^^;propo8ed maybe blown either in 
ll^ction. In the first case they open 
that is, towards the further end 
distinguish as striking inwardt. 
n they would do if allowed to 
ith an air chamber. The tongues 
instruments already mentioned, IT 
But both membranous and metal 
of air, and hence to open 
instrument. I then say that they 
lE^rike outwards are always sharper 



considered as musical in- 
j3!>and the human larymc in singing. 
"' _V"y elaatio membranous tongues, 
^^ter, and they would consequently 
jiljg{^^ vibrate by ^emselyes. In brass 
"ijifhich strike outwards, and conse- 
_ _ than their proper tonea. But as 

^^^^ly Bet in motion, by the alternate 

-.^■^'^^cSff^mn'^ied with brass instrumenta* IT 

;■_•*'. 

Sftith the lips is about one octave greater 

- -—.S^ae whole range of the bumao voice from 

■fi^Eta^olando to thahigliest eopnuo. That 

'a§^*B^> acting oa the vocal chorda do, can 

Ivea vibrate rapidly when Bupported by 

i^aof a moathpiece, may be proved, for if 

i^lg&iinl, unconnected with any resonating 

held against the lips, varioui notes of 




can be produced vety faintly, the dit- 
toing to maintain steadiness of pitch 
- Mag., Aug. 1678, p. 2). The office of 
._ m tM lujw in relation to the lipi (leav- 
t§|f of ooniideration its work aa a resonant . 
lai-^Bi. — •M-!-^ ^jjj modifying the tone) it i 

_ , tm govtmor in facilitating 

^&i-^inUiiane» (not the origination) of a ' 



98 



TONES OF REED PIPES. 



PART I. 



In the larynx, the elastic vocal chords act as membranous tongues. They are 
stretched across the windpipe, from front to back, like the india-rubber strips in 
fig. 30 (p. 97a), and leave a small slit, the glottis, between them. They have the 
advantage over all artificially constructed tongues of allowing the width of their slit, 
their tension, and even their form to be altered at pleasure with extraordinary 
rapidity and certainty, at the same time that the resonant tube formed by the 
opening of the mouth admits of much variety of form, so that many more qualities 
of tone can be thus produced than on any instrument of artificial construction. If 
the vocal chords are examined from above with a laryngoscope, while producing a 
tone, they will be seen to make very large vibrations for the deeper breast voice, 
shutting the glottis tightly whenever they strike inwards. 

The pitch of the various reeds or tongues just mentioned is altered in very 
different manners. The metal tongues of the organ and harmonium are always 

IT intended to produce one single tone apiece. On the motion of these comparatively 
heavy and stiff tongues, the pressure of the vibrating air has very small influence, 
and their pitch within the instrument is consequently not much different from that 
of the isolated tongues. There must be at least one tongue for each note on such 
instruments. 

In wooden wind instruments^ a single tongue has to serve for the whole series 
of notes. But the tongues of these instruments are made of light elastic wood, 
which is easily set in motion by the alternating pressure of the vibrating column 
of air, and swings sympathetically with it. Such instruments, therefore, in 
addition to those very high tones, which nearly correspond to the proper tones of 
their tongues, can, as theory and experience alike show, also produce deep tones of 
a very different pitch,* because the waves of air which arise in the tube of the in- 
strument excite an alternation in the pressure of air adjacent to the tongue itself 
sufficiently powerful to make it vibrate sensibly. Now in a vibrating column of 

T air the alteration of pressure is greatest where the velocity of the particles of air is 
smallest ; and since the velocity is always null, that is a minimum, at the end of a 
closed tube, such as a stopped organ pipe, and the alteration of pressure in that 
place is consequently a maximum, the tones of these reed pipes must be the same as 
those which the resonant tube alone would produce, if it were stopped at the place 
where the tongue is placed, and were blown as a stopped pipe. In musical practice, 
then, such tones of the instrument as correspond to the proper tones of the tongue 
are not used at all, because they are very high and screaming, and their pitch can- 
not be preserved with sufficient steadiness when the tongue is wet. The only 
tones produced are considerably deeper than the proper tone of the tongue, and 
have their pitches determined by the length of the column of air, which corresponds 
to the proper tones of the stopped pipe. 

The clarinet has a cylindrical tube, the proper tones of which correspond to 
the third, fifth, seventh, &c., partial tone of the prime. By altering the style of 

% blowing, it is possible to pass from the prime to the Twelfth or the higher major 
Third. The acoustic length of the tube may also be altered by opening the side 



periodic vibration of the lips. Prof. Helmholtz 
does not say above what produces the alternate 
pressure, and I can conceive no source for it but 
a periodic vibration of the lips of a time suited 
to the particular note required.* The depth of 
the cup is also important : — * The shallower and 
more ** cup-like " the cup,' says Mr. Blaikley, 
* the greater the strength of the upper partials. 
Compare the deep and narrow cup of the 
French horn with weak upper partials, and 
the wide and shallow cup of the trumpet with 
strong upper partials.* — (MS. communica- 
tions.) Mr. Blaiide^ kindly sounded for me the 
same instrument with different mouthpieces or 
cups, to show the great difference of quality 
they produce. In the great bass bombaxdon on 



which he produced a tone of 40 vib., the tone 
was, even at that depth, remarkably rich and 
fine, owing to the large and deep cup extin- 
guishing the beating upper partials. Mr. 
Blaikley also drew my attention to the fact thati 
where the tube opens out into the cup, therei' 
must be no sharp shoulder, but that the edgej' 
must be carefully rounded off, otherwise there 
is a great loss of power to the blower. In the 
case of the French horn the cup is very long 
and almost tapers into the tube. — Translator.'] 
*See Helmholtz, Verhandlungen des na- 
turhistorischen niedicinischen Vereins 8U Hei- 
delberg, July 26, 1861, in the Eeidelbergm- 
Jahrbilcher, Poggendorff's Annalen, 1861. 
[Beproduced in part in App. VII. sect. B., I.] 



CHAP. V. 6. 



TONES OF REED PIPES. 



99 



holes of the clarinet, in which case the vibrating column of air is principally that 
between the mouthpiece and the uppermost open side hole.* 

The oboe (hautbois) and bassoon (fagotto) have conical tubes which are closed up 
to the vertex of their cone, and have proper tones that are the same as those of 
open tubes of the same length. Hence the tones of both of these instruments 
nearly correspond to those of open pipes. By overblowing they give the Octave, 
Twelfth, second Octave, and so on, of the prime tone. Intermediate tones are 
produced by opening side holes. 

The older horns and trumpets consist of long conical bent tubes, without keys 
or side holes.f They can produce such tones only as correspond to the proper 
tones of the tube, and these again are the natural harmonic upper partials of the 
prime. But as the prime tone of such a long tube is very deep, the upper partial 
tones in the middle parts of the scale lie rather close together, especially in the 
extremely long tubes of the hom,^ so that they give most of the degrees of the scale. 1 



* [Mr. D. J. Blaikley obligingly furnished me 
with the substance of the following remarks on 
clarinets, and repeated his experiments before 
me in May 1884. The ordinary form of the 
clarinet is not wholly cylindrical. It is slightly 
constricted at the mouthpiece and provided 
with a spreading bell at the other end. The 
modification of form by key and finger holes 
also must not be neglected. On a cylindrical 
pipe played with the lips, the evenly numbered 
partials cure quite inaudible. When a clarinet 
mouthpiece was added I found traces of the 
4th and 6th partials beating with my forks. 
But on the clarinet with the bell, the 2nd, 
4th, and 6th partials were distinct, and I could 
obtain beats from them with my forks. Mr. 
Blaikley brought them out (1) by bead and 
diaphragm resonators tuned to them (fig. 16, 
p. 42a), which I also witnessed, (2) by an irre- 
gularly-shaped tubular resonator sunk gra- 
dually in water, on which I also heard them, 



(3) by beats with an harmonium with a con- 
stant blast, which I also heard. On the cylin- 
drical tube aU the unevenly numbered partials 
are in tune when played as primes of inde- 
pendent harmonic notes. On the clarinet 
only the Brd particJ, or 2nd proper tone, can 
be used as the prime of an independent har- 
monic tone. The 3rd, 4th, and 5th proper 
tones of the instrument, are sufficiently near 
in pitch to the 5th, 7th, and 9th partials of 
the fundamental tone for these latter to be 
greatly strengthened by resonance, but the 
agreement is not close enough to allow of the 
higher proper tones being used as the primes 
of independent harmonic compound tones. 
Hence practically only the Bra harmonics, 
or Twelfths, are used on the clarinet. The 
following table of the relative intensity of the IT 
partials of a B|> clarinet was given by Mr. 
Blaikley in the Proc, of the Mus. Assn. for 
1877-8. p. 84 :— 



Pabtiaub — B|> Clabimbtb. 



Pitch 


1 


2 


3 


4 


5 


6 


7 


8, &c. 


T 


/ 


• 


/ 


P 


mf 


P 


• • • 


• • • 


by 


/ 


:2 


/ 


P 


mf 


• m • 


mf 


PP 


a 


/ 


/ 


P 


mf 


• ■ • 


mf 


PP 


9 


f 


o 

OB 


/ 


• • ■ 


mf 


mf 


P 


PP 


f 


f 




/, 


■ • • 


mf 


P 


mf 


PP 


'^ 


f 


49 
09 


mf 


• ■ • 


P 


P 


mf 


PP 


f 




mf 


p 


mf 


P 


P 


PP 



Where / means forte, mf mezzoforte, p piano, pp pianissimo. Translator.] 



t [Such brass tubes are first worked unbent 
from cylindrical brass tubes, by putting solid 
steel cores of the required form inside, and then 
drawing them through a hole in a piece of 
lead, which yields enough for the tube to pass 
through, but presses the brass firmly enough 
against the core to make the tube assume the 
proper form. Afterwards the tube is filled 
with lead, and then bent into the required coils, 
after which the lead is melted out. The in- 
struments are also not conical in the strict 
sense of the word, but * approximate in form 
to the hyperbolic cone, where the axis of the 
instrument is an asymptote, and the vertex is 
at a great or even an infinite distance from 
the bell end \ From information furnished by 
Mr. Blaikley. — Translator.'] 

I The tube of the Waldhom [foresthom. 



hunting horn of the Germans, answering to 
our French horn] is, according to Zamminer 
[p. 812], 13*4 feet long. Its proper prime tone ^ 
is ^,1^ This and the next EW are not used, 
but only the other tones, £|^, tf^, g, b\^, <2'k -, 
s% fy g\ a'k-l-, h% <fcc. [Mr. Blaikley 
kindly sounded for me the harmonics 8, 9, 10, 
11, 12, 13, 14, on an E^ French horn. The 
result was almost preciselv 320, 360, 400, 440, 
480, 520, 560 vib., that is the exact harmonics 
for the prime tone 40 vib. to which it was 
tuned, the pitch of English militazy musical 
instruments being as nearly as possible c' 269, 
e*^ 319'9, a' 452*4. This scale was not com- 
pleted because the 15th and 16th harmonics 
600 and 640 vib. would have been too high for 
me to measure. Expressed in cents we may 
compare this scale with just intonation thus : — 



Notes 


. e'\> 


f 


9' 


«'b 


«>'b 


c" 


d"b 


d" 


«"b 


Just cents. 


• 0. 


204, 


386, 


498, 


702, 




996, 


1088, 


1200 


Harmonic cents 


. 0, 


204, 


386, 


661, 


702, 


841, 


969, 


1088, 


1200 


HarmomoSf ^o. 


. 8. 


9. 


10. 


11. 


12, 


13. 


u, 


16. 


16. 
H 2 



100 



TONES OF REED PIPES. 



PAKT I. 



The trumpet is restricted to these natural tones. But by introducing the hand 
into the bell of the French horn and thus partly closing it, and by lengthening 
the tube of the trombone,* it was possible in some degree to supply the missing 
tones and improve the faulty ones. In later times trumpets and horns have been 
frequently supplied with keysf to supply the missing tones, but at some expense 
of power in the tone and the brilliancy in its quality. The vibrations of the air 
in these instruments are unusually powerful, and require the resistance of firm, 
smooth, unbroken tubes to preserve their strength. In the use of brass instru- 
ments, the different form and tension of the lips of the player act only to determine 
which of the proper tones of the tube shall speak ; the pitch of the individual 
tones is almost I entirely independent of the tension of the lips. 

On the other hand, in the larynx the tension of the vocal chords, which here 
form the membranous tongues, is itself variable, and determines the pitch of 

IT the tone. The air chambers connected with the larynx are not adapted for 
materially altering the tone of the vocal chords. Their walls are so yielding that 
they cannot allow the formation of vibrations of the air within them sufiGiciently 
powerful to force the vocal chords to oscillate with a period which is different from 
that required by their own elasticity. The cavity of the mouth is also far too 
short, and generally too widely open for its mass of air to have material influence 
on the pitch. 

In addition to the tension of the vocal chords (which can be increased not 
only by separating the points of their insertion in the cartilages of the larynx, but 
also by voluntarily stretching the muscular fibres within them), their thickness 
seems also to be variable. Much soft watery inelastic tissue lies underneath the 
elastic fibrils projier and the muscular fibres of the vocal chords, and in the breast 
voice this probably acts to weight them and retard their vibrations. The head 
voice is probably produced by drawing aside the mucous coat below the chords, 

1 thus rendering the edge of the chords sharper, and the weight of the vibrating 
part less, while the elasticity is unaltered. § 



Henoe the Fourth a'j* was 58 cents (88 : 82) 
too sharp, and the Sixth c" was 48 cents 
(40 : 89) too flat, and they were consequently 
unusahle without modification by the hand. 
The minor Seventh d"\f was too flat by 27 cents 
(64 : 68), but unless played in (intended) 
unison against the just form, it produces a 
better effect. * In trumpets, strictly so called,' 
says Mr. Blaikley, * a great portion of the length 
is cylindrical and the bell curves out hyper- 
bolically, the two lowest partials are not 
required as a rule and are not strictly in 
tune, so the series of partials may be taken 
as about '75, 1-90, 8, 4, 6, 6, 7, 8, &c., all the 
upper notes being brought into time by modi- 
^ fications in the form of the bell in a ffood instru- 
ment.' The length of the French horn varies 
with the ' crook ' which determines its pitch. 
The following contains the length in English 
inches for each crook, as given by Mr. Blaikley : 

B^ (alto) 108, 4t) 114* ^\> ^^^* <^ 1^> ^ 
144i, E^ 158, JE^ 162, I^ 171}, O 192}, B^ 
(basso) 216}, hence the length varies from 
9 ft. to 18 ft. } inch. By a curious error in 
all the German editions, Zamminer is said to 
make the length of the B]^ Waldhom 27 feet, 
or the length of the wave of the lowest note, 
in place of his 18*4 feet. Zamminer, however, 
says that the instrument is named from the 
Octave above the lowest note, and that hence 
the wave-length of this Octave is the length of 
the horn. — Translaior.] 

* [A large portion of the trombone is com- 
posed of a double narrow cylindrical tube on 
which another slides, so that the length of the 



trombone can be altered at will, and chosen 
to make its harmonics produce a just scale. 
Some trumpets also are made with a short 
slide worked by two finders one way, and 
returning to its position by a spring. Such 
instruments are sometimes used by first-rate 
players, such as Harper, the late celebrated 
trumpeter, and his son. But, as Mr. Blaikley 
informed me, an extremely small percentage 
of the trumpets sold have slides. At present 
the piston brass instruments have nearly driven 
all slides, except the trombone, out of the field. 
— Translator,] 

f [The keys are nearly obsolete, and have 
been replaced by pistons which open valves, 
and thus temporarily increase the length of 
the tube, so as to make the note blown 1, 2, 
or 8 Semitones fiatter. These can also be 
used in combination, but are then not so true. 
This is tantamount to an imperfect slide 
action. Instruments of this kind are now 
much used in all military bands, and are 
made of very different sizes and pitches. — 
Translator,] 

X [But by no means * quite '. It is possible 
to blow out of tune, and to a small extent 
temper the harmonics. — Translator,] 

§[0n the subject of the registers of the 
human voice and its production generally, see 
Lennox Browne and Emil Behnke, VoicOf Song, 
and Speech (Sampson Low, London, 1888, 
pp. 822). This work contains not merely 
accurate drawings of the larynx in the different 
registers, but 4 laiyngoscopic photographs 
from Mr. Behnke's own larynx. A register 



CHAP. V. 6. 



TONES OF REED PIPES. 



101 



We now proceed to investdgate the quality of tone produced on reed pipes, 
which is our proper subject. The sound in these pipes is excited by intermittent 
pulses of air, which at each swing break through the opening that is closed by 
the tongue of the reed. A freely vibrating tongue has far too small a surface to 
communicate any appreciable quantity of sonorous motion to the surrounding air ; 
and it is as little able to excite the air inclosed in pipes. The sound seems to be 
really produced by pulses of air, as in the siren, where the metal plate that opens 
and closes the orifice does not vibrate at all. By the alternate opening and closing 
of a passage, a continuous influx of air is changed into a periodic motion, capable 
of affecting the air. Like any other periodic motion of the air, the one thus 
produced can also be resolved into a series of simple vibrations. We have already 
remarked that the number of terms in such a series will increase with the discon- 
tinuity of the motion to be thus resolved (p. 34(2). Now the motion of the air which 
passes through a siren, or past a vibrating tongue, is discontinuous in a very high f 
degree, since the individual pulses of air must be generally separated by complete 
pauses during the closures of the opening. Free tongues without a resonance 
tube, in which all the individual simple tones of the vibration which they excite 
in the air are given ofif freely to the surrounding atmosphere, have consequently 
always a very sharp, cutting, jarring quality of tone, and we can really hear with 
either armed or unarmed ears a long series of strong and clear partial tones up 
to the 16th or 20th, and there are evidently still higher partials present, although 
it is difficult or impossible tod istinguish them from each other, because they do 
not lie so much as a Semitone apeurt^ This whirring of dissonant partial tones 
makes the musical quaUty of free tongues very disagreeable.f A tone thus pro- 
duced also shows that it is really due to pufiQs of air. I have examined the vibra- 
ting tongue of a reed pipe, like that in fig. 28 (p. 96b), when in action with the 
vibration microscope of Lissajous, in order to determine the vibrational form of 
the tongue, and I foimd that the tongue performed perfectly regular simple vibra- ^ 
tions. Hence it would communicate to the air merely a simple tone and not a 
compound tone, if the sound were directly produced by its own vibrations. 

The intensity of the upper partial tones of a free tongue, unconnected with a 
resonance tube, and their relation to the prime, are greatly dependent on the 



is defined as *a series of tones produced by 
the same mechanism ' (p. 168). The names of 
the registers adopted are those introduced 
by the late John Gurwen of the Tonic Sol-fa 
movement. They depend on the appearance of 
the glottis and vocal chords, and are as follows : 
1. Lower thick, 2. Upper thick (both * chest 
voice '), 3. Lower thin (' high chest ' voice in 
men), 4. Upper thin (' falsetto '. in women), 
5. Small (* head voice ' in women}. The extent 
of the registers are stated to be (p. 171) 



2. apper thick. S. lower thin. 
6tof\ g'toc" 

d'to/', g'toc" 

2. upper thick. 8. lower thin. 



1. lower thick. 
TMkn J^too^ 
\ Women e toe', 

1. lower thick. 

Women oitlt, d" to/", g" to/' 

4. upper thin. 6. raiaU. 

The mechanism is as follows (pp. 168-171) : — 

1. Lower thick. The hindmost points of the 
pyramids (arytenoid cartilages) close together, 
an elliptical slit between the vocal ligaments 
(or chords), which vibrate through their whole 
length, breadth, and thickness fully, loosely, 
and visibly. The lid (epiglottis) is low. 

2. Upper thick. The elliptical chink dis- 
appears and becomes linear. The lid (epiglottis) 
rises ; the vocal ligaments are stretched. 

8. Lower thin. The lid (epiglottis) is more 
raised, so as to show the cusMon below it, the 
whole larynx and the insertions of the vocal 



ligaments in the shield (thyroid) cartilage. 
The vocal ligaments are quite still, and their 
vibrations are confined to the thin inner edges. 
The vocal ligaments are made thinner and 
transparent, as shown by illumination from 
below. Male voices cease here. 

4. Upper thin. An elliptical slit again forms 
between the vocal ligaments. When this is 
used by men it gives the falsetto arising from 
the vfpp0r thin being carried below its trae 
place. This slit is gradually reduced in size 
as the contralto and soprano voices ascend. er 

5. Small. The back part of the glottis 
contracts for at least two-thirds of its length, 
the vocal ligaments being pressed together so 
tightly that scarcely any trace of a slit remains, 
and no vibrations are visible. The front part 
opens as an oval chink, and the edges of this 
vibrate so markedly that the outline is blurred. 
The drawings of the two lost registers (pp. 168- 
169) were made from laryngoscopic examina- 
tion of a lady. 

Reference should be made to the book 
itself for full explanations, and the reader 
should especially consult Mr. Behnke*s admir- 
able little work The Mechaniam of the Human 
Voice (Ourwen, 3rd ed., 1881, pp. 126).— 
Translaior.'] 

♦[See footnote t p. &bd' .^Translator,] 
t[The cheap little mouth harmonicons 
exhibit this effect very well. — Translalor.'l 



102 TONES OF REED PIPES. part i. 

nature of the tongue, its position with respect to its frame, the tightness with 
which it closes, &c. Striking tongues which produce the most discontinuous pulses 
of air, also produce the most cutting quality of tone.* The shorter the pufif of air, 
and hence the more sudden its action, the greater number of high upper partials 
should we expect, exactly as we find in the siren, according to Seebeck's investi- 
gations. Hard, unyielding material, like that of brass tongues, will produce 
pulses of air which are much more disconnected than those formed by soft and 
yielding substances. This is probably the reason why the singing tones of the 
human voice are softer than all others which are produced by reed pipes. Never- 
theless the number of upper partial tones in the human voice, when used in 
emphatic /orte, is very great, and they reach distinctly and powerfuUy up to the 
four-times accented [or quarter-foot] Octave (p. 26a). To this we shall have to 
return. 

IT The tones of tongues are essentially changed by the addition of resonance 
tubes, because they reinforce and hence give prominence to those upper partial 
tones which correspond to the proper tones of these tube&f In this case the 
resonance tubes must be considered as closed at the point where the tongue is 
inserted.^ 

A brass tongue such as is used in organs, and tuned to b\f, was applied to one 
of my larger spherical resonators, also tuned to b\^, instead of to its usual resonance 
tube. After considerably increasing the pressure of wind in the bellows, the 
tongue spoke somewhat flatter than usual, but with an extraordinarily full, beautiful, 
soft tone, from which almost all upper partials were absent. Very little wind was 
used, but it was under high pressure. In this case the prime tone of the compound 
was in unison with the resonator, which gave a powerful resonance, and conse- 
quently the prime tone had also great power. None of the higher partial tones 
could be reinforced. The theory of the vibrations of air in the sphere further 

IT shows that the greatest pressure must occur in the sphere at the moment that the 
tongue opens. Hence arose the necessity of strong pressure in the bellows to over- 
come the increased pressure in the sphere, and yet not much wind really passed. 

If instead of a glass sphere, resonant tubes are employed, which admit of a 
greater number of proper tones, the resulting musical tones are more complex. 
In the clarinet we have a cylindrical tube which by its resonance reinforces the 
uneven partial tones. § The conical tubes of the oboe, bassoon, trumpet, and 
French horn, on the other hand, reinforce all the harmonic upper partial tones of 
the compound up to a certain height, determined by the incapacity of the tubes 
to resound for waves of sound that are not much longer than the width of the 
opening. By actual trial I found only unevenly numbered partial tones, distinct to 
the seventh inclusive, in the notes of the clarinet,§ whereas on other instruments, 
which have conical tubes, I found the evenly numbered partials also. I have not yet 
had an opportunity of making observations on the further differences of quality in 

% the tones of individual instruments with conical tubes. This opens rather a wide 
field for research, since the quality of tone is altered in many ways by the style of 
blowing, and even on the same instrument the different parts of the scale, when 
they require the opening of side holes, show considerable differences in quality. 
On wooden wind instruments these differences are striking. The opening of side 
holes is by no means a complete substitute for shortening the tube, and the reflec- 
tion of the waves of sound at the points of opening is not the same as at the free 
open end of the tube. The upper partials of compound tones produced by a tube 
limited by an open side hole, must certainly be in general materially deficient in 
harmonic purity, and this will also have a marked influence on their resonance.** 

* [But see footnote f p. 95d', — Trans- p. 89, 1. 2, but was cancelled in the 4th 

latar,] Qerman edition. — Translator.] 

t [A line has been here cancelled in the t See Appendix VII. 

translation which had been accidentally left § [But see note * p. 996.— 2VansZator.] 

standing in the German, as it refers to a re- ** [The theory of side holes is excessively 

mark on the passage which formerly followed complicated and has not been as yet worked 



CHAP. V. 7. 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



103 



7. Vowel Qualities of Tone. 

We have hitherto discussed cases of resonance, generated in such' air chambers 
as were capable of reinforcing the prime tone principally, but also a certain 
number of the harmonic upper partial tones of the compound tone produced. The 
case, however, may also occur in which the lowest tone of the resonance chamber 
applied does not correspond with the prime, but only with some one of the upper 
partials of the compound tone itself, and in these cases we find, in accordance with 
the principles hitherto developed, that the corresponding upper partial tone is 
really more reinforced than the prime or other partials by the resonance of the ' 
chamber, and consequently predominates extremely over all the other partials in 
the series. The quality of tone thus produced has consequently a peculiar cha- 
racter, and more or less resembles one of the vowels of the human voice. For the 
vowels of speech are in reality tones produced by membranous tongues (the vocal IT 
chords), with a resonance chamber (the mouth) capable of altering in length, 
width, and pitch of resonance, and hence capable also of reinforcing at dififerent 
times different partials of the compound tone to which it is applied.''^ 

In order to understand the composition of vowel tones, we must in the first 
place bear in mind that the source of their sound lies in the vocal chords, and 
that when the voice is heard, these chords act as membranous tongues, and like 
all tongues produce a series of decidedly discontinuous and sharply separated 
pulses of air, which, on being represented as a sum of simple vibrations, must 
consist of a very large number of them, and hence be received by the ear as a very 
long series of partials belonging to a compound musical tone. With the assistance 
of resonators it is possible to recognise very high partials, up to the sixteenth, 
when one of the brighter vowels is sung by a powerful bass voice at a low pitch, 
and, in the case of a strained forte in the upper notes of any human voice, we C8.n 
hear, more clearly than on any other musical instrument, those high upper partials 
that belong to the middle of the four-times accented Octave (the highest on s 
modem pianofortes, see note, p. 18^), and these high tones have a peculiar relation 
to the ear, to be subsequently considered. The loudness of such upper partials, f 
especially those of highest pitch, differs considerably in different individuals. For 
cutting bright voices it is greater than for soft and dull ones. The quality of tone 
in cutting screaming voices may perhaps be referred to a want of sufficient 
smoothness or straightness in the edges of the vocal chords, to enable them to 
close in a straight narrow slit without striking one another. This circumstance 
would give the larynx more the character of striking tongues, and the latter have 
a much more cutting quality than the free tongues of the normal vocal chords. 
Hoarseness in voices may arise from the glottis not entirely closing during the 
vibrations of the vocal chords. At any rate, when alterations of this kind are 
made in artificial membranous tongues, similar results ensue. For a strong and 
yet soft quality of voice it is necessary that the vocal chords should, even when ^ 
most strongly vibrating, join rectilinearly at the moment of approach with perfect 
tightness, effectually closing the glottis for the moment, but without overlapping 



out scientifically. 'The general principles,* 
writes Mr. Blaikley, ' are not difficult of com- 
prehension; the difficulty is to determine quan- 
titatively the values in each particular case.* 
The paper by Schafhautl (writing under the 
name of Pellisov), *Theorie gedeckter cyl- 
indrischer und conischer Pfeifen und der 
Querfl5ten,* Schweiger, Joum, Ixviii. 1883, is 
disfigured by misprints so that the formulse are 
unintelligible, and the theory is also extremely 
hazardous. But they are the only papers I 
have found, and are referred to by Theobald 
Boehm, Ueher den FWtenbau, Mainz, 1847. 
An English version of this, by himself, made 
for Mr. Kudall in 1847, has recently been 



edited with additional letters by W. S. Broad- 
wood, and published by Budall, Carte, & Co., 
makers of his flutes. See also Victor Mahillon, 
Etude sur le doigU de laFlUte Boehm, 1882, 
and a paper by M. Aristide Gavaill^-Goll, in 
UJ&cho Musical for 11 Jan. 1888.~2Van<2a^.] 
* The theory of vowel tones was first enun- 
ciated by Wheatstone in a criticism, unfortu- 
nately little known, on Willis's experiments. 
The latter are described in the Transactions 
of the Cambridge Philosophical Society, vol. 
iii. p. 281, and Poggendorff's Armal&n der 
Physik, vol. xxiv. p. 897. Wheatstone's re- 
port upon them is contained in the London 
and Westminster Revieiu for October, 1837. 



104 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



PABTI. 



or striking against each other. If they do not close perfectly, the stream of air 
will not be completely interrupted, and the tone cannot be powerful. If they 
overlap, the tone must be cutting, as before remarked, as those arising from 
striking tongues. On examining the vocal chords in action by means of a 
laryngoscope, it is marvellous to observe the accuracy with which they close even 
when making vibrations occupying nearly the entire breadth of the chords them- 
selves.* 

There is also a certain difference in the way of putting on the voice in speak- 
ing and in singing, which gives the speaking voice a much more cutting quality 
of tone, especially in the open vowels, and occasions a sensation of much greater 
pressure in the larynx. I suspect that in speaking the vocal chords act as striking 
tongues.f 

When the mucous membrane of the larynx is affected with catarrh, the 
f laryngoscope sometimes shows little flakes of mucus in the glottis. When these 
are too great they disturb the motion of the vibrating chords and make them irre- 
gular, causing the tone to become unequal, jarring, or hoarse. It is, however, re- 
markable what comparatively large flakes of mucus may lie in the glottis without 
producing a very striking deterioration in the quality of tone. 

It has already been mentioned that it is generally more difficult for the un- 
* assisted ear to recognise the upper partials in the human voice, than in the tones 
of musical instruments. Besonators are more necessary for this examination 
than for the analysis of any other kind of musical tone. The upper partials of the 
human voice have nevertheless been heard at times by attentive observers. Bameau 
had heard them at the beginning of last century. And at a later period Seiler of 
Leipzig relates that while listening to the chant of the watchman during a sleepless 
night, he occasionally heard at first, when the watchman was at a distance, the 
Twelfth of the melody, and afterwards the prime tone. The reason of this difficulty 
f is most probably that we have all our lives remarked and observed the tones of 
the human voice more than any other, and always with the sole object of grasping 
it as a whole and obtaining a clear knowledge and perception of its manifold changes 
of quality. 

We may certainly assume that in the tones of the human larynx, as in all 
other reed instruments, the upper partial tones would decrease in force as they 
increase in pitch, if they could be observed without the resonance of the cavity of 
the mouth. In reality they satisfy this assumption tolerably well, for those vowels 
which are spoken with a wide funnel-shaped cavity of the mouth, as A [a in art\ or 
A [a in bat lengthened, which is nearly the same as a iabare]. But this relation is 
materiaUy altered by the resonance which takes place in the cavity of the mouth. 
The more this cavity is narrowed, either by the lips or the tongue, the more dis- 
tinctly marked is its resonance for tones of determinate pitch, and the more there- 
fore does this resonance reinforce those partials in the compound tone produced by 
^ the vocal chords, which approach the favoured pitch, and the more, on the contrary, 
will the others be damped. Hence on investigating the compound tones of the 
human voice by means of resonators, we find pretty uniformly that the first six to 
eight partials are clearly perceptible, but with very different degrees of force accord- 
ing to the different forms of the cavity of the mouth, sometimes screaming loudly 
into the ear, at others scarcely audible. 

Under these circumstances the investigation of the resonance of the cavity of 
the mouth is of great importance. The easiest and surest method of finding the 
tones to which the air in the oral cavity is tuned for the different shapes it assumes 



* [Probably these obflervations were made 
on the 'upper thick* register, because the 
chords are then more visible. It is evident 
that these theories do not apply to the lower 
thick, upper thin, and small registers, and 
scarcely to the lower thin, as described above, 
footnote, p. 101c. — Translator,] 



t[The German habit of beginning open 
vowels with the * check' or Arabic hamza, 
which IB very marked, and instantly charac- 
terises the nationality, is probably what is 
here alluded to, as occasioning a sensation of 
much greater pressure. This does not apply 
in the least to English speakers. — Translator,] 



CHAP. V. 7. 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



105 



in the production of vowels, is that which is used for glass bottles and other spaces 
filled with air. That is, tuning-forks of different pitches have to be struck and 
held before the opening of the air chamber — in the present case the open mouth 
— and the louder the proper tone of the fork is heard, the nearer does it corre- 
spond with one of the proper tones of the included mass of air.* Since the shape 
of the oral cavity can be altered at pleasure, it can always be made to suit the 
tone of any given tuning-fork, and we thus easily discover what shape the mouth 
must assume for its included mass of air to be tuned to a determinate pitch. 

Having a series of tuning-forks at command, I was thus able to obtain the 
following results : — 

The pitch of strongest resonance of the oral cavity depends solely upon the 
vowel for pronouncing which the mouth has been arranged, and alters considerably 
for even slight alterations in the vowel quality, such, for example, as occur in the 
different dialects of the same language. On the other hand, the proper tones of T 
the cavity of the mouth are nearly independent of age and sex. I have in general 
found the same resonances in men, women, and children. The want of space in 
the oral cavity of women and children can be easily replaced by a great closure of its 
opening, which will make the resonance as deep as in the larger oral cavities of men.f 

The vowels can be arranged in three series, according to the position of the 
parts of the mouth, which may be written thus, in accordance with Du Bois- 
Beymond the elder J : — 

E I 



k- 



u 



The vowel A [a in father, or Scotch a in man] forms the common origin of 
all three series. With this vowel corresponds a funnel-shaped resonance cavity, f 



* [See note * p. 876, on determining violin 
reaonanoe. One difficulty in the case of the 
mouth la that there is a constant tendency to 
vary the shape of the oral cavity. Another, as 
shown at the end of the note cited, is that 
the same irregular cavity, such as that of the 
mouth, often more or less reinforces a large 
number of different tones. As it was impor- 
tant for my phonetic researches, I have niiade 
many attempts to determine my own vowel 
resonances, but have hitherto failed in all my 
attempts. — TranalatorJ] 

t [Easily tried by more or less covering 
the top of a tumbler with the hand, till it 
resounds to any fork from c' to d" or higher. 
— Translator.] 

t Norddet^schs Zeitsehrift, edited by de 
la Motte Fouqu6, 1812. Kadmus oder aUge- 
meine Alphabetik^ von F. H. du Bois-Reymond, 
Berlin, 1862, p. 152. [This is the arrange- 
ment usually adopted. But in 1867 Mr. 
Melville Bell, an orthoepical teacher of many 
years' standing, who had been led profession- 
ally to pay great attention to the shapes of the 
mouth necessary to produce certain sounds, in 
his VisibU Speech; the Science of Universal 
Alphabetics (London: Simpkin, Marshall & 
Co., 4to, pp. z. 126, with sixteen lithographic 
tables), proposed a more elaborate methoid of 
classifying vowels by the shape of the mouth. 
He commenced with 9 positions of the tongue, 
consisting of 8 in which the middle, or as he 
terms it, * front' of the tongue was raised, 
highest for ea in seat^ not so high for a in scUe^ 
and lowest for a in sat ; 8 others in which the 
hacky instead of the middle, of the tongue 



was raised, highest for oo in snood, lower for o 
in node, and lowest for aio in gnawed (none of 
which three are determined by the position of 
the tongue aJone), and 3 intermediate posi- 
tions, where the whole tongue is raised almost 
evenly at three different elevations. These 9 
lingual positions might be accompanied with 
the ordinary or with increased distension of 
the pharynx, giving 9 primary and 9 * wide ' 
vowels. And each of the 18 vowels, thus 
produced, oould be ' rounded,' that is, modified 
by shading the mouth in various degrees with 
the lips. He thus obtains 86 distinct vowel 
cavities, among which almost all those used 
for vowel qualities in different nations may be 
placed. Subsequent research has shown how 
to extend this arrangement materially. See ^ 
my Early English Prommdation, part iv., 
1874, p. 1279. Also see generally my Pro- 
nunoiation for Singers (Curwen, 1877, pp. 246) 
and Speech in Song (Novello, 1878, pp. 140). 
German vowels differ materially in quality 
from the English, and consequently complete 
agreement between Prof. Helmholtz's obser- 
vations and those of any Englishman, who 
repeats his experiments, must hot be expected. 
I have consequently thought it better in this 
place to leave his German notation untrans- 
lated, and merely subjoin in parentheses the 
nearest English sounds. For the table in the 
text we may assume A to»a in father, or else 
Scotch a in man (different sounds), E to=0 in 
there, I to=« in machine, O to=o in more, U 
to=« in sure; and to'^eu in French j76tt 
or else in peuple (different sounds), and tf to 
=uin French ptt. — Translator.] 



106 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



PiLRT I. 



enlarging with tolerably uniformity from the larynx to the lips. For the vowels of 
the lower series, O [o in more] and U [oo in poor\ the opening of the mouth is 
contracted by means of the lips, more for U than for 0, while the cavity is enlarged 
as much as possible by depression of the tongue, so that on the whole it becomes 
like a bottle without a neck, with rather a narrow mouth, and a single unbroken 
cavity.^ The pitch of such a bottle-shaped chamber is lower the larger its cavity 
and the narrower its mouth. Usually only one upper partial with strong resonance 
can be clearly recognised ; when other proper tones exist they are comparatively 
very high, or have only weak resonance. In conformity with these results, obtained 
with glass bottles, we find that for a very deep hollow U [oo in poor nearly], where 
the oral cavity is widest and the mouth narrowest, the resonance is deepest and 
answers to the unaccented/. On passing from U to O [o in more nearly] the 
resonance gradually rises ; and for a full, ringing, pure O the pitch is b'\f. The 

f position of the mouth for O is peculiarly favourable for resonance, the opening of the 
mouth being neither too large nor too small, and the internal cavity sufficiently 
spacious. Hence it &h'\} tuning-fork be struck and held before the mouth while Oi 
is gently uttered, or the O-position merely assumed without really speaking, the tonej 
of the fork will resound so fully and loudly that a large audience can hear it. The 
usual a' tuning-fork of musicians may also be used for this purpose, but then it will be 
necessary to make a somewhat duller O, if we wish to bring out the full resonance. 
On gradually bringing the shape of the mouth from the position proper to O, 
through those due to O* [nearly o in cot, with rather more of the O sound], and A** 
[nearly au in caiMght, with rather more of the A sound] into that for A [Scotch a 
in man, with rather more of an O quality in it than English a in father], the 
resonance gradually rises an Octave, and reaches 5"[>. This tone corresponds with 
the North German A ; the somewhat brighter A [a in father] of the English and 
Italians, rises up to d"\ or a major Third higher. It is particularly remarkable what 

IT little differences in pitch correspond to very sensible varieties of vowel quality in 
the neighbourhood of A ; and I should therefore recommend philologists who wish 
to define the vowels of different languages to fix them by the pitch of loudest 
resonance.f 

For the vowels already mentioned I have not been able to detect any second 
proper tone, and the analogy of the phenomena presented by artificial resonance 
chambers of similar shapes would hardly lead us to expect any of sensible loudness. 



*[Thi8 depressed position of the tongue 
answers better for English aw in saw than for 
either o in more or oo in poor. For the o the 
tongue is slightly more raised, especially at the 
back, while for English oo the back of the 
tongue is almost as high as for k, and greatly 
impedes the oral cavity. If, however, the 
tongue be kept in the position for aw by sound- 
ir ing this vowel, and, while sounding it steadily, 
the lips be gradually contracted, the sound 
will be found to pass through certain obscure 
qualities of tone till it suddenly comes out 
clearly as a sound a little more like aw than o 
in more (really the Danish oa), and then again 
passing through other obscure phases, comes 
out again clearly as a deep sound, not so bright 
as our 00 in poor, but more resembling the 
Swedish o to which it will reach if the tongue 
be slightly raised into the A position. It is 
necessary to bear these facts in mind when 
following the text, where U is only almost, not 
quite =00 in poor, which is the long sound of u 
in pull, and is duller than oo in pool or French 
ou in poule, — Translator,] 

t [Great difficulties lie in the way of carry- 
ing out this recommendation. The ear of 
philologists and even of those who are readily 



able to discriminate vowel sounds, is frequently 
not acute for differences of pitch. The deter- 
mination of the pitch even under favour- 
able circumstances is not easy, especially, as it 
will be seen, for the higher pitches. Without 
mechanical appliances even good ears are 
deceived in the Octave. The differences of 
pitch noted by Helmholtz, Donders, Merkel, 
and Koenig, as given on p. 109d, probably point 
to fundamental differences of pronunciation, 
and show the desirability of a very extensive 
series of experiments being carried out with 
special apparatus, by an operator with an 
extremely acute musical ear, on speakers of 
various nationalities and also on various 
speakers of the same nationality. Great diffi- 
culty will even then be experienced on account 
of the variability of the same speaker in his 
vowel quality for differences of pitch and 
expression, the want of habit to maintain the 
position of the mouth unmoved for a sufficient 
length of time to complete an observation 
satisfactorily, and, worst of all, the involuntary 
tendency of the organs to accommodate them- 
selves to the pitch of the fork presented . Com,- 
pare note * p. 106c. — Translator.] 



CHAP. V. 7. VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 107 

Experiments hereafter described show that the resonance of this single tone is 
sufficient to characterise the vowels above mentioned. 

The second series of vowels consists of A, A, B, I. The lips are drawn so far 
apart that they no longer contract the issuing stream of air, but a fresh constric- 
tion is formed between the front (middle) parts of the tongue and the hard palate, 
the space immediately above the larynx being widened by depressing the root of 
the tongue, and hence causing the larynx to rise simultaneously. The form of the 
oral cavity consequently resembles a bottle with a narrow neck. The belly of the 
bottle is behind, in the pharynx, and its neck is the narrow passage between the 
upper surface of the tongue and the hard palate. In the above series of letters, 
A, E, I, these changes increase until for I the internal cavity of the bottle is greatest 
and the neck narrowest. For A [the broadest French t, broader than e, in tlMfre, 
and nearly as broad as a in hat lengthened, with which the name of their city is 
pronounced by the natives of Bath], the whole channel is, however, tolerably wide, IT 
so that it is quite easy to see down to the larynx when the laryngoscope is used. 
Indeed this vowel gives the very best position of the mouth for the application of 
this instrument, because the root of the tongue, which impedes the view when A 
is uttered, is depressed, and the observer can see over and past it. 

When a bottle with a long narrow neck is used as a resonance chamber, two 
simple tones are readily discovered, of which one can be regarded as the proper 
tone of the belly, and the other as that of the neck of the bottle. Of course the 
air in the belly cannot vibrate quite independently of that in the neck, and both 
proper tones in question must consequently be different, and indeed somewhat 
deeper than they would be if belly and neck were separate and had their resonance 
examined independently. The neck is approximately a short pipe open at both 
ends. To be sure, its inner end debouches into the cavity of the bottle instead of 
the open air, but if the neck is very narrow, and the belly of the bottle very wide, 
the latter may be looked upon in some respects as an open space with regard to the IT 
vibrations of the air inclosed in the neck. These conditions are best satisfied for 
I, in which the length of the channel between tongue and palate, measured from 
the upper teeth to the back edge of the bony palate, is about 6 centimetres [2*36 
inches]. An open pipe of this length when blown would give e"", while the 
observations made for determining the tone of loudest resonance for I gives nearly 
d!^*\ which is as close an agreement as could possibly have been expected in such 
an irregularly shaped pipe as that formed by the tongue and palate. 

In accordance with these experiments the vowels A, E, I, have each a higher 
and a deeper resonance tone. The higher tones continue the ascending series of 
the proper tones of the vowels U, O, A. By means of tuning-forks I found for A 
a tone between ^'" and a'"lj, and for B the tone 6'"|7. I had no fork suitable for 
I, but by means of the whistling noise of the air, to be considered presently 
(p. 1085), its proper tone was determined with tolerable exactness to be d!^^\ 

The deeper proper tones which are due to the back part of the oral cavity are IT 
rather more difficult to discover. Tuning-forks may be used, but the resonance is 
comparatively weak, because it must be conducted through the long narrow neck 
of the air chamber. It must further be remembered that this resonance only 
occurs during the time that the corresponding vowel is gently whispered, and dis- 
appears as soon as the whisper ceases, because the form of the chamber on which 
the resonance depends then immediately changes. The tuning-forks after being 
struck must be brought as close as possible to the opening of. the air chamber 
which lies behind the upper teeth. By this means I found d" for A and/' for E. 
For I, direct observation with tuning-forks was not possible ; but from the upper 
partial tones, I conclude that its proper tone is as deep as that of U, or near/. 
Hence, when we pass from A to I, these deeper proper tones of the oral cavity sink, 
and the higher ones rise in pitch. "^ 

* [Mr. Graham Bell, the inventor of the mentioned (p. 105e2, note), was in the habit of 
Telephone, son of the Mr. Melville Bell already bringing out this fact by placing his mouth in 



108 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



TAST I. 



For the third series of vowels from A through [French eu in peu, or the 
deeper eu in peuple], towards t) pBVench u in pu, which is rather deeper than the 
German sound], we have the same internal positions of the mouth as in the last- 
named series of vowels. For U the mouth is placed in nearly the same position 
as for a vowel lying between E and I, and for O as for an E which inclines towards 
A. In addition to the constriction between the tongue and palate as in the second 
series, we have also a constriction of the lips, which are made into a sort of tube, 
forming a front prolongation of that made by the tongue and palate. The air 
chamber of the mouth, therefore, in this case also resembles a bottle with a neck, 
but the neck is longer than for the second series of vowels. For I the neck was 
6 centimetres (2*36 inches) long, for t), measured from the front edge of the upper 
teeth to the commencement of the soft palate, it is 8 centimetres (315 inches). 
The pitch of the higher proper tone corresponding to the resonance of the neck 

T must be, therefore, about a Fourth deeper than for I. If both ends were free, a pipe 
of this length would give b"\ according to the usual calculation. In reality it 
resounded for a fork lying between g"' and a"'\}, a divergence similar to that 
found for I, and also probably attributable to the back end of the tube debouching 
into a wider but not quite open space. The resonance of the back space has to be 
observed in the same way as for the I series. For O it is/', the same as for E, 
and for U it is/, the same as for I. 

The fact that the cavity of the mouth for different vowels is tuned to different 
pitches was first discovered by Donders,* not with the help of tuning-forks, but by 
the whistling noise produced in the mouth by whispering. The cavity of the 
mouth thus reinforces by its resonance the corresponding tones of the windrush, 
which are produced partly in the contracted glottis,f and partly in the forward 
contracted passages of the mouth. In this way it is not usual to obtain a complete 
musical tone ; this only happens, without sensible change of the vowel, for tJ and 

T U, when a real whistle is produced. This, however, would be a fault in speaking. 
We have rather only such a degree of reinforcement of the noise of the air as 
occurs in an organ pipe, which does not speak well, either from a badly-constructed 
lip or an insufficient pressure of wind. A noise of this kind, although not brought 
up to being a complete musical tone, has nevertheless a tolerably determinate 
pitch, which can be estimated by a practised ear. But, as in all cases where tones 
of very different qualities have to be compared, it is easy to make a mistake in the 
Octave. However, after some of the important pitches have been determined by 



the raqaired positionB and then tapping against 
a finger placed juat in front of the upper teeth, 
for the higher resonance, and placed against 
the neck, just ahove the larynx, for the lower. 
He obligingly perf oimed the experimentseveral 
times privately before me, and the successive 
alteratlona and differences in their direction 
Twere striking. The tone was dull and like 
a wood harmonica. Considerable dexterity 
seemed necessary to produce the effect, and I 
could not succeed in doing so. He carried out 
the experiment much further than is suggested 
in the text, embracing the whole nine positions 
of the tongue in his father*s vowel scheme, 
and obtaining a double resonance in each case. 
This fact is stated, and the various vowel 
theories appreciated in Mr. Graham Bell's 
paper on * Vowel Theories* read before the 
American National Academy of Arts and 
Sciences, April 15, 1879, and printed in the 
American Journal of Otology^ vol. i. July 
1879.— TVoimJ^i tor.] 

^Archiv fUr dta Homndischen B^itrage 
fUr Natur- tmd HetikutuU von Donders und 
Berlin, vol. i. p. 167. Older incomplete obser- 
vations of the same circumstance in Samuel 
Keyher*s Math^ii Mosaica^ Kiel, 1619. — 



Ghr. Hellwag, De Formations Loquelaa Dias,, 
Tubingaet 1710. — F15rcke, Neus Berliner 
Monatssckrift, Sept. 1803, Frfb. 1804 —Olivier 
Ortho-epo-graphisches Elementar-Werk^ 1804, 
part iii. p. 21. 

t In whispering, the vocal chords are kept 
close, but the air passes through a small 
triangular opening at the back part of the 
glottis between the arytenoid cartilages. [Ac- 
cording to Czermak (^itsungiberichte, Wiener 
Akad., Math.-Naturw. 01. April, 29, 1858, 
p. 576) the vocal chords as seen through the 
laryngoscope are not quite close for whisper, 
but are nicked in the middle. Merkel (Die 
Funktionen des menschlichen Schlund- und 
Kehlkopfes. . . . nach eigenen pharyngo- und 
laryngoskopischen Untersuchungen, Leipzig, 
1862, p. 77) distinguishes two kinds of whisper- 
ing : (1) the loud, in which the opening between 
the chords is from J to f of a line wide, pro- 
ducing no resonant vibrations, and that between 
the arytenoids is somewhat wider; (2) the 
gentle, in which the vowel is commenced as in 
loud speaking, with closed glottis, and, after it 
has begun, the back part of the glottis is 
opened, while the chords remain close and 
motionless. — Translator.] 



CHAP. V. 7. 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



109 



tuning-forks, and others, as tt and 0, by allowing the whisper to pass into a 
regular whistle, the rest are easily determined by arranging them in a melodic 
progression vdth the first. Thus the series : — 



Clear A 


A 


E 


I 


[a in fathsr] 
d'" 


[a in mat] 

g"' 


[e in th$re] 


[i in machine] 
d"" 



forms an ascending minor chord of g in the second Inversion f , [with the Fifth in 
the bass,] and can be readily compared with the same melodic progression on the 
pianoforta I was able to determine the pitch for clear A, A, and E by tuning- 
forks, and hence to fix that for I alsa* 



* The statements of Dondera differ slightly 
from mine, partly because they have reference 
to Dutch pronunciation, while mine refer to 
the North German vowels ; and partly because 



Donders, not having been assisted by tuning- ■ 
forks, was not always able to determine with 
certainty to what Octave the noises he heard 
should be assigned. 



Vowel 


Pitch accord- 
ing to 
Danders 


Pitch accord- 
ing to 
Helmholtz 


U 

A 


£ 
I 


• 

b'\, 

gi 

a" 

«"* 


{f*' to a'"b 



[*The extreme divergence of results ob- 
tained by difierent investigators shows the in- 
herent difficulties of the determination, which 
(as already indicated) arise partly from difier- 
ent values attributed to the vowels, partly from 
the difficulty of retaining the form of the mouth 
steadily for a sufficient time, partly from the 
wide range of tones which the same cavity of 
the mouth will more or less reinforce, partly 
from the difficulty of judging of absolute pitch 
in general, and especially of the absolute pitch 
of a scarcely musical whisper, and other causes. 
In G. L. Merkel's Physiologis der menseh- 
Uchen Sprache (Leipzig, 1866), p. 47, a table is 
given of the results of Beyher, Hellwag, 
Florcke, and Donders (the latter differing ma- 
terially from that just given by Prof. Helm- 
holtz), and on Merkel's p. 109, he adds his last 



results. These are reproduced in the following ^ 
table with the notes, and their pitch to the ■ 
nearest vibration, taking a' 440, and supposing 
equal temperament. To these I add the re- 
sults of Donders, as just given, and of Helm- 
holtz, both with pitches simUarly assumed. 
Eoenig {Comptes Bendus, April 25, 1870) also 
gives his pitches with exact numbers, reckoned 
as Octaves of the 7th harmonic of c' 256, and 
hence called 6|^, although they are nearer the 
a of this standard. Reference should also be 
made to Dr. Koenig's paper on *Manometric 
Flames ' translated in the PhUosophieal MoffO- 
Bine, 1878, vol. xlv. pp. 1-18, 105-114. Lastly, 
Dr. Moritz Trautmann {Anglia, vol. 1. p. 690) 
very confidently gives results utterly different 
from all the above, which I subjoin with the 
pitch as before. I give the general form of 







Table 


OF VowsL Rbsonanges. 








ObBerver. 


U 





A 


A 


£ 


I 


tJ 





1. Beyher . . 


clSl 


d|l56 


a 220^ 
c'262/ 


(Z|l66 


/349 


c"528 






a. Hellwag . 


cl81 


cS189 


/J 185 


a 220 


6 247 


c'262 


61^233 


df208 
/380 


8. Florcke. . 


clSl 


gl96 


c' 262 


<7'892 


a' 440 


c"523 


^'892 


4. Donders ac- ^ 


















cording to - 


/'349 


d'29i 


b'\, 466 


g"' 1568 


c"'| 1109 


/'" 1897 


a" 880 


^196? 


Helmholtz .. 








+ d"587 








5. Donders ac-^ 


















cording to - 


1651 


eieb 


6 247 




c'262 


/'698 


a' 440 


^196 


Merkel . . 


/176/ 
U,/175 
















6. Hblmholts 


6^466 


6"|^932 


g'" 1568 


b'" 1976 


d"" 2849 


^"1568 


c'"8 1109 




Ou,/849 






+d"587 


+ /'349 


+/175 


+/175 


-H/349 


7. Merkel . . 


dU7 


yjfl85 


A,a220 


d" 587 


E\ d" 587 


a" 880 


a' 440 


/J 870 






Oa,^196 


A,6247 


or a' 440 


E', e" 669 






or d'294 


8. Koenig, 7th 


















harmonics . 


6k 224 


b' y 448 


6" ^96 




6"> 1792 


6""k3584 
/""^2794 






9. Trautmann 


/'698 


O\c"'1047 


/"1397 


=E^? 


E\a"' 1760 


b'" 1976 


6 g"' 1568 






0', a" 880 






E',c""2093 






0',a'"1760 



110 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



PABT I. 



For U it is also by no means easy to find the pitch of the resonanoe by a fork, 
as the smallness of the opening makes the resonance weak. Another phenomenon 
has guided me in this case. If I sing the scale from c upwards, uttering the vowel 
U for each note, and taking care to keep the quality of the vowel correct, and not 
allowing it to pass into O,* I feel the agitation of the air in the mouth, and even 
on the drums of both ears, where it excites a tickling sensation, most powerfully 
when the voice reaches/. As soon as/ is passed the quality changes, the strong 
agitation of the air in the mouth and the tickling in the ears ceasa For the note 
/ the phenomenon in this case is the same as if a spherical resonance chamber 
were placed before a tongue of nearly the same pitch as its proper tone. In this 
case also we have a powerful agitation of the air within the sphere and a sudden 
alteration of quality of tone, on passing from a deeper pitch of the mass of air 
through that of the tongue to a higher. The resonance of the mouth for U is thus 
1 fixed at / with more certainty than by means of tuning-forks. But we often meet 
with a U of higher resonance, more resembling O, which I will represent by the 
French Ou. Its proper tone may rise as high as /'.f The resonance of the cav- 
ity of the mouth for different vowels may then be expressed in the notes as follows : 

/ / b'\^ 6"b g"' b'" d"" c"'jt (f" 

d" Tin 



% 



%- 



I 






X~*"~r 



I 



1^ 



I t 



UOuOAAE lOtJ 

T The mode in which the resonance of the cavity of the mouth acts upon the 
quality of the voice, is then precisely the same as that which we discovered to 
exist for artificially constructed reed pipes. All those partial tones are reinforced 
which coincide with a proper tone of the cavity of the mouth, or have a pitch 
sufficiently near to that of such a tone, while the other partial tones will be more 
or less damped. The damping of those partial tones which are not strengthened 
is the more striking the narrower the opening of the mouth,^ either between the 
lips as for U, or between the tongue and palate as for I and U. 

These differences in the partial tones of the different vowel sounds can be easily 
and clearly recognised by means of resonators, at least within the once and twice 
accented Octaves [264 to 1056 vib.]. For example, apply a,b'\^ resonator to the 
ear, and get a bass voice, that can preserve pitch well and form its vowels with 
purity, to sing the series of vowels to one of the harmonic under tones of b'\fy such 
as b\}j e|>, ^1^, Gb, JSb. It will be found that for a pure, full-toned O the b'\} of 

IT the resonator will bray violently into the ear. The same upper partial tone is 
still very powerful for a clear A and a tone intermediate between A and O, but is 
weaker for A, E, 0, and weakest of all for U and I. It will also be found that 
the resonance of O is materially weakened if it is taken too dull, approaching U, 



the vowel at the head of each column, and 
when the writer distinguishes different forms 
I add them immediately before the resonance 
note. Thus we have Helmholtz's Ou between 
U and O ; Merkel's Qa between O and A, his 
obscure A\ E' and clear A', E' ; Trautmann^s 
O^ = Italian open O, and (as he says) English 
a in all (which is, however, slightly different), 
0' ordinary o in Berliner ohne, E' Berlin 
Schnee, E' French pSre (the same as A ?), & 
Berlin schtiriy French peu, C French leur. Of 
course this is far from exhausting the list of 
vowels in actual use. — Tr(knsl(Uor.] 



* [That is, according to the previous direc- 
tions, to keep the tongue altogether depressed, 
in the position for aw in gnaw, which is not 
natural for an Englishman, bo that for English 
00 in too we may expect the result to be ma- 
terially different. — Translator.] 

t [Prof. Helmholtz may mean the Swedish 
o, see note* p. 10C<i. The following words im- 
mediately preceding the notes, which occur 
in the Srd German edition, appear to have 
been accidentally omitted in the 4th. They 
are, however, retained as they seem necessary. 
— Translator,] 



CHAP. V. 7. 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



Ill 



or too open, becoming A**. But if the b"\^ resonator be used, which is an Octave 
higher, it is the vowel A that excites the strongest sympathetic resonance ; while O, 
which was so powerful with the b'\} resonator, now produces only a slight effect. 

For the high upper partials of A, E, I, no resonators can be made which are 
capable of sensibly reinforcing them. We are, then, driven principally to observa- 
tions made with the unassisted ear. It has cost me much trouble to determine these 
strengthened partial tones in the vowels, and I was not acquainted with them when 
my previous accounts were published.* They are best observed in high notes of 
women's voices, or the falsetto of men's voices. The upper partials of high notes 
in that part of the scale are not so nearly of the same pitch as those of deeper notes, 
and hence they are more readily distinguished. On b% for example, women's 
voices could easily bring out all the vowels, with a full quality of tone, but at 
higher pitches the choice is more limited. When 6'b ^ sung, then, the Twelfth/"' 
is heard for the broad A, the double Octave b"'\f for E, the high Third d"" for 1, 1 
all clearly, the last even piercingly. [See table on p. 124, note.] f 

Further, I should observe, that the table of notes given on the preceding page, 
relates only to those kinds of vowels which appear to me to have the most cha- 
racteristic quality of tone, but that in addition to these, all intermediate stages 
are possible, passing insensibly from one to the other, and are actually used partly 
in dialects, partly by particular individuals, partly in peculiar pitches while singing, 
or to give a more decided character while whispering. 

It is easy to recognise, and indeed is sufiGiciently well known, that the vowels 
with a single resonance from U through O to clear A can be altered in continuous 
succession. But I wish further to remark, since doubts have been thrown on the 
deep resonance I have assigned to IT, that when I apply to my ear a resonator 
tuned to f, and, singing upon / or B\} as the fundamental tone, try to find the 
vowel resembling IT which has the strongest resonance, it does not answer to a 
dull U, but to a U on the way to O.J IT 

Then again transitions are possible between the vowels of the A — O — IT series 
and those of the A — — tl series, as well as between the last named and those of 
the A — E — I series. I can begin on the position for U, and gradually transform 
the cavity of the mouth, already narrowed, into the tube-like forms for and t!, 
in which case the high resonance becomes more distinct and at the same time 
higher, the narrower the tube is made. If we make this transition while applying 
a resonator between b'\} and b"\f to the ear, we hear the loudness of the tone 
increase at a certain stage of the transition, and then diminish again. The higher 
the resonator, the nearer must the vowel approach to or tt. With a proper 
position of the mouth the reinforced tone may be brought up to a whistle. Also 
in a gentle whisper, where the rustle of the air in the larynx is kept very weak, so 
that with vowels having a narrow opening of the mouth it can be scarcely heard, a 
strong fricative noise in the opening of the mouth is often required to make the 
vowel audible. That is to say, we then make the vowels more like their related IT 
consonants, English W and German J [English Y]. 

Generally speaking the vowels ^ with double resonance admit of numerous 
modifications, because any high pitch of one of the resonances may combine with 
any low pitch of the other. This is best studied by applying a resonator to the 
ear and trying to find the corresponding vowel degrees in the three series which 
reinforce its tone, and then endeavouring to pass from one of these to the other in 
such a way that the resonator should have a reinforced tone throughout. 



* Oelehrte Anxeigen der Bayerisohen Ak<i- 
demie der Wisaenschaften, June 18, 1859. 

t [The passage ' In these experiments ' 
to * too deep to be sensible/ pp. 166-7 of the 
1st English edition, is here cancelled, and 
p. 1115, ' Further, I should observe/ to p. 116a, 
* high tones of A, £, I,' inserted in its place 
IroxQ the dth German edition. — Tra/nAlaiiyr^'] 



X [An U sound verging towards O is gener- 
ally conceived to be duller not brighUr, by 
English writers, but here U is taken as the 
dullest vowel. This remark is made merely 
to prevent confusion with English readers. — 
TranslcUorJ] 

§ [Misprinted Consonanten in th9 Qerman, 
— TranaUUor,] 



112 VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. pabt i. 

Thus the resonator b'\^ answers to O, to an So and to an E which resembles A, 
and these sounds may pass continuously one into the other. 

The resonator / answers to the transition Ou — 6 — E. The resonator (i" to 
Oa — Ao — A. In a similar manner each of the higher tones may be connected 
with various deeper tones. Thus assuming a position of the mouth which would 
give «'" for whistling, we can, without changing the pitch of the fricative sound in 
the mouth, whisper a vowel inclining to O or inclining to tj, by allowing the 
fricative sound in the larynx to have a higher or deeper resonance in the back part 
of the mouth.* 

In comparing the strength of the upper partials of different vowels by means of 
resonators, it is further to be remembered, that the reinforcement by means of the 
resonance of the mouth affects the prime tone of the note produced by the voice, 
as well as the upper partials. And as it is especially the vibrations of the prime, 
T which by their reaction on the vocal chords retain these in regular vibratory motion, 
the voice speaks much more powerfully, when the prime itbclf receives such a 
reinforcement This is especially observable in those parts of the scale which 
the singer reaches with difficulty. It may also be noted with reed pipes having 
metal tongues. When a resonance pipe is applied to them tuned to the tone of the 
tongue, or a little higher, extraordinarily powerful and rich tones are produced, by 
means of strong pressure but little wind, and the tongue oscillates in large ex- 
cursions either way. The pitch of a metal tongue becomes a little flatter than 
before. This is not perceived with the human voice because the singer is able to 
regulate the tension of the vocal chords accordingly. Thus I find distinctly that 
at b'\}y the extremity of my falsetto voice, I can sing powerfully an O, an A, and an 
A on the way to 0, which have their resonance at this pitch, whereas U, if it is 
not made to come very near O, and I, are dull and uncertain, with the expenditure 
of more air than in the former case. Begard must be had to this circumstance in 
1 experiments on the strength of upper partials, because those of a vowel which speaks 
powerfully, may become proportionally too powerful, as compared with those of a 
vowel which speaks weakly. Thus I have found that the high tones of the soprano 
voice which lie in the reinforcing region of the vowel A at the upper extremity of 
the doubly-accented [or one-foot] Octave, when sung to the vowel A, exhibit their 
higher Octave more strongly than is the case for the vowels E and I, which do not 
speak so well although the latter have their strong resonance at the upper end of 
the thrice-accented [or six-inch] Octave. 

It has been already remarked (p. 39c) that the strength and amplitude of 
sympathetic vibration is affected by the mass and boundaries of the body which 
vibrates sympathetically. A body of considerable mass which can perform its 
vibrations as much as possible without any hindrance from neighbouring bodies, 
and has not its motion damped by the internal friction of its parts, after it has 
once been excited, can continue to vibrate for a long time, and consequently, if it 
IT has to be set in the highest degree of sympathetic vibration, the oscillations of the 
exciting tone must, for a comparatively long time, coincide with those proper 
. vibrations excited in itself. That is to say, the highest degree of sympathetic 
resonance can be produced only by using tones which lie within very narrow limits 
of pitch. This is the case with tuning-forks and bells. The mass of air in the 
.^ cavity of the mouth, on the other b^bud, has but slight density and mass, its walls, 
so far as they are composed of soft parts, are not capable of offering much resist- 
ance, are imperfectly elastic, and when put in vibration have much internal friction 
to stop their motion. Moreover the vibrating mass of air inr the cavity of the 
mouth communicates through the orifice of the mouth with the outer air, to which 
it rapidly gives off large parts of the motion it has received. For this reason a 

* This appears to me to meet the objec- my attention to the habit of using suoh devia- 
tions which were made by Herr G. Engel, in tions from the usual qualities of vowels in 
Beichart's and Dn Bois-Reymond^s Archive syllables which are briefly uttered. 
1869, pp. 317-319. Herr J. Stockhausen drew 



OHAP. V. 7. 



MODIFICATIONS OF VOWEL QUALITIES. 



113 



vibratory motion once excited in the air filling the cavity of the mouth is very 
rapidly extinguished, as any one may easily observe by filliping his cheek with a 
finger when the mouth is put into different vowel positions. We thus very easily 
distinguish the pitch of the resonance for the various transitional degrees from O 
towards U in one direction and towards A in the other. But the tone dies away 
rapidly. The various resonances of the cavity of the mouth can also be made 
audible by rapping the teeth. Just for this reason a tone, which oscillates approxi- 
mately in agreement with the few vibrations of such a brief resonance tone, will be 
reinforced by sympathetic vibration to an extent not much less than another tone 
which exactly coincides with the first ; and the range of tones which can thus 
be sensibly reinforced by a given position of the mouth, is rather considerable.* 
This is confirmed by experiment. When I apply a 6'[> resonator to the right, 
and an/' resonator to the left ear and sing the vowel O on J9|>, I find a reinforce- 
ment not only of the 4th partial b'\} which answers to the proper tone of the T 
cavity of the mouth, but also, very perceptibly, though considerably less, of /', 
the 6th partial, also. If I then change O into an A, until /' finds its strongest 
resonance, the reinforcement of b'\} does not entirely disappear although it becomes 
much less. 

The position of the mouth from O to O^ appears to be that which is most 
favourable for the length of its proper tone and the production of a resonance 
limited to a very narrow range of pitch. At least, as I have before remarked, for 
this position the reinforcement of a suitable tuning-fork is most powerful, and tap- 
ping the cheek or the hps gives the most distinct tone. If then for the rein- 
forcement by resonance extends to the interval of a Fifth, the intervals wUl be still 
greater for the other vowels. With this agree experiments. Apply any resonator 
to the ear, take a suitable under tone, sing the different vowels to this under tone, and 
let one vowel melt into another. The greatest reinforcements by resonance take 
place on that vowel or those vowels, for which one of the characteristic tones in 1 
the diagram p. 1006 coincides with the proper tone of the resonator. But more or 
less considerable reinforcement is also observed for such vowels as have their charac- 
teristic tones at moderate differences of pitch from the proper tone of the resonator, 
and the reinforcement will be less the greater these differences of pitch. 

By this means it becomes possible in general to distinguish the vowels from 
each other even when the note to which they are sung is not precisely one of the 
harmonic under tones of the vowels. From the second partial tone onwards, the 
intervals are narrow enough for one or two of the partials to be distinctly reinforced 
by the resonance of the mouth. It is only when the proper tone of the cavity of 
the mouth falls midway between the prime tone of the note sung by the voice and 
its higher Octave, or is more than a Fifth deeper than that prime tone, that the 
characteristic resonance will be weak. 

Now in speaking, both sexes choose one of the deepest positions of their voice. 
Men generally choose the upper half of the great (or eight-foot) Octave; and If 
women the upper half of the small (or four-foot) Octave, j- With the exception of 
U, which admits of fluctuations in its proper tone of nearly an Octave, all these 
pitches of the speaking voice have the corresponding proper tones of the cavity 
of the mouth situated within sufficiently narrow intervals from the upper partials of 
the speaking tone to create sensible resonance of one or more of these partials, 
and thus characterise the vowel.^ To this must be added that the speaking voice, 
probably through great pressure of the vocal ligaments upon one another, converting 



*0n this subject see Appendix X., and 
the corresponding investigation in the text in 
Part I. Chap. YI. therein referred to. 

t [That 18 both use their * lower thick * 
register, as described in the note p. lOld, but 
are an Octave apart. — Translator,] 

:^ [Observe here that the quality of the 
vowel tone is not made to consist in the identity 



of certain of its partiaJs with exact pitches 
but in their coming near enough to those 
pitches to receive reinforcement, and that the 
character of a vowel quality of tone, like that 
of all qualities of tone, depends not on the 
absolute pitch, but on the relative force of the 
upper partials. As Prof. Helmholtz's theory 
has often been grievously misunderstood, I 

I 



114 



MODIFICATIONS OF VOWEL QUALTTIBS. 



PABT X. 



them into striking reeds, has a jarring quality of tone, that is, possesses stronger 
upper partials than the singing voice. 

In singing, on the other hand, especially at higher pitches, conditions are less 
favourable for the characterisation of vowels. Every one knows that it is generally 
much more dijQ&cult to understand words when sung than when spoken, and that 
the difficulty is less with male than with female voices, each having been equally well 
cultivated. Were it otherwise, ' books of the words ' at operas and concerts would 
be unnecessary. Above /', the characterisation of U becomes imperfect even if it 
is closely assimilated to O. But so long as it remains the only vowel of indetermi- 
nate sound, and the remainder allow of sensible reinforcement of their upper partials 
in certain regions, this negative character will distinguish U. On the other hand 
a soprano voice in the neighbourhood of/' should not be able to clearly distinguish 
U, O, and A ; and this agrees with my own experience. On singing the three vowels 

IT in immediate succession, the resonance /" for A will, however, be still somewhat 
clearer in the cavity of the mouth when tuned for b'% than when it is tuned to 6'|^ 
for O. The soprano voice will in this case be able to make the A clearer, by eleva- 
ting the pitch of the cavity of the mouth towards d'" and thus making it approach 
to f". The O, on the other hand, can be separated from U by approaching O^^, and 
giving the prime more decisive force. Nevertheless these vowels, if not sung in 
immediate succession, will not be very clearly distinguished by a listener who is 
unacquainted with the mode of pronouncing the vowels that the soprano singer 
uses.* 

A. further means of helping to diacrimix&ate-vawels, moreover, is found in com- 
mencing them powerfully. This depends upon a general relation in bodies excited 
to sympathetic vibration. Thus, if we excite sympathetic vibration in a suitable 
body with a tone somewhat different from its proper tone, by commencing it suddenly 
with great power, we hear at first, in addition to the exciting tone which is rein- 

f forced by resonance, the proper tone of the sympathetically vibrating body.f But 
the latter soon dies away, while the first remains. In the case of tuning-forks with 
large resonator, we can even hear beats between the two tones. Apply a 6' [> resonator 
to the ear, and commence singing the vowel O powerfully on ^, of which the upper 
partials g' and d" have only a weak lasting resonance in the cavity of the mouth, 
and you may hear immediately at the commencement of the vowel, a short sharp 
beat between the b'\f of the cavity of the mouth and of the resonator. On selecting 
another vowel, this b'\} vanishes, which shows that the pitch of the cavity of the 
mouth helps to generate it. In this case then also the sudden commencement of 
the tones g' and d" belonging to the compound tone of the voice, excites the inter- 
mediate proper tone b'\} of the cavity of the mouth, which rapidly fades. The 
same thing may be observed for other pitches of the resonator used, when we sing 
notes, powerfully commenced, which have upper partials that are not reinforced by 
the resonator, provided that a vowel is chosen with a characteristic pitch which 

% answers to the pitch of the resonator. Hence it results that when any vowel in 
any pitch is powerfully commenced, its characteristic tone becomes audible as a 
short beat. By this means the vowel may be distinctly characterised at the 
moment of commencement, even when it becomes intermediate on long con- 
tinuance. But for this purpose, as already remarked, an exact and energetic com- 
mencement is necessary. How much such a commencement assists in rendering 
the words of a singer intelligible is well known. For this reason also the vocal- 
isation of the briefly-uttered words of a reciting parlando, is more distinct than 
that of sustained song4 



draw particular attention to the point in this 
place. See also the table which I have added 
in a footnote on p. 12Ad, — Translator.] 

* [In my Pronunciation for Singers (Cur- 
wen, 1877), and my Speech in Song (Novello, 
1878) I have endeavoured to give a popular 
explanation of the alterations which a singer 



may make in the vowels in English, German, 
French and Italian, at different pitches, so as 
to remain intelligible. — Translator.] 

t See the mathematical statement of this pro- 
cess in App. IX., remarks on equations 4 to 46. 

X The facts here adduced meet, I think, the 
objections brought against my vowel theory by 



CHAP. V. 7. CHARACTERISTIOS OF VOWELS. 116 

Moreover vowels admit of other kinds of alterations in their qualities of tone, 
conditioned by alterations of their characteristic tones within certain limits. Thus 
the resonating capability of the cavity of the mouth may undergo in general altera- 
tions in strength and definition, which would render the character of the various 
vowels and their difference from one another in general more or less conspicuous 
or obscure. Flaccid soft walls in any passage with sonorous masses of air, are 
generally prejudicial to the force of the vibrations. Partly too much of the motion 
is given off to the outside through the soft masses, partly too much is destroyed by 
friction within them. Wooden organ pipes have a less energetic quality of tone 
than metal ones, and those of pasteboard a still duller quaUty, even when the 
mouthpiece remains unaltered. The walls of the human throat, and the cheeks, 
are, however, much more yielding than pasteboard. Hence if the tone of the voice 
with all its partials is to meet with a powerful resonance and come out unweakened, 
these most flaccid parts of the passage for our voice, must be as much as possible IT 
thrown out of action, or else rendered elastic by tension, and in addition the passage 
must be made as short and wide as possible. The last is effected by raising the 
larynx. The soft wall of the cheeks can be almost entirely avoided, by taking care 
that the rows of teeth are not too far apart. The lips, when their co-operation is 
not necessary, as it is for and U, may be held so far apart that the sharp firm 
edges of the teeth define the orifice of the mouth. For A the angles of the mouth 
can be drawn entirely aside. For they can be firmly stretched by the muscles 
above and below them {levator anguli oris and Pria/ngulari$ menti), which then feel 
like stretched cords to the touch, and can be thus pressed against the teeth, so that 
this part of the margin of the orifice of the mouth is also made sharp and capable 
of resisting. 

In the attempt to produce a clear energetic tone of the voice we also become 
aware of the tension of a large number of muscles lying in front of the throat, 
both those which he between the under jaw and the tongue-bone and help to form f 
the floor of the cavity of the mouth {mylohyoideuSt geniohyoideics, and perhaps 
also biventer), and likewise those which run down near the larynx and air tubes, and 
draw down the tongue-bone (aternohyoideuSj sternothyroidetts and thyrohyoideiLs). 
Without the counteraction of the latter, indeed, considerable tension of the former 
would be impossible. Besides this a contraction of the skin on both sides of the 
larynx which takes place at the commencement of the tone of the voice, shows that 
the omohyoideics muscle, which runs obliquely down from the tongue-bone back- 
wards to the shoulder-blade, is also stretched. Without its co-operation the muscles 
arising from the under jaw and breast-bone would draw the larynx too far forwards. 
Now the greater part of these muscles do not go to the larynx at all, but only to 
the tongue-bone, from which the larynx is suspended. Hence they cannot directly 
assist in the formation of the voice, so far as this depends upon the action of the 
larynx. The action of these muscles, so far as I have been able to observe it on 
myself, is also much less when I utter a dull guttural A, than when I endeavour to IT 
change it into a ringing, keen and powerfully penetrating A. Binging and keen, 
applied to a quality of tone, imply many and powerful upper partials, and the 
stronger they are, of course the more marked are the differences of the vowels 
which their own differences condition. A singer, or a declaimer, will occasionally 
interpose among his bright and rich tones others of a duller character as a contrast. 
Sharp characterisation of vowel quaUty is suitable for energetic, joyful or vigorous 
frames of mind ; indifferent and obscure quaUty of tone for sad and troubled, or taci- 
turn states. In the latter case speakers like to change the proper tone of the vowels, 
by drawing the extremes closer to a middle Ad (say the short German E [the final 

Herr E. y. Quanten (Foggendorff's Annal., article, pp. 724-741, with especial leference to 

vol. cliv. pp. 272 and 522), so far as they do not it. In consequence of the new matter added 

rest upon misconceptions. [In the 1st edition by Prof. Helmholtz in his 4th German edition 

of this tran8lation,during the printing of which here followed, this article is omitted from the 

V. Quanten's first paper appeared, I added an present edition. — Translator.] 

l2 



116 VOWEL QUALITIES OP TONE. paet i. 

English obscure A in idea])y and hence select somewhat deeper tones in place of 
the high tones of A, E, L 

A peculiar circumstance must also be mentioned which distinguishes the 
human voice from all other instruments and has a peculiar relation to the human 
ear. Above the higher reinforced partial tones of I, in the neighbourhood of e"" 
up to g"'* [2640 to 3168 vib.] the notes of a pianoforte have a peculiar cutting 
effect, and we might be easily led to believe that the hammers were too hard, or 
that their mechanism somewhat differed from that of the adjacent notes. But the 
phenomenon is the same on all pianofortes, and if a very small glass tube or sphere is 
applied to the ear, the cutting effect ceases, and these notes become as soft and weak 
as the rest, but another and deeper series of notes now becomes stronger and more 
cutting. Hence it follows that the human ear by its own resonance favours the tones 
between e"" and g"'', or, in other words, that it is tuned to one of these pitches.* 

1 These notes produce a feeling of pain in sensitive ears. Hence the upper partial 
tones which have nearly this pitch, if any such exist, are extremely prominent 
and affect the ear powerfully. This is generally the case for the human voice when 
it is strained, and will help to give it a screaming effect. In powerful male voices 
singing /or^6, these partial tones sound like a clear tinkling of little bells, accom- 
panying the voice, and are most audible in choruses, when the singers shout a 
little. Every individual male voice at such pitches produces dissonant upper partials. 
When basses sing their high e', the 7th partial tone f is d""y the 8th e"", the 
9th /""ft and the 10th ^""ft Now, if e"" and/""Jf are loud, and d"" and g"'% 
though weaker, are audible, there is of course a sharp dissonance. If many voices 
are sounding together, producing these upper partials with small differences of 
pitch, the result is a very peculiar kind of tinkling, which is readily recognised a 
second time when attention has been once drawn to it. I have not noticed any 
difference of effect for different vowels in this case, but the tinkling ceases as soon 

1 as the voices are taken piano ; although the tone produced by a chorus will of 
course still have considerable power. This kind of tinkling is peculiar to human 
voices ; orchestral instruments do not produce it in the same way either so sensibly 
or so powerfully. I have never heard it from any other musical instrument so 
clearly as from human voices. 

The same upper partials are heard also in soprano voices when they ^ing forte ; 
in harsh, uncertain voices they are tremiilous, and hence show some resemblance 
to the tinkling heard in the notes of male voices. But I have heard them brought 
out with exact purity, and continue to sound on perfectly and quietly, in some 
steady and harmonious female voices, and also in some excellent tenor voices. In 
the melodic progression of a voice part, I then hear these high upper partials of 
the four-times accented Octave, falling and rising at different times within the 
compass of a minor Third, according as different upper partials of the notes sung 
enter the region for which our ear is so sensitive. It is certainly remarkable that 

€r it should be precisely the human voice which is so rich in those upper partials for 
which the human ear is so sensitive. Madame E. Seiler, however, remarks that 
dogs are also very sensitive for the high e"" of the violin. 

This reinforcement of the upper partial tones belonging to the middle of the 
four-times accented Octave, has, however, nothing to do with the characterisation 
of vowels. I have mentioned it here, merely because these high tones are readily 
remarked in investigations into the vowel qualities of tone, and the observer must 
not be misled to consider them as peculiar ^characteristics of individual vowels. 
They are simply a characteristic of strained voices. 

The humming tone heard when singing with closed mouth, lies nearest to U. 

* I have lately found that my right ear is merely applying a short paper tube to the en- 
most sensitive ior f"'\ and my left for c'"\ trance of my ear, this chirp is rendered extra- 
When I drive air into the passage leading to the ordinarily weak. 

tympanum, the resonance descends to c""j( and t[The first six partial tones are e'y e", b", 

g"'jL The chirp of the cricket corresponds e'", g"%b"\ the seventh is 27 cents flatter 

precisely to the higher resonance, and on than d"''. — TVanslator.] 



CHAP. V. 7. 



VOWEL QUALITIES OF TONE. 



117 



This hum is used in uttering the consonants, M, N and N*. The size of the exit 
of the air (the nostrils) is in this case much smaller in comparison with the 
resonant chamber (the internal nasal cavity) than the opening of the lips for U in 
comparison with the corresponding resonant chamber in the mouth. Hence, in 
humming, the peciiliarities of the U tone are much enhanced. Thus although 
upper partials are present, even up to a considerably high pitch, yet they decrease 
in strength as they rise in pitch much faster than for U. The upper Octave is 
tolerably strong in humming, but all the higher partial tones are weak. Humming 
in the N-position differs a little from that in the M-position, by having its upper 
partials less damped than for M. But it is only at the instant when the cavity of 
the mouth is opened or closed that a clear difference exists between these conso- 
nants. We cannot enter into the details of the composition of the sound of the 
other consonants, because they produce noises which have no constant pitch, and 
are not musical tones, to which we have here to confine our attention. IT 

The theory of vowel sounds here explained may be confirmed by experiments 
with artificial reed pipes, to which proper resonant chambers are attached. This 
was first done by Willis, who attached reed pipes to cylindrical chambers of variable 
length, and produced different tones by increasing the length of the resonant tube. 
The shortest tubes gave him I, and then E, A, O, up to U, until the tube exceeded 
the length of a quarter of a wave. On further increasing the length the vowels 
returned in converse order. His determination of the pitch of the resonant pipes 
agrees well with mine for the deeper vowels. The pitch found by Willis for the 
higher vowels was relatively too high, because in this case the length of the wave 
was smaller than the diameter of the tubes, and consequently the usual calcula- - 
tion of pitch from the length of the tubes alone was no longer applicable. The 
vowels E and I were also far from accurately resembling those of the voice, because 
the second resonance was absent, and hence, as Willis himself states, they could 
not be well distinguished.* IT 



Vowel 


In the Word 


Pitch. 
WUlifl 


Pitch, 
Helmholtz 


Length of Tube 
in Inches 




A? 

A 

E 

I 


No 

Nought 

Paw 

Part 

Pad 

Pay 

Pet 

See 


r 
d"" 


? 

c" 


4-7 

3-8 

3-05 

2-2 

1-8 

1-0 

0-6 

0-88 (?) 



The vowels are obtained much more clearly and distinctly with properly tuned 
resonators, than with cylindrical resonance chambers. On applying to a reed pipe 
which gave h\^, a glass resonator tuned to &I7, I obtained the vowel U ; changing IT 
the resonator to one tuned for 6' [7, I obtained O ; the V^ resonator gave a rather 
close A, and the (2"' resonator a clear A. Hence by tuning the applied chambers 
in the same way we obtain the same vowels quite independently of the form of the 
chamber and nature of its walls. I also succeeded in producing various grades of 



* [Probably the first treatise on phonology 
in which Willises experiments were given at 
length, and the above table cited, with Wheat- 
stone's article from the Iy(7n(2an and Westmin- 
ster Review, which was kindly brought under 
my notice by Sir Charles Wheatstone himself, 
was my Alphabet of Nature, London, 1845. The 
table includes U exemplified by but, boot, with 
an indefinite length of pipe. The word pad is 
misprinted paa in all the German editions of 
Helmholtz (even the 4th, which appeared after 
the correction in my translation), and as he 



therefore could not separate its A from that in 
part, he gives no pitch. It is really the nearest 
English representative of the German. The 
sounds in nought, paw, which Sir John Her- 
schel, when citing Willis (Art. * Sound,* in 
Encyc. Metropol., par. 375), could not distin- 
guish, were probably meant for the broad 
Italian open O, or English o in more, and the 
English aw in maw respectively. The length 
of the pipe in inches is here added from Willis's 
paper. I have heard Willis's experiments 
repeated by Wheatstone. — Translator,] 



118 VOWEL QUALITEES OF TONE. pabt i. 

A,0 , E, and I with the same reed pipe, by applying glass spheres into whose external 
opening glass tubes were inserted from 6 to 10 centimetres (2*36 to 3*94 inches) in 
length in order to imitate the double resonance of the oral cavity for these 
vowels. 

Willis has also given another interesting method for producing vowels. If a 
toothed wheel, with many teeth, revolve rapidly, and a spring be applied to its 
teeth, the spring will be raised by each tooth as it passes, and a tone will be pro- 
duced having its pitch number equal to the number of teeth by which it has been 
struck in a second. Now if one end of the spring is well fastened, and the spring 
be set in vibration, it will itself produce a tone which will increase in pitch as the 
spring diminishes in length. If then we turn the wheel with a constant velocity, 
and allow a watch spring of variable length to strike against its teeth, we shall 
obtain for a long spring a quality of tone resembling IT, and as we shorten the 

f spring other qualities in succession like O, A, E, I, the tone of the spring here 
playing the part of the reinforced tone which determines the vowel. But this 
imitation of the towels is certainly much less complete than that obtained by reed 
pipes. The reason of this process also evidently depends upon bur producing 
compound tones in which certain upper partials (which in this case correspo]!id with 
the proper tones of the spring itself) are more reinforced than others. 

Willis himself advanced a theory concerning the nature of vowel tones which 
differs from that I have laid down in agreement with the whole connection of all 
other acoustical phenomena. Willis imagines that the pulses of air which produce 
the vowel qualities, are themselves tones which rapidly die away, corresponding to 
the proper tone of the spring in his last experiment, or the short echo produced by 
a pulse or a little explosion of air in the mouth, or in the resonance chamber of a 
reed pipe. In fact something like the sound of a vowel will be heard if we only 
tap against the teeth with a little rod, and set the cavity of the mouth in the posi- 

ir tion required by the different vowels. Willis's description of the motion of sound 
for vowels is certainly not a great way from the truth ; but it only assigns the 
mode in which the motion of the air ensues, and not the corresponding reaction 
which this produces in the ear. That this kind of motion as well as all others 
is actually resolved by the ear into a series of partial tones, according to the laws 
of S3rmpathetic resonance, is shown by the agreement of the analysis of vowel 
qualities of tone made by the unarmed ear and by the resonators. This will 
appear still more clearly in the next chapter, where experiments will be described 
showing the direct composition of vowel qualities from their partial tones. 

Vowel qualities of tone consequently are essentially distinguished from the 
tones of most other musical instruments by the fact that the loudness of their 
partial tones does not depend solely upon their numerical order but preponder- 
antly upon the absolute pitch of those partials. Thus when I sing the vowel A to 
the note E\^*, the reinforced tone 5''|^ is the 12th partial of the compound tone ; 

f and when I sing the same vowel A to the note b% the reinforced tone is still b'% 
but is now the 2nd partial of the compound tone sung.f 



From the examples sbdduced to show the dependence of quality of tone from 
the mode in which a musical tone is compounded, we may deduce the following 
general rules : — 

1. Simple Tones, like those of tuning-forks applied to resonance chambers and 
wide stopped organ pipes, have a very soft, pleasant sound, free from all roughness, 
but wanting in power, and dull at low pitches. 

2. Musical Tones, which are accompanied by a moderately loud series of the 

* [^1^ has for 2nd partial «(>, for 3rd b\f, f [See App. XX. sec. M. No. 1, for Jen- 

and hence for 6th b'^, and for 12th, &"|^.— kin and Swing's analysis of vowel sounds by 
Translator.] means of the Phonograph.— rratwZator.] 



CHAPS. V. VI. APPREHENSION OP QUALITIES OF TONE. 119 

lower partial tones, up to about the sixth partial, are more harmonious and 
musical. Compared with simple tones they are rich and splendid, while they are 
at the same time perfectly sweet and soft if the higher upper partials are absent. 
To these belong the musical tones produced by the pianoforte, open organ pipes, 
the softer piano tones of the human voice and of the French horn. The last- 
named tones form the transition to musical tones with high upper partials ; while 
the tones of flutes, and of pipes on the flue-stops of organs with a low pressure of 
wind, approach to simple tones. 

3. If only the unevenly numbered partials are present (as in narrow stopped 
organ pipes, pianoforte strings struck in their middle points, and clarinets), the 
quality of tone is hollow, and, when a large number of such upper partials are 
present, nascU, When the prime tone predominates the quality of tone is rich ; 
but when the prime tone is not sufficiently superior in strength to the upper 
partials, the quality of tone is poor. Thus the quality of tone in the wider open IT 
organ pipes is richer than that in the narrower ; strings struck with pianoforte 
hammers give tones of a richer quality than when struck by a stick or plucked 
by the finger ; the tones of reed pipes with suitable resonance chambers have a 
richer quality than those without resonance chambers. 

4. When partial tones higher than the sixth or seventh are very distinct, the 
quality of tone is cutting and rough. The reason for this will be seen hereafter to 
lie in the dissonances which they form with one another. The degree of harshness *" 
may be very different. When their force is inconsiderable the higher upper partials 
do not essentially detract from the musical applicability of the compound tones ; 
on the contrary, they are useful in giving character and expression to the music. 
The most important musical tones of this description are those of bowed instru- 
ments and of most reed pipes, oboe (hautbois), bassoon (fagotto), harmonium, and 
the human voice. The rough, braying tones of brass instruments are extremely 
penetrating, and hence are better adapted to give the impression of great power f 
than similar tones of a softer quality. They are consequently little suitable for 
artistic music when used alone, but produce great effect in an orchestra. Why 
high dissonant upper partials should make a musical tone more penetrating will 
appear hereafter. 



CHAPTER VI. 

ON THB APPBEHBNSION OF QUALITIES OF TONE. 

Up to this point we have not endeavoured to analyse given musical tones further 
than to determine the differences in the number and loudness of their partifiQ tones. 
Before we can determine the function of the ear in apprehending qualities of tone, IT 
we must inquire whether a determinate relative strength of the upper partials 
suffices to give us the impression of a determinate musical quality of tone or 
whether there are not also other perceptible differences in quality which are 
independent of such a relation. Since we deal only with musical tones, that is, 
with such as are produced by exactly periodic motions of the air, and exclude all 
irregular motions of the air which appear as noises, we can give this question a 
more definite form. If we suppose the motion of the air corresponding to the 
given musical tone to be resolved into a sum of pendular vibrations of air, such 
individual pendular vibrations will not only differ from each other in force or 
amplitude for different forms of the compound motion, but also in their relative 
position, or, according to physical terminology, in their difference of phase. For 
example, if we superimpose the two pendular vibrational curves A and B, fig. 31 
(p. 120a), first with the point e of B on the point do of A, and next with the point 
e of B on the point d^ of A, we obtain the two entirely distinct vibrational curves 



120 



DOBS QUALITY DEPEND ON PHASE ? 



PART I. 



G and D. By farther displacement of the initial point e so as to place it on d^ or 
dj we obtain other forms, which are the inversions of the forms C and D, as has 
been already shown (supra, p. 32a). If, then, musical quality of tone depends solely 
on the relative force of the partial tones, all the various motions C, D, Ac., must 



Fig. 81. 



B 



D 




make the same impression on the ear. But if the relative position of the two 
^ waves, that is the difference of phase, produces any effect, they must make different 
impressions on the ear. 

Now to determine this point it was necessary to compound various musical 
tones out of simple tones artificially, and to see whether an alteration of quality 
ensued when force was constant but phase varied. Simple tones of great purity, 
which can have both their force and phase exactly regulated, are best obtained 
from tuning-forks having the lowest proper tone reinforced, as has been already 
described (p. 54(2), by a resonance chamber, and communicated to the air. To set 
the tuning-forks in very uniform motion, they were placed between the limbs of a 
little electro-magnet, as shown in fig. 32, opposite. Each tuning-fork was screwed 
into a separate board d d, which rested upon pieces of india-rubber tubing e e that 
were cemented below it, to prevent the vibrations of the fork from being directly 
communicated to the table and hence becoming audible. The limbs b b of the 
electro-magnet are surrounded with wire, and its pole f is directed to the fork. 
% There are two clamp screws g on the board d d which are in conductive connection 
with the coils of the electro-magnet, and serve to introduce other wires which 
conduct the electric current. To set the forks in strong vibration the strength of 
these streams must alternate periodically. These are generated by a separate 
apparatus to be presently described (fig. 33, p. 122b, c). 

When forks thus arranged are set in vibration, very little indeed of their tone 
is heard, because they have so little means of communicating their vibrations to 
the surrounding air or adjacent solids. To make the tone strongly audible, the 
resonance chamber i, which has been previously tuned to the pitch of the fork, 
must be brought near it. This resonance chamber is fastened to another board k, 
which slides in a proper groove made in the board d d, and thus allows its opening 
to be brought very near to the fork. In the figure the resonance chamber is shown 
at a distance from the fork in order to exhibit the separate parts distinctly ; when 
in use, it is brought as close as possible to the fork. The mouth of the resonance 
chamber can be closed by a lid 1 attached to a lever m. By pulling the string n 



3».^?rs5'"™"s?"rBr¥W7-?" V 



-'i'iv^i^' 




ELS. 



i|tj||toiie of the fork is communicated 
ps let loose, the lid is brought over 
id the tone of the fork is no longer 
|chamber, the tone of the fork can 
legree of strength. The whole of 
lobambers belonging to e> series of 
a way that by pressing a key the 

if^lg the tones B\f and its firat seven 

/', a'%* and b"\f. The prime 

ces naturally speak. Afterwards 

'and b"'\f, and assumed b^ for the 



[■^«|^jkkM^BJrS|^Hrical currents bad to be condncted 1* 
O^^ftffil^nlwI^'Al <^B many electrical shocks as the 

Mi 



^^«L^-( 




•-ji^Mli 



^A^Siely 120. Every shock makes the 

^J^^agnetio, and hence enables it to 

rendered permanently magnetic 

LCted by the poles of the electro- K 

iration ; the prongs of the second 

■^seeoTtd vibration, and so on. The 

lod kept up as long as the electric 

itions of the lower forks are very 

Br, 

!S to produce intermittent currents 
|6rk a is fixed horizontally between 
imities are fastened two platinum 
half with mercury and half with 
mns. These columns have clamp- 
two boards f, g, which turn about 
;]iat raised or lowered by a thumb- 

the justly intoned scale of t^ — 




>{ the pUtiDnm wires c c exactly touch 
1 A third clamping screw e is in con- 

Igfc tuniDg-fork. When the fork vibrates, 

'Aj9C)i( from i to e, the current will be broken 

tIScB above the surface of the mercury in the 
tfliAiiium wire dips again into the mercury. 
-~"'^ ^jime time conducted through the electro- 
[■magnetio every time it passes, and thus 
lb is iteelf magnetic Generally only 
current. Alcohol is poured over the 
burned by the electrical sparks which 
method of interrupting the current 
vibrating spring in place of the taning- 
^tion apparatus bo much used for medical 
IBOmmunioate themselves to all adjacent 




]«)^po audible and too irregular. Hence the 

'^*IC'*'is spring. The handle of a well worked 

" Stle agitated by the vibrations of the fork 

' m connected with it, so powerfully as the 

ling-fork of the apparatus in fig. 33 must 

\\t. To effect this I employ a little clamp 

prongs. By slipping this towards the 

and by slipping it towards the handle 

in, but the resonance chambers are closed, 
if uniform motion, but no sound is heard, 
[direct action of the forks on the air. But 
ibers. the corresponding tones are beard 
;s the lid is more widely opened. By this 
BBsion, different combinations of the prime 



Appendix VIII. [This apparntuB was bi- 
...litod by R. Koenig (saa Appendiill.) in the 
[- loternaCional BihibiliioD of 1872 in I>ondon. 
— Translator.) 



CHAP. VI. ARTIFICIAL VOWELS. 123 

tone with one or more harmonic upper partiaJs having different degrees of loudness, 
and thus produce tones of different qualities. 

Among the natural musical tones which appear suitable for imitation with forks, 
the vowels of the human voice hold the first rank, because they are accompanied by 
comparatively little extraneous noise and show distinct differences of quality which 
are easy to seize. Most vowels also are characterised by comparatively low upper 
partials, which can be reached by our forks ; E and I alone somewhat exceed these 
limits. The motion of the very high forks is too weak for this purpose when in- 
fluenced only by such electrical currents as I was able to use without disturbance 
from the noise of the electric sparks. 

The first series of experiments was made with the eight forks B\} to V\^. With 
these U, O, 0, and even A could be imitated ; the last not very well because of my 
not possessing the upper partials c'" and d^'\ which lie immediately above its 
characteristic tone b"\), and are sensibly reinforced in the natural sound of this IF 
vowel. The prime tone B\^ of this series, when sounded alone, gave a very dull 
V, much duller than could be produced in speech. The sound became more like 
n when the second and third partial tones b\^ and/' were allowed to sound feebly 
at the same time. A very fine O was produced by taking b'\} strong, and 6b>/> ^" 
more feebly ; the prime tone B\^ had then, however, to be somewhat damped. On 
suddenly changing the pressure on the keys and hence the position of the lids 
before the resonance chambers, so as to give B\} strong, and all the upper partials 
weak, the apparatus uttered a good clear U after the O. 

A or rather A° [nearly o in not] was produced by making the fifth to the eighth 
partial tones as loud as possible, and keeping the rest under. 

The vowels of the second and third series, which have higher characteristic tones, 
could be only imperfectly imitated by bringing out their reinforced tones of the lower 
pitch. Though not very clear in themselves they became so by contrast on alterna- 
tion with U and O. Thus a passably clear A was obtained by giving loudness IT 
chiefly to the fourth and fifth tones, and keeping down the lower ones, and a sort 
of E by reinforcing the third, and letting the rest sound feebly. The difference 
between O and these two vowels lay principally in keeping the prime tone B\^ and 
its Octave b\f much weaker for A and E than for O.* 

To extend my experiments to the brighter vowels, I afterwards added the forks 
d"\f*', a"% b'"\}, the two upper ones of which, however, gave a very faint tone, 
and I chose b\^ as the prime tone in place oi B\}, With these I got a very good A 
and A, and at least a much more distinct E than before. But I could not get up 
to the high characteristic tone of I. 

In this higher series of forks, the prime tone b\^, when sounded alone, repro- 
duced n. The same prime 6|> with moderate force, accompanied with a strong 
Octave fe'l^, and a weaker Twelfth/', gave O, which has the characteristic tone b'\^. 
A was obtained by taking b\^, 5' [7, and/'' moderately strong, and the characteristic 
tones 6"b and d"* very strong. To change A into A it was necessary to increased 
somewhat the force of b'\} and /" which were adjacent to the characteristic tone 
d", to damp b*% and bring out d'" and/" as strongly as possible. For E the two 
deepest tones of the series, b\^ and b'\}, had to be kept moderately loud, as being 
adjacent to the deeper characteristic tone/', whilst the highest/"', a'"|j, b"'\f had 
to be made as prominent as possible. But I have hitherto not succeeded so well 
with this as with the other vowels, because the high forks were too weak, and 
because perhaps the upper partials which lie above the characteristic tone 6"'|7 
could not be entirely dispensed with.f 

*The statements in the MUnchener gelehrte above results will serve to show their relations 

Anesigen for June 20, 1859, must be corrected more clearly. In the first line are placed the 

accordingly. At that time I did not know the notes of the forks and the numl^rs of the 

higher upper partials of E and I, and hence corresponding partials. The letters pp, p, mf, 

made the O too dull to distinguish it from the /, ff below them are the usual musical indica- 

imperfect E. tions of force, pianissimo^ piano, mezzo forte, 

f [The following tabular statement of the forte, fortissimo. Where no such mark is 



124 



QUALITY INDEPENDENT OF PHASE. 



PART I. 



In precisely the same way as the vowels of the human voice, it is possible to 
imitate the quality of tone produced by organ pipes of different stops, if they have 
not secondary tones which are too high, but of course the whizzing noise, formed 
by breaking the stream of air at the lip, is wanting in these imitations. The 
tuning-forks are necessarily limited to the imitation of the purely musical part of 
the tone. The piercing high upper partials, required for imitating reed instru- 
ments, were absent, but the nasality of the clarinet was given by using a series 
^^ of unevenly numbered partials, and the softer tones of the horn by the full chorus 
\ of all the forks. 

But though it was not possible to imitate every kind of quality of tone by the 
present apparatus, it sufficed to decide the important question as to the effect of 
altered difference of phase upon quality of tone. As I particularly observed at the 
beginning of this chapter, this question is of fundamental importance for the 
IT theory of auditory sensation. The reader who is unused to physical investigations 
must excuse some apparently difficult and dry details in the explanation of the 
experiments necessary for its decision. 

The simple means of altering the phases of the secondary tones consists in 
bringing the resonance chambers somewhat out of tune by narrowing their 
apertures, which weakens the resonance, and at the same time alters the phase. 
If the resonance chamber is tuned so that the simple tone which excites its 
« strongest resonance coincides with the simple tone of the corresponding fork, then, 
as the mathematical theory shows,* the greatest velocity of the air at the mouth 
of the chamber in an outward direction, coincides with the greatest velocity of the 
ends of the fork in a inward direction. On the other hand, if the chamber is 
tuned to be slightly deeper than the fork, the greatest velocity of the air slightly 
precedes, and if it is tuned slightly higher, that greatest velocity slightly lags 
behind the greatest velocity of the fork. The more the tuning is altered, the 
IT greater will be the difference of phase, till at last it reaches the duration of a 
quarter of a vibration. The magnitude of the difference of phase agrees during 
this change precisely with the strength of the resonance, so that to a certain degree 
we are able to measure the former by the latter. If we represent the strength of 
the sound in the resonance chamber when in unison with the fork by 10, and 
divide the periodic time of a vibration, like the circumference of a circle, into 360 



added the partial is not mentioned in the text. 
For the second series of experiments the forks 
of corresponding pitches are kept under the old 



ones, but the whole are now numbered as par- 
tials of b}y. 



First \ 


1 


2 


3 


4 


5 


6 


7 


8 


10 


12 


Forks / 


*b 


h 


f 


*> 


a" 


/" 


a"b 


f>"b 








u 


/ 


PP 


PP 














o 


mf 


P 


P 


/ 


P 
















P 


P 


P 


P 


ff 


/ 


ff 


ff 






> 


A 


P 


PP 


P 


f 


f 














E 


P 


PP 


f 


P 


P 


P 
3 


P 


p 






Second \ 
Forks j 




1 


2 






4 


6 


6 




*b 




b'b 




/' 




n 


d'" 


/" 




U 




/ 












"3 







mf 




f 




P 










> 


A 




mf 




mf 




mf 




f 


f 




o 
> 


X 








f 




f 




V 


ff 


/ 




E 




mf 




mf 












ff 



14 



7 



/ 



16 



8 



ft"> 



ff 



[See Appendix XX. sect. M. No. 2, for 
Messrs. Preeco and Stroh's new method of 
vowel synthesis. — TranslatorJ] 



* See the first part of Appendix IX. 



CHAP. VI. 



QUALITY INDEPENDENT OP PHASE. 



125 



degrees, the relation between the strength of the resonance and the difference of 
phase is shown by the following table : — 



Strength of 


Difference of Phase in angular 


Resonance. 


degrees. 
0° 


10 


9 


36° 64' 


8 


50" 12' 


7 


60° 40' 


6 


68° 54' 


6 


75° 31' 


4 


80° 48' 


8 


84° 60' 


2 


87° 42' 


1 


89° 26' 



This table shows that a comparatively slight weakening of resonance by 
altering the tuning of the chamber occasions considerable differences of phase, 
but that when the weakening is considerable there are relatively slight changes 
of phase. We can take advantage of this circumstance when compounding the 
vowel sounds by means of the tuning-forks to produce every possible alteration of 
phase. It is only necessary to let the lid shade the mouth of the resonance 
chamber till the strength of the tone is perceptibly diminished. As soon as we 
have learned how to estimate roughly the amount of diminution of loudness, the 
above table gives us the corresponding alteration of phase. We are thus able to 
alter the vibrations of the tones in question to any amount, up to a quarter of the 
periodic time of a vibration. Alterations of phase to the amount of half the 
periodic time are produced by sending the electric current through the electro- 
magnets of the corresponding fork in an opposite direction, which causes the ends 
of the fork to be repelled instead of attracted by the electro-magnets on thef 
passage of the current, and thus sets the fork vibrating in the contrary direction. 
This counter-excitement of the fork, however, by repelling currents, must not be 
continued too long, as the magnetism of the fork itself would otherwise gradually 
diminish, whereas attracting currents strengthen it or maintain it at a maximum. 
It is well known that the magnetism of masses of iron that are violently agitated 
is easily altered. 

After a tone has been compounded, in which some of the partials have been 
weakened and at the same time altered in phase by the half- shading of the 
apertures of their corresponding resonance chambers, we can re-compound the 
same tone by an equal amount of weakening in the same partials, but without 
shading the aperture, and therefore without change of phase, by simply leaving 
the mouths of the chambers VTide open, and increasing their distances from the 
exciting forks, until the required amount of enfeeblement of sound is attained. 

For example, let us first sound the forks 5|> and 6|>, v^ith fuUy opened resonance T 
chambers, and perfect accord. They will vibrate as shewn by the vibrational 
forms fig. 31, A and B (p. 120a), with the points e and dg coincident, and produce 
at a distance the compound vibration represented by the vibrational curve C. But 
by closing the resonance chamber of the fork B\^ we can make the point e on the 
curve B coincide with the points between d^ and d^ on the curve A. To make e 
coincide with d^ the loudness of B\} must be made about three-quarters of what 
it would be if the mouth of the chamber were unshaded. The point e can be made 
to coincide with d^ by reversing the current in the electro-magnets and fully 
opening the mouth of the resonance chamber ; and then by imperfectly opening 
the chamber of B^ the point e can be made to move towards 8. On the other 
hand, an imperfect opening of the chamber b\^ will make e recede from coincidence 
with 8 (which is the same thing as coincidence with do) or with d^ towards d^ or 
dg respectively. The proportions of loudness may be made the same in all these 



l\l 



fi <r cam0 



126 QUALITY INDEPENDENT OP PHASE. pabt i. 

cases, without any alteration of phase, by removing the corresponding chambers to 
the proper distance from its forks without shading its moutL 

In this manner every possible difference of phase in the tones of two chambers 
can be produced. The same process can of course be applied to any required 
number of forks. I have thus experimented upon numerous combinations of tone 

* with varied differences of phase, and I have never experienced the slightest dif- 
ference in the quality of tone. So far as the quality of tone was concerned, I 
found that it was entirely indifferent whether I weakened the separate partial 
tones by shading the mouths of their resonance chambers, or by moving the 
chamber itself to a sufficient distance from the fork. Hence the answer to the 
proposed question is : the qimlity of the musical portion of a compound tone depends 
solely on the number and relative strength of its partial simple tones, and in no respect 
on their differences of phase* 

IT The preceding proof that quality of tone is independent of difference of 
phase, is the easiest to carry out experimentally, but its force lies solely in the 
theoretical proposition that phases alter contemporaneously with strength of tone 
when the mouths of the resonance chambers are shaded, and this proposition is 

I the result of mathematical theory alone. We cannot make vibrations of air 
directly visible. But by a slight change in the experiment it may be so conducted 
as to make the alteration of phase immediately visible. It is only necessary to 
put the tuning-forks themselves out of tune with their resonance chambers, by 
attaching little lumps of wax to the prongs. The same law holds for the phases 
of a tuning-fork kept in vibration by an electric current, as for the resonance 
chambers themselves. The phase gradually alters by a quarter period, while the 
strength of the tone of the fork is reduced from a maximum to nothing at all, by 
putting it out of tune. The phase of the motion of the air retains the same 
relation to the phase of the vibration of the fork, because the pitch, which is 

T determined by the number of interruptions of the electrical current in a second, is 
not altered by the alteration of the fork. The change of phase in the fork can be 
observed directly by means of Lissajou's vibration microscope, already described 
and shown in fig. 22 (p. %0d). Place the prongs of the fork and the microscope of 
this instrument horizontally, and the fork to be examined vertically ; powder the 
upper end of one of its prongs with a little starch, direct the microscope to one of 
the grains of starch, and excite both forks by means of the electrical currents of 
the interrupting fork (fig. 33, p. 122^). The fork of Lissajou's instrument is in 
unison with the interrupting fork. The grain of starch vibrates horizontally, the 
object-glass of the microscope vertically, and thus, by the composition of these 
two motions, curves are generated, just as in the observations on violin strings 
previously described. 

When the observed fork is in unison with the interrupting fork, the ciure 
becomes an oblique straight line (fig. 34, 1), if both forks pass through their 

T FiQ. 31. 




position of rest at the same moment. As the phase alters, the straight line passes 
through a long oblique ellipse (2, 3), till on the difference of phase becoming a 
quarter of a period, it develops into a circle (4) ; and then as the difference of 
phase increases, it passes through oblique ellipses (5, 6) in another direction, till it 
reaches another straight line (7), on the difference becoming half a period. 

If the second fork is the upper Octave of the interrupting fork, the curves 



CHAP. Ti. QUALITY INDEPENDEISTT OF PHASE. 127 

1, 2, 3, 4, 5, in fig. 35, show the series of forms. Here 3 answers to the case when 
both forks pass through their position of rest at the same time ; 2 and 4 differ from 
that position by ^, and 1 and 5 by ^ of a wave of the higher fork. 

If we now bring the forks into the most perfect possible unison with the 
interrupting fork, so that both vibrate as strongly as possible, and then alter their 




tuning a little by putting on or removing pieces of wax, we also see one figure of the 
microscopic image gradually passing into another, and can thus easily assure our- % 
selves of the correctness of the law already cited. Experiments on quality of tone 
are then conducted by first bringing aU the forks as exactly as possible to the 
pitches of the harmonic upper partial tones of the interrupting fork, next removing 
the resonance chambers to such distances from the forks as will give the required 
relations of strength, and finally putting the forks out of tune as much as we please 
by sticking on lumps of wax. The size of these lumps should be previously so 
regulated by microscopical observation as to produce the required difference of 
phase. This, however, at the same time weakens the vibrations of the forks, and 
hence the strength of the tones must be restored to its former state by bringing the 
resonance chambers nearer to the forks. 

The resTilt in these experiments, where the forks are put out of tune, is the 
same as in those where the resonance chambers were put out of tune. There is 
no perceptible alteration of quality of tone. At least there is no alteration so 
marked as to be recognisable after the expiration of the few seconds necessary 1 
for resetting the apparatus, and hence certainly no such change of quaUty as 
would change one vowel into another. 

An apparent exception to this rule must here be mentioned. If the forks B\^ 
and b\} are not perfectly tuned as Octaves, and are brought into vibration by rub- 
bing or striking, an attentive ear will observe very weak beats which appear like ! 
smsJl changes in the strength of the tone and its quality. These beats are cer- 
tainly connected with the successive entrance of the vibrating forks on varying 
difference of phase. Their explanation will be given when combinational tones are i 
considered, and it will then be shown that these slight variations of quality are ' 
referable to changes in the strength of one of the simple tones. 

Hence we are able to lay down the important law that differences in musical 
quality of tone depend solely on the presence and strength of partial tones, and in 
no respect on the differences in phase under which these partial tones enter vnto 
composition. It must be here observed that we are speaking only of musicals 
quality as previously defined. When the musical tone is accompanied by un- 
musical noises, such as jarring, scratching, soughing, whizzing, hissing, these 
motions are either not to be considered as periodic at all, or else correspond to 
high upper partials, of nearly the same pitch, which consequently form strident 
dissonances. We were not able to embrace these in our experiments, and hence 
we must leave it for the present doubtful whether in such dissonating tones 
difference of phase is an element of importance. Subsequent theoretic considera- 
tions will lead us to suppose that it really is. 

If we wish only to imitate vowels by compound tones without being able to 
distinguish the differences of phase in the individual constituent simple tones, we 
can effect our purpose tolerably well with organ pipes. But we must have at least 
two series of them, loud open and soft stopped pipes, because the strength of tone 
cannot be increased by additional pressure of wind without at the same time 
changing the pitch. I have had a double row of pipes of this kind made by Herr 



128 APPREHENSION OF QUALITY OF TONE. part l 

Appunn in Hanau, giving the first sixteen partial tones of B\}. All these pipes 
stand on a common windchest, which also contains the valves by which they can 
be opened or shut. Two larger valves cut off the passage from the windchest to 
the bellows. While these valves are closed, the pipe valves are arranged for the 
required combination of tones, and then one of the main valves of the windchest 
is opened, allowing all the pipes to sound at once. The character of the vowel is 
better produced in this way by short jerks of sound, than by a long continued 
sound. It is best to produce the prime tone and the predominant upper partial 
tones of the required vowels on both the open and stopped pipes at once, and to 
open only the weak stopped pipes for the next adjacent tones, so that the strong 
tone may not be too isolated. 

The imitation of the vowels by this means is not very perfect, because, among 
other reasons, it is impossible to graduate the strength of tone on the different pipes 

T so delicately as on the tuning-forks, and the higher tones especially are too screaming. 
But the vowel sounds thus composed are perfectly recognisable. 

We proceed now to consider the part played by the ear in the apprehension of 
quality of tone. The assumption formerly made respecting the function of the ear, 
was that it was capable of distinguishing both the pitch number of a musical tone 
(which gives the pitch), and also the form of the vibrations (on which the difference 
of quality depends). This last assertion was based simply on the exclusion of all 
other possible assumptions. As it could be proved that sameness of pitch always 
required equal pitch numbers, and as loudness visibly depended upon the ampli- 
tude of the vibrations, the quality of tone must necessarily depend on something 
which was neither the number nor the amplitude of the vibrations. There was 
nothing left us but form. We can now make this view more definite. The ex- 
periments just described show that waves of very different forms (as fig. 31, 
G, D, p. 120a, and fig. 12, G, D, p. 226), may have the same quality of tone, and 

IT indeed, for every case, except the simple tone, there is an infinite number of forms 
of wave of this kind, because any alteration of the difference of phase alters the 
form of wave without changing the quality of tone. The only decisive character 
of a quality of tone, is that the motion of the air which strikes the ear when re- 
solved into a sum of pendulum vibrations gives the same degree of strength to the 
same simple vibration. 

Hence the ear does not distinguish the different forms of waves in themselves, 
as the eye distinguishes the different vibrational curves. The ear must be said 
rather to decompose every wave form into simpler elements according to a definite 
law. It then receives a sensation from each of these simpler elements as from an 
harmonious tone. By trained attention the ear is able to become conscious of each 
of these simpler tones separately. And what the ear distinguishes as different 
qualities of tone are only different combinations of these simpler sensations. 

The comparison between ear and eye is here very instructive. When the 

f vibrational motion is rendered visible, as in the vibration microscope, the eye is 
capable of distinguishing every possible different form . of vibration one from 
another, even such as the ear cannot distinguish. But the eye is not capable of 
directly resolving the vibrations into simple vibrations, as the ear is. Hence the 
eye, assisted by the above-named instrument, really distinguishes the form of vibra- 
tion, as such, and in so doing distinguishes every different form of vibration. The 
ear, on the other hand, does Tiot distinguish every different form of vibration, but 
only such as when resolved into pendular vibrations, give different constituents. 
But on the other hand, by its capability of distinguishing and feeling these very 
constituents, it is again superior to the eye, which is quite incapable of so doing. 

This analysis of compound into simple pendular vibrations is an astonishing 
property of the ear. The reader must beatr in mind that when we apply the term 
' compound ' to the vibrations produced by a single musical instrument, the * com- 
position ' has no existence except for our auditory perceptions, or for mathematical 
theory. In reality, the motion of the particles of the air is not at all compound, 






I PARTS OF THE EAB. 



ff';?l!iif 

ii|tiflHj:^'^^^l7llpy$^When we turn to ezteinal Qature 
'H'JSfl^l^ttfS'^'S*'"'^^"^ ^*^ simple motions, we 
B^VL&ik^Li gBj^doQ^ jj, reality if we sappose 
illoi 




>tl0Q. 

_ low any muBical tone to impinge 
I9trf strings into sympathetic vibra- 



l/pjrtgft BBOt^rf? JSween the two kinds of apparatus, 
b^iJtttSljfMsal'S^ edtheir npper partials In sympathy, 
U«f Sf §p|^i^^^i(B. We wiU disregard this pecu- ? 
JtlttWllcM I vnS^fA>ljSleB be easy to make an instrument 
'^*^l!W'^~J$JWrtPy or powerfully for any but their 
J^%^ti^>^piJt in the middle. This would make 
"■"i^hJ^J^mes. 

^f&^^^nng of a piano with a nervoos fibre 
^^K^ and experience a sensation every 
' '*|j|One which impinged on the instni- 
oase in the ear, a serieB of senaa- 
irations into which the original 
leans, then, the esietence of each 
it really is perceived by the ear. 
ih would under the supposed cod- 
3B, and hence be produced quite 

-- ^SwusyegdiflCoverieB respecting the internal 
f^djil^iT^^'^^hat arrangements exiBt in the ear 
'#* • • ")it"Tii* similar to those which we 
have imagined. The end of 
every fibre of the auditory 
nerve is connected with small 
elastic parts, which we cannot 
hut assume to be Bet in sym- 
pathetic vibration by the 
waves of sound. 

The construction of the 
ear may be briefly described 
as follows : — The fine ends 
of the fibres of the auditory IT 
nerves are expanded on a deli- 
cate membrane in a cavity 
filled with fluid. Owing to 
its involved form this cavity 
^duct the vibrations of the air with 
the oEGce of a second portion of 
I". ."-.". .^. ..™ within it. Fig. 36 above is a 

■|^^a^£ ^fM^Kt, is alwaya true enough to surprise 

¥!i^5« to whom iHs new, even it the pitch of 
•Ho-tl IB token at hazard. It will be im- 
. ^ .'ji|*"W'?^*i' 'he vowels are sung loudly to notes 
■ ^^'^"S^tSgT'^no. The experiment ia so easj to 
>Wj»i^<§i)«j|Mid so fandamental in character, that 
^_a-ras-j?_„_^]ij ^^ witnessed bj every student.— 



130 



SYMPATHETICALLY VIBRATING PARTS OF THE EAR. part i. 



diagrammatic section, of the size of life, shewing the cavities belonging to the 
auditory apparatus. A is the labyrinth, B B the cavity of the tympdnum or drum, 
D the funnel-shaped entrance into the meatus or external auditory passage, nar- 
rowest in the middle and expanding slightly towards its upper extremity. This 
medtuSy in the ear or passage, is a tube formed partly of cartilage or gristle and 
partly of bone, and it is separated from the tymp&num or drum, by a thin circular 
membrane, the membrdna tympdni or drumskin* c c, which is rather laxly stretched 
in a bony ring. The drum (tym'pftnum) B lies between the outer passage 
(meatus) and the labyrinth. The drum is separated from the labyrinth by bony 
walls, pierced with two holes, closed by membranes. These are the so-called 
windows (fenesHras) of the labyrinth. The upper one o, called the oval window 
{fenes'tra dvdlis), is connected with one of the ossicles or little bones of the ear 
called the stirrup. The lower or round window r (fenes'ira rokm'da) has no 

IT connection with these ossicles. 

The drum of the ear is consequently completely shut off from the external 
passage and from the labyrinth. But it has free access to the upper part of the 
pharynx or throat, through the so-called Eustachian t tvibe E, which in Grermany 
is termed a trumpet^ because of the trumpet-like expansion of its pharyngeal 
extremity and the narrowness of its opening into the drum. The end which opens 
into the drum is formed of bone, but the expanded pharyngeal end is formed of thin 
flexible cartilage or gristle, split along its upper side. The edges of the split are 
closed by a sinewy membrane. By closing the nose and mouth, and either con- 
densing the air in the mouth by pressure, or rarefying it by suction, air can be 
respectively driven into or drawn out of the drum through this tube. At the 
entrance of air into the drum, or its departure from it, we feel a sudden jerk in 
the ear, and hear a dull crack.- Air passes from the pharynx to the drum, or from 
the drum to the pharynx only at the moment of making the motion of swallowing. 

IT When the air has entered the drum it remains there, even after nose and mouth 
are opened again, until we make another motion 
of swallowing. Then the air leaves the drum, 
as we perceive by a second cracking in the ear, 
and the cessation of the feeling of tension in the 
drumskin which had remained up till that time. 
These experiments shew that the tube is not 
usually open, but is opened only during swallow- 
ing, and this is explained by the fact that the 
muscles which raise the velum paldtl or soft ^i 
palate, and are set in action on swallowing, arise 
partly from the cartilaginous extremity of the tube. 
Hence the drum is generally quite closed, and 
filled with air, which has a pressure equal to Mm 

IT that of the external air, because it has from Ossicles of the ear in mutual oonnectiaii 

time to time, that is whenever we swallow, the 
means of equalising itself with the same by free 
communication. For a strong pressure of the 
air, the tube opens even without the action of 
swallowing, and its power of resistance seems to 
be very different in different individuals. 

In two places, this air in the drum, is like- 
wise separated from the fluid of the labyrinth 
merely by a thin stretched membrane, which closes the two windows of the 



Mcp 




seen from the ftront, and taken firom the 
right side of the head, which has been 
turned a little to the right round a 
vertical axis. M hammer or maUeua, 
J anvil or incus. S stirrup or stapes, 
Mcp head, Mcneck, Ml long process or 
proc^'sus gr&'cUis, Mm handle or 
manu'brium of the hammer. — Jc body, 
Jb short process, Jl long process, Jpl 
orbicular process or os orbiciUdre or 
oces'sus Unticiildris, of the anvU. — 
p head or capU'iUum of the stimip. 



*[In common parlance the drumskin of 
the ear, or tympanic membrane, is spoken of 
as the drum itself. Anatomists as well as 
drummers distinguish the membranous cover 
(drumskin) which is struck, from the hollow 
cavity (drum) which contains the resonant air. 



The quantities of the Latin words are marked, 
as I have heard musicians give them incor- 
rectly. — 7}ranslator,'\ 

t [GeneraUy pronounced yoo-stdi'-kt-dn^ 
but sometimes yoO'Stdi'-shl-dn. — Translaior,"] 



ii^j|;»§!^I'§<|!;f;|fifi|p^'" 



'S OF THE EAR 




l|S^\£^ll^S^^'^^°^. ^'^' ^s- ^^' ^• 



ifik 



--••— — u<^-^— ■ ,-. -D- — . r- 129c) and 

Pfcjj{j*{jtf$^^Pyift)CTifla are in contact od their outer 

S^SS^^^'^B^ W^tm^ °'^^ ^'^ ^^^ ^"^^^ ^' *^^ ''^7' 

BbJ {Ijj IB ^5%»''^B^ff H^ree. but that of the oval window 
'*^~' Ph'm'— ^C9^^ series of three little bones or 

^ „.JfeR MwtiSUKtiytfu the three OBsicles in their natural 

jj tlylBi 'B*^ *Q*|tJt# * ^6 hammer (mal'leue) M, the anvil 
•-—^ 1 ■' —-^—^mer is attached to the drumskin, 
flow, 

a thick, rounded upper extremity, 

kaadle m. Between these two is 

lontraction o, the neck. At the 

J S I cN ^^^ of the head is the surface of the 

fi9^9> 1^'Sm ^^mr^ ^y means of which it fits on to IT 

^AS^W^St (iffl'tuivil. Below the neck, where 

nj3ft|6Sy** ^ *Sb' handle begins, project two pro- 

i^B^^ t^ .r'an^ S tea, the long 1, also called pro- 

l^^j|j^«a( H t^^ut Folianus and jpr, yrffcliw, and 

iZii short b, also called pr. bre'vie. 

^^ long process has the proportion- 

^^ length shewn in the figure, in 

^tldren only ; in adults it appears to 

4S>abeorbed down to a little atump. 

3yt3 directed forwards, and is covered 

ihe bands which fasten the hammer 

is directed towards the dmmBkin, 

_ r^rom the point of this prooeee b to 

'^ifigiiihed to the upper portion of their 



,2- ,«.;«* 
M' 'i' 'W 'E -^ 't ' 






below) 1b remoTed. Stp, spina tympfiiilci 
poat. Hep, Lead ortb« bammer. Hi, Irmg 
process ofliamineT. ma, lig^meD'tummallfi 
ant. 1 chorda tympfaii. 2 Eastachiui tnbe. 
* Tendon of toe H. tciuor tjmp&iir, cut 
throogh close to ib insertiaii. 

^ 1^111^ '»S^^^ypiS>*sH tb^ handle draws the drumskin 

^^^^£*%^^^^'{£'*^' *£' "^tural position as seen from 
s'^f^^*^*^^'*^''' ^^^ ^S' ^^ shews the hammer 
^''~" -" -^ — »_!•=.- jjijjg hammer is fastened along 



' foot-reat, also not 
^1 



^iBl^^^Sitf-fv^'^irgBtraotiDii for atcUipli < 



132 SYMPATHETICALLY VIBBATING PARTS OF THE BAR. pabt i. 

the upper margin of the drumskin by a fold of mucous membrane, within which 
run a series of rather stiff bundles of tendinous fibres. These straps arise in a 
line which passes from the processus Folianus (fig. 38, 1), above the contraction of 
the neck, towards the lower end of the surface of the joint for the anvil, and in 
elderly people is developed into a prominent ridge of bone. The tendinous bands 
or ligaments are strongest and stiffest at the front and back end of this line of 
insertion. The front portion of the ligament, lig. mallei anterius (fig. 40, ma), 
surrounds the processus Folianus, and is attached partly to a bony spine (figs. 39 
and 40, Stp) of the osseous ring of the drum, which projects close to the neck of 
the hammer, and partly to its under edge, and partly falls into a bony fissure 
which leads towards the articulation of the jaw. The back portion of the same 
ligament, on the other hand, is attached to a sharp-edged bony ridge projecting 
inwards from the drumskin, and parallel to it, a little above the opening, through 

^ which a traversing nerve, the chorda tymp&nl (fig. 40, 1, 1, p. 131c), enters the bone. 
This second bundle of fibres may be called the lig. mallSI posterius. In fig. 39 
(p. 131c) the origin of this ligament is seen as a little projection of the ring to 
which the drumskin is attached. This projection bounds towards the right the 
upper edge of the opening for the drumskin, which begins to the left of Stp, exactly 
at the place where the long process of the anvil makes its appearance in the figure. 
These two ligaments, front and back, taken together form a moderately tense 
sinewy chord, round which the hammer can turn as on an axis. Hence even when 
the two other ossicles have been carefully removed, without loosening these two 
ligaments, the hammer will remain in its natural position, although not so stiffly 
as before. 

The middle fibres of the bibad ligamentous band above mentioned pass outwards 
towards the upper bony edge of the drumskin. They are comparatively short and 
are known as lig. mallei externum. Arising above the line of the axis of the 

^ hammer, they prevent the head from turning too far inwards, and the handle with 
the drumskin from turning too far outwards, and oppose any down-dragging of the 
ligament forming the axis. The first effect is increased by a ligament (lig. mallei 
superius) which passes from the processus Folianus, upwards, into the small slit, 
between the head of the hammer and the wall of the drum, as shewn in fig. 40 
(p. 131c). 

It must be observed that in the upper part of the channel of the Eustachian 
tube, there is a muscle for tightemng the drumskin (m. tensor tymp&ni), the tendon 
of which passes obliquely across the cavity of the drum and is attached to the 
upper part of the handle of the hammer (at *, fig. 40, p. 131c). This muscle 
must be regarded as a moderately tense elastic band, and may have its tension 
temporarily much increased by active contraction. The effect of this muscle is 
also principally to draw the handle of the hammer inwards, together with the 
drumskin. But since its point of attachment is so close to the ligamentous axis, 

^ the chief part of its pull acts on this axis, stretching it as it draws it inwards. 
Here we must observe that in the case of a rectilinear inextensible cord, which 
is moderately tense, such as the ligamentous axis of the hammer, a slight force 
which pulls it sideways, suffices to produce a very considerable increase of tension. 
This is the case with the present arrangement of stretching muscles. It should 
also be remembered that quiescent muscles not excited by innervation, are always 
stretched elastically in the living body, and act like elastic bands. This elastic 
tension can of course be considerably increased by the innervation which brings 
the muscles into action, but such tension is never entirely absent from the majority 
of our muscles. 

The anvily which is shewn separately in fig. 41, resembles a double tooth with 
two fangs ; the surface of its joint with the hammer (at *, fig. 41), replacing the 
masticating surface. Of the two roots of the tooth which are rather widely 
separated, the upper, directed backwards, is called the short process b ; the other, 
thinner and directed downwards, the long process of the cmvil 1. At the tip of 



-S^pr^Tf .■:5'#«»«»^ 




i PABTS OF THE EAR. 133 

' "^ " S*^B^iSf fif'° Btirmp. The tip of the Bhort 

""" Tjrt ligament and an imperfectly 

loiut at its under surfiice, is con- 

1 the back wall of the cavity of 

— .^^—. r^jp..^-at the spot where this passes 

H'iS'H # 3 Mito the air oavities of the mastoid 

H;'np^> Oiind the ear. The joint between 

Ha )]filHit If l^mmer is a curved depression of 

Mii^ti^i Mi-egular form, like a saddle. In 

WitfSfa^iiB may be compared with the joints 

H^VKiBf^Paiowii Bregnet watohkeys, which 

Illiflj?#iil of interlocking teeth, offering 

l'*$!*fi^A? resistance to revolution in one 

^ut allowing no revolution what- H 

i other. Interlocking teeth of 

e developed upon the under side 

» M fk ^M 7 H ^^Si' **1?'*^W **'^* between hammer and anvil. 

^ ^*t J* ^ |'H^l^JS|w!««^*gAg?drum8kin, that of the anvU lies 

f^i*U* ^^^>SE*'w^^b6^^ °^ ^^^ hollow of the joint, the 

_ . a _ .«....». _ _ . -^jy^ fjijjQ consequence of this 

. t inwards by the handle, it bites 

Isi^i '^^^'^CS^vsI^y, when the drumskin, with the 




' '>"' 111 



fJSpyrt 



?£= 



MjugSC^ug^liged to follow it. The interlocking 

""^""' ~" """md the surfaces glide over each 

i has the very great advantage of 

^>tom away from the oval window, 

" rably rarefied. There is also no 

^ppen when the air in the auditory ^ 

y opposed by the tension of the 

, „ ■""» in the act of swallowing, the 

Ei*S-cyc:^^^ tones in the middle and upper 

""' "~" weakly than usual, but stronger 

m be explained by supposing that 

I transfer weak motions from one 

I the surfaces to slide over one 

a maet be enfeebled. 

they are strong or weak, perhaps 

i^^l^^eoome audible.* 

' " * tone, which is due to the above 

ivil, wiU have to be considered in 

^ process of the anvil lies sensibly 
lammer, the head of the hammer 

^■lammer and anvil, when the head 
i drumskin are driven inwards, 
e anvil against the hammer, and 

Bsensibly stretched, and hence the 
"mtly in the normal position of the 
h any other bone but the hammer, 
^ed ligaments, which are tolerably 

;3about its ligamentous axis remains 

j9iif^^|Wft^ely in fig. 42, has really a most 
y*ISh it has been named. The foot B 



^3I^^3 



!c;:st.:R;;9 



.^^•S^^i^a^^f^frgllhapter IX. 





134 SYMPATHETICALLY VIBRATING PARTS OF THE EAR. part i. 

is fastened into the membrane of the oval window, and fills it all up, with the 

exception of a narrow margin. The head op, has an articulating hole for the tip 

of the long process of the anvil 

(processus lenticularis, or os A 

orbiculare). The joint is sur- >«s^^n. 

rounded by a lax membrane. Jl , l^j 4 1_»M \ b «P 

When the drumskin is normally B 

drawn inwards, the anvil presses 

on the stirrup, so that no tighter — 

ligamentous fastening of the Right stirrup : seen, A from within, B ftrom front, C from 
joint is necessary. Every in- behind. B foot, cp, head or capitulum. % Front, p 

crease in the push on the hammer 

arising from the drumskin also occasions an increase in the push of the stirrup 

T against the oval window; but in this action the upper and somewhat looser 
margin of its foot is more displaced than the under, so that the head rises slightly ; 
this motion again causes a slight elevation of the tip of the long process in the 
anvil, in the direction conditioned by its position, inwards and underneath the 
ligamentous axis of the hammer. 

The excursions of the foot of the stirrup are always very small, and according 
to my measurements * never exceed one-tenth of a millimetre ('00394 or about 
?7T of an inch). But the hammer when freed from anvil and stirrup, with its 
handle moving outwards, and sliding over the articulating surface of the anvil, can 
make excursions at least nine times as great as it can execute when acting in 
connection with anvil and stirrup. 

The first advantage of the apparatus belonging to the drum of the ear, is that 
the whole sonorous motion of the comparatively wide surface of the drumskin (ver- 
tical diameter 9 to 10 millimetres [or 35 to 0*39 inches], just over one-third of an 

finch ; horizontal diameter, 7'5 to 9 millimetres [or 0*295 to 0*35 inches], that is 

about five-sixths of the former dimensions) is collected and transferred by the 

ossicles to the relatively much smaller surface of the oval window or of the foot of 

the stirrup, which is only 1*5 to 3 millimetres [0*06 to 0*12 inches] in diameter. 

The surface of the drumskin is hence 15 to 20 times larger than that of the oval 

window. 

In this transference of the vibrations of air into the labyrinth it is to be observed 

that though the paoiiicles of air themselves have a comparatively large amplitude of 
vibration, yet their density is so small that they have no very great moment of inertia, 
and consequently when their motion is impeded by the drumskin of the ear, they 
are not capable of presenting much resistance to such an impediment, or of exert- 
ing any sensible pressure against it. The fluid in the labyrinth, on the other hand, 
is much denser and heavier than the air in the auditory passage, and for moving it 
rapidly backwards and forwards as in sonorous oscillations, a far greater exertion of 
f pressure is required than was necessary for the air in the auditory pskssage. On 
the other hand the amplitude of the vibrations performed by the fluid in the laby- 
rinth are relatively very small, and extremely minute vibrations will in this case 
suffice to give a vibratory motion to the terminations and appendages of the nerves, 
which lie on the very limits of microscopic vision. 

The mechanical problem which the apparatus within the drum of the ear had 
to solve, was- to transform a motion of great amplitude and little force, such as im- 
* pinges on the drumskin, into a motion of small amplitude and great force, such as 
had to be communicated to the fluid in the labyrinth. 

A problem of this sort can be solved by various kinds of mechanical apparatus, 
such as levers, trains of pulleys, cranes, and the like. The mode in which it is 
solved by the apparatus in the drum of the ear, is quite unusual, and very peculiar. 

* Helmholtz, ' Mechanj^jw ^l the Auditory attempt is made to prove the correotnefis of 
Ossicles/ in Pflu^er's ^^ ,^ filr Physio- the account of this mechanism given in the 
logie, vol. i. pp. 34-48. r Zhi^ paper an text. 



CHAP. VI. SYMPATHETICALLY VIBRATING PARTS OF THE EAR. 135 

A leverage is certainly employed, but only to a moderate extent. The tip of 
the handle of the hammer, on which the pull of the drumskin first acts, is about 
once and a half as far from the axis of rotation as that point of the anvil which 
presses on the stirrup (see fig. 39, p. 131c). The handle of the hammer consequently 
forms the longer arm of a lever, and the pressure on the stirrup will be once and a 
half as great as that which drives in the hammer. 

The chief means of reinforcement is due to the form of the drumskin. It has 
been already mentioned that its middle or navd (umbilicus) is drawn inwards by 
the handle, so as to present a funnel shape. But the meridian lines of this funnel 
drawn from the navel to the circumference, are not straight lines ; they are slightly 
convex on the outer side. A diminution of pressure in the auditory passage in- 
creases this convexity, and an augmentation dinodnishes it. Now the tension caused 
in an inextensible thread, having the form of a flat arch, by a force acting perpen- 
dicular to its convexity, is very considerable. It is well known that a sensible force IT 
must be exerted to stretch a long thin string into even a tolerably straight horizon- 
tal line. The force is indeed very much greater than the weight of the string which 
pulls the string from the horizontal position.* In the case of the drumskin, it is 
not gravity which prevents its radial fibres from straightening themselves, but partly 
the pressure of the air, and partly the elastic pull of the circular fibres of the mem- 
brane. The latter tend to contract towards the axis of the funnel-shaped mem- 
brane, and hence produce the inflection of the radial fibres towards this axis. By 
means of the variable pressure of air during the sonorous vibrations of the at- 
mosphere this pull exerted by the circular fibres is alternately strengthened and 
weakened, and produces an effect on the point where the radial fibres are attached 
to the tip of the handle of the hammer, similar to that which would happen if we 
could alternately increase and diminish the weight of a string stretched horizontally, 
for this would produce a proportionate increase and decrease in the pull exerted by 
the hand which stretched it. f 

In a horizontally stretched string such as has been just described, it should be 
further remarked that an extremely small relaxation of the hand is followed by a 
considerable fall in the middle of the string. The relaxation of the hand, namely, 
takes place in the direction of the chord of the arc, and ea»sy geometrical con- 
siderations show that chords of arcs of the same length and different, but always 
very small curvature, differ very slightly indeed from each other and from the 
lengths of the arcs themselves, t This is also the case vdth the drumskin. An ex- 
tremely little yielding in the handle of the hammer admits of a very considerable 
change in the curvature of the drumskin. The consequence is that, in sonorous 
vibrations, the parts of the drumskin which lie between the inner attachment of 
this membrane to the hammer and its outer attachment to the ring of the drum, 
are able to follow the oscillations of the air with considerable freedom, while the 
motion of the air is transmitted to the handle of the hammer with much diminished 
amplitude but much increased force. After this, as the motion passes from 'the f 
handle of the hammer to the stirrup, the leverage already mentioned causes 
a second and more moderate reduction of the amplitude of vibration with corre- 
sponding increase of force. 

We now proceed to describe the innermost division of the organ of hearing, 
called the labyrinth. Fig. 43 (p. 134c) represents a cast of its cavity, as seen from 
different positions. Its middle portion, containing the oval vnndow Fv (fenestra 
vestibull) that receives the foot of the stirrup, is called the vestibule of the labyrinth, 

* [The following quatrain, said to have Into a horizontal line, 

been unconsciously produced by Vince, as a So as to make it truly straight. — Translator.^ 

?^h2i„^ wm "L^^ S^^^^'J^ ttl + The "mount of difference varieg as the 

l^f ^m;tW,rri r^^T"^ «!«»« °« *!>« depth of the arc. If the length 

on a non-mathematioal reader .- ^ ^j^^ ,,„ ^^ j^ ^^ ^^^ distance of its middle 

_, , , from the chord be s, the chord is shorter than 

Hence no force, however great, g g> 

Can stretch a cord, however fine, the arc by the length - . " 




"fi*iif 



iP THB EAB. pam i. 

tS^uid DDderwards, a spiral oanal, the <nat^- 

tS^S^H g^iich liee the round window Fc (fanegtra 

I^S^~"" J £ faavit Y of the drum. Upwards and back- 

^^SftiB ffjSf J*" ,36iDi droular canals from the vestibule^ the 

iMIBIg||^^|A|StBtticaJ lemicircular canait, each of which 

iKiHiiniSpW'lB^** vestibule, and each of which has at one 

•— ~— ^•'jOiM'ftjgpHiio (ha, vaa, vpa). The aqnaedactus 

1^W^- MiMfii (from Or. Fr. E. Weber's investigatioiiB) 

"^BiQwater of the Iftbyrinth, and the spaces for 

[Sattggplaces Tsf and * are casts of canals which 



I y ^JM'J^yWMMft 1^ jy^th is filled with fluid, and sorrounded by 
IjSjJtm '«<tgidjtfjiMpetrous bone, so that there are only two 



^j^^j^^lfff^bws, the oval Ft, and the round Fc Into 

pSted the foot of the stirrup, by a narrow 

1 by a membrane. When the stirrup 

[[whole mass of fluid in the labyrinth is 

Adow, as the only spot where its walls can 

3{^Bc{iiiS^^a^ finely drawn gloss tube as a manometer 

.l^&s^^S'^Tiff'^Bl^ reepecte Injuring the labyrinth, the water 

^i^^^^^^^fHO^^ci/^^^^OGa as a strong pressure of air acts on the 

[• .jj. t^^ .jjj. .jjj* .jj. . jj. ^. 

.2r ■!='■ "■ 







Ifom within. C, leH Inbyrintli from &boy8. Fc, renntn 
, oroinl window. Be, rocesaus elUpttciu. Rs, recesaus 
_ unpullAoftheMmo. vaa,anipnlUorthefroutTerticftl 
!l^ul MmiclrcaUr ouud. ro, common limb of the two 
' (udoctiu vSBtlbOlL Tsf, trmctiu apHUs rorftmlaniu. 
pf rkmia vwUMUi. 

Ooot of the stirrup to be driven into the oval 

„ „„-„,-^Jierve are spread over fine membranous 

l^^^^f^J^ partly expanded in the hollow of the bony 

i^:^^^<M>^& membranoui labyrinth. This last has 

^^^il^i^ny labyrinth. But its canals and oavities 

""■{•^^^d into two separate sections ; first the 

'ti^iito^and second the taccUlm with the mem- 

^^■•^^i the sacculus lie in the vestibule of the 

^ the recessut elUptlcm (Be, fig, 43 above), 

'r^ii^^haerlcus (Ra). These are floating bags 

l^>^*9^t£BBs|^l of the labyrinth at the point where the 

.i::f.=fi: 

imbranous semicircular canals is shewn in 

~j™.j™-»-a in the membranous than in the bony semi- 

IJ^^C^A^nt investigations of Biidinger, the mem- 

r^KS^|l in the bony ones, but are fastened to the 

'CB:^,^r||^^*Q^lla there is a pad-like prominence directed 




137 

and on the utriculua 

The peculiftr manner in which 

in this place will be descnbed 

these, and the whole apparatus 

Sn^^t^aoalB, assiBt in the s 






alftlg^ljttf^ M>he utriculua is found the auditory 

EwSlK^PS'^Siw^^''^ crystalB of lime connected by 

yj|ttM.Mf'*tttdftltaaea with each other and with the 

I iXksHvnB'^^ Siere the nerves are bo abundant. 

afp^ ^-".ei^ *~^ — ,J?Bvltt!'OT^S^RtEea'bony veatibule, near the utriculus, 

"~i^l§^^'^''M||^^fi' "^I^Kf^^^ ^^^ ^ similar thickened •r 

^^^KMk ^i Bf " "fSl fy'W^tT ^ narrow oanal connects it with 

S^P^gJ-H^W^^gJgiBtgjAglbnmotiBoochleft. As to the cavity 

_Si^L^ ""SiWirBi^lvlBee by fig. 43 opposite, that it is 

~\ aqfj^dflgC j9rfWfiHi0| bnt the canal of the coohlea is 

jtA^ — • — ''galleries, by a tranavarse partition, 

•calleries oommunicate only at the 

_ JOi^. the helicotrema, bounded by the 

>i|idf|tnl axis or m^i'dus. Of the two 

9a is divided, one communicates 

veitilmle gallery (ecala vestlbflll). 

;3>y the membianous partition, but 

^ndow, and the yielding membrane, 

to exchange vibrations with the 

gallery (sc&la tymp&nl). ^ 

'S^QlOQltranous partition of the cochlea is 

i^^^ t^^ (ductus ooohle&ris). Its inner 

'^ !^rUm|^i^ ^lamed towards the central axis or 

'"' '^^ii^ps^flS^'i^A attached to the rudimentary 

l'>^;«C^lii^on (Umlna splr&lis). A part of 

it^k^vSp^^te external surface is attached to 

i'^^'V^^&r'a^ of the bony gallery. Fig. 45 

p.a^f^lhllbony parts of a cochlea which has 

tU^^r^en, and fig. 46 (p. 138a), a trans- 

t;i^W«^(|?sh of the canal (which is imperfect 

^aluiAM^hand at bottom). la both figures 

*"' ~ '^ the bony port of the partition, and 

& and b are the two unattached parts 

C^nbranous canal. The transverse 1[ 

iS^lHahis canal is, as the figure shews, 

^; lingular, so that an angle of the 

L- tflis^^^lbw Us is attached to the edge of 

»*^ •^«qg^)artition. The commencement of 

_ oochlearis at the base of the 

t^^mmunicates, as already stated, by 

narrow membranous canal with 

in the vestibule. Of the two un- 

ps of its membranous walls, the 

vestibule gallery is a soft mem- 

ler's membrane (membr&na vesti- 

membrdna bOslldrU (b), is a firm, 

lially, corresponding to its radial 

fibres, shewing that it is but loosely 



'WM<i 




138 



COCHLEA OF THE EAR. 



PABT I. 



Fio. 46. 



connected in a direction transverse to them. The terminations of the nerves of 
the cochlea and their appendages, are attached to the membrana b&silaris, as is 
shewn by the dotted lines in fig. 46. 

When the drumskin is driven inwards by increased pressure of air in the auditory 
passage, it also forces the auditory ossicles inwards, as already explained, and as a 
consequence the foot of the stirrup 
penetrates deeper into the oval win- 
dow. The fluid of the labyrinth, being 
surrounded in all other places by 
firm bony walls, has only one means 
of escape, — the round window with its 
yielding membrane. To reach it, the 
fluid of the labyrinth must either pass 
T through the h6lic6trema, the narrow 
opening at the vertex of the cochlea, 
flowing over from the vestibule gallery 
into the drum gallery, or, as it would 
probably not have sufficient time to do 
this in the case of sonorous vibrations, 
press the membranous partition of 
the cochlea against the drum gallery. 
The converse action must take place 
when the air in the auditory passage 
is rarefied. 




Transverse section of a spire of a cochlea which has been 
softened in hydrochloric acid. Ls, lamina spiralis. Lis, 
limbus laminae spiralis. Sv, scala vestibftli. St, scala 
tymp&ni. Dc, ductus cochlearis. Lsp, ligamentum 
spirale. v, membrana vestibularis, b, membrana bAsi- 
liris. e, outer wall of the ductus cochlearis. *its fillet. 
The dotted lines shew sections of themembrana tectoria 
and the auditory rods. 



Fio. 47. 



Hence the sonorous vibrations of the air in the outer auditory passage are 

finally transferred to the membranes of the labyrinth, more especially those of the 

cochlea, and to the expansions of the nerves upon them, 
f The terminal expansions of these nerves, as I have already mentioned, are con- 
nected with very small elastic appendages, which appear adapted to excite the 

nerves by their vibrations. 

The nerves of the vestibule terminate in the thickened places of the bags of 

the membranous labyrinth, already mentioned 

(p. 137a), where the tissue has a greater and 

almost cartilaginous consistency. One of these 

places, provided with nerves, projects like a fillet 

into the inner part of the ampulla of each semi- 
circular canal, and another lies on each of the little 

bags in the vestibule. The nerve fibres here enter 

between the soft cylindrical cells of the fine cuticle 

(epithelium) which covers the internal surface of 

the fillets. Projecting from the internal surface 
IT of this epithelium in the ampullae, Max Schultze 

discovered a number of very peculiar, stiff, elastic 

hairs, shewn in fig. 47. They are much longer 

than the vibratory hairs of the ciliated epithe'lium 

(their length is ^}g of a Paris line [or -00355 

English inch] in the ray fish), brittle, and running 

to a very fine point. It is clear that fine stiff 

hairs of this kind are extremely well adapted for 

moving sympathetically with the motion of the 

fluid, and hence for producing mechanical irri- 
tation in the nerve fibres which lie in the soft 

epithelium between their roots. 

According to Max Schultze, the corresponding 

thickened fillets in the vestibules, where the nerves terminate, have a similar soft 

epithelium, and have short hairs which are easily destroyed. Close to these 





'riie calcareous concretioca, called 

',oonnected ooDvexo- concave solids, 

nerve fillet. In human beings, 

crystalline tx)die8, of a lougish 

BWTipi- '«vBr- **** '''''*® '*^' *°^ apparently 

j&ftHktt^QAiH^SI^aitmely well suited for producing a 
jSbi»S^]|[{f||'}^kit» fluid in the labyrinth ia suddenly 
((Millu«f , J^^^M|)rwoTen nerves, probably inBtantly 
'" W*iBV494&ftSlBrioi'<^''yB'^^ ^e ^t more slowly in 
'WFtSTwb ^iteSS'""*^ slowly, and thus partly drag 
|*^JP ^fyB i|PM§'would satisfy the same conditions 



By this instrument the nerre 
a of a very rapidly oscillating ivory 
' "it bruising the nerve. A powerful 
^ produced, which is shewn by a IT 
Sfponding muscle. The above parts 
p|Uar mechanical excitenient. 
fte complex. The nerve fibres enter 
^^to the bony part of the partition, 
&i^. Where they reach this, peculiar 
IHgi^^Sefl^^JlEl) by the Morchese Corti, and have 
^Bitl^^^ECrminate. 

§^m= ta i- i>»-w--a— w— J^'W^!??^-'*^'-^^'™ '° ^- *^- It enters through 
'^^sS/^'^W^i'*'^^^*^^'^^"'*"''"" ^""^ ^^^ *"* through the 
».j(»t:^.5t*.^*.^..5t..^.™,^. ■^- ,)jt..jj. ijQjjy partiUon (1, 3, 4), 

aft. 'S'-^mn; as far as its margins. 

'■^Tk. . . At this point the nerves 

pass under the com- 
mencement of the mem- IT 
brona basil Kris, pene- 
trate this in a series of 
openings, and thus reach 
the ductus cochlefiris 
and those nervous, 
elastic formations which 
lie on the inner zone 
(Zi) of the membrane. 

The margin of the 

bony partition (a to b, 

fig. 49, p. 140a), and the 

* * * ^ *''**''*'^*^ ft ft 1* '£' ft inner zone of the mem- 

*^^,^^*'^^-*S>*^*|f''i^<l!y^:^?^- ^B u^^^** ^'^B °^ ^^^ figure* 

Zi.%r^ b> >J*kV'i:S:^B^^^t|g^C^k%:^cgmtlitheductuscochleflris. Hereh^T 



i^lH&^^qX^ates of the bony partition, between 

"~"~" i;The upper side of the bony parti- 

£, fig. 49, also shewn at Lis, fig, 46, 

ions on its upper aide, is called 

•Q5,tsh carries a peculiar elastic pierced 

|his membrane is stretched parallel 

on the outer side of the duct, 






e5g*!2!- 






Between these two membranes 
^^rS^)J^^3^rminate. 
^^BveS^^Il-^. 49) are relatively the most solid 



^hes consists of two e 






140 



COCHLEA OF THE EAR. 



PARI L 



Fig. 49. 




■AVi 



A": 



■>■'•••■*■* 



mmmm 







or fibres, an external and an internal. A single pair of these is shewn in fig. 50, 

A, below, and a short series of them in fig. 50, B, attached to the membrana 

basilaris, and at f also connected with the pierced 

tissue, into which fit the terminal cells of the nerves 

(fig. 49, c), which will be more fully described pre- 
sently. These formations are shewn in fig. 51, 

(p. 141^, c), as seen from the vestibule gallery ; a is 

the denticulated layer, c the openings for the 

nerves on the internal margin of the membrana 

basilaris, its external margin being visible at u u ; 

d is the inner series of Gorti's rods, e the outer ; 

over these, between e and x is seen the pierced 

membrane, against which lie the terminal cells of 
Tthe nerves. 

The fibres of the first, or outer series, are fiat, 

somewhat S-shaped formations, having a swelling 

at the spot where they rise from the membrane to 

which they are attached, and ending in a kind of 

articulation which serves to connect them with the 

second or inner series. In fig. 51, p. 141, at d 

will be seen a great number of these ascending 

fibres, lying beside each other in regular succession. 

In the same way they may be seen all along the 

membrane of the cochlea, close together, so that 

there must be many thousands of them. Their 

sides lie close together, and even seem to be con- 
nected, leaving however occasional gaps in the line 
T of connection, and these gaps are probably tra- 
versed by nerve fibres. Hence the fibres of the 

first series as a whole form a stiff layer, which 

endeavours to erect itself when the natural fasten- 
ings no longer resist, but allows the membrane on 

which they stand to crumple up between the at- 
tachments d and e of Gorti's arches. 

The fibres of the second or inner series, which 

form the descending part of the arch e, fig. 50, 

below, are smooth, flexible, cylindrical threads 

with thickened ends. The upper extremity forms 

a kind of joint to connect them with the fibres 

of the first series, the lower extremity is enlarged in a bell shape and is attached 

closely to the membrane at the base. In the microscopic preparations they gen- 



^ 



Fig. 60. 



U 




A, external and internal rod in connection seen in profile. B, membrana basilaris (b) with the 
terminal fascIctUi of nerves (n), and the internal and external rods (i and e). 1 internal, 
2 external ceUB of the floor, 4' attachments of the cells of the cover. * * epithelium. 

erally appear bent in various ways ; but there can be no doubt that in their natural 
condition they are stretched with some degree of tension, so that they pull down 



;|iitfjii)i|«i']SAa 




series. The fibres of the first 

rtie, which can be relatively little 

^tached nearly in the middle of the 

vibrations will have the greatest 

le drum gallery of the labyrinth 

inst the oval window, the mem- 

^.rds, the fibres of the second series 

'•ponding places of the fibres of the 

jnot, however, seem probable that 

'any great extent, for their lateral 

hang together in masses like a 

their attachment In anatomical 

Lent, there can be no doubt that 

the vibrations of the membrana T 




lent knowledge is not sufficient to ^ 
these vibrations take place. For 
of the several parts and the degree 
than can be deduced from suoh 
iated parts, as they casually group 

)V6red over with a multitude of 

various kinds, partly the finest 

mded nerve cells, partly fibres o( 

support for fixing and suspending 

I in fig. 49 opposite. They are 

and within Corti's arches. The 

lO and d, which are furnished with 



142 DAMPING OF THE VIBRATIONS IN THE EAR. pabt i. 

hairs, precisely resembling the ciliated cells in the ampullae and utriculus. They 
appear to be directly connected by fine varicose nerve fibres, and constitute the 
most constant part of the cochlean formations ; for with birds and reptiles, where 
the structure of the cochlea is much simpler, and even Corti's arches are absent, 
these little ciliated cells are always to be found, and their hairs are so placed as to 
strike against Gorti's membrane during the vibration of the membrana basilaris. 
The cells at a and a', fig. 49 (p. 140), which appear in an enlarged condition at b 
and n in fig. 51 (p. 141), seem to have the character of an epithelium. In fig. 51 
there will also be observed bundles and nets of fibres, which may be partly merely 
supporting fibres of a ligamentous nature, and may partly, to judge by their appear- 
ance as strings of beads, possess the character of bundles of the finest fibriles of 
nerves. But these parts are all so frail and delicate that there is still much 
doubt as to their connection and office. 

IT The essential result of our description of the ear may consequently be said to 
consist in having found the terminations of the auditory nerves everywhere con- 
nected with a peculiar auxiliary apparatus, partly elastic, partly firm, which may be 
put in sympathetic vibration under the influence of external vibration, and will then 
probably agitate and excite the mass of nerves. Now it was shewn in Chap. III., 
that the process of sympathetic vibration was observed to differ according as the 
bodies put into sympathetic vibration were such as when once put in motion con- 
tinued to sound for a long time, or soon lost their motion, p. 39c. Bodies which, 
like tuning-forks when once struck, go on sounding for a long time, are susceptible 
of sympathetic vibration in a high degree notwithstanding the difficulty of putting 
their mass in motion, because they admit of a long accumulation of impulses in 
themselves minute, produced in them by each separate vibration of the exciting 
tone. But precisely for this reason there must be the exactest agreement between 
the pitches of the proper tone of the fork and of the exciting tone, because other- 

IT wise subsequent impulses given by the motion of the air could not constantly recur 
in the same phase of vibration, and thus be suitable for increasing the subsequent 
effect of the preceding impulses. On the other hand if we take bodies for which 
the tone rapidly dies away, such as stretched membranes or thin light strings, we 
find that they are not only susceptible of sympathetic vibration, when vibrating 
air is allowed to act on them, but that this sympathetic vibration is not so limited 
to a particular pitch, as in the other case, and they can therefore be easily set in 
motion by tones of different kinds. For if an elastic body on being once struck 
and allowed to sound freely, loses nearly the whole of its motion after ten vibra- 
tions, it will not be of much importance that any fresh impulses received after the 
expiration of this time, should agree exactly with the former, although it would be 
of great importance in the case of a sonorous body for which the motion generated 
by the first impulse would remain nearly unchanged up to the time that the second 
impulse was applied. In the latter case the second impulse could not increase the 

IT amount of motion, unless it came upon a phase of the vibration which had 
precisely the same direction of motion as itself. 

The connection between these two relations can be calculated independently of 
the nature of the body put into sympathetic vibration,* and as the results are im- 
portant to enable us to form a judgment on the state of things going on in the ear, 
a short table is annexed. Suppose that a body which vibrates sympathetically has 
been set into its state of maximum vibration by means of an exact unison, and 
that the exciting tone is then altered till the S3anpathetic vibration is reduced to 
^jf of its former amount. The amount of the required difference of pitch is given in 
the first column in terms of an equally tempered Tone [which is ^ of an Octave], 
Now let the same sonorous body be struck, and let its sound be allowed to die 
away gradually. The number of vibrations which it has made by the time that its 
intensity is reduced to y^ of its original amount is noted, and given in the second 
column. 

* The modo 9f ^culatiog }^ explained in Appendix X. 



CHAP. VI. 



DAMPING OF THE VIBRATIONS IN THE EAR 



143 



Difference of Pitch, in terms of an equally tempered Tone, 
necessarv to reduce the intensitv of sympathetic vibration to 
■fj^ of that produced by perfect unisonanoe 


Number of vibrations after which 
the intensity of tone in a sonorous 
body whose sound is allowed to die 
out, reduces to -^ of its original 
amount 


1. One eighth of a Tone 

2. One quarter of a Tone 

3. One Semitone 

4. Three quarters of a Tone 

5. A whole Tone 

6. A Tone and a quarter 

7. A tempered minor Third or a Tone and a half 

8. A Tone and three quarters 

9. A tempered major Third or two whole Tones 


38-00 
19O0 
9-60 
6-83 
4-75 
3-80 
8-17 
2-71 
2-37 



Now, although we are not able exactly to discover how long the ear and its 
individual parts, when set in motion, will continue to sound, yet well- known IT 
experiments allow us to form some sort of judgment as to the position which 
the parts of the ear must occupy in the scale exhibited in this table. Thus, there 
cannot possibly be any parts of the ear which continue to sound so long as a 
tuning-fork, for that would be patent to the commonest observation. But even if 
there were any parts in the ear answering to the first degree of our table, that is 
requiring 38 vibrations to be reduced to y^^ of their force, — we should recognise 
this in the deeper tones, because 38 vibrations last ^ of a second for il, ^ for a, 
^ for a', &c., and such a long endurance of sensible sound would render rapid 
musical passages impossible in the unaccented and once*accented Octaves. Such 
a state of things would disturb musical effect as much as the strong resonance of 
a vaulted room, or as raising the dampers on a piano. When making a shake, we 
can readily strike 8 or 10 notes in a second, so that each tone separately is struck 
from 4 to 5 times. If, then, the sound of the first tone had not died off in our ear 
before the end of the second sound, at least to such an extent as not to be sensible T 
when the latter was sounding, the tones of the shake, instead of being individually 
distinct, would merge into a continuous mixture of both. Now shakes of this kind, 
with 10 tones to a second, can be clearly and sharply executed throughout almost 
the whole scale, although it must be owned that from A downwards, in the great 
and contra Octaves they sound bad and rough, and their tones begin to mix. Yet 
it can be easily shewn that this is not due to the mechanism of the instrument. 
Thus if we execute a shake on the harmonium, the keys of the lower notes are 
just as accurately constructed and just as easy to move as those of the higher 
ones. Each separate tone is completely cut off with perfect certainty at the 
moment the valve falls on the air passage, and each speaks at the moment the valve 
is raised, because during so brief an interruption the tongues remain in a state of 
vibration. Similarly fpr the violoncello. At the instant when the finger which 
makes the shake falls on the string, the latter must commence a vibration of a 
different periodic time, due to its length; and the instant that the finger is IT 
removed, the vibration belonging to the deeper tone must return. And yet the 
shake in the bass is as imperfect on the violoncello as on any other instrument. 
Buns and shakes can be relatively best executed on a pianoforte because, at the 
moment of striking, the new tone sounds with great but rapidly decreasing inten- 
sity. Hence, in addition to the inharmonic noise produced by the simultaneous 
continuance of the two tones, we also hear a distinct prominence given* to each 
separate tone. Now, since the difficulty of shaking in the bass is the same for all 
instruments, and for individual instruments is demonstrably independent of the 
manner in which the tones are produced, we are forced to conclude that the 
difficulty lies in the ear itself. We have, then, a plain indication that the vibrating 
parts of the ear are not damped with sufficient force and rapidity to allow of 
successfully effecting such a rapid alternation of tones. 

Nay more, this fact further proves that there mnst be different parts of the ear 
which are set in vibration by tones of different pitch and which receive the sensation 



144 DAMPING OF THE VIBRATIONS IN THE EAR. fabt i. 

of these tones. Thus, it might be supposed that as the vibratory mass of the whole 
ear, the drumskin, auditory ossicles, and fluid in the labyrinth, were vibrating at 
the same time, the inertia of this mass was the cause why the sonorous vibrations 
in the ear were not immediately extinguished. But this hypothesis would not 
suffice to explain the fact observed. For an elastic body set into sympathetic 
vibration by any tone, vibrates sympathetically in the pitch number of the exciting 
tone ; but as soon as the exciting tone ceases, it goes on sounding in the pitch 
number of its own proper tone. This fact, which is derived from theory, may be 
perfectly verified on tuning-forks by means of the vibration microscope. 

If, then, the ear vibrated as a single system, and were capable of continuing 
its vibration for a sensible time, it would have to do so with its own pitch number, 
which is totally independent of the pitch number of the former exciting tone. 
The consequence is that shakes would be equally difficult upon both high and 

IT low tones, and next that the two tones of the shake would not mix with each 
other, but that each would mix with a third tone, due to the ear itself. We became 
acquainted with such a tone in the last chapter, the high/'"', p. 116a. The result, 
then, under these circumstances would be quite different from what is observed. 

Now if a shake of 10 notes in a second, be made on A^ of which the vibra- 
tional number is 110, this tone would be struck every ^ of a second. We may 
justly assume that the shake would not be clear, if the intensity of the expiring 
tone were not reduced to -j^ of its original amount in this -^ of a second. In this 
case, after at least 22 vibrations, the parts of the ear which vibrate sympathetically 
with A must descend to at least ^ of their intensity of vibration as their tone 
expires, so that their power of sympathetic vibration cannot be of the first degree 
in the table on p. 143a, but may belong to the second, third, or some other higher 
degree. That the degree cannot be any much higher one, is shewn in the first 
place by the fact that shakes and runs begin to be difficult even on tones which do 

IT not lie much lower. This we shall see by observations on beats subsequently de- 
tailed. We may on the whole assume that the parts of the ear which vibrate 
sympathetically have an amount of damping power corresponding to the third 
degree of our table, where the intensity of sympathetic vibration with a Semitone 
difference of pitch is only ^ of what it is for a complete unison. Of course there 
can be no question of exact determinations, but it is important for us to be able 
to form at least an approximate conception of the influence of damping on the 
sympathetic vibration of the ear, as it has great significance in the relations 
of consonance. Hence when we hereafter speak of individual parts of the ear 
vibrating sympathetically with a determinate tone, we mean that they are set into 
strongest motion by that tone, but are also set into vibration less strongly by tones 
of nearly the same pitch, and that this sympathetic vibration is still sensible for 
the interval of a Semitone. Fig. 62 may serve 
to give a general conception of the law by which ^^' 

fthe intensity of the sympathetic vibration de- 
creases, as the difference of pitch increases. The 
horizontal line a b c represents a portion of the 
musical scale, each of the lengths a b and b c 
standing for a whole (equally tempered) Tone. 
Suppose that the body which vibrates sympa- 
thetically has been tuned to the tone b and that 
the vertical line b d represents the maximum 
of intensity of tone which it can attain when excited by a tone in perfect unison 
with it. On the base line, intervals of -^^ of a whole Tone are set off, and the ver- 
tical lines drawn through them shew the corresponding intensity of the tone in the 
body which vibrates sympathetically, when the exciting tone differs from a unison 
by the corresponding interval. The following are the numbers from which fig. 52 
was constructed : — • 




OHAP. VI. 



THEORY OF THE FUNCTION OF THE COCHLEA. 



145 



Difference of Pitch 


Intensity 
of Sympathetic vibration 


Difference of Pitch 


Intensity 
of Sympathetic Vibration 


00 
0-1 
0-2 
0-8 
0-4 
Semitone 


100 
74 
41 
24 
15 
10 


0-6 
0-7 
0-8 
0-9 
Whole Tone 


7-2 
5^4 
4-2 
8-8 
2-7 



Now we cannot precisely ascertain what parts of the ear actually vibrate sym- 
pathetically with individual tones.^ We can only conjecture what they are at 
present in the case of human beings and mammals. The whole construction of 
the partition of the cochlea, and of Corti's arches which rest upon it, appears most 
suited for executing independent vibrations. We do not need to require of them 
the power of continuing their vibrations for a long time without assistance. f 

But if these formations are to serve for distinguishing tones of different pitch, 
and if tones of different pitch are to be equally well perceived in all parts of the 
scale, the elastic formations in the cochlea, which are connected with different 
nerve fibres, must be differently tuned, and their proper tones must form a regu- 
larly progressive series of degrees through the whole extent of the musical scale. 

According to the recent anatomical researches of Y. Hensen and C. Hasse, it 
is probably the breadth of the membrana basilaris in the cochlea, which deter- 
mines the tuning. f At its commencement opposite the oval window, it is 
comparatively narrow, and it continually increases in width as it approaches the 
apex of the cochlea. The following measurements of the membrane in a newly 
bom child, from the line where the nerves pass through on the inner edge, to the 
attachment to the ligamentum spirale on the outer edge, are given by Y. Hensen : — 



f 



Place of Section 


Breadth of Membrane or T/ength of 
Transverse Fibres 


Millimetres 


Inches 


0-2625 nun. [=0-010885 in.] from root . 
0-8626 mm. [<= 0-088961 in.] from root . 

Middle of the first spire 

Snd of first spire 

Middle of second spire 

End of second spire 

At the hamulus 


0-04125 

0-0825 

0169 

0-8 

0*4125 

0-45 

0-495 


HX)162 
•00825 
•00665 
•01181 
•01624 
•01772 
•01949 



The breadth therefore increases more than twelvefold from the beginning to 
the end. 

Corti's rods also exhibit an increase of size as they approach the vertex of the 
cochlea, but in a much less degree than the membrana basilaris. The following 
are Hensen's measurements : — 





At the round window 


At the hamulus 




inch 


mm. 


inch 


Length of inner rod ... . 
Length of outer rod .... 
Span of the arch .... 


ooo 

CO 00 00 


0-00189 
0-00189 
000075 


0-0865 

0-098 

0-085 


0-003^7 
0-00386 
0-00885 



IT 



*[Here the passage, *The particles of 
auditory sand,* to 'used for musical tones,* 
on pp. 217-18 of the 1st English edition has 
been cancelled, and the passage * We can only 
conjecture,* to ' without assistance,* on p. 145a 
added in its place from the 4th German edition. 
— TransUUor.'i 

t In the 1st [German] edition of this book 
(1868), which was written at a time when the 
more delicate anatomy of the cochlea was just 



beginning to be developed, I supposed that the 
difierent degrees of stifiness and tension in 
Gorti*8 rods themselves might furnish the 
reason of their different tuning. By Hensen *s 
measures of the breadth of the membrana 
basilaris {ZeiUchrift filr toissensch, Zoologie, 
vol. xiii. p. 492) and Has3e*s proof that Corti's 
rods are absent in birds and amphibia, far more 
definite foundations for forming a judgment 
have been furnished, than I then possessed. 

li 



146 THEORY OF THE FUNCTION OF THE COCHLEA. part i. 

Hence it follows, as Henle has also proved, that the greatest increase of breadth 
falls on the outer zone of the basilar membrane, beyond the line of the attach- 
ment of the outer rods. This increases from 0*023 mm. [= -000905 in.] to 0-41 
mm. [= -016142 inch] or nearly twentyfold. 

. In accordance with these measures, the two rows of Gorti's rods are almost 
parallel and upright near to the round window, but they are bent much more 
strongly towards one another near the vertex of the cochlea. 

It has been already mentioned that the membrana basilaris of the cochlea 
breaks easily in the radial direction, but that its radial fibres have considerable 
tenacity. This seems to me to furnish a very important mechanical relation, 
namely, that this membrane in its natural connection admits of being tightly 
stretched in the transverse direction from the modiolus to the outer wall of the 
cochlea, but can have only little tension in the direction of its length, because it 
IT could not resist a strong pull in this direction. 

Now the mathematical theory of the vibration of a membrane with different ten- 
sions in different directions shews that it behaves very differently from a membrane 
which has the same tension in all directions.* On the latter, vibrations produced 
in one part, spread uniformly in all directions, and hence if the tension were uniform 
it would be impossible to set one part of the basilar membrane in vibration, without 
producing nearly as strong vibrations (disregarding individual nodal lines) in all other 
parts of the membrane. 

But if the tension in direction of its length is infinitesimally small in com- 
parison with the tension in direction of the breadth, then the radial fibres of 
the basilar membrane may be approximatively regarded as forming a system of 
stretched strings, and the membranous connection as only serving to give a ful- 
crum to the pressure of the fluid against these strings. In that case the laws of 
their motion would be the same as if every individual string moved independently 
% of all the others, and obeyed, by itself, the influence of the periodically alternating 
pressure of the fluid of the labyrinth contained in the vestibule gallery. Conse- 
quently any exciting tone would set that part of the membrane into sympathetic 
vibration, for which the proper tone of one of its radial fibres that are stretched 
and loaded with the various appendages already described, corresponds most nearly 
with the exciting tone ; and thence the vibrations will extend with rapidly dimin- 
ishing strength on to the adjacent parts of the membrane. Fig. 52, on p. 144d, 
might be taken to represent, on an exaggerated scale of height, a longitudinal sec- 
tion of that part of the basilar membrane in which the proper tone of the radial 
fibres of the membrane are nearest to the exciting tone. 

The strongly vibrating parts of the membrane would, as has been explained in 
respect to all bodies which vibrate sympathetically, be more or less limited, accord- 
ing to the degree of damping power in the adjacent parts, by friction against the 
fluid in the labyrinth and in the soft gelatinous parts of the nerve fillet. 
f Under these circumstances the parts of the membrane in unison with higher 
tones must be looked for near the round window, and those with the deeper, near 
the vertex of the cochlea, as Hensen also concluded from his measurements. That 
such short strings should be capable of corresponding with such deep tones, must 
be explained by their being loaded in the basilar membrane with all kinds of solid 
formations ; the fluid of both galleries in the cochlea must also be considered as 
weighting the membrane, because it cannot move without a kind of wave motion 
in that fluid. 

The observations of Hasse shew that Gorti's arches do not exist in the cochlea 
of birds and amphibia, although the other essential parts of the cochlea, as the 
basilar membrane, the ciliated cells in connection with the terminations of the 
nerves, and Gorti's membrane, which stands opposite the ends of these ciliae, are 
all present. Hence it becomes very probable that Gorti's arches play only a 
secondary part in the function of the cochlea. Perhaps we might look for the effect 

* See Appendix XI. 



CHAP. VI. 



THEORY OF THE FUNCTION OF THE COCHLEA. 



147 



of Corti's arches in their power, as relatively firm objects, of transmitting the 
vibrations of the basilar membrane to small limited regions of the upper part of 
the relatively thick nervous fillet, better than it could be done by the immediate 
communication of the vibrations of the basilar membrane through the soft mass 
of this fillet. Close to the outside of the upper end of the arch, connected with 
it by the stiffer fibriles of the membrana reticularis, are the ciliated cells of the 
nervous fillet (see c in fig. 49, p. 140). In birds, on the other hand, the ciliated cells 
form a thin stratum upon the basilar membrane, and this stratum can readily 
receive limited vibrations from the membrane, without communicating them too 
far sideways. 

According to this view Corti's arches, in the last resort, will be the means of 
transmitting the vibrations received from the basilar membrane to the terminal 
appendages of the conducting nerve. In this sense the reader is requested here- 
after to understand references to the vibrations, proper tone, and intonation of IT 
Corti's arches; the intonation meant is that which they receive through their 
connection with the corresponding part of the basilar membrane. 

According to Waldeyer there are about 4500 outer arch fibres in the human 
cochlea. If we deduct 300 for the simple tones which lie beyond musical limits, 
and cannot have their pitch perfectly apprehended, there remain 4200 for the 
seven octaves of musical instruments, that is, 600 for every Octave, 50 for every 
Semitone (that is, 1 for every 2 cents) ; certainly quite enough to explain the 
power of distinguishing small parts of a Semitone. ''^ According to Prof. W. 
Preyer's investigations,'!' practised musicians can distinguish with certainty a 
difference of pitch arising from half a vibration in a second, in the doubly 
accented Octave. This would give 1000 distinguishable degrees of pitch in the 
Octave, from 500 to 1000 vibrations in the second. Towards the limits of the 
scale the power to distinguish differences diminishes. The 4200 Corti's arches 
appear then, in this respect, to be enough to apprehend distinctions of this IT 
amount of delicacy. But even if it should be found that many more than 
4200 degrees of pitch could be distinguished in the Octave, it would not prejudice 
our assumption. For if a simple tone is struck having a pitch between those of 
two adjacent Corti's arches, it would set them both in sympathetic vibration, and 
that arch would vibrate the more strongly which was nearest in pitch to the 
proper tone. The smallness of the interval between the pitches of two fibres still 
distinguishable, vdll therefore finally depend upon the delicacy with which the 
different forces of the vibrations excited can be compared. And we have thus 
also an explanation of the fact that as the pitch of an external tone rises con- 
tinuously, our sensations also alter continuously and not by jumps, as must be the 
case if only one of Corti's arches were set in sympathetic motion at once. 

To draw further conclusions from our hypothesis, when a simple tone is pre- 
sented to the ear, those Corti's arches which are nearly or exactly in unison with 
it will be strongly excited, and the rest only slightly or not at all. Hence every ^ 
simple note of determinate pitch will be felt only by certain nerve fibres, and 



* [A few lines of the Ist English edition 
have here been cancelled, and replaced by 
others from the 4th German edition. — Trans- 
lator.'] 

f[Ueber die Orenzen der Tonwahmeh- 
tnung (On the limits of the perception of 
tone), June, 1876. Rearranged in English by 
the Translator in the Proceedings of the 
Musical Association for 1876-7, pp. 1-82, 
nnder the title of * On the Sensitiveness of the 
Bar to Pitch and Change of Pitch in Music *. 
On p. 11 of this arrangement it is stated that, 
including Delezenne's results, 
at vib. a difference of or interval of 
120 '418 vib. 6 cents \i£>as per- 

440 -364 „ 1-4 „ /ceived. 



»» 



at vib. a difference of 

600 -300 vib. 

1000 -600 „ 
but on the other hand 

at vib. a difference of 

60 -200 vib. 

110 -091 

260 -160 

400 -200 



or interval of 

1*0 cents\was per 
•9 „ /ceived. 



»» 



it 



If 



or interval of 
6 cents 

1-4 

10 
•9 



fi 



ft 



was 
not 



I 

jper- 
J ceived, 

the intervals perceived, or not perceived, being 
the same, but the pitches different. And gen- 
erally throughout the scale a difference of ^ 
vib. is not heard, but 

from 04 to 17:|fvib.l 
from a' to c" i „ Vis heard. 
c to c" i „ J 

— Translator.] 

l2 



and 
and from 



148 THEORY OF THE FUNCTION OF THE COCHLEA. paet i. 

simple tones of different pitch will excite different fibres. When a compound 
musical tone or chord is presented to the ear, all those elastic bodies will be 
excited, which have a proper pitch corresponding to the various individual simple 
tones contained in the whole mass of tones, and hence by properly directing 
attention, all the individual sensations of the individual simple tones can be 
perceived. The chord must be resolved into its individual compound tones, and 
the compound tone into its individual harmonic partial tones. 

This also explains how it is that the ear resolves a motion of the air into 
pendular vibrations and no other. Any particle of air can of course execute only 
one motion at one time. That we considered such a motion mathematically as a 
sum of pendular vibrations, was in the first instance merely an arbitrary assump- 
tion to facilitate theory, and had no meaning in nature. The first meaning in 
nature that we found for this resolution came from considering sympathetic 
1[ vibration, when we discovered that a motion which was not pendular, could 
produce sympathetic vibrations in bodies of those different pitches, which cor- 
responded to the harmonic upper partial tones. And now our hypothesis has also 
reduced the phenomenon of hearing to that of sympathetic vibration, and thus 
furnished a reason why an originaJly simple periodic vibration of the air pro- 
duces a sum of different sensations, and hence also appears as compound to our 
perceptions. 

The sensation of different pitch would consequently be a sensation in different 
nerve fibres. The sensation of a quality of tone would depend upon the power of 
a given compound tone to set in vibration not only those of Corti's arches which 
correspond to its prime tone, but also a series of other arches, and hence to excite 
sensation in several different groups of nerve fibres. 

Physiologically it should be observed that the present assumption reduces 
sensations which differ qualitatively according to pitch and quality of tone, to a 
f difference in the nerve fibres which are excited. This is a step similar to that 
taken in a wider field by Johannes Miiller in his theory of the specific energies of 
sense. He has shewn that the difference in the sensations due to various senses, 
does not depend upon the actions which excite them, but upon the various nervous 
arrangements which receive them. We can convince ourselves experimentally 
that in whatever manner the optic nerve and its expansion, the retina of the eye, 
may be excited, by light, by twitching, by pressure, or by electricity, the result is 
never anything but a sensation of light, and that the tactual nerves, on the contrary, 
never give us sensations of light or of hearing or of taste. The same solar rays 
which are felt as light by the eye, are felt by the nerves of the hand as heat ; the 
same agitations which are felt by the hand as twitterings, are tone to the ear. 

Just as the ear apprehends vibrations of different periodic time as tones of 
different pitch, so does the eye perceive luminiferous vibrations of different periodic 
time as different colours, the quickest giving violet and blue, the mean green and 
^ yellow, the slowest red. The laws of the mixture of colours led Thomas Young 
to the hypothesis that there were three kinds of nerve fibres in the eye, with 
different powers of sensation, for feeling red, for feeling green, and for feeling 
violet. In reality this assumption gives a very simple and perfectly consistent 
explanation of all the optical phenomena depending on colour. And by this means 
the qualitative differences of the sensations of sight are reduced to differences in 
the nerves which receive the sensations. For the sensations of each individual 
fibre of the optic nerve there remains only the quantitative differences of greater 
or less irritation. 

The same result is obtained for hearing by the hypothesis to which our 
investigation of quality of tone has led us. The qualitative difference of pitch 
and quality of tone is reduced to a difference in the fibres of the nerves receiving 
the sensation, and for each individual fibre of the nerve there remains only the 
quantitative differences in the amount of excitement. 

The processes of irritation within the nerves of the muscles, by which their 
contraction is determined, have hitherto been more accessible to physiological 



CHAP. VI. THEORY OF THE FUNCTION OF THE COCHLEA. 149 

investigation than those which take place in the nerves of sense. In those of the 
muscle, indeed, we find only quantitative dififerences of more or less excitement, 
and no qualitative differences at all. In them we are ahle to establish, that during 
excitement the electrically active particles of the nerves undergo determinate 
changes, and that these changes ensue in exactly the same way whatever be the 
excitement which causes them. But precisely the same changes also take place in 
an excited nerve of sense, although their consequence in this case is a sensation, 
while in the other it was a motion ; and hence we see that the mechanism of the 
process of irritation in the nerves of sense must be in every respect similar to that 
in the nerves of motion. The two hypotheses just explained really reduce the 
processes in the nerves of man's two principal senses, notwithstanding their 
apparently involved qualitative differences of sensations, to the same simple 
scheme with which we are familiar in the nerves of motion. Nerves have been 
often and not unsuitably compared to telegraph wires. Such a wire conducts one l 
kind of electric current and no other ; it may be stronger, it may be weaker, it may 
move in either direction ; it has no other qualitative differences. Nevertheless, 
according to the different kinds of apparatus with which we provide its termina- 
tions, we can send telegraphic despatches, ring bells, explode mines, decompose 
VTater, move magnets, magnetise iron, develop light, and so on. So with the 
nerves. The condition of excitement which can be produced in them, and is con- 
ducted by them, is, so far as it can be recognised in isolated fibres of a nerve, 
everywhere the same, but when it is brought to various parts of the brain, or 
the body, it produces motion, secretions of glands, increase and decrease of the 
quantity of blood, of redness and of warmth of individual organs, and also sensa- 
tions of light, of hearing, and so forth. Supposing that every qualitatively 
different action is produced in an organ of a different kind, to which also separate 
fibres of nerve must proceed, then the actual process of irritation in individual 
nerves may always be precisely the same, just as the electrical current in the tele- IF 
graph wires remains one and the same notwithstanding the various kinds of 
effects which it produces at its extremities. On the other hand, if we assume that 
the same fibre of a nerve is capable of conducting different kinds of sensation, we 
should have to assume that it admits of various kinds of processes of irritation, 
and this we have been hitherto unable to establish. 

In this respect then the view here proposed, like Young's hypothesis for the 
difference of colours, has a still wider signification for the physiology of the 
nerves in general. 

Since the first publication of this book, the theory of auditory sensation here 
explained, has received an interesting confirmation from the observations and 
experiments made by Y. Hensen * on the auditory apparatus of the Crustaceae. 
These animals have bags of auditory stones (otoliths), partly closed, partly 
opening outwards, in which these stones float freely in a watery fluid and are 
supported by hairs of a peculiar formation, attached to the stones at one end, and, f 
partly, arranged in a series proceeding in order of magnitude, from larger and 
thicker to shorter and thinner. In many crustaceans also we find precisely 
similar hairs on the open surface of the body, and these must be considered as 
auditory hairs. The proof that these external hairs are also intended for hearing, 
depends first on the similarity of their construction with that of the hairs in the 
bags of otoliths; and secondly on Hensen 's discovery that the sensation of 
hearing remained in the Mysis (opossum shrimp) when the bags of otoliths had 
been extirpated, and the external auditory hairs of the antennae were left. 

Hensen conducted the sound of a keyed bugle through an apparatus formed on 
the model of the drumskin and auditory ossicles of the ear into the water of a 
little box in which a specimen of Mysis was fastened in such a way as to allow 
the external auditory hairs of the tail to be observed. It was then seen that 
certain tones of the horn set certain hairs into strong vibration, and other tones 

* Studien lib&r das Oeklfrorgan der Deca- akndKdlliker'a ZeitschrififUrwissenschaftliche 
poden, Leipzig, 1868. Beprinted from Siebold Zoologie, vol. ziii. 



160 THEORY OP THE FUNCTION OF THE COCHLEA. pabt i. 

other hairs. Each hair answered to several notes of the horn, and from the 
notes mentioned we can approximatively recognise the series of under tones of one 
and the same simple tone. The results could not be quite exact, because the 
resonance of the conducting apparatus must have had some influence. 

Thus one of these hairs answered strongly to d^ and d% more weakly to g, 
and very weakly to G, This leads us to suppose that it was tuned to some pitch 
between d" and d"jt In that case it answered to the second partial of d' to d'jL 
the third of g to gj^, the fourth of d ix) d^ and the sixth of G to G^ A second 
hair answered strongly to ajt and the adjacent tones, more weakly to djt and AJt 
Its proper tone therefore seems to have been ajL 

By these observations (which through the kindness of Herr Hensen I have 
myself had the opportunity of verifying) the existence of such relations as we have 
supposed in the case of the human cochlea, have been directly proved for these 

IT Crustaceans, and this is the more valuable, because the concealed position and 
ready destructibility of the corresponding organs of the human ear give little hope 
of our ever being able to make such a direct experiment on the intonation of its 
individual parts.'"' 

So far the theory which has been advanced refers in the first place only to 
the lasting sensation produced by regular and continued periodical oscillations. 
But as regards the perceptio7i of irregular motions of the airy that is, of noises, it 
is clear that an elastic apparatus for executing vibrations could not remain at 
absolute rest in the presence of any force acting upon it for a time, and even a 
momentary motion or one recurring at irregular intervals would suffice, if only 
powerful enough, to set it in motion. The peculiar advantage of resonance over 
proper tone depends precisely on the fact that disproportionately weak individual 
impulses, provided that they succeed each other in correct rhythm, are capable of 
producing comparatively considerable motions. On the other hand, momentary 

IT but strong impulses, as for example those which result from an electric spark, will 
set every part of the basilar membrane into an almost equally powerful initial 
motion, after which each part would die off in its own proper vibrational period. 
By that means there might arise a simultaneous excitement of the whole of the 
nerves in the cochlea, which although not equally powerful would yet be propor- 
tionately gradated, and hence could not have the character of a determinate pitch. 
Even a weak impression on so many nerve fibres will produce a clearer impression 
than any single impression in itself. We know at least that small differences of 
brightness are more readily perceived on large than on small parts of the circle of 
vision, and little differences of temperature can be better perceived by plunging 
the whole arm, than by merely dipping a finger, into the warm water. 

Hence a perception of momentary impulses by the cochlear nerves is quite 
possible, just as noises are perceived, without giving an especially sensible pro- 
minence to any determinate pitch. 

f If the pressure of the air which bears on the drumskin lasts a little longer, it 
will favour the motion in some regions of the basilar membrane in preference to 
other parts of the scale. Certain pitches will therefore be especially prominent. 
This we may conceive thus : every instant of pressure is considered as a pressure 
that will excite in every fibre of the basilar membrane a motion corresponding 
to itself in direction and strength and then die off; and all motions in each 
fibre which are thus excited are added algebraically, whence, according to cir- 
cumstances, they reinforce and enfeeble each other, f Thus a uniform pressure 
which lasts during the first half vibration, that is, as long as the first positive 
excursion, increases the excursion of the vibrating body. But if it lasts longer 
it weakens the effect first produced. Hence rapidly vibrating bodies would be 
proportionably less excited by such a pressure, than those for which half a vibra- 
tion lasts as long as, or longer than, the pressure itself. By this means such an 

* [From here to the end of this cliapter is t See the mathematical expression for this 

an addition from the 4th German edition. — conception at the end of Appendix XI. 
Translator,] 



CHAP. VI. THEORY OP THE FUNCTION OP THE COCHLEA. 151 

impression would acquire a certain, though an ill-defined, pitch. In general the 
intensity of the sensation seems, for an equsJ amount of vis viva in the motion, to 
increase as the pitch ascends. So that the impression of the highest strongly 
excited fibre preponderates. 

A determinate pitch, to a more remarkable extent, may also naturally result, if 
the pressure itself which acts on the stirrup of the drum alternates several times 
between positive and negative. And thus all transitional degrees between noises 
without any determinate pitch, and compound tones with a determinate pitch may 
be produced. This actually takes place, and herein lies the proof, on which Herr 
S. Exner * has properly laid weight, that such noises must be perceived by those 
parts of the ear which act in distinguishing pitch. 

In former editions of this work I had expressed a conjecture that the auditory 
cOiae of the ampullae, which seemed to be but little adapted for resonance, and 
those of the little bags opposite the otoliths, might be especially active in the T 
perception of noises. 

As regards the ciliae in the ampullae, the investigations of Goltz have made it 
extremely probable that they, as weU as the semicircular canals, serve for a totally 
different kind of sensation, namely for the perception of the turning of the head. 
Revolution about an axis perpendicular to the plane of one of the semicircular 
canals cannot be immediately transferred to the ring of water which lies in the 
canal, and on account of its inertia lags behind, while the relative shifting of the 
water along the wall of the canal might be felt by the cUiae of the nerves of the 
ampullae. On the other hand, if the turning continues, the ring of water itself 
will be gradually set in revolution by its friction against the wall of the canal, 
and will continue to move, even when the turning of the head suddenly ceases. 
This causes the elusive sensation of a revolution in the contrary direction, in the 
well-known form of giddiness. Injuries to the semicircular canals without injuries 
to the brain produce the most remarkable disturbances of equilibrium in the lower T 
animals. Electrical discharges through the ear and cold water squirted into the 
ear of a person with a perforated drumskin, produce the most violent giddiness. 
Under these circumstances these parts of the ear can no longer with any probability 
be considered as belonging to the sense of hearing. Moreover impulses of the 
stirrup against the water of the labyrinth adjoining the oval window are in reality 
ill adapted for producing streams through the semicircular canals. 

On the other hand the experiments of Eoenig with short sounding rods, and 
those of Preyer with Appunn's tuning-forks, have established the fact that very 
high tones with from 4000 to 40,000 vibrations in a second can be heard, but that 
for these the sensation of interval is extremely deficient. Even intervals of a Fifth 
or an Octave in the highest positions are only doubtfully recognised and are often 
wrongly appreciated by practised musicians. Even the major Third &' — e' [4096 : 
5120 vibrations] was at one time heard as a Second, at another as a Fourth or a 
Fifth ; and at still greater heights even Octaves and Fifths were confused. % 

If we maintain the hypothesis, that every nervous fibre hears in its own peculiar 
pitch, we should have to conclude that the vibrating parts of the ear which convey 
these sensations of the highest tones to the ear, are much less sharply defined in their 
capabilities of resonance, than those for deeper tones. This means that they lose any 
motion excited in them comparatively soon, and are also comparatively more easily 
brought into the state of motion necessary for sensation. This last assumption 
must be made, because for parts which are so strongly damped, the possibility of 
adding together many separate impulses is very limited, and the construction of the 
auditory ciliae in the little bags of the otoliths seems to me more suited for this 
purpose than that of the shortest fibres of the basilar membrane. If this hypo- 
thesis is confirmed we should have to regard the auditory ciliae as the bearers of 
squeaking, hissing, chirping, crackling sensations of sound, and to consider their 
reaction as differing only in degree from that of the cochlear fibres, f 

• Pflueger, Archiv fUr Phyaiologie, vol. t [See App. XX. sect. L. art. 6.— Traiw- 

ziii. lator.] 



PART IL 

ON THE INTERRUPTIONS OF HARMONY. 

COMBINATIONAL TONES AND BEATS,* 
CONSONANCE AND DISSONANCE. 

OHAPTEB VII. 

OOICBINATIONAL T0NB8. 



In the first part of this hook we had to enunciate and constantly apply the pro- 
position that oscillatory motions of the air and other elastic bodies, produced by 
several sources of sound acting simultaneously, are always the exact sum of the 
individual motions producible by each source separately. This law is of extreme 
importance in the theory of sound, because it reduces the consideration of com- 

T pound cases to those of simple ones. But it must be observed that this law holds 
strictly only in the case where the vibrations in all parts of the mass of air and of 
the sonorous elastic bodies are of infinitesimaUy small dimensions ; that is to say, 
only when the alterations of density of the elastic bodies are so small that they 
may be disregarded in comparison with the whole density of the same body ; and 
in the same way, only when the displacements of the vibrating particles vanish as 
compared with the dimensions of the whole elastic body. Now certainly in all 
practical applications of this law to sonorous bodies, the vibrations are always 
very small, and near enough to being infinitesimally small for this law to hold 
with great exactness even for the real sonorous vibrations of musical tones, and by 
fsur the greater part of their phenomena can be deduced from that law in con- 
formity with observation. Still, however, there are certain phenomena which 
result from the fact that this law does not hold with perfect exactness for vibra- 
tions of elastic bodies, which, though almost always very small, are far from being 
infinitesimally small, f One of these phenomena, with which we are here interested 

IT is the occurrence of Combinational Tones, which were first discovered in 1745 by 
Sorge,t a German organist, and were afterwards generally known, although their 
pitch was often wrongly assigned, through the Italian violinist Tartini (1764), from 
whom they are often called Tartini^s tones,^ 

These tones are heard whenever two musical tones of dififerent pitches are 



* [So much attention has recently been 
paid to the whole subject of this second part 
— Combinational Tones and Beats — ^mostly 
since the publication of the 4th German 
edition, that I have thought it advisable to 
give a brief account of the investigations of 
Koenig, Bosanquet, and Preyer in App. XX. 
sect. L., and merely add a few footnotes to 
refer the reader to them where they especially 
relate to the statements in the text. But the 
reader should study the text of this second 
part, so as to be familar with Prof. Helm- 



holtz's views before taking up the Appendix. 
— Translator.] 

t Helmholtz, on * Combinational Tones,* 
in Poggendorf's Annalen, vol. xcix. p. 497. 
Monatsberichts of the Berlin Academy, May 22, 
1856. From this last an extract is given in 
Appendix XII. 

t Vorgemach musikalischer Composition 
(Antechamber of musical composition). 

§ [In England they have hence been often 
called by Tartini's name, terzi suony or third 
sounds, resulting from the combination of two. 



cnip. Tii. 



COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



163 



sounded together, loudly and oontinnonsly. The pitch of a combinational tone 
is generally different from that of either of the generating tones, or of their 
harmonic upper partials. In experiments, the combinational are readily distin- 
guished from the upper partial tones, by not being heard when only one generating 
tone is sounded, and by appearing simultaneously with the second tone. Combi- 
national tones are of two kinds. The first class, discovered by Sorge and Tartini, 
I have termed differential tones, because their pitch number is the difference of 
the pitch numbers of the generating tones. The second class of sii/mmational 
tones, haying their pitch number equal to the sum of the pitch numbers of the 
generating tones, were discovered by mysell 

On investigating the combinational tones of two compound musical tones, we 
find that both the primary and the upper partial tones may give rise to both dif- 
ferential and summational tones. In such cases the number of combinational 
tones is very great. But it must be observed that generally the differential are % 
stronger than the summational tones, and that the stronger generating simple 
tones also produce the stronger combinational tones. The combinational tones, 
indeed, increase in a much greater ratio than the generating tones, and diminish 
Sklso more rapidly. Now since in musical compound tones the prime generally pre- 
dominates over the partials, the differential tones of the two primes are generally 
heard more loudly than all the rest, and were consequently first discovered. They 
are most easily heard when the two generating tones are less than an octave apart, 
because in that case the differential is deeper than either of the two generating 
tones. To hear it at first, choose two tones which can be held with great force for 
some time, and form a justly intoned harmonic interval. First sound the low 
tone and then the high one. On properly directing attention, a weaker low tone 
will be heard at the moment that the higher note is struck ; this is the required 
combinational tone.*^ For particular instruments, as the harmonium, the com- 
binational tones can be made more audible by properly tuned resonators. In this IT 
ease the tones are generated in the air contained within the instrument. But in 
other cases, where they are generated solely within the ear, the resonators are of 
little or no use. 



A commoner EDglish name is grave harmonics, 
which is inapplicable, as they are not neces- 
sarily graver than both of the generating tones. 
Prof. Tyndall calls them resultant tones. 1 
prefer retaining the Latin expression, first in- 
trodaced, as Prof. Preyer informs us {Akusti- 
schs Unterstichungen, p. 11), by G. U. A. Vieth 
(d. 1886 in Dessau) in Gilbert's Annalen der 
Physik, 1^)5, vol. xzi. p. 265, but only for the 
tones here distinguished as differential, and 
s^terwards used by Scheibler and Piof. Helm- 
holtz. I shall, however, use 'combinational 
tones ' to express all the additional tones which 
are heuxl when two notes are sounded at the 
same ^rae.-^TransUUor.] 

*[I have found that combinational tones 
can be made quite audible to a hundred people 
at once, by means of two flageolet fifes or whis- 
tles, blown as strongly as possible. I choose 
very close dissonant intervals because the 
great depth of the low tone is much more strik- 
ing, being very far below anything that can be 
touched by the instrument itself. Thus g"" 
being sounded loudly on one fife by an assist- 
ant, I give f"'jl^ when a deep note is instantly 
heard which, if the interval were pure, would 
be g, and is sufficiently near to </ to be recog- 
nised as extremely deep. As a second experi- 
ment, the g"" being held as before, I give first 
/""ft and then a"" in succession. If the inter- 
vals were pure the combinational tones would 
jump from g toe", and in reality, the jump is 
very nearly the same and quite appreciable. 



The differential tones are well heard on the 
English concertina, for the same reason as on 
the harmonium. High notes forming Semi- 
tones tell well. It is convenient to choose 
close dissonant intervals for first examples in 
order to dissipate the old notion that the 
* grave harmonic' is necessarily the * true 
fundamental bass ' of the * chord '. It is very 
easy when playing two high generating notes, 
as^"' and g"'f^ or the last and a"', to hear at 
the same time the rattle of the beats (see next 
chapter) and the deep combinational tones 
about F,ij^ and OA, much resembling a thrash- 
ing machine two or three fields off. The beats IT 
and the differentials have the same frequency 
(note, p. lid). See infr4, App. XX. sect. L. art. 
5, /. The experiment can also be made with 
b" c'" and b"\f b" on any harmonium. And if 
all three notes b"]^,b'\c"' are held down to- 
gether, the ear can perceive the two sets of 
beats of the upper notes as sharp high rattles, 
and the beats of the two combinational tones, 
about the pitch of C, which have altogether a 
different character and frequency. On the 
Harmonical, notes b" c'" should beat 66, notes 
b"\^ b" should beat 39-6, and notes 76"|, 6i"U 
should beat 26'4 in a second, and these should 
be the pitches of their combinational notes ; 
the two first should therefore beat 26*4 times 
in a second, and the two last 18*2 times in a 
second. But the tone 26*4 is so difficult to 
hear that the beats are not distinct. — TranS' 
latorJ] 



154 



COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



PABT n. 



The following table gives the first dififerential tones of the usual harmonic 
intervals : — 



Intervals. 


Ratio of the 
▼ibrational 


Difference of 


llie combinational tone is deeper than 




numbers 
1 : 2 


the same 


the deeper generating tone by 


Octave .... 




a Unison 


Fifth 




2 : 8 




an Octave 


Fourth . 




8 : 4 




a Twelfth 


Major Third . 




4 : 5 




Two Octaves 


Minor Third . 




5 : 6 




Two Octaves and a major Thizd 


Major Sixth . 




8 : 5 


2 


a Fifth 


Minor Sixth . 




6 : 8 


S 


a major Sixth 



or in ordinary musical notation, the generating tones being written as minims and 
IT the differential tones as crotchets — 

Octave. Fifth. Fourth. Major Minor Major Minor 

Third. Third. Sixth. Sixth. 



^m 



t 



^ 



-^- 



t 



f 



3 



ei 



=-3^ 



3.= 



--^ 



When the ear has learned to hear the combinational tones of pure intervals 
and sustained tones, it will be able to hear them from inharmonic intervals and in 
the rapidly fading notes of a pianoforte. The combinational tones from inhar- 
IT monic intervals are more difficult to hear, because these intervals beat more or less 
strongly, as we shall have to explain hereafter. The combinational tones arising 
from such as fade rapidly, for example those of the pianoforte, are not strong 
enough to be heard except at the first instant, and die off sooner than the gener- 
ating tones. Combinational tones are also in general easier to hear from the simple 
tones of tuning-forks and stopped organ pipes than from compound tones where a 
number of other secondary tones are also present. These compound tones, as has 
been already said, also generate a number of differential tones by their harmonic 
upper partials, and these easily distract attention from the differential tones of the 
primes. Combinational tones of this kind, arising from the upper partials, are 
frequently heard from the violin and harmonium. 

Example. — Take the major Third c'e\ ratio of pitch numbers 4 : 5. First difference 1, that 
is C. The first harmonic upper partial of c' is c", relative pitch number 8. Ratio of this and 
u' 5 : 8, difference 3, that is g. The first upper partial of e' is e", relative pitch number 10; 
IT ratio for this and c\ 4 : 10, difference 6, that is g'. Then again c" e" have ratio 8 : 10, difference 
2, that is c. Hence, taking only the first upper partials we have the series of combinational 
tones 1, 3, 6, 2 or C, g, g\ c. Of these the tone 8, or g, is often easily perceived. 

These multiple combinational tones cannot in general be distinctly heard, except 
when the generating compound tones contain audible harmonic upper partials. 
Yet we cannot assert that the combinational tones are absent, where such partials 
are absent ; but in that case they are so weak that the ear does not readily recognise 
them beside the loud generating tones and first differential. In the first place 
theory leads us to conclude that they do exist in a weak state, and in the next 
place the beats of impure intervals, to be discussed presently, also establish their 
existence. In this case we may, as Hallstroem suggests,* consider the multiple 
combinational tones to arise thus : the first differential tone, or co7nbinational tone 
of the first order, by combination with the generating tones themselves, produce 
other differential tones, or combinational tones of the second order ; these again 



Poggendorff's Annalen, vol. 3cxiv. p. 438. 



CHAP. VII. 



COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



155 



produce new ones with the generators and differentials of the first order, and 
so on. 

Example. — Take two simple tones c' and e', ratio 4 : 5, differenoe 1, differential tone of the 
first order C This with the generators gives the ratios 1 : 4 and 1 : 6, differences 3 and 4, 
differential tones of the second order </, and e' once more. The new tone 3, gives with the 
generators the ratios 3 : 4 and 3:5, differences 1 and 2, giving the differential tones of the third 
order C and c, and the same tone 3 gives with the differential of the first order 1, the ratio 1 : 3 
difference 2, and hence as a differential of the fourth order c once more and so on. The dif- 
ferential tones of different orders which coincide when the interval is perfect, as it is supposed to 
be in this example, no longer exactly coincide when the generating interval is not pure ; and 
consequently such beats are heard, as would result from the presence of these tones. More on 
this hereafter. 

The differential tones of different orders for different intervals are given in the 
following notes, where the generators are minims, the combinational tones of the f 
first order crotchets, of the second quavers, and so on. The same tones also occur 
with compound generators as combinational tones of their upper partials.''^ 



i 



Octave. 



Fifth. 



Fourth. 



Major Third. 



^- 



— si- 



i 



:^- 






1 



azzjt 



■:X 



^ 



^ 



^ 



^ 



^ 



^ 



^ 



Minor Third. 



Major Sixth. 



Minor Sixth. 



% 



^- 



Bi 



%SE^^ 



5 



-d. 



%- 




The series are broken off as soon as the last orden of differentials furnishes no 
fresh tones. In general these examples shew that the complete series of harmonic 
partial tones 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, &c., up to the generators themselves, f is produced. 

The second kind of combinational tones, which I have distinguished as ^umma- 
tioncU, is generally much weaker in sound than the first, and is only to be heard 



* [These examples are best calculated by 
giving to the notes in the example the numbers 
representing the harmonics on p. 22c. Thus 

Octave, notes 4 : 8. Diff. 8-4=4. 

Fifth, notes 4 : 6. Diff. 6-4=2. 
2nd order, 4-2=2, 6-2=4. 

Fourth, notes 6 : 8. Diff. 8-6=2. 
2nd order, 8-2=6, 6-2=4. 
3rd order, 6-4 = 2, 6-2=4. 

Major Third , notes 4 : 5. Diff. 5-4 = 1. 
2nd. 4-1=3, 6-1 = 4. 
3rd. 4-3=1,5-3=2. 
4th. 4-2=2,4-1 = 3. 

Minor Third, notes 6 : 6. Diff. 6-6=1, 

2nd. 5-1 = 4, 6-1 = 5. 
3rd. 5-4=1,6-4 = 2. 
4th. 4-1 = 8,6-2=4. 
5th. 6-4=2,6-3=3. 



Major Sixth, notes 6 : 10. 
2nd. 10-4=6,6-4=2. 
3rd. 10-2 = 8, 6-2=4. 
4th. 6-4 = 2. 



Diff. 10 -6= 4. IT 



Minor Sixth, notes 5 : 8. Diff. 8-6=3. 
2nd. 5-3 = 2, 8-3 = 5. 
3rd. 5-2=3,8-2 = 6. 
4th. 3-2 = 1,5-3 = 2. 
5th. 5-1 = 4, 8-1 = 7. 
6th. 8-7 = 5-4 = 1,4-2 = 2,8-4 = 4. 

The existence of these differential tones of 
higher orders cannot be considered as com- 
pletely established. — TranslaUrr.] 

t[See App. XX. sect. L. art. 7, for the 
influence of such a series on the consonance of 
simple tones. It is not to be supposed that all 
these tones are audible. Mr. Bosanquet derives 
them direct from the generators, see App. XX. 
sect. L. art. 6, a, — Translator,] 



156 



COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



FABXn. 



with decent ease under peculiarly favourable circumstances on the harmonium and 
polyphonic siren. Scarcely any but the first summational tone can be perceived, 
having a vibrational number equal to the sum of those of the generators. Of course 
summational tones may also arise from the harmonic upper partials. Since their 
vibrational number is always equal to the sum of the other two, they are always 
higher in pitch than either of the two generators. Thei following notes^will ishew 
their nature for the simple intervals : — 




Minor 
Sixth.* 
6 + 8 
-13. 

In relation to music I will here remark at once that many of these summa- 
tional tones form extremely inharmonic intervals with the generators. Were they 
not generally so weak on most instruments, they would give rise to intoler- 
able dissonances. In reality, the major and minor Third, and the minor Sixth, 
sound very badly indeed on the polyphonic siren, where all combinational tones 
are remarkably loud, whereas the Octave, Fifth, and major Sixth are very beautiful. 
Even the Fourth on this siren has only the effect of a tolerably harmonious chord 
of the minor Seventh. 

V It was formerly believed that the combinational tones were purely subjective, 
and were produced in the ear itself.f Differential tones alone were known, and these 
were connected with the beats which usually result from the simultaneous sounding 
of two tones of nearly the same pitch, a phenomenon to be considered in the follow- 
ing chapters. It was believed that when these beats occurred with sufficient 
rapidity, the individual increments of loudness might produce the sensation of a 
new tone, just as numerous ordinary impulses of the air would, and that the 
frequency of such a tone would be equal to the frequency of the beats. But this 
supposition, in the first place, does not explain the origin of summational tones, 
being confined to the differentials ; secondly, it may be proved that under certain 
conditions the combinational tones exist objectively, independently of the ear 
which would have had to gather the beats into a new tone; and thirdly, this 
supposition cannot be reconciled with the law confirmed by all other experiments, 
that the only tones which the ear hears, correspond to pendular vibratipns of the 

fair.t 

And in reality a different cause for the origin of combinational tones can be 
established, which has already been mentioned in general terms (p. 162c). When- 
ever the vibrations of the air or of other elastic bodies which are set in motion at 
the same time by two generating simple tones, are so powerful that they can no longer 
be considered infinitely small, mathematical theory shews that vibrations of the 
air must arise which have the same frequency as the combinational tones. § 

Particular instruments give very powerful combinational tones. The condition 



* [The notation of the last 5 bi^rs has been 
altered to agree with the diagram of harmonics 
of C on p. 22c. — Tra7islator/\ 

t [The result of Mr. Bosanquet*s and Prof. 
Preyer's quite recent experiments is to shew 
that they are so. See App. XX. sect. L. art. 4, 
6, c. — 7}ranslator.] 

J [For Prof. Preyer's remarks on these 



objections, and for other objections, see App. 
XX. sect. L. art. 5, 6, c. — Translator.] 

§ [The tones supposed to arise from beats, 
and the differential tones thus generated, are 
essentially distinct, having sometimes the same 
but frequently different pitch numbers. See 
App. XX. sect. L. art. 3, d. — Translator.] 



CHAP. vn. COMBINATIONAL TONES. 157 

for their generation is that the same mass of air should be violently agitated by "^ 
two simple tones simultaneously. This takes place most powerfully in the poly- 
phonic siren, ''^ in which the same rotating disc contains two or more series of 
holes which are blown upon simultaneously from the same windchest. The air 
of the windchest is condensed whenever the holes are closed ; on the holes being 
opened, a large quantity of air escapes, and the pressure is considerably diminished. 
Consequently the air in the windchest, and partly even that in the bellows, as 
can be easily felt, comes into violent vibration. 11 two rows of holes are blown, 
vibrations arise in the air of the windchest corresponding to both tones, and each 
row of openings gives vent not to a stream of air uniformly supplied, but to a 
stream of air already set in vibration by the other tone. Under these circumstances 
the combinational tones are extremely powerful, almost as powerful, indeed, as the 
generators. Their objective existence in the mass of air can be proved by vibrat- 
ing membranes tuned to be in unison with the combinational tones. Such IT 
membranes are set in sympathetic vibration immediately upon both generating 
tones being sounded simultaneously, but remain at rest if only one or the other of 
them is sounded. Indeed, in this case the summational tones are so powerful 
that they make all chords extremely unpleasant which contain Thirds or minor 
Sixths. Instead of membranes it is more convenient to use the resonators already 
recommended for investigating harmonic upper partial tones. Besonators are ^ 
also unable to reinforce a tone when no pendular vibrations actually exist in the> 
air ; they have no effect on a tone which exists only in auditory sensation, and \ 
hence they can be used to discover whether a combinational tone is objectively \ 
present. They are much more sensitive than membranes, and are well adapted 
for the clear recognition of very weak objective tones. 

The conditions in the harmonium are similar to those in the siren. Here, too, 
there is a common windchest, and when two keys are pressed down, we have two 
openings which are closed and opened rhythmically by the tongues. In this case T 
also the air in the common receptacle is violently agitated by both tones, and air 
is blown through each opening which has been already set in vibration by the 
other tongue. Hence in this instrument also the combinational tones are objectively 
present, and comparatively very distinct, but they are far from being as powerful 
as on the siren, probably because the windchest is very much larger in proportion 
to the openings, and hence the air which escapes during the short opening of an 
exit by the oscillating tongue cannot be sufficient to diminish the pressure sensibly. 
In the harmonium also the combinational tones are very clearly reinforced by 
resonators tuned to be in unison with them, especially the first and second dif- 
ferential and the first summational tone.^ Nevertheless I have convinced myself, 
by particular experiments, that even in this instrument the greater part of the force \ 
of the combinational tone is generated in the ear itself. I arranged the portvents < 
in the instrument so that one of the two generators was supplied with air by the 
bellows moved below by the foot, and the second generator was blown by the ^ 
reserve bellows, which was first pumped full and then cut off by drawing out the 
so-called expression-stop, and I then found that the combinational tones were not 
much weaker than for the usual arrangement. But the objective portion which 
the resonators reinforce was much weaker. The noted examples given above 
(pp.. 154-5-6) will easily enable any one to find the digitals which must be 
pressed down in order to produce a combinational tone in unison with a given 
resonator. 

On the other hand, when the places in which the two tones are struck are 
entirely separate and have no mechanical connection, as, for example, if they come 
from two singers, two separate vrind instruments, or two violins, the reinforcement 

* A detailed description of this instrument apparent reinforcement by a resonator arose 

will be given in the next chapter. from imperfect blocking of both ears when 

t [The experiments of Bosanquet, App. XX. using it. See also p. 43d', note.— Translator.] 
gect. K art. 4, b, render it probable that this 



A N • 



n .. 



158 COMBINATIONAL TONES. part n. 

of the combinational tones by resonators is small and dubious. Here, then, there 
does not exist in the air any clearly sensible pendular vibration corresponding to 
the combinational tone, and we must conclude that such tones, which are often 
powerfully audible, are really produced in the ear itself. But analogously to the 
former cases we are justified in assuming in this case also that the external vibrat- 
ing parts of the ear, the drumskin and auditory ossicles, are really set in a suffi- 
I ' ciently powerful combined vibration to generate combinational tones, so that the 
\^ vibrations which correspond to combinational tones may really exist objectively in 
- the parts of the ear without existing objectively in the external air. A slight rein- 
forcement of the combinational tone in this case by the corresponding resonator 
may, therefore, arise from the drumskin of the ear communicating to the air in the 
, resonator those particular vibrations which correspond to the combinational tone.**^ 

• 'Now it so happens that in the construction of the external parts of the ear for 
•' f conducting sound, there are certain conditions which are peculiarly favourable for 

the generation of combinational tones. First we have the unsymmetrical form of 
. . the drumskin itself. Its radial fibres, which are externally convex, undergo a much 
> / greater alteration of tension when they make an oscillation of moderate amplitude 
^ towards the inside, than when the oscillation takes place towards the outside. 
For this purpose it is only necessary that the amplitude of the oscillation should 
not be too small a fraction of the minute depth of the arc made by these radial 
fibres. Under these circumstances deviations from the simple superposition of 
vibrations arise for very much smaller amplitudes than is the case when the vibrat- 
ing body is symmetrically constructed on both sides, f 

But a more important circumstance, as it seems to me, when the tones are 
powerful, is the loose formation of the joint between the hammer and anvil (p. 1332^). 
\ If the handle of the hammer is driven inwards by the drumskin, the anvil and 
, stirrup must follow the motion unconditionally. But that is not the case for the 
T subsequent outward motion of the handle of the hammer, during which the teeth 
of the two ossicles need not catch each other. In this case the ossicles may click. 
Now I seem to hear this clicking in my own ear whenever a very strong and deep 
tone is brought to bear upon it, even when, for example, it is produced by a tuning- 
fork held between the fingers, in which there is certainly nothing that can make 
any click at all. 

This peculiar feeling of mechanical tingling in the ear had long ago struck me 
when two clear and powerful soprano voices executed passages in Thirds, in which 
case the combinational tone comes out very distinctly. If the phases of the two 
tones are so related that after every fourth oscillation of the deeper and every fifth 
of the higher tone, there ensues a considerable outward displacement of the drum- 
skin, sufficient to cause a momentary loosening in the joint between the hammer 
and anvil, a series of blows will be generated between the two bones, which would 
be absent if the connection were firm and the oscillation regular, and these blows 
^ taken together would exactly generate the first differential tone of the interval of 
a major Third. Similarly for other intervals. 

It must also be remarked that the same peculiarities in the construction of a 
sonorous body which makes it suitable for allowing combinational tones to be heard 
when it is excited by two waves of different pitch, must also cause a single simple 
tone to excite in it vibrations corresponding to its harmonic upper partials ;. the 
effect being the same as if this tone then formed summational tones with itself. 

This result ensues because a simple periodical force, corresponding to pendular 
vibrations, cannot excite similar pendular vibrations in the elastic body on which 
it acts, unless the elastic forces called into action by the displacements of the ex- 

* [See latter half of Appendix XVI. — are proportional to the first power of the am* 
Translator.] plitude, whereas for symmetrical ones they 

t See my paper on combinational tones are proportional to only the second power of 
already cited, and Appendix XII. For unsym- this magnitude, which is very small in both 
metrical vibrating bodies the disturbances cases. 



CHAPS, vn. vni. INTERFERENCE OF SOUND. 159 

cited body from its position of equilibrium, are proportional to these displacements 
themselves. This is always the case so long as these displacements are infinitesimal. 
But if the amplitude of the oscillations is great enough to cause a sensible devia- 
tion from this proportionality, then the vibrations of the exciting tone are increased 
by others which correspond to its harmonic upper partial tones. That such har- 
monic upper partials are occasionally heard when tuning-forks are strongly ex- 
cited, has been already mentioned (p. 54^). I have lately repeated these experi- 
ments with forks of a very low pitch. With such a fork of 64 vib. I could, by 
means of proper resonators, hear up to the fifth partial. But then the amplitude 
of the vibrations was almost a centimetre [-3937 inch]. When a sharp-edged 
body, such as the prong of a tuning-fork, makes vibrations of such a length, 
vortical motions, differing sensibly from the law of simple vibrations, must arise 
in the surrounding air. On the other hand, as the sound of the fork fades, these 
upper partials vanish long before their prime, which is itself only very weakly IT 
audible. This agrees with our hypothesis that these partials arise from disturb- 
ances depending on the size of the amplitude. 

Herr E. Koenig,'*' with a series of forks having sliding weights by which the pitch 
might be graduaUy altered, and provided also with boxes giving a good resonance 
and possessing powerful tones, has investigated beats and combinational tones, and 
found that those combinational tones were most prominent which answered to the 
difference of one of the tones from the partial tone of the other which was nearest 
to it in pitch ; and in this research partial tones as high as the eighth were effec- 
tive (at least in the number of beats), f He has unfortunately not stated how far 
the corresponding upper partials were separately recognised by resonators. I 

Since the human ear easily produces combinational tones, for which the prin- 
cipal causes lying in the construction of that organ have just been assigned, it 
must also form upper partials for powerful simple tones, as is the case for tuning- 
forks and the masses of air which they excite in the observations described. Hence ^ 
we cannot easily have the sensation of a powerful simple tone, without having also 
the sensation of its harmonic upper partials. § 

The importance of combinational tones in the construction of chords will appear 
hereafter. We have, however, first to investigate a second phenomenon of the 
simultaneous sounding of two tones, the so-called beats. 



CHAPTER Vin. 

ON THB BEATS OF SIMPLE TONES. 

We now pass to the consideration of other phenomena accompanying the simul- IT 
taneous sounding of two simple tones, in which, as before, the motions of the air 
and of the other co-operating elastic bodies without and within the ear may be con- 
ceived as an undisturbed coexistence of two systems of vibrations corresponding to 
the two tones, but where the auditory sensation no longer corresponds to the sum 
of the two sensations which the tones would excite singly. Beats, which have 
now to be considered, are essentially distinguished from combinational tones as 
follows: — In combinational tones the composition of vibrations in the elastic 
vibrating bodies which are either within or without the ear, undergoes certain dis- 
turbances, although the ear resolves the motion which is finally conducted to it, 

* Poggendorff's Armal.f vol. clvii. pp. 177- sect. L. — Translator.] 
286. :t[Koenig states that no upper partials 

t [Even with this parenthetical correction, could be heard. See Appendix XX. sect. L. 

the above is calculated to give an inadequate art. 2, a. — Translator.] 

impression of the results of Eoenig's paper, §[See App. XX. sect. L. art. 1, ii. — Trans- 

which is more fully described in Appendix XX. lator.] 



160 



INTERPERBNOE OF SOUND. 



PAST n. 




into a series of simple tones, according to the usual law. In beats, on the 
contrary, the objective motions of the elastic bodies follow the simple law ; but 
the composition of the sensations is disturbed. As long as several simple tones of 
a sufficiently different pitch enter the ear together, the sensation due to each 
remains undisturbed in the ear, probably because entirely different bundles of 
nerve fibres are affected. But tones of the same, or of nearly the same pitch, 
which therefore affect the same nerve fibres, do not produce a sensation which is 
the sum of the two they would have separately excited, but new and peculiar 
phenomena arise which we term interference^ when caused by two perfectly equal 
simple tones, and heats when due to two nearly equal simple tones. 

We will begin with interference. Suppose that a point in the air or ear 
is set in motion by some sonorous force, and that its motion is represented by 
the curve 1, fig. 53. Let 

^the second motion be Pw* ^3. 

precisely the same at the 
same time and be repre- 
sented by the curve 2, so 
that the crests of 2 fall 
on the crests of 1, and 
also the troughs of 2 on 
the troughs of 1. If both 
motions proceed at once, 3 
the whole motion will be 
their sum, represented by 
3, a curve of the same 
kind but with crests twice as high and troughs twice as deep as those of either of 
the others. Since the intensity of sound is proportional to the square of the 

IT amphtude, we have consequently a tone not of twice but of four times the loudness 
of either of the others. 

But now suppose the vibrations of the second motion to be displaced by 
half the periodic time. The curves to be added will stand under one another, as 
4 and 5 in fig. 54, and 

when we come to add- ^'^' ^' 

to them, the heights of 
the second curve will be 
still the same as those 
of the first, but, being 
always in the contrary 
direction, the two will 
mutually destroy each 
other, giving as their 

f sum the straight line 6, or no vibration at all. In this case the crests of 4 are 
added to the troughs of 5, and conversely, so that the crests fill up the troughs, 
and crests and troughs mutually annihilate each other. The intensity of sound 
also becomes nothing, and when motions are thus cancelled within the ear, sensa- 
tion also ceases ; and although each single motion acting alone would excite the 
corresponding auditory sensation, when both act together there is no auditory 
sensation at all. One sound in this case completely cancels what appears to be 
an equal sound. This seems extraordinarily paradoxical to ordinary contempla- 
tion because our natural consciousness apprehends sound, not as the motion of 
particles of the air, but as something really existing and analogous to the sensation 
of sound. Now as the sensation of a simple tone of the same pitch shews no oppo- 
sitions of positive and negative, it naturally appears impossible for one positive 
sensation to cancel another. But the really cancelling things in such a case are 
the vibrational impulses which the two sources of sound exert on the ear. When 
it so happens that the vibrational impulses due to one source constantly coincide 




CHAP. vin. INTERFKRENOE OF SOUND. 161 

with opposite ones due to the other, and exactly counterbalance each other, no 
motion can possibly ensue in the ear, and hence the auditory nerve can experience 
no sensation. 

The following are some instances of sound cancelling sound : — 
Put two perfectly similar stopped organ pipes tuned to the same pitch close 
beside each other on the same portvent. Each one blown separately gives a 
powerful tone ; but when they are blown together, the motion of the air in the 
two pipes takes place in such a manner that as the air streams out of one it streams 
into the other, and hence an observer at a distance hears no tone, but at most the 
rushing of the air. On bringing the fibre of a feather near to the lips of the 
pipes, this fibre vnll vibrate in the same way as if each pipe were blown separately. 
Also if a tube be conducted from the ear to the mouth of one of the pipes, the 
tone of that pipe is heard so much more powerfully that it cannot be entirely 
destroyed by the tone of the other.* IT 

Every tuning-fork also exhibits phenomena of interference, because the prongs 
move in opposite directions. On striking a tuning-fork and slowly revolving it 
about its longitudinal axis close to the ear, it will be found that there are four 
positions in which the tone is heard clearly ; and four intermediate positions in 
which it is inaudible. The four positions of strong sound are those in which 
either one of the prongs, or one of the side surfaces of the fork, is turned towards 
the ear. The positions of no sound lie between the former, almost in planes 
which make an angle of 45° with the surfaces of the prongs, and pass through 
the axis of the fork. If in fig. 55, a and b are the ends of the fork seen from 
above, c, d, e, f will be the four places of strong sound, and the dotted lines 

the four places of silence. The arrows under a 
Fio. 55. and b shew the mutual motion of the two prongs. 

Hence while the prong a gives the air about c an im- 

'\^ /'" pulse in the direction c a, the prong b gives it an f 

\ / opposite one. Both impulses only partially cancel 

'\^ , ' one another at c, because a acts more powerfully 

\ /' thanb. But the dotted lines shew the places where 

the opposite impulses from a and b are equally 
e strong, and consequently completely cancel each 

other. If the ear be brought into one of these 
places of silence and a narrow tube be slipped over 
one of the prongs a or b, taking care not to touch it, 
/ \^ the sound will be immediately augmented, because 

/ \ the influence of the covered prong is almost entirely 

destroyed, and the uncovered prong therefore acts 
alone and undisturbed, -j* 
A double siren which I have had constructed is very convenient for the demon- 
stration of these relations. J Fig. 56 (p. 162) is a perspective view of this instru- T 
ment. It is composed of two of Dove's polyphonic sirens, of the kind previously 
mentioned, p. 13a ; aQ and a^ are the two windchests, c^ and c^ the discs attached 
to a common axis, on which a screw is introduced at k, to drive a counting 
apparatus which can be introduced, as described on p. 126. The upper box a^ 
can be turned round its axis, by means of a toothed wheel, in which works a 
smaller wheel e provided with the driving handle d §. The axis of the box a^ 
round which it turns, is a prolongation of the upper pipe gj, which conducts 
the wind. On each of the two discs of the siren are four rows of holes, which 

* [If a screen of any sort, as the hand, be reeonance chamber, the alternation of sound 

interposed between the mouths of the pipes, and silence, &c., can be made audible to many 

the tone is immediately restored, and then persons at once. — Translator.] 
generally remains even if the hand be re- t Constructed by the mechanician Sauer- 

moved. — Trarulator.'] wald in Berlin. 

t [If instead of bringing the tuning-fork to § [Three turns of the handle cause one 

the ear, it be slowly turned before a proper turn of the box round its Aw.^Translatar,] 

M 










;|^W]§'.§JE 




OF SOUND. 



in any oombination at pleasnre, and at i 

le series of bolee by a peculiar arrange- 

10, 12, 18 holes, the upper of 9, 12, 

lies c, the lower disc gives the tones c, e. 



t 






^: 




'*'^T^Tr ^^"^1^°'^ ^^^^ ^ produce the following 
leously. 



C7HAP. vm. INTERFERENCE OF SOUND. 1«3 

3. fWihs : c g and g d* either on the lower disc alone or on both discs together. 

4. Fourths : d g and g c' on the upper disc alone or on both together. 

5. Major Third : c on the lower alone, and g b on the upper alone, or ^ & on 
both together. 

6. Minor Third : ^ on the lower, or on both together ; b d' on both together. 

7. Whole Tone [major Tone] : e d and & d' on both together [the minor Tone 
is produced by d and e on both together]. 

8. Semitone [diatonic Semitone] : b & on the upper. 

When both tones are produced from the same disc the objective combinational 
tones are very powerful, as has been already remarked, p. 157a. But if the tones 
are produced from different discs, the combinational tones are weak. In the latter 
case (and this is the chief point of interest to us at present), the two tones can 
be made to act together with any desired difference of phase. This is effected by 
altering the position of the upper box. f 

We have first to investigate the phenomena as they occur in the unison g g. 
The effect of the interference of the two tones in this case is complicated by the 
fact that the siren produces compound and not simple tones and that the in- 
terference of individual partial tones is independent of that of the prime tone 
and of one another. In order to damp the upper partial tones in the siren by 
means of a resonance chamber, I caused cyhndrical boxes of brass to be made, 
of which the back halves are shewn at h^ h^ and h^ h^ fig. 56, opposite. These 
boxes are each made in two sections, so that they can be removed, and be again 
attached to the windchest by means of screws. When the tone of the siren 
approaches the prime tone of these boxes, its quality becomes full, strong and soft, 
like a fine tone on the French horn ; otherwise the siren has rather a piercing tone. 
At the same time we use a small quantity of air, but considerable pressure. The 
circumstances are of the same nature as when a tongue is applied to a resonance 
chamber of the same pitch. Used in this way the siren is very well adapted for f 
experiments on interference. 

If the boxes are so placed that the pufiis of air follow at exactly equal intervals 
from both discs, similar phases of the prime tone and of all partials coincide, and 
all are reinforced. 

,If the handle is turned round half a right angle, the upper box is turned round 
j^ of a right angle, or ^^^ of the circumference, that is half the distance between 
the holes in the series of 12 holes which is in action for g. Hence the difference 
in the phase of the two primes is half the vibrational period, the pufk of air in 
one box occur exactly in the middle between those of the other, and the two 
prime tones mutually destroy each other. But under these circumstances the 
difference of phase in the upper Octave is precisely the whole of the vibrational 
period ; that is, they reinforce each other, and similarly all the evenly numbered 
harmonic upper partials reinforce each other in the same position, and the unevenly 
numbered ones destroy each other. Hence in the new position the tone is weaker, f 
because deprived of several of its partials ; but it does not entirely cease ; it rather 
jumps up an Octave. If we further turn the handle through another half a right 
angle so that the box is turned through a whole right angle, the pufGs of the two 
discs again agree completely, and the tones reinforce one another. Hence in a 
complete revolution of the handle there are four positions where the whole tone of 
the siren appears reinforced, and four intermediate positions where the prime tone 
and all uneven upper partials vanish, and consequently the Octave occurs in a 
weaker form accompanied by the evenly numbered upper partials. If we attend to 
the first upper partial, which is the Octave of the prime, by listening to it through 
a proper resonator, we find that it vanishes after turning through a quarter of a 
right angle, and is reinforced after turning through half a right angle, and hence 
for every complete revolution of >the handle it vanishes 8 times, and is reinforced 
8 times. The third partial (or second upper partial), the Twelfth of the prime 
tone, vanishes in the same time 12 times, the fourth partial 16 times, and so on. 

m2 



164 ORIGIN OF BEATS. pakt n. 

Other compound tones behave like those of the siren. When two tones of the 
same pitch are sounded together having differences of phase corresponding to half 
the periodic time, the tone does not vanish, but jumps up an Octave. When, for 
example, two open organ pipes, or two reed pipes of the same construction and 
pitch, are placed beside each other on the same portvent, their vibrations generaUy 
accommodate themselves in such a manner that the stream of air enters first one 
and then the other alternately ; and while the tone of stopped pipes, which have 
only unevenly numbered partials, is then almost entirely destroyed, the tone of the 
open pipes and reed pipes falls into the upper Octave. This is the reason why no 
reinforcement of tone can be effected on an organ or harmonium by combining 
tongues or pipes of the same kind [on the same portvent]. 

So far we have combined tones of precisely the same pitch ; now let us inquire 
what happens when the tones have slightly different pitch. The double siren 

T just described is also well fitted for explaining this case, for we can slightly alter 
the pitch of the upper tone by slowly revolving the upper box by means of the 
handle, the tone becoming flatter when the direction of revolution is the same as 
that of the disc, and sharper when it is opposite to the same. The vibrational 
period of a tone of the siren is equal to the time required for a hole in the rotating 
disc to pass from one hole in the windbox to the next. If, through the rotation of 
the box, the hole of the box advances to meet the hole of the disc, the two holes 
come into coincidence sooner than if the box were at rest : and hence the vibra- 
tional period is shorter, and the tone sharper. The converse takes place when the 
revolution is in the opposite direction. These alterations of pitch are easily heard 
when the box is revolved rather quickly. Now produce the tones of twelve holes 
on both discs. These will be in absolute unison as long as the upper box is at 
rest. The two tones constantly reinforce or enfeeble each other according to the 
position of the upper box. But on setting the upper box in motion, the pitch of 

T the upper tone is altered, while that of the lower tone, which has an immovable 
windbox, is unchanged. Hence we have now two tones of slightly different pitch 
sounding together. And we hear the so-called beats of the tones, that is, the 
intensity of the tone will be alternately greater and less in regular succession.* The 
arrangement of our siren makes the reason of this readily intelligible. The 
revolution of the upper box brings it alternately in positions which as we have 
seen correspond to stronger and weaker tones. When the handle has been turned 
through a right angle, the windbox passes from a position of loudness through a 
position of weakness to a position of strength again. Consequently every complete 
revolution of the handle gives us four beats, whatever be the rate of revolution of 
the discs, and hence however low or high the tone may be. If we stop the box at 
the moment of maximum loudness, we continue to hear the loud tone ; if at a 
moment of minimum force, we continue to hear the weak tone. 

The mechanism of the instrument also explains the connection between the 

^ number of beats and the difference of the pitch. It is easily seen that the number 
of the puffs is increased by one for every quarter revolution of the handle. But 
every such quarter revolution corresponds to one beat. Hence the number of beats 
in a given time is eqiial to the difference of the numbers of vibrations executed by 
the two tones in the samne time. This is the general law which determines the 
number of beats, for all kinds of tones. This law results immediately from the 
construction of the siren ; in other instruments it can only be verified by very 
accurate and laborious measurements of the numbers of vibrations. 

The process is shewn graphically in fig. 57. Here c c represents the series of 
puffs belonging to one tone, and d d those belonging to the other. The distance 
for c c is divided into 18 parts, the same distance is divided into 20 parts for d d. At 

* [The German word Schwebung, which * beat '. But it is not usual to make the dis- 
might be rendered ' fluctuation/ implies this : tinction in English, where the whole phench 
The loudest portion only is called the StosSy or menon is (^Iled b«ata, — TransUUor,] 



OHAP. vm. ORIGIN OF BEATS. 165 

1, 3, 5, both puffs concur, and the tone is reinforced. At 2 and 4 they are inter- 
mediate and mutually enfeeble each other. The number of beats for the whole 
distance is 2, because the difference of the numbers of parts, each of which cor- 
respond to a vibration, is also 2. 

The intensity of tone varies ; swelling from a minimum to a maximum, and 
lessening from the maximum to the minimum. It is the places of maximum 

Fig. 67. 

intensity which are properly called beats, and these are separated by more or less 
distinct pauses. 

Beats are easily produced on all musical instruments, by striking two notes of IT 
nearly the same pitch. They are heard best from the simple tones of tuning-forks 
or stopped organ pipes, because here the tone really vanishes in the pauses. A 
little fluctuation in the pitch of the beating tone may then be remarked.* For the 
compound tones of other instruments the upper partial tones are heard in the 
pauses, and hence the tone jumps up an Octave, as in the case of interference 
already described. If we have two tuning-forks of exactly the same pitch, it is 
only necessary to stick a little wax on to the end of one, to strike both, and bring 
them near the same ear or to the surface of a table, or sounding board. To make 
two stopped pipes beat, it is only necessary to bring a finger slowly near to the lip 
of one, and thus flatten it. The beats of compound tones are heard by striking 
any note on a pianoforte out of tune when the two strings belonging to the same 
note are no longer in unison ; or if the piano is in tune it is sufficient to attach a 
piece of wax, about the size of a pea, to one of the strings. This puts them suffi- 
ciently out of tune. More attention, however, is required for compound tones f 
because the eufeeblement of the tone is not so striking. The beat in this case 
resembles a fluctuation in pitch and quality. This is very striking on the siren 
according as the brass resonance cylinders (h^ h^ and h^ h^ of fig. 56, p. 162) are 
attached or not. These make the prime tone relatively strong. Hence when beats 
are produced by turning a handle, the decrease and increase of loudness in the tone 
is very striking. On removing the resonance cylinders, the upper partial tones 
are relatively powerful, and since the ear is very uncertain when comparing the 
loudness of tones of different pitch, the alteration of force during the beats is 
much less striking than that of pitch and quality of tone. 

On listening to the upper partials of compound tones which beat, it vnll be 
found that these beat also, and that for each beat of the prime tone there are two 
of the second partial, three of the third and so on. Hence when the upper partials 
are strong, it is easy to make a mistake in counting the beats, especially when the 
beats of the primes are very slow, so that they occur at intervals of a second or two. U 
It is then necessary to pay great attention to the pitch of the beats counted, and 
sometimes to apply a resonator. 

It is possible to render beats visible by setting a suitable elastic body into 
sympathetic vibration with them. Beats can then occur only when the two 
exciting tones lie near enough to the prime tone of the sympathetic body for the 
latter to be set into sensible sympathetic vibration by both the tones used. This 
is most easily done with a thin string which is stretched on a sounding board 
on which have been placed two tuning-forks, both of very nearly the same pitch 
as the string. On observing the vibrations of the string through a microscope, 
or attaching a fibril of a goosefeather to the string which will make the same 
excursions on a magnified scale, the string will be clearly seen to make sympathetic 

* See the explanation of this phenomenon French translator of this work,] in Appen* 
which was given me by Mons. G. Gudroult [the dix XIV. 



166 ORIGIN OF BEATS. . part n. 

vibrations with akemately large and small excursions, according as the tone of the 
two forks is at its maximum or minimum. 

The same effect can be obtained from the sympathetic vibration of a stretched 
membrane. Fig. 58 is the copy of a drawing made by a vibrating membrane of 

Fig. 5a 




this sort, used in the phonautograph of Messrs. Scott & Eoenig, of Paris. The mem- 
brane of this instrument, which resembles the drumskin of the ear, carries a small 
stiff style, which draws the vibrations of the membrane upon a rotating cylinder. 
In the present case the membrane was set in motion by two organ pipes, that beat. 

IT The undulating line, of which only a part is here given, shews that times of strong 
vibration have alternated with times of almost entire rest. In this case, then, the 
beats are also sympathetically executed by the membrane. Similar drawings 
again have been made by Dr. Politzer, who attached the writing style to the 
auditory bone (the columella) of a duck, and then produced a beating tone by 
means of two organ pipes. This experiment shewed that even the auditory bones 
follow the beats of two tones.* 

Generally this must always be the case when the pitches of the two tones 
struck differ so little from each other and from that of the proper tone of the sym- 
pathetic body, that the latter can be put into sensible vibration by both tones at 
once. S3rmpathetic bodies which do not damp readily, such as tuning-forks, 
consequently require two exciting tones which differ extraordinarily little in pitch, 
in order to shew visible beats, and the beats must therefore be very slow. For 
bodies readily damped, as membranes, strings, &c., the difference of the exciting 

U tones may be greater, and consequently the beats may succeed each other more 
rapidly. 

This holds also for the elastic terminal formations of the auditory nerve fibres. 
Just as we have seen that there may be visible beats of the auditory ossicles, Gorti's 
arches may also be made to beat by two tones sufficiently near in pitch to set the 
same Gorti's arches in sympathetic vibration at the same time. If then, as we 
have previously supposed, the intensity of auditory sensation in the nerve fibres 
involved increases and decreases with the intensity of the elastic vibrations, the 
strength of the sensation must also increase and diminish in the same degree as the 
vibrations of the corresponding elastic appendages of the nerves. In this case also 
the motion of Gorti's arches must still be considered as compounded of the motions 
which the two tones would have produced if they had acted separately. According 
as these motions are directed in the same or in opposite directions they will rein- 
force or enfeeble each other by (algebraical) addition. It is not till these motions 

U excite sensation in the nerves that any deviation occurs from the law that each of 
the two tones and each of the two sensations of tones subsist side by side without 
disturbance. 

We now come to a part of the investigation which is very important for the 
theory of musical consonance, and has also unfortunately been little regarded by 
acousticians. The question is : what becomes of the beats when they grow faster 
and faster ? and to what extent may their number increase without the ear being 
unable to perceive them ? Most acousticians were probably inclined to agree with 
the hypothesis of Thomas Young, that when the beats became very quick they 
gradually passed over into a combinational tone (the first differential). Young 
imagined that the pulses of tone which ensue during beats, might have the same 

* The beats of two tones are also olearly tones. Even without using the rotating mirror 

shewn by the vibrating flame described at the for observing the flames, we can easily recQg- 

end of Appendix II. The flame must be con- nise the alterations in the shape of the flame 

nected with a resonator having a pitch suffi- which takes place isochronously with the 

oiently near to those of the two generating audible beats. 



CHAP. vm. 



LIMITS OF THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. 



167 



efTect on the ear as elementary pulses of air (in the siren, for example), and that 
just as 30 pufiGs in a second through a siren would produce the sensation of a deep 
tone, so would 30 beats in a second resulting from any two higher tones produce 
the same sensation of a deep tone. Certainly this view is well supported by the 
fact that the vibrational number of the first and strongest combinational tone is 
actually the number of beats produced by the two tones in a second. It is, however, 
of much importance to remember that there are other combinational tones (my 
summational tones), which will not agree with this hypothesis in any respect,* 
but on the other hand are readily deduced from the theory of combinational tones 
which I have proposed (in Appendix XII.). It is moreover an objection to Young's 
theory, that in many cases the combinational tones exist externally to the ear, and 
are able to set properly tuned membranes or resonators into sympathetic vibra- 
tion,-|- because this could not possibly be the case, if the combinational tones were 
nothing but the series of beats with undisturbed superposition of the two waves, f 
For the mechanical theory of sympathetic vibration shews that a motion of the 
air compounded of two simple vibrations of different periodic times, is capable of 
putting such bodies only into sympathetic vibration as have a proper tone corre- 
sponding to one of the two given tones, provided no conditions intervene by which 
the simple superposition of two wave systems might be disturbed ; and the nature 
of such a disturbance was investigated in the last chapter.^ Hence we may 
consider combinational tones as an accessory phenomenon, by which, however, the 
course of the two primary wave systems and of their beats is not essentiaUy in- 
terrupted. 

Against the old opinion we may also adduce the testimony of our senses, which 
teaches us that a much greater number of beats than 30 in a second can be 
distinctly heard. To obtain this result we must pass gradually from the slower to 
the more rapid beats, taking care that the tones chosen for beating are not too far 
apart from each other in the scale, because audible beats are not produced unless f 
the tones are so near to each other in the scale that they can both make the same 
elastic appendages of the nerves vibrate sympathetically. § The number of beats, 
however, can be increased without increasing the interval between the tones, if 
both tones are taken in the higher octaves. 

The observations are best begun by producing two simple tones of the same 
pitch, say from the once-accented octave by means of tuning-forks or stopped organ 
pipes, and slowly altering the pitch of one. This is effected by sticking more and 
more wax on one of the forks ; or more and more covering the mouth of one of 
the pipes. Stopped organ pipes are also generally provided with a movable plug 
or Ud at the stopped end, in order to tune them ; by pulling this out we flatten, by 
pushing it in we sharpen the tone.** 

When a slight difference in pitch has been thus produced, the beats are heard 
at first as long drawn out fluctuations alternately swelling and vanishing. Slow 
beats of this kind are by no means disagreeable to the ear. In executing music ^ 
containing long sustained chords, they may even produce a solemn effect, or else 
give a more lively, tremulous or agitating expression. Hence we find in modem 



* [Prof. Pxeyer shews, App. XX. sect L. 
art. 4, dt that smnmAtional tones, as suggested 
by Appunn, may be oonsideied as differential 
tones of the second order, if saoh are admitted. 
— Trantlaior,] 

t [After the experiments of Piof. Preyer 
and Mr. Bosanquet, App. XX. seot. L. art. 4, 
this. must be oonsiderea as due to some error 
of observation. — Translator.] 

$[See Bosanquet's theory of * transforma- 
tion * in App. XX. sect. L. art. 5, a. — Trans- 
lator.] 

§[Koenig knows no suoh limitation. See 
App. XX. sect. L. art. 8. — TransUUcr.] 

~~[A cheap apparatus, useful for demon- 



•• 



stration of the following facts, is made with 
two ' pitch pipes,' each consisting of an exten- 
sible stoppea pipe, which has the compass of 
the once-accented octave and is blown as a 
whistle, the two being connected by a bent tube 
with a single mouthpiece. By carefully adjust- 
ing the lengths of the pipes, I was first able to 
produce complete destruction of the tone by 
interference, the sound returning immediately 
when the mouth of one whistle was stopped by 
the finger. Then on gradually lengthening one 
of the pipes the beats began to be heard slowly, 
and increased in rapidity. The tone being 
nearly simple the beats are well heard. — 
Translator,] 



168 



LIMITS OF THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. 



PART II. 



organs and harmoniums, a stop with two pipes or tongaes, adjusted to beat. This 
imitates the trembling of the human voice and of violins which, appropriately in- 
troduced in isolated passages, may certainly be very expressive and efifective, but 
applied continuously, as is unfortunately too common, is a detestable malpractice. 
The ear easily follows slow beats of not more than 4 to 6 in a second. The 
hearer has time to apprehend all their separate phases, and become conscious of 
each separately, he can even count them without difficulty.* But when the interval 
between the two tones increases to about a Semitone, the number of beats becomes 
20 or 30 in a second, and the ear is consequently unable to follow them sufficiently 
well for counting. If, however, we begin with hearing slow beats, and then increase 
their rapidity more and more, we cannot fail to recognise that the sensational im- 
pression on the ear preserves precisely the same character, appearing as a series 
of separate pulses of sound, even when their frequency is so great that we have 

H no longer time to fix each beat, as it passes, distinctly in our consciousness and 
count it.f 

But while the hearer in this case is quite capable of distinguishing that his ear 
now hears 30 beats of the same kind as the 4 or 6 in a second which he heard 
before, the effect of the collective impression of such a rapid beat is quite different. 
In the first place the mass of tone becomes confused, which I principally refer to 
the psychological impressions. We actually hear a series of pulses of tone, and 
are able to recognise it as such, although no longer capable of following each 
singly or separating one from the other. But besides this psychological considera- 
tion, the sensible impression is also unpleasant. Such rapidly beating tones are 
jarring and rough. The distinctive property of jarring, is the intermittent cha- 
racter of the sound. We think of the letter B as a characteristic example of a 
jarring tone. It is well known to be produced by interposing the uvula, or else 
the thin tip of the tongue, in the way of the stream of air passing out of the mouth, 

^ in such a manner as only to allow the air to force its way through in separate pulses, 
the consequence being that the voice at one time sounds freely, and at another is 
cut off. J 

Intermittent tones were also produced on the double siren just described by 
using a little reed pipe instead of the wind-conduit of the upper box, and driving 
the air through this reed pipe. The tone of this pipe can be heard externally only 
when the revolution of the disc brings its holes before the holes of the box and 
opens an exit for the air. Hence, if we let the disc revolve while air is driven 
through the pipe, we obtain an intermittent tone, which sounds exactly like beats 
arising from two tones sounded at once, although the intermittence is produced by 
purely mechanical means. Such effects may also be produced in another way on 
the same siren. Bemove the lower windbox and retain only its pierced cover, 
over which the disc revolves. At the under part apply one extremity of an india- 
rubber tube against one of the holes in the cover, the other end being conducted 

5[ by a proper ear-piece to the observer's ear. The revolving disc alternately opens 
and closes the hole to which the india-rubber tube has been applied. Hold a 
tuning-fork in action or some other suitable musical instrument above and near 



• [See App. XX. sect. B. No. 7, for direo- 
tions for observing beats. — Translator,] 

t [The Harmonical is very convenient for 
this purpose. On the d\f key is a di one 
comma lower than d. These ddi beat about 
9, 18, 86, 78 times in 10 seconds in the 
different Octaves, the last barely countable. 
Also «i[^ and e^ beat 83, 66, 182, 864 in 10 
seconds in the different Octaves. The two first 
of these sets of beats can be counted, the two 
last cannot be counted, but will be distinctly 
perceived as separate pulses. Similarly the 
beats between all consecutive notes (except J^ 
and G, B and C) can be counted in the lowest 



Octave, but become rapidly too fast to be 
followed. As, however, these are not simple 
tones, the beats are not perfectly dear. — 
Translator,] 

it [Phonautographic figures of the effect 
of r, resemble those of fig. 58, p. 166a. Six 
varieties of these figures are given on p. 19 of 
Donder's important little tract on * The Physi- 
ology of Speech Sounds, and especially of those 
in the Dutch Language ' {De Physiologie der 
Spraakklankenf in het hrj zander van die der 
nederlandache taal. Utrecht 1870, pp. 24).— 
Translator.] 



CHAP. vin. LIMITS OP THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. 169 

the rotating disc. Its tone will be heard intermittently and the number of 
intermissions can be regulated by altering the velocity of the rotation of the 
disa 

In both ways then we obtain intermittent tones. In the first case the tone of 
the reed pipe as heard in the outer air is interrupted, because it can only escape 
from time to time. The intermittent tone in this case can be heard by any number 
of listeners at once. In the second case the tone in the outer air is continuous, 
but reaches the ear of the observer, who hears it through the disc of the siren, 
intermittently. It can certainly be heard by one observer only, but then all kinds 
of musical tones of the most diverse pitch and quality may be employed for the 
purpose. The intermission of their tones gives them all exactly the same kind of 
roughness which is produced by two tones which beat rapidly together. We thus 
come to recognise clearly that beats and intermissions are identical, and that either 
when fast enough produces what is termed a jar or rattle. H 

Beats produce intermittent excitement of certain auditory nerve fibres. The 
reason why such an intermittent excitement acts so much more unpleasantly than 
an equally strong or even a stronger continuous excitement, may be gathered from 
the analogous action of other human nerves. Any powerful excitement of a nerve 
deadens its excitability, and consequently renders it less sensitive to fresh irritants. 
But after the excitement ceases, and the nerve is left to itself, irritability is speedily 
re-established in a living body by the influence of arterial blood. Fatigue and re- 
freshment apparently supervene in different organs of the body with different 
velocities ; but they are found wherever muscles and nerves have to operate. The 
eye, which has in many respects the greatest analogy to the ear, is one of those 
organs in which both fatigue and refreshment rapidly ensue. We need to look at 
the sun but an instant to find that the portion of the retina, or nervous expansion 
of the eye, which was affected by the solar light has become less sensitive for other 
light. Immediately afterwards on turning our eyes to a uniformly illuminated ^ 
surface, as the sky, we see a dark spot of the apparent size of the sun ; or several 
such spots with lines between them, if we had not kept our eye steady when look- 
ing at the sun but had moved it right and left. An instant suffices to produce this 
effect; nay, an electric spark, that lasts an immeasurably short time, is fully 
capable of causing this species of fatigue. 

When we continue to look at a bright surface, the impression is strongest at 
first, but at the same time it blunts the sensibility of the eye, and consequently 
the impression becomes weaker, the longer we allow the eye to act. On coming 
out of darkness into full daylight we feel blinded ; but after a few minutes, when 
the sensibility of the eye has been blunted by the irritation of the light,— or, as we 
say, when the eye has grown accustomed to the glare, — this degree of brightness is 
found very pleasant. Conversely, in coming from full daylight into a dark vault, 
we are insensible to the weak light about us, and can scarcely find our way about, 
yet after a few minutes, when the eye has rested from the effect of the strong light, H 
we are able to see very well in the semi-dark room. 

These phenomena and the like can be conveniently studied in the eye, because 
individual spots in the eye may be excited and others left at rest, and the sensations 
of each may be afterwards compared. Put a piece of black paper on a tolerably 
well-lighted white surface, look steadily at a point on or near the black paper, and 
then withdraw the paper suddenly. The eye sees a secondary image of the black 
paper on the white surface, consisting of that portion of the white surface where 
the black paper lay, which now appears brighter than the rest. The place in the 
eye where the image of the black paper had been formed, has been rested in com- 
parison with all those places which had been affected by the white surface, and 
on removing the black paper this rested part of the eye sees the white surface in 
its first fresh brightness, while those parts of the retina which had been already 
fatigued by looking at it, see a decidedly greyer tinge on the whiter surface. 

Hence by the continuous uniform action of the irritation of light, this irritation 



170 LIMITS OP THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. part n. 

itself blunts the sensibility of the nerve, and thus effectually protects this organ 
against too long and too violent excitement. 

It is quite different when we allow intermittent light to act on the eye, such as 
, flashes of light with intermediate pauses. During these pauses the sensibility is 
again somewhat re-established, and the new irritation consequently acts much 
more intensely than if it had lasted with the same uniform strength. Every one 
knows how unpleasant and annoying is any flickering light, even if it is relatively 
very weak, coming, for example, from a little flickering taper or rushlight. 

The same thing holds for the nerves of touch. Scraping with the nail is far 
more annoying to the skin than constant pressure on the same place with the 
same pressure of the nail. The unpleasantness of scratching, rubbing, tickling, 
depends upon the intermittent excitement which they produce in the nerves of 
touch. 
f A jarring intermittent tone is for the nerves of hearing what a flickering light 
is to the nerves of sight, ayd scratching to the nerves of touch. A much more 
intense and unpleasant excitement of the organs is thus produced than would be 
occasioned by a continuous uniform tone. This is even shewn when we hear very 
weak intermittent tones. If a tuning-fork is struck and held at such a distance 
from the ear that its sound cannot be heard, it becomes immediately audible if the 
handle of the fork be revolved by the fingers. The revolution brings it alternately 
into positions where it can and cannot transmit sound to the ear [p. 1616] , and 
this alternation of strength is immediately perceptible by the ear. For the same 
reason one of the most delicate means of hearing a very weak, simple tone consists 
in sounding another of nearly the same strength, which makes from 2 to 4 beats in 
a second with the first. In this case the strength of the tone varies from nothing 
to 4 times the strength of the single simple tone, and this increase of strength 
combines with the alternation to make it audibla 
51 Just as this alternation of strength will serve to strengthen the impression of 
the very weakest musical tones upon the ear, we must conclude that it must also 
serve to make the impression of stronger tones much more penetrating and violent, 
than they would be if their loudness were continuous. 

We have hitherto confined our attention to cases where the number of beats 
did not exceed 20 or 30 in a second. We saw that the beats in the middle part of 
the scale are still quite audible and form a series of separate pulses of tone. But 
this does not furnish a limit to their number in a second. 

The interval b* c*' gave us 33 beats in a second, and the effect of sounding the 
two notes together was very jarring. The interval of a whole tone b'\^ &' gives 
nearly twice as many beats, but these are no longer so cutting as the former. The 
rule assigns 88 beats in a second to the minor Third a' c*\ but in reality this interval 
scarcely shews any of the roughness produced by beats from tones at closer intervals. 
We might then be led to conjecture that the increasing number of beats weakened 
^ their impression and made them inaudible. This conjecture would find an analogy 
in the impossibility of separating a series of rapidly succeeding impressions of 
light on the eye, when their number in a second is too large. Think of a glowing 
stick swung round in a circle. If it executes 10 or 15 revolutions in a second, the 
eye believes it sees a continuous circle of fire. Similarly for colour-tops, with 
which most of my readers are probably familiar. If the top be spun at the rate 
of more than 10 revolutions in a second, the colours upon it mix and form a per- 
fectly unchanging impression of a mixed colour. It is only for very intense light 
that the alternations of the various fields of colour have to take place more quickly, 
20 to 30 times in a second. Hence the phenomena are quite analogous for ear and 
eye. When the alternation between irritation and rest is too fast, the alternation 
ceases to be felt, and sensation becomes continuous and lasting. 

However, we may convince ourselves that in the case of the ear, an increase of 
the number of beats in a second is not the only cause of the disappearance of the 



CHAP. vm. LIMITS OF THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. 171 

corresponding sensation. As we passed from the interval of a Semitone h* c" to 
that of a minor Third a* c", we not only increased the number of beats, but the 
width of the interval. Now we can increase the number of beats without increasing 
the interval by taking it in a higher Octave. Thus taking h* c" an Octave higher 
we have h*' &" with 66 beats, and another Octave would give us b"* c"" with as 
many as 132 beats, and these are really audible in the same way as the 88 beats 
of b' &\ although they certainly become weaker in the higher positions. Never- 
theless the 66 beats of the interval V* &" are much more distinct and penetrating 
than the same number in the whole Tone b^\^ c", and the 88 of the interval e"* f* 
are still quite evident, while the 88 of the minor Third a' c" are practically in- 
audible. My assertion that as many as 182 beats in a second are audible will per- 
haps appear very strange and incredible to acousticians. But the experiment is 
easy to repeat, and if on an instrument which gives sustained tones, as an organ 
or harmonium, we strike a series of intervals of a Semitone each, beginning low % 
down, and proceeding higher and higher, we shall hear in the lower parts very 
slow beats {B^ C gives 4i, B c gives 8^, b & gives 16^ beats in a second), and as we 
ascend the rapidity will increase but the character of the sensation remain un- 
altered. And thus we can pass gradually from 4 to 182 beats in a second, and 
convince ourselves that though we become incapable of counting them, their cha- 
racter as a series of pulses of tone, producing an intermittent sensation, remains 
unaltered. It must be observed, however, that the beats, even in the higher parts 
of the scale, become much shriller and more distinct, when their number is 
diminished by taking intervals of quarter tones or less. The most penetrating 
roughness arises even in the upper parts of the scale from beats of 80 to 40 in a 
second. Hence high tones in a cord are much more sensitive to an error in 
tuning amounting to the fraction of a Semitone, than deep ones. While two c' 
notes which difGar from one another by the tenth part of a Semitone, produce about 
3 beats in two seconds,* which cannot be observed without considerable attention, If 
and, at least, give no feeling of roughness, two c" notes with the same error give 
3 beats in one second, and two c"' notes 6 beats in one second, which become very 
disagreeable. The character of the roughness also alters with the number of beats. 
Slow beats give a coarse kind of roughness, which may be considered as chattering 
or jarring ; and quicker ones have a finer but more cutting roughness. 

Hence it is not, or at least not solely, the large number of beats which renders 
them inaudible. The magnitude of the interval is a factor in the result, and con- 
sequently we are able with high tones to produce more rapid audible beats than 
with low tones. 

Observation shews us, then, on the one hand, that equally large intervals by 
no means give equally distinct beats in all parts of the scale. The increasing 
number of beats in a second renders the beats in the upper part of the scale less 
distinct. The beats of a Semitone remain distinct to the upper limits of the four- 
times accented octave [say 4000 vib.], and this is also about the limit for musical ^ 
tones fit for the combinations of harmony. The beats of a whole tone, which in 
deep positions are very distinct and powerful, are scarcely audible at the upper 
limit of the thrice-accented octave [say at 2000 vib.]. The major and minor 
Third, on the other hand, which in the middle of the scale [264 to 528 vib.] may 
be regarded as consonances, and when justly intoned scarcely shew any roughness, 
are decidedly rough in the lower octaves and produce distinct beats. 

On the other hand we have seen that distinctness of beating and the roughness 
of the combined sounds do not depend solely on the number of beats. For if we 
could disregard their magnitudes all the following intervals, which by calculation 
should have 88 beats, would be equally rough : 



* [Taking c' = 264, a tone one-tenth of a second. The figures in the text have been 
Semitone or 10 cents higher make 265*6 yibra- altered to these more exact numbers. — Trans- 
tions, and these tones beat 1} times in a latorJ] 



172 



LIMITS OF THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. 



PART n. 



the Semitone 


. b'c" 


the whole Tones . 


. e'd' 


the minor Third . 


. eg 


the major Third . 


c e 


the Fourth . 


. Gc 


the Fifth 


, CO 



628-495 = 33] 

major, 297-264] and d' e' [minor 330-297] 
198-166] 
165-132] 
132-99] 
[99-66] 
and yet we find that these intervals are more and more free from roughness.* 

The roughness arising from sounding two tones together depends, then, in a 
compound manner on the magnitude of the interval and the number of beats pro- 
duced in a second. On seeking for the reason of this dependence, we observe that, 
as before remarked, beats in the air can exist only when two tones are produced 
sufficiently near in the scale to set the same elastic appendages of the auditory 
nerve in sympathetic yibration at the same time. When the two tones produced 

IT are too far apart, the vibrations excited by both of them at once in Corti's organs 
are too weak to admit of their beats being sensibly felt, supposing of course that 
no upper partial or combinational tones intervene. According to the assumptions 
made in the last chapter respecting the degree of damping possessed by Ck)rti's 
organs (p. 144c), it would result, for example, that for the interval of a whole Tone 
c d, such of Corti's fibres as have the proper tone cjt, would be excited by each of 
the tones with ^ of its own intensity ; and these fibres will therefore fluctuate 
between the intensities of vibration and y^^. But if we strike the simple tones c 
and c^j it follows from the table there given that Corti's fibres which correspond 
to the middle between c and <A will alternate between the intensities and !§. 
Conversely the same intensity of beats would for a minor Third amount to only 
0*194, and for a major Third to only 0'108, and hence would be scarcely perceptible 
beside the two primary tones of the intensity 1. 
Fig. 59, which we used on p. 144^ to express the 

IT intensity of the sympathetic vibration of Corti's 
fibres for an increasing interval of tone, may 
here serve to shew the intensity of the beats 
which two tones excite in the ear when forming 
different intervals in the scale. But the parts on 
the base line must now be considered to repre- 
sent fifths of a whole Tone, and not as before of 
a Semitone. In the present case the distance of 

the two tones from each other is doubly as great as that between either of them 
and the intermediate Corti's fibres. 

Had the damping of Corti's organs been equally great at all parts of the scale, 
and had the number of beats no influence on the roughness of the sensation, equal 
intervals in all parts of the scale would have given equal roughness to the combined 
tones. But as this is not the case, as the same intervals diminish in roughness 

II as we ascend in the scale, and increase in roughness as we descend, we must either 
assume that the damping power of Corti's organs of higher pitch is less than that 
of those of lower pitch, or else that the discrimination of the more rapid Treats 
meets with certain hindrances in the nature of the sensation itself. 

At present I see no way of deciding between these two suppositions ; but the 
former is possibly the more improbable, because, at least with our artificial musical 
instruments, the higher the pitch of a vibrating body, the more difficulty is ex- 
perienced in isolating it sufficiently to prevent it from communicating its vibrations 
to its environment. Very short, high-pitched strings, little metal tongues or plates, 
&c., yield high tones which die off with great rapidity, whereas it is easy to 
generate deep tones with correspondingly greater bodies which shall retain their 
tone for a considerable time. On the other hand the second supposition is favoxired 
by the analogy of another nervous apparatus, the eye. As has been already re- 




* [All these intervals can be tried on the the student should listen to the beats of the 
Harmonical, but as the tones are compound, primes only. — Translator.'\ 



CHAP. YIU. 



LIMITS OF THE FREQUENCY OF BEATS. 



173 



marked, a series of impressions of light, following each other rapidly and regularly, 
excite a uniform and continuous sensation of light in the eye. When the separate 
luminous irritations follow one another very quickly, the impression produced by 
each one lasts unweakened in the nerves till the next supervenes, and thus the 
pauses can no longer be distinguished in sensation. In the eye, the number of 
separate irritations cannot exceed 24 in a second without being completely fused 
into a single sensation. In this respect the eye is far surpassed by the ear, which 
can distinguish as many as 132 intermissions in a second and probably even that 
is not the extreme limit. Much higher tones of sufficient strength would probably 
allow us to hear still more.^ It lies in the nature of the thing, that dififerent kinds 
of apparatus of sensation should shew dififerent degrees of mobility in this respect, 
since the result does not depend simply on the mobility of the molecules of the 
nerves, but also depends upon the mobility of the auxiliary apparatus through 
which the excitement is induced or expressed. Muscles are much less mobile than ^ 
the eye ; ten electrical discharges in a second directed through them generally 
suffice to bring the voluntary muscles into a permanent state of contraction. For 
the muscles of the involuntary system, of the bowels, the vessels, &c., the pauses 
between the irritations may be as much as one, or even several seconds long, with- 
out any intermission in the continuity of contraction. 

The ear is greatly superior in this respect to any other nervous apparatus. It 
is eminently the organ for small intervals of time, and has been long used as such 
by astronomers. It is well known that when two pendulums are ticking near one 
another, the ear can distinguish whether the ticks are or are not coincident, within 
one hundredth of a second. The eye would certainly fail to determine whether 
two flashes of light coincided within ^ second ; and probably within a much larger 
fraction of a second, f 

But although the ear shews its superiority over other organs of the body in 
this respect, we cannot hesitate to assume that, like every other nervous apparatus, f 
the rapidity of its power of apprehension is limited, and we may even assume that 
we have approached very near the limit when we can but faintly distinguish 132 
beats in a second. 



♦[In the two high notes g"" f"% of the 
flageolet fifes (p. 158d, note), which if justly 
intoned should give 198 beats in a second, I 
could hear none, though the tones were veij 
powerful, and the scrMfn was yery catting 
indeed. — In the case of b" c"\ whicn on the 
Harmonical are tuned to make 1056 and 990, 
the rattle of the 66 beats, or thereabouts, is 
quite distinct, and the differential tone is very 
powerful at the same time. — Translaior,'] 

t [The following is an interesting compari- 
son between eye and ear, and eye and hand. 
The usual method of observing transits is by 
counting the pendulum ticks of an astronomi- 
cal clock, and by observing the distances of 
the apparent positions of a star before and after 
passing each bar of the transit instrument at 
the moments of ticking, to estimate the mo- 
ment at which it ha^ passed each bar. This is 
done for five be^rs and a mean is taken. But a 
few years ago a chronograph was introduced at 
Greenwich Observatory, consisting of a uni- 
formly revolving cylinder in which a point 
pricks a hole every second. Electrical com- 
mimication being established with a knob on 
the transit instrument, the observer presses 
the knob at the moment he sees a star dis- 



appear behind a bar, and an electrical current 
causes another point to make a hole between 
the seconds holes on the chronograph. By 
applying a scale, the time of transit is thus 
measured off. A mean, of course, is taken as 
before. On my asking Mr. Stone (now Astrono- 
mer at Oxford, then chief assistant at Green- 
wich Observatory) as to the relative degree of 
accuracy of the two methods, he told me that 
he considered the first gave results to one- 
tenth, and the second to one-twentieth of a 
second. It must be remembered that the first 
method also required a mental estimation 
which had to be performed in less than a 
second, and the result borne in mind, and that % 
this was avoided by the second plan. On the 
other hand in the latter the sensation had to 
be conveyed from the eye to the brain, which 
issued its orders to the hand, and the hand 
had to obey them. Hence there was an endea- 
vour at performing simultaneously, several 
acts which could only be successive. Any one 
will find upon trial that an attempt to merely 
make a mark at the moment of hearing an 
expected sound, as, for example, the repeated 
tick of a common half seconds clock, is liable 
to great error. — Translaior J] 



174 DEEP AND DEEPEST TONES. part n. 



CHAPTER IX. 

DBBP AND DBBPB8T TONBB. 

Beats give us an important means of determining the limit of the deepest tones, 
and of accounting for certain peculiarities of the transition from the sensation of 
separate pulses of air to a perfectly continuous musical tone, and to this inquiry 
we now proceed. 

The question : what is the smallest number of vibrations in a second which 
can produce the sensation of a musical tone ? has hitherto received very contra- 
dictory replies. The estimates of dififerent observers fluctuate between 8 (Savart) 

K and about 30. The contradiction is explained by the existence of certain difficul- 
ties in the experiments. 

In the first place it is necessary that the strength of the vibrations of the air 
for very deep tones should be extremely greater than for high tones, if they are to 
make as strong an impression on the ear. Several acousticians have occasionally 
started the hypothesis that, caeteris paribuSy the strength of tones of different 
heights is directly proportional to the vis viva of the motion of the air, or, which 
comes to the same thing, to the amount of the mechanical work applied for pro- 
ducing it. But a simple experiment with the siren shews that when equal amounts 
of mechanical work are applied to produce deep and high tones under conditions 
otherwise alike, the high tones excite a very much more powerful sensation than 
the deep ones. Thus, if the siren is blown by a bellows, which makes its disc 
revolve with increasing rapidity, and if we take care to keep up a perfectly 
uniform motion of the bellows by raising its handle by the same amount the same 

H number of times in a minute, so as to keep its bag equally filled, and drive the 
same amount of air under the same pressure through the siren in the same time, 
we hear at first, while the revolution is slow, a weak deep tone, which continually 
ascends, but at the same time gains strength at an extraordinary rate, till when the 
highest tones producible on my double siren (near to a", with 880 vibrations in a 
second) are reached, their strength is almost insupportable. In this case by far 
the greatest part of the uniform mechanical work is applied to the generation of 
sonorous motion, and only a small part can be lost by the friction of the revolving 
disc on its axial supports, and the air which it sets into a vortical motion at the 
same time ; and these losses must even be greater for the more rapid rotation than 
for the slower, so that for the production of the high tones less mechanical work 
remains applicable than for the deep ones, and yet the higher tones appear to our 
sensation extraordinarily more powerful than the deep ones. How far upwards 
this increase may extend, I have as yet been unable to determine, for the rapidity 
of my siren cannot be further increased with the same pressure of air. 

^ The increase of strength with height of tone is of especial consequence in the 
deepest part of the scale. It follows that in compound tones of great depth, the 
upper partial tones may be superior to the prime in strength, even though in 
musical tones of the same description, but of greater height, the strength of the 
prime greatly predominates. This is reckdily proved on my double siren, because 
by means of the beats it is easy to determine whether any partial tone which we 
hear is the prime, or the second or third partial tone of the compound under 
examination. For when the series of 12 holes are open in both windboxes, and 
the handle, which moves the upper windbox, is rotated once, we shall have, as 
already shewn, 4 beats for the primes, 8 for the second partials, and 12 for the 
third partials. Now we can make the disc revolve more slowly than usual, by 
allowing a well-oiled steel spring to rub against the edge of one disc with different 
degrees of pressure, and thus we can easily produce series of puffis which corre- 
spond to very deep tones, and then, turning the handle, we can count the beats. 



CHAP. ix. DEEP AND DEEPEST TONES. 175 

By allowing the rapidity of the revolution of the disos to increase gradually, we 
find that the first audible tones produced make 12 beats for each revolution of the 
handle, the number of puSs being from 36 to 40 in the second. For tones with 
from 40 to 80 puffs, each revolution of the handle gives 8 beats. In this case, 
then, the upper Octave of the prime is the strongest tone. It is not till we have 
80 pufib in a second that we hear the four beats of the primes. 

It is proved by these experiments that motions of the air, which do not take 
the form of pendular vibrations, can excite distinct and powerful sensations of tone, 
of which the pitch number is 2 or 3 times the number of the pulses of the air, 
and yet that the prime tone is not heard through them. Hence, when we continu- 
ally descend in the scale, the strength of our sensation decreases so rapidly that 
the sound of the prime tone, although its vis viva is independently greater than that 
of the upper partials, as is shewn in higher positions of a musical tone of the 
same composition, is overcome and concealed by its own upper partials. Even IT 
when the action of the compound tone on the ear is much reinforced, the effect 
« remains the same. In the experiments with the siren the uppermost plate of the 
bellows is violently agitated for the deep tones, and when I laid my head on it, my 
whole head was set into such powerful sympathetic vibration that the holes of the 
rotating disc, which vanish to an eye at rest, became again separately visible, 
through an optical action similar to that which takes place in stroboscopic discs. 
The row of holes in action appeared to stand still, the other rows seemed to move 
partly backwards and partly forwards, and yet the deepest tones were no more 
distinct than before. At another time I connected my ear by means of a properly 
introduced tube with an opening leading to the interior of the bellows. The 
agitation of the drumskin of the ear was so great that it produced an intolerable 
itching, and yet the deepest tones remained as indistinct as ever. 

In order, then, to discover the limit of deepest tones, it is necessary not only to 
produce very violent agitations in the air but to give these the form of simple f 
pendular vibrations. Until this lacit condition is fulfilled we cannot possibly say 
whether the deep tones we hear belong to the prime tone or to an upper partial tone 
of the motion of the air.* Among the instruments hitherto employed the wide- 
stopped organ pipes are the most suitable for this purpose. Their upper partial 
tones are at least extremely weak, if not quite absent. Here we find that even the 
lower tones of the 16-foot octave, C, to £^, begin to pass over into a droning noise, 
so that it becomes difficult for even a practised musical ear to assign their pitch with 
certainty ; and, indeed, they cannot be tuned by the ear alone, but only indirectly 
by means of the beats which they make with the tones of the upper octaves. We 
observe a similar effect on the same deep tones of a piano or harmonium ; they 
form drones and seem out of tune, although their musical character is on the 
whole better established than in the pipes, because of their accompanying upper 
partial tones. In music, as artistically applied in an orchestra, the deepest tone 
used is, therefore, the E„ of the [4-stringed Grerman] double bass, with 41^ vibra- f 
tions in a second [see p. 18o, note], and I think I may predict with certainty that all 
efforts of modem art applied to produce good musical tones of a lower pitch must 
fail, not because proper means of agitating the air cannot be discovered, but 
because the human ear cannot hear them. The 16-foot C, of the organ, with 
33 vibrations in a second, certainly gives a tolerably continuous sensation of 
drone, but does not allow us to give it a definite position in the musical scale. 
We almost begin to observe the separate pulses of air, notwithstanding the regular 
form of the motion. In the Upper half of the 32-foot octave, the perception of the 
separate pulses becomes still clearer, and the continuous part of the sensation, 

* Thus Savart's instrument, where a rota* tion, and consequently the upper partial tones 

ting rod strikes thxough a narrow slit, is totally must be very strongly developed, and the 

unsuitable for making the lowest tone audible, deepest tones, which are heard for 8 to 16 

The separate puffs of air are here veiy short in passages of the rod through the hole in a 

relation to the whole periodic time of the vibra- second, can be nothing but upper partials. 



176 



DEEP AND DEEPEST TONES. 



PAST n. 



which may be compared with a sensation of tone, continually weaker, and in the 
lower half of the 32-foot octave we can scarcely be said to hear anything bat the 
individual pulses, or if anything else is really heard, it can only be weak upper 
partial tones, from which the musical tones of stopped pipes are not quite free. 

I have tried to produce deep simple tones in another way. Strings which are 
weighted in their middle with a heavy piece of meta], on being struck give a com- 
pound tone consisting of many simple tones which are mutually inharmonic. The 
prime tone is separated from the nearest upper partials by an interval of several 
Octaves, and hence there is no danger of confusing it with any of them ; besides, 
the upper tones die away rapidly, but the deeper ones continue for a very long time. 
A string of this kind * was stretched on a sounding-box having a single opening 
which could be connected with the auditory passage, so that the air of the sounding- 
box could escape nowhere else but into the ear. The tones of a string of customary 
IT pitch are under these circumstances insupportably loud. But for D^, with 37i 
vibrations in a second, there was only a very weak sensation of tone, and even this 
was rather jarring, leading to the conclusion that the ear began even here to feel 
the separate pulses separately, notwithstanding their regularity. At B^,\f, with 
29^ vibrations in a second, there was scarcely anything audible left. It appears, 
then, that those nerve fibres which perceive such tones begin as early as at this 
note to be no longer excited with a uniform degree of strength during the whole 
time of a vibration, whether it be the phases of greatest velocity or the phases of 
greatest deviation from their mean position in the vibrating formations in the ear 
which effect the excitement, t 



* It was a thin brass pianoforte string. The 
weight was a copper kreutzer piece [pronounce 
kroitser; three kreutzers make a penny at 
Heidelberg, where the experiment was prob- 
ably tried], pierced in the middle by a hole 

U through which the wire passed, and then made 
to grip the wire immovablv by driving a steel 
point between the hole in tJae kreutzer and the 
string. 

t Subsequently I obtained two large tuning- 
forks from Herr Koenig in Paris, with sliding 
weights on their prongs. By altering the posi- 
tion of the weights, the pitch was changed, 
and the corresponding number of vibrations 
was given on a scale which runs along the 
prongs. One fork gave 24 to 36, the other 35 
to 61 vibrations. The sliding weight is a plate, 
5 centimetres [nearly 2 inches] in diameter, 
and forms a mirror. On bringing the ear close 
to these plates the deep tones are well heard. 
For 80 vibrations I could still hear a weak 
drone, for 28 scarcely a trace, although this 
arrangement made it easily possible to form 

^ oscillations of 9 millimetres [about | inch] in 
amplitude, quite close to the ear. Prof. W. 
Preyer has been thus able to hear down to 24 
vib. He has also applied another method 
{Physiologische Abhandlung0nt Physiological 
Treatises, Series 1, part 1, * On the limits of 
the perception of tone,' pp. 1-17) by using very 
deep, loaded tongues, in reed pipes, which were 
constructed for this purpose by Herr Appunn 
of Hanau, and gave from 8 to 40 vib. These 
were set into strong vibration by blowing, and 
then on interrupting the wind, the dying off 
of the vibrations was listened to by laying the 
ear against the box. He states that tones were 
heard downwards as low as 15 vib. But the 
proof that the tones heard corresponded with 
the primes of the pipes depends only on the 
fact, that the pitch gradually ascended as they 
passed over into the tones of from 25 to 32 vib., 
whicU W9re more audible, but died off more 



rapidly. With extensive vibrations, however, 
the tongues may have very easily given their 
point of attachment longitudinal impulses of 
double the frequency, because when they 
reached each extremity of their amplitude they 
might drive back the point of attachment 
through their flexion, whereas in the middle 
of the vibration they would draw it forward bj 
the centrifugal force of their weight. Since 
the power of distinguishing pitch for these 
deepest tones is extremely imperfect, I do not 
feel my doubts removed by the judgment of 
the ear when the estimates are not checked by 
the counting of beats. 

[This check I am fortunately able to supply. 
A copy of the instrument used by Prof. Preyer 
is in the South Kensington Museum. It con- 
sists of an oblong box, in the lower part of 
which akre the loaded harmonium reeds, not 
attached to pipes, but vibrating within the box, 
and governed by valves which can be opened 
at pleasure. On account of the beats between 
tongue and tongue taking place in strongly 
condensed air, they are accelerated, and the 
nominal pitch, obtained by counting the beats 
from reed to reed, is not quite the same 
as the actual pitch (see App. XX. sect. B. 
No. 6). The series of tones is supposed to 
proceed from 8 to 82 vib. by differences of 1 
vib., from 82 to 64 by differences of 2 vib., and 
from 64 to 128 by differences of 4 vibs. In 
November, 1879, for another purpose, I deter- 
mined the pitch of every reed by Scheibler's 
forks (see App. XX. sect. B. No. 7), by means 
of the upper partials of the reeds. For Beeds 
8, 9, 10, 11, I used from the 20th to the 80th 
partial, but I consider only Beed 11 as quite 
certain. I found it made 10*97 vib. by the 20th, 
and 10-95 by both the 21st and 24th partials. 
From Reed 11 upwards I determined eveiy 
pitch, in many cases by several partials, the 
result only differing in the second place of 
decimals. I give the two lowest Octaves, the 



GHAP. DC. 



DEEP AND DEEPEST TONES. 



177 



Henoe although tones of 24 to 28 vib. have been heard, notes do not begin to 
have a definite pitoh till about 40 vibrations are performed in a second. These 
facts will agree with the hypothesis concerning the elastic appendages to the audi- 
tory nerves, on remembering that the deeply intoned fibres of Gorti may be set in 
sympathetic vibration by still deeper tones, although with rapidly decreasing 
strength, so that sensation of tone, but no discrimination of pitch, is possible. If 
the most deeply intoned of Gorti's fibres lie at greater intervals from each other in 
the scale, but at the same time their damping power is so great that every tone 
which corresponds to the pitch of a fibre, also pretty strongly affects the neighbour- 
ing fibres, there will be no safe distinction of pitch in their vicinity, but it will 
proceed continuously without jumps, while the intensity of the sensation must at 
the same time become smalL 

Whilst simple tones in the upper half of the 16-foot octave are perfectly con- 
only pitohes of interest for the present par- close together) and the highest (which had a IT 
pose, premising that I consider the three lowest bad reed) to be veiy uncertain, 
pitches (for which the upper partials lay too 



Nominal 
Actual - 


8 
7*91 


9 
8*89 


10 
9*81 


11 
10*96 


12 
11*90 


18 
12*90 


14 
18*98 


15 
14*91 


16 
16*91 


Nominal 
Actual - 


17 
16*90 


18 
17-91 


19 
18-89 


20 
19*91 


21 
20*91 


22 
21*91 


28 
22*88 


24 
23*97 


26 

24-92 


Nominal 
Actual - 


26 
25*92 


27 
26*86 


28 
27*86 


29 
28*84 


80 
29*77 


81 
30-68 


82 
81*47. 







There can therefore be no question as to the 
real pitch. At Prof. Preyer's request I ex- 
amined this instrument in Oct. 1877, and he 
has printed my notes in his AkusUseha UnUr^ 
suchung&n, pp. 6-8. From these I extract the 
loUowing : — 

R means Beed, and R 21**25 means that the 
two reeds 21 and 25 were sounded together and 
gave beats. 

R 21-25, beat 4 in 1 sec., ooonted for 20 sec 
Hence both of their lowest partials must have 
been effectiva 

R 20*-24, beat 4 in 1 sec., ooonted for 10 sec. 

R 19-28, beat 4 in 1 lec, counted for 20 sec. 

R 17**21, same beats. 

R 16 "20, same beats quite distinctly. 

R 15-19, at flnt I lost the beats, but afterwards 
by getting R 15 well into actbn before R 19 wss 
set on, and keeping on pumping, I got out the 4 
in a second quite distinctly. Hence the lowest 
partial of R 15 was effectiye. 

R 15 "17, here also I once beard 4 in a sec., but 
this must haye been from the Octaves. 

R 14**16, I was quite unable to distinguish 
anything in the way of beats, but volleys like a 
Jeu dejoie about a second in length, but impossible 
to count accuratelv ; they may have been 2 in a 
sec and I oounteu double. At the same time I 
seemed occasibnallY to hear a low beat, so low and 
gentle that I could not count it, and the great 
exertion of pumping the bellows full enough to 
keep these two low reeds in action, prevented 
accurate observation. 

R 15 decidedly seemed flatter than R 18, so 
that I could have only heard the lowest partial 
of B 15 and the Octave of R 18. 

On sounding R 14 and R 15 separately, I 
seemed to hear firom each a very low tone, in 
quality more like a dilTerential tone than any- 
Umup else This could also be heard even with 
R 18 and R 12, below the thumps, and even in 
RU. 

At R 8 I heard only the sishing of the escape 
of wind from the reed, 8 times in a second, as 
well as I could count, and I also heard beats 
evidently arising ftrom the higher partials, and 
also 8 in a second. 

At R 9 there was the same kind of sishing and 
equally rapid beats. But in addition I seemed 
to hear a faint low tone. 



At R 10 there was no mistake as to the ezistenoe 
of such a musical tone. 

At R 11 and R 12 it was stiU more distinct 

At R 13 the tone was very distinct and was 
quite a good musical tone at R 14, but the sish 
was stilf audible Was this the lowest partial 
or its Octave t 

R 16 gave quite an organ tone, nothing like 
a hum or a dilTerential, but the sish and beats 
remain. I must have heard the lowest partial. ^ 
and by continual pumping I was able to Keep it 
in my ear. 

R 18**20 gave beats of 2 in a sec. very distinctly. 

Up to R 25 the sish could be heard at the 
commencement, but it rapidly disappeared. It 
feels as if the tone were getting gnulually into 
practice. This effect continued up to R 22, after 
which the sish was scarcely brought out at all. 
In fact long before this the sish was made only 
at the first moment, and was rather a bubble than 
a sish. 

In listening to the very tow beats, the beats of 
the lowest partials as such could not be separated 
from the general mass of beats, but the 4 in a sec. 
were quite dear from R 15"19. The lowest pair 
in which I was distinctly able to hear the bell-like 
beat of the lowest partialB distinct from the 

general crash was R 80 "84. But I fancied I 
eaid it at R 28**82. 

P9>f • Preyer also, in the same place, details ^ 
his experiments with two enormous tuning- 
forks giving 18-7 and 18*6 vib. The former 
gave no musical tone at all, though the vibra- 
tions were visible for 8 min. and were dis- 
tinctly separable by touch. The latter had 
' an unmistakable dull tone, without droning 
or jarring '. He concludes : ' Less than 15 
▼ib. in a sec. give no musical tone. At from 
16 to 24, say then 20 in the sec. the series of 
aerial impulses begins to dissolve into a tone, 
assuming that there are no pauses between 
them. Above 24 begins the musical character 
of these bass tones. Herr Appunn,' adds 
Prof. Preyer, * informed me that the differen- 
tial tone of 27*85 vib., generated by the two 
forks of 111*8 and 88*45 vib., was ** surprisingly 
beautiful " and had a " wondrous effect ".*— 
Translator.^ 

N 



178 DBEP AND DEEPEST TONES. pabt n. 

tinuous and musical, yet for aerial vibrations of a different form, for example when 
compound tones are used, discontinuous pulses of sound are still heard even within 
this octave. For example, blow the disc of the siren with gradually increasing 
speed. At first only pulses of air are heard ; but after reaching 36 vibrations in a 
second, weak tones sound with them, which, however, are at first upper partials. 
As the velocity increases the sensation of the tones becomes continually stronger, 
but it is a long time before we cease to perceive the discontinuous pulses of air, 
although these tend more and more to coalesce. It is not till we reach 110 or 11 7^ 
vibrations in a second {A or B\^ of the great octave) that the tone is tolerably con- 
tinuous. It is just the same on the harmonium, where, in the cor anglais stop, c 
with 132 vibrations in a second still jars a little, and in the bassoon stop we observe 
the same jarring even in c' with 264 vibrations in a second. Generally the same 
observation can be made on all cutting, snarling, or braying tones, which, as has 

H been already mentioned, are always provided with a very great number of distinct 
upper partial tones. 

The cause of this phenomenon must be looked for in the beats produced by the 
high upper partials of such compound tones, which are too nearly of the same pitch. 
If the 15th and 16th partials of a compound tone are still audible, they form the 
interval of a Semitone, and naturally produce the cutting beats of this dissonance. 
That it is really the beats of these tones which cause the roughness of the whole 
compound tone, can be easily felt by using a proper resonator. If G, is struck, 
having 49^ vibrations in a second, the 15th partial is fjj^, the 16th g", and the 
17th g"jt [nearly], &c. Now when I apply the resonator g'*, which reinforces g" 
most, and J"jj^, g"jj^ somewhat less, the roughness of the tone becomes extremely 
more prominent, and exactly resembles the piercing jar produced when f'jt and 
g" are themselves sounded. This experiment succeeds on the pianoforte, as well 
as on both stops of the harmonium. It also distinctly succeeds for higher pitches, 

H as far as the resonators reach. I possess a resonator for g"\ and although it only 
slightly reinforces the tone, the roughness of G, with 99 vibrations in a second, 
was distinctly increased when the resonator was applied.* 

Even the 8th and 9th partials of a compound tone, which are a whole Tone 
apart, cannot but produce beats, although they are not so cutting as those from the 
higher upper partials. But the reinforcement by resonators does not now succeed 
so well, because the deeper resonators at least are not capable of simultaneously 
reinforcing the tones which differ from each other by a whole Tone. For the 
higher resonators, where the reinforcement is slighter, the interval between the 
tones capable of being reinforced is greater, and thus by means of the resonators 
^" and g'" 1 succeeded in increasing the roughness of the tones C? to ^ (having 
99 and 198 vibrations in a second respectively), which is due to the 7th, 8th and 
9th partial tones (f', gr", a", and /", g'", a"' respectively). On comparing the 
tone of G as heard in the resonators with the tone of the dissonances /' g" 

^ and g" a" as struck directly, the ear felt their close resemblance, the rapidity of 
intermittence being nearly the same. 

Hence there can no longer be any doubt that motions of the air corresponding 
to deep musical tones compounded of numerous partials, are capable of exciting at 
one and the same time a continuous sensation of deep tones and a discontinuous 
sensation of high tones, and become rough or jarring through the latter, f Herein 
lies the explanation of the fact already observed in examining qualities of tone, 
that compound tones with many high upper partials are cutting, jarring, or bray- 
ing ; and also of the fact that they are more penetrating and cannot readily pass 
unobserved, for an intermittent impression excites our nervous apparatus much 
more powerfully than a continuous one, and continually forces itself afresh on our 

* [The student should now perform the ex- punn*s Reed pipes of 82 and 64 vib. in the South 

periments on the Harmonica! indicated on Kensington Museum. Their musical charaoter 

p. 22d, note.— Tratulaior,] is quite destroyed by the loud thumping of the 

t[Thi8 is particularly noticeable on Ap- upper partials. — Translaior.] 



CHAPS. IX. X. BEATS OF UPPER PARTIALS. 179 

perception.* On the other hand simple tones, or compound tones which have only 
a few of the lower upper partials, lying at wide intervals apart, must produce per- 
fectly continuous sensations in the ear, and make a soft and gentle impression, 
without much energy, even when they are in reality relatively strong. 

We have not yet been able to determine the upper limit of the number of inter- 
mittences perceptible in a second for high notes, and have only drawn attention to 
their becoming more difficult to perceive, and making a slighter impression, as they 
became more numerous. Hence even when the form of vibration, that is the 
quality of tone, remains the same, while the pitch is increased, the quality of tone 
will generally appear to diminish in roughness. The part of the scale adjacent to 
f'jL for which the ear is peculiarly sensitive, as I have already remarked (p. 116a), 
must be particularly important, as dissonant upper partials which lie in this neigh- 
bourhood cannot but be especially prominent. Nowf^jt is the 8th partial otfj^ 
with d66f vibrations in a second, a tone belonging to the upper tones of a man's f 
and the lower tones of a woman's voice, and it is the 16th partial of the unaccented 
fjt which lies in the middle of the usual compass of men's voices, f I have already 
mentioned that when human voices are strained these high notes are often heard 
sounding with them. When this takes place in the deeper tones of men's voices, 
it must produce cutting dissonances, and in fact, as I have already observed, when 
a powerful bass voice is trumpeting out its notes in full strength, the high upper 
partial tones in the four-times-accented octave are heard, in quivering tinkles 
(p. 116c). Hence jarring and braying are much more usual and more powerful in 
bass than in higher voices. For compound tones above fjt the dissonances of the - 
higher upper partials in the four-times-accented octave, are not so strong as those 
of a whole Tone, and as they occur at so great a height they can scarcely be 
distinct enough to be clearly sensible. 

In this way we can explain why high voices have in general a pleasanter tone, 
and why all singers, male and female, consequently strive to touch high notes. U 
Moreover in the upper parts of the scale slight errors of intonation produce many 
more beats than in the lower, so that the musical feeling for pitch, correctness, and 
beauty of intervals is much surer for high than low notes. 

According to the observations of Prof. W. Preyer the difference in the qualities 
of tone of tuning-forks and reeds entirely disappears when they reach a height of 
c ' 4224, doubtless for the reason he assigns, namely that the upper partials of the 
reeds fall in the seventh and eighth accented octave, which are scarcely audible. 



CHAPTER X. 

BBATS OF THE UPPEB PARTIAL TONES. 

u 

The beats hitherto considered, were produced by two simple tones, without any 
intervention of upper partial or combinational tones. 8uch beats could only arise 
when the two given tones made a comparatively small interval with each other. 
As soon as the interval increased even to a minor Third the beats became indistinct. 
Now it is well known that beats can also arise from two tones which make a much 
greater interval with each other, and we shall see hereafter that these beats play 
a principal part in settling the consonant intervals of our musical scales, and they 

• [In Prof. Tyndairs paper • On the Atmo- throwing the hems slightly out of unison ; but 

sphere as a Vehicle of Sound,* read before though the beats rendered the sound charac- 

tne Royal Society, Feb. 12, 1874, in trying the teristic, they did not seem to augment the 

distance at which intense sounds could be range'. — Translator.] 

heard at sea, he says {Philosophical Transae- f [On the compass of voices see App. XX. 

tions for 1874, vol. olxiv. p. 189), * The influence sect. N. No. 1.— Translator.] 
of •* beats" was tried on June 3 [1373] by 

N 2 



180 



BEATS OF UPPER PARTIALS. 



PART n. 



must consequently be closely examined. The beats heard when the two genera- 
ting tones are more than a minor Third apart in the scale, arise from upper partial 
and combinational tones.* When the compound tones have distinctly audible upper 
partials, the beats resulting from them are generally clearer and stronger than 
those due to the combinational tones, and it is much more easy to determine their 
source. Hence we begin the investigation of the beats occurring in wider intervals 
with those which arise from the presence of upper partial tones. It must not be 
forgotten, however, that beats of combinational tones are much more general than 
these, as they occur with all kinds of musical tones, both simple and compound, 
whereas of course those due to upper partial tones are only found when such partials 
are themselves distinct But since all tones which are useful for musical purposes 
are, with rare exceptions, richly endowed with powerful upper partial tones, the 
beats due to these upper partials are relatively of much greater practical importance 
^ than those due to the weak combinational tones. 

When two compound tones are soimded at the same time, it is readily seen, 
from what precedes, that beats may arise whenever any two upper partial tones lie 
sufficiently near to each other, or when the prime of one tone approaches to an upper 
partial of the other. The number of beats is of course, as before, the difference of 
the vibrational numbers of the two partial tones to which the beats are due. 
When this difference is small, and the beats are therefore slow, they are relatively 
most distinct to hear and to ooimt and to investigate, precisely as for beats of prime 
tones. They are also more distinct when the particular partial tones which gene- 
rate them are loudest. Now, for the tones most used in music, partials with a low 
ordinal number are loudest, because the intensity of partial tones usually diminishes 
as their ordinal number increases. 

Let us begin, then, with examples like the following, on an organ in its princi- 
pal or violin stops, -I* or upon an harmonium : 



Bia 



t 



H. 



3 



S 



i 



^Ef 



■&' -m- 



-rjr 



p 



The minims in these examples denote the prime tones of the notes^ struck, and 
the crotchets the corresponding upper partial tones. If the octave c in the first 
example is tuned accurately, no beats will be heard. But if the upper note is 
changed into B as in the second example, or d\f as in the third, we obtain the same 
beats as we should from the two tones Before d\^, where the interval is a Semitone. 
The number of beats (16-^ in a second) is the same in each case, but their intensity 
is naturally less in the former case, because they are somewhat smothered by the 
strong deep tone C, and also because c, the second partial of 0, has generally less 
force than its prima ^ 
^ In examples 4 and 5 beats will be heard on keyed instruments tuned according 
to the usual system of temperament If the tempered intonation is exact there will 
be one beat in a second, § because the note a" on the instrument does not exactly 



* [But as upper partial and oombinational 
tones are both simple, it is always simple tones 
which beat together, and the laws of Chap. 
VIII. therefore govern all beats. With a little 
practice the bell-like sound of the beating par- 
tials may be distinguished amid the coxif used 
beating of harsh reed tones. It only remains 
to determine when and how these extra beat- 
ing tones arise. — Translator,] 

t[See p. 98, notes * and §. On English 
organs the open diapason and keraulophon or 
gamba might be used. — Translator,] 

X [On the Harmonical, instead of vazying 
the Octave in C c by a Semitone up or down, 



we can slightly flatten the upper note, by just 
pressing it down enough to speak, when the 
beats will arise. Or by using the d and d. we 
can produce mistuned Octaves as D d^ or 1)| d. 
And for the Fifth in No. 4 and 6, we can use 
d' a' ' or d' a\ or take this mistuned Fifth lower, 
as d a' or d a, the true Fifth being d^ a, which 
may be contrasted with it. — Translator,] 

§ [Suppose d' has 297, then equallv tempered 
a ought to have 445 vibs. The third partial of 
d' has therefore 8 x 297 = 891 vib., and the 
Octave of a has 2 x 445 = 890 vib., and these 
two tones beat 891 -> 890= once in a second. — 
Translator.] 



^""^ ' - - ■ ' ■ _ ^ 



CHAP. X. BEATS OF UPPER PARTIALS. 181 

agree with the note a*\ which is the third partial tone of the note d*. On the other 
hand the note a" on the instrument exactly coincides with a'', the second partial 
tone of the note a' in the fifth example, so that on instruments exactly tuned in 
any temperament the two examples 4 and 5 should give the same number of beats. 
Since the first upper partial tone makes exactly twice as many vibrations in a 
second as its prime, the c on the instrument in Ex. 1, is identical with the first upper 
partial of the prime tone 0, provided c makes twice as many vibrations in a second 
as G. The two notes 0, c, cannot be struck together without producing beats, upless 
this exact relation is maintained. The least deviation from this exact relation is 
betrayed by beats. In the fourth example the beats will not cease till we tune a" 
on the instrument so as to coincide with the third partial tone of the note d, and 
this can only happen when the pitch number of a" is precisely three times that of 
d'. In the fifth example we have to make the pitch number of a! half as great as 
that of a", which is three times that of d' ; that is the pitch numbers of d* and a* H 
must be exactly as 2 : 3, or beats will ensue. Any deviation from this ratio will be 
detected at once by beats. 

Now we have already shewn that the pitch numbers of two tones which form 
an Octave are in the ratio 1 : 2, and those of two which form a Fifth in that of 2 : 3. 
These ratios were discovered long ago by merely following the judgment of the ear 
respecting the most pleasant concord of two tones. The circumstances just stated 
furnish the reason why these intervals when tuned according to these simple ratios 
of numbers, and in no other case, will produce an undisturbed concord, whereas 
very small deviations from this mathematical intonation will betray themselves by 
that restless fluctuation of tone known as beats. The d* and a' of the last example, 
if d* tuned as a perfect Fifth below a [that is as d^ on the Harmonical], make 293^ 
and 440 vibrations in a second respectively, and their common upper partial a" 
makes 3 x 293^ =» 2 x 440 » 880 vibrations in a second. In the tempered intonation 
d^ makes almost exactly 293§ vibrations in a second, and hence its second upper H 
partial (or third partial) tone makes 881 vib. in the same time, and this extremely 
small difference is betrayed to the ear by one beat in a second. That imperfect 
Octaves and Fifths will produce beats, was a fact long known to organ builders, 
who made use of it practically to obtain the required just or tempered intonation 
with greater ease and certainty. Indeed, there is no more sensitive means of 
proving the correctness of intervals. 

Two musical tones, therefore, which stand in the relation of a perfect Octave, 
a perfect Twelfth, or a perfect Fifth, go on sounding uniformly without disturbance, 
and are thus distinguished from the next adjacent intervals, imperfect Octaves and 
Fifths, for which a part of the tone breaks up into distinct pulses, and consequently the 
two tones do not continue to sound without interruption. For this reason the perfect 
Octave, Twelfth, and Fifth will be called consonant intervals in contradistinction to 
the next adjacent intervals, which are termed dissonant. Although these names 
were given long ago, long before anything was known about upper partial tones and U 
their beats, they give a very correct notion of the essential character of the pheno- 
menon which consists in the undisturbed or disturbed coexistence of sounds. 

Since the phenomena just described form the essential basis for the construction 
of normal musical intervals, it is advisable to establish them experimentally in every 
possible form. 

We have stated that the beats heard are the beats of those partial tones of both 
compounds which nearly coincide. Now it is not always very easy on hearing a 
Fifth or an Octave which is slightly out of tune, to recognise clearly with the un- 
assisted ear which part of the whole sound is beating. On listening we are apt 
to feel that the whole sound is alternately reinforced and weakened. Yet an ear 
accustomed to distinguish upper partial tones, after directing its attention on the 
common upper partials concerned, will easily hear the strong beats of these par- 
ticular ton^s, and recognise the continued and undisturbed sound of the primes. 
Strike the note d\ attend to its upper partial a", and then strike a tempered Fifth 



182 BEATS OF UPPER PARTIALS. pabt n. 

a! ; the beats of a" will be dearly heard. To an unpractised ear the resonators 
already described will be of great assistance. Apply the resonator for a!\ and the 
above beats will be heard with great distinctness. If, on the other hand, a resonator, 
tuned to one of the prime tones d! or a\ be employed, the beats are heard much less 
distinctly, because the continuous part of the tone is then reinforced. 

This last remark must not be taken to mean that no other simple tones beat in 
this combination except a". On the contrary, there are other higher and weaker 
upper partials, and also combinational tones which beat, as we shall learn in the 
next chapter, and these beats coexist with those already described. But the beats 
of t^e lowest common upper partials are the most prominent, simply because these 
beats are the loudest and slowest of all. 

Secondly, a direct experimental proof is desirable that the numerical ratios here 
deduced from the pitch numbers are really those which give no beats. This proof 

f is most easily given by means of the double siren (fig. 56, p. 162). Set the discs 
in revolution and open the series of 8 holes on the lower and 16 on the upper, thus 
obtaining two compound tones which form an Octave. They continue to sound 
without beats as long as the upper box is stationary. But directly we begin to 
revolve the upper box, thus slightly sharpening or flattening the tone of the upper 
disc, beats are heard. As long as the box was stationary, the ratio of the pitch 
numbers was exactly 1 : 2, because exactly 8 pulses of air escaped on one rotation 
of the lower, and 16 on one rotation of the upper disc. By diminishing the speed 
of rotation of the handle this ratio may be altered as slightly as we please, but how- 
ever slowly we turn it, if it move at all, the beats are heard, which shews that the 
interval is mistuned. 

Similarly with the Fifth. Open the series of 12 holes above, and 18 below, and 
a perfectly unbroken Fifth will be heard as long as the upper windbox is at rest. 
The ratio of the vibrational numbers, fixed by the holes of the two series, is exactly 

If 2 to 3. On rotating the windchest, beats are heard. We have seen that each 
revolution of the handle increases or diminishes the number of vibrations of the 
tone due to the 12 holes by 4 (p. 164c). When we have the tone of 12 holes on the 
lower discs also, we thus obtain 4 beats. But with the Fifth from 12 and 18 holes 
each revolution of the handle gives 12 beats, because the pitch number of the 
third partial tone increases on each revolution of the handle by 3 x 4 = 12, when 
that of the prime tone increases by 4, and we are now concerned with the beats 
of this partial tone. 

In these investigations the siren has the great advantage over all other musical 
instruments, of having its intervals tuned according to their simple numerical rela- 
tions with mechanical certainty by the method of constructing the instrument, and 
we are consequently relieved from the extremely laborious and difficult measure- 
ments of the pitch numbers which would have to precede the proof of our law on 
any other musical instrument. Yet the law had been already established by such 

f[ measurements, and the ratios were shewn to approximate more and more closely to 
those of the simple numbers, as the degree of perfection increased, to which the 
methods of measuring numbers of vibrations and tuning perfectly had been brought. 
Just as the coincidences of the two first upper partial tones led us to the natural 
consonances of the Octave and Fifth, the coincidences of higher upper partials 
would lead us to a further series of natural consonances. But it must be remarked 
that in the same proportion that these higher upper partials become weaker, the 
less perceptible become the beats by which the imperfect are distinguished from 
the perfect intervals, and the error of tuning is shewn. Hence the delimitation of 
those intervals which depend upon coincidences of the higher upper partials be- 
comes continually more indistinct and indeterminate as the upper partials involved 
are higher in order. In the following table the first horizontal line and first ver- 
tical column contain the ordinal numbers of the coincident upper partial tones, 
and at their intersection will be found the name of the corresponding interval 
between the prime tones, and the ratio of the vibrational numbers of the tones 



CHAP. X. 



BEATS OF UPPER PARTIALS. 



183 



oomposing it. This numerical ratio always results from the ordinal numbers of 
the two coincident upper partial tones. 



Gbinddent 
Partial Tones 


1 


2 


3 


4 


5 




6 


2 Ootaves and 
Fifth 
1 : 6 


Twelfth 
1 : 8 


Octave 
1 ; 2 


Fifth 
2 : 3 


Minor 
Third 
6 : 6 


5 


2 Octaves and 

Major Third 

1 : 5 


Major 

Tenth 

2 : 5 


Major 
Sixth 
8 : 6 


Major 

Third 

4 : 5 




* { 


Double Octave 
1 : 4 


Octave 
1 : 2 


Fourth 
3 : 4 






8 { 


Twelfth 
1 : 8 


Fifth 
2 : 3 








2 -1 


Octave 
1 : 2 











The two lowest lines of this table contain the intervals already considered, the 
Octave, Twelfth, and Fifth. In the third line from the bottom the 4th partial 
gives the intervals of the Fourth and double Octave. The 5th partial determines 
the major Third, either simple or increased by one or two Octaves, and the major 
8ixth. The 6th partial introduces the minor Third in addition. Here I have 
stopped, because the 7th partial tone is entirely eliminated, or at least much 
weakened, on instruments such as the piano, where the quality of tone can be 
regulated within certain limits.* Even the 6th partial is generally very weak, but 
an endeavour is made to favour all the partials up to the 5th. We shall return 
hereafter to the intervals characterised by the 7th partial, and to the minor Sixth, 
which is determined by the 8th. The following is the order of the consonant f 
intervals beginning with those distinctly characterised, and then proceeding to 
those which have their limits somewhat blurred, so to speak, by the weaker beats 
of the higher upper partial tones : — 

1. Octave ....... 1 



2. Twelfth 

3. Fifth . 

4. Fourth 

5. Major Sixth 

6. Major Third 

7. Minor Third 



1 
2 
3 
3 
4 
5 



2 
3 
3 
4 
5 
5 
6 



The following examples in musical notation shew the coincidences of the upper 
partials. The primes are as before represented by minims, and the upper partials 
by crotchets. The series of upper partials is continued up to the common tone ^ 
only. 



pj _J_i_i__: ggji 




Fifth. 
2 : 3 



Fourth. Maj. Sixth. Maj. Third. Min. Third. 
8:4 3:5 4:5 5:6 



We have hitherto confined our attention to beats arising from intervals which 
differ but slightly from those of perfect consonances. When the difference is 



[But see Mr. Hipkins* remarks and experiments, supra, p. 77c, note. — TranslaU)r,'\ 



184 



BEATS OF UPPER PABTIALS. 



PART II. 



small the beats are slow, aod henoe easy both to observe and oount. Of ooarse 
beats continue to ooour when the deviation of the two ooinoident upper partials 
increases. But as the beats then become more numerous the overwhelming mass 
of sound of the louder primes conceals their real character more easily than the 
quicker beats of dissonant primes themselves. These more rapid beats give a 
rough effect to the whole mass of sound, but the ear does not readily recognise its 
cause, unless the experiments have been conducted by gradually increasing the 
imperfection of an harmonic interval, so as to make the beats gradually more and 
more rapid, thus leading the observer to mark the intermediate steps between the 
numerable rapid beats on the one hand, and the roughness of a dissonance on 
the other, and hence to convince himself that the two phenomena differ only in 
degree. 

In the experiments with pairs of simple tones we saw that the distinctness and 
If roughness of their beats depended partly on the magnitude of the interval between 
the beating tones, and partly upon the rapidity of the beats themselves, so that for 
high tones this increasing rapidity injured the distinctness of even the beats arising 
from small intervals, and obliterated them in sensation. At present, as we have 
to deal with beats of upper partials, which, when their primes lie in the middle 
region, principally belong to the higher parts of the scale, the rapidity of the beats 
has a preponderating influence on the distinctness of their definition. 

The law determining the number of beats in a second for a given imperfection 
in a consonant interval, results immediately from the law above assigned for the 
beats of simple tones. When two simple tones, making a small interval, generate 
beats, the number of beats in a second is the difference of their vibrational numbers. 
Let us suppose, by way of example, that a certain primiB tone has the pitch number 
300. The pitch numbers of the primes which make consonant intervals with it, 

will be as follows : — 

H 



Prime Tone s 800 


Upper Octave = 600 
„ Fifth = 450 
„ Fourth s 400 
„ Major 8ixth » 600 
„ Major Third = 875 
„ Minor Third » 860 


Lower Octave » 150 
„ Fifth » 200 
„ Fourth = 225 
„ Major Sixth == 180 
„ Major Third » 240 
„ Minor Third » 250 



Now assume that the prime tone has been put out of time by one vibration in 
a second, so that its pitch number becomes 301, then calculating the vibrational 
number of the coincident upper partial tones, and taking their difference, we find 
the number of beats thus : — 



H 



Interval upwards 


Beating Partial Tones 


Number of 
Beats 


Prime 

Octave 

Fifth 

Fourth 

Major Sbrtih . . . . 

Major Third . . 

Minor Third . . . . 


1 X 800 =» 300 
1 X 600» 600 

3 X 450 » 900 
8 X 400 :^ 1200 
8 X 500 = 1500 

4 X 875 « 1500 

5 X 860 = 1800 


1 X 801 » 801 

2 X 801 =» 602 
8 X 801 » 908 

4 X 801 = 1204 

5 X 801 = 1505 

5 X 801 = 1505 

6 X 801 = 1806 


1 
2 
8 
4 
5 
5 
6 



Interval downwards 


Beating Partial Tones 


Number of 
Beats 


Prime 
Octave . 
Fifth . 
Fourth . 
Major Sixth , 
Major Third . 
Minor Third . 








1 X 800» 800 

2 X 150 = 800 
8 X 200 = 600 

4 X 225 = 900 

5 X 180 = 900 

5 X 240 =:= 1200 

6 X 250 = 1500 


1 X 801 = 301 

1 X 801 = 301 

2 X 301 = 602 

3 X 801 = 903 

3 X 301 = 903 

4 X 801 = 1204 

5 X 801 r:^ 1505 


1 
1 
2 
3 
3 
4 
5 



CHAP. X. 



BEATS OF UPPER PARTIALS. 



186 



Hence the number of beats which arise from putting one of the generating 
tones out of tune to the amount of one vibration in a second, is always given by 
the two numbers which define the interval. The smaller number gives the number 
of beats which arise from increasing the pitch number of the upper tone by 1. 
The larger number gives the number of beats which arise from increasing the 
pitch number of the lower tone by 1. Hence if we take the major Sixth c a, 
having the ratio 3 : 5, and sharpen a so as to make one additional vibration in a 
seoond, we shall have 3 beats in a second ; but if we sharpen c so as to make one 
more vibration in a second, we obtain 5 beats in a second and so on. 

Our calculation and the rule based on it shew that if the amount by which one 
of the tones is put out of tune remains constant, the number of the beats increases 
according as the interval is expressed in larger numbers. Hence for Sixths and 
Thirds the pitch numbers of the tones must be much more nearly in the normal 
ratio, if we wish to avoid slow beats, than for Octaves and Unisons. On the other IT 
hand a slight imperfection in the tuning of Thirds brings us much sooner to the 
limit where the beats become too rapid to be distinctly separable. If we change 
the Unison c" c'\ by flattening one of the tones, into the Semitone b' c", on 
sounding the notes together there results a clear dissonance of 33 beats, the 
number which, as before observed, seems to give the maximum of harshness. 
But to obtain 33 beats from fifth /' c", it is only necessary to alter c" by a quarter 
of a Tone. If it is changed by a Semitone, so that / c" becomes/' b\ there result 
66 beats, and their clearness is already much injured. To obtain 33 beats the &' 
must not be changed in the Fifth c" g" by more than one-sixth of a Tone, in the 
Fourth c"/" by more than one-eighth, in the major Third c" e" and major Sixth 
c" a" by more than one-tenth, and in the minor Third c" e"b ^J naore than one- 
twelfth. Conversely, if in each of these intervals the pitch number of c" be 
altered by 33, so that c" becomes V or d'% we obtain the following numbers of 
beats : — T 



The interval of the 


becomes 


or 


and gives beats 


Octavo . . . . c'V 
Fifth .... c"p" 
Fourth . . . . c"/' 
Major Third . . . c"«" 
Minor Third . . . c"«"t 


b'&" 
h'g" 
h'f 


d" 
d" 
d" 
d" 


be- 

y^"\> 


66 

99 

182 

165 

198 



Now since 99 beats in a second produce very weak effects even under favourable 
circumstances for simple tones, and 132 beats in a second seem to lie at the limit 
of audibility, we must not be surprised if such numbers of beats, produced by the 
weaker upper partials, and smothered by the more powerful prime tones, no longer 
produce any sensible effect, and in fact vanish so far as the ear is concerned. Now 
this relation is of great importance in the practice of music, for in the table it will H 
be seen that the mistuned Fifth gives the interval 6' ^", which is much used as an 
imperfect consonance under the name of minor Sixth, In the same way we find 
the major Third d"\}f" as a mistuned Fourth, and the Fourth b' e" as a mistuned 
major Third, and so on. That, at least in this part of the scale, the major Third 
does not produce the beats of a mistuned Fourth, or the Fourth those of a mis- 
tuned major Third, is explained by the great number of beats. In point of fact 
these intervals in this part of the scale give a perfectly uninterrupted sound, with- 
out a trace of beats or harshness, when they are tuned perfectly. 

This brings us to the investigation of those circumstances which affect the 
perfection of the consonance for the different intervals. A consonance has been 
characterised by the coincidence of two of the upper partial tones of the compounds 
forming the chord. When this is the case the two compound tones cannot gener- 
ate any slow beats. But it is possible that some other two upper partial tones of 
these two compounds may be so nearly of the same pitch that they can generate 



186 



DEGREE OP HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



PABT n. 



rapid beats. Cases of this kind ooour in the last examples in musical notation 
(p. 183(2). Among the upper partials of the major Third FA occur/ and e\ side 
by side ; and among those of the minor Third FA\^ will be found a* and a% In 
each case there is the dissonance of a Semitone, and these must produce the same 
beats as if they had been given directly as simple prime tones. Now although 
such beats can produce no very prominent impression, partly on account of their 
rapidity, partly on account of the weakness of the tones which generate them, and 
partly because the primes and other partial tones are sounding on at the same time 
unintermittently, yet they cannot but exert some efifect on the harmoniousness of 
the interval. In the last chapter we found that in certain qualities of tone, where 
the higher upper partials are strongly developed, sensible dissonances may arise 
within a single compound tone (p. 1785). When two such musical tones are 
sounded together, there will be not only the dissonances resulting from the higher 
II upper partial tones in each individual compound, but also those which arise from 
a partial tone of the one forming a dissonance with a partial tone of the other, and 
in this way there must be a certam increase in roughness. 

An easy method of finding those upper partials in each consonant interval 
which form dissonances with each other, may be deduced from what has been already 
stated concerning larger imperfections in tuning consonant intervals (p. 185c, d). 
We thus found that the major Third might be considered as a mistuned Fourth, 
and the Fourth again as a mistuned Third. On raising the pitch of a compound 
tone by a Semitone, we raise the pitch of all its upper partial tones by the same 
amount. Those upper partials which coincide for the interval of a Fourth, sepa- 
rate by a Semitone when by altering the pitch of one generating tone we con- 
vert the Fourth into a major Third, and similarly those which coincide for the 
major Third differ by a Semitone for the Fourth, as will appear in the following 
example : — 




Fourth. 



-P i P- i 

Major Third. Minor Third. 



The 4th and drd partial in the Fourth of the first example coincide as/\ But 
if the Fourth B\} sinks, as in the second example, to the major Third Aj its 3rd 
partial/ sinks also to e\ and forms a dissonance with the 4th partial/ of F, which 
was unaltered. On the other hand the 5th and 4th tone of the two compounds, 
which in the first example formed the dissonance a* b'\^ now coincide as a\ In 
H the same way the consonant unison a'a' of the second example appears as the dis- 
sonance a' a*\f in the third, and the dissonance c" c" 4 in the second becomes the 
eonsonant unison c" c*' in the third. 

Hence in each consonant interval those upper partials form a dissonance, which 
coincide in one of the adjacent consonant intervals,* and in this sense we can say, 
that every consonance is disturbed by the proximity of the consonances next 
adjoining it in the scale, and that the resulting disturbance is the greater, the 



*[That is, in intervals which differ from 
the first by raising or depressing one of its tones 
by a Semitone (either |f or )f ), as in the table 
on p. 185c, or even a Tone (|). Thus for the 
Fifth, t X if = I a minor Sixth ; and f x | = | a 
Fourth. For the Fourth, f x |j| ==: j a major 
Third ; and * x g = ^ a Fifth. For the major 
Third | x U = I » Fourth ; and J x || = |^ a 
minor Third. For the minor Third f x |f = ^ a 



major Third, and f x ^ | == f a major Tone. 
The adjacency of the consonant intervals is 
best shewn in fig. 60, A (p. 198), where it 
appears that the order may be taken as : 1) 
Unison, 2) minor Third, 3) major Third, 
4) Fourth, 5) Fifth, 6) minor Sixth, 7) major 
Sixth, 8) Octave. In the table on p. 1876, 
other intervals, not perfectly consonant, are 
intercalated among these. — Translator,^ 



OHAP. X. 



DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



187 



lower and louder the upper partials which by their coincidence characterise the 
disturbing interval, or, in other words, the smsJler the number which expresses the 
ratio of the pitch numbers. 

The following table gives a general view of this influence of the different con- 
sonances on each other. The partials are given up to the 9th inclusive, and cor- 
responding names assigned to the intervals arising from the coincidence of the 
higher upper partial tones. The third column contains the ratios of their pitch 
numbers, which at the same time furnish the number of the order of the coincident 
partial tones. The fourth column gives the distance of the separate intervals from 
each other, and the last a measure of the relative strength of the beats resulting 
from the mistuning of the corresponding interval, reckoned for the qusJity of tone 
of the violin.* The degree to which any interval disturbs the adjacent intervals, 
increases with this last number, f 



Intervals 




Ratio of the 


Relative 


Cents in the 


Difference 


Intensity 


Notation 


Pitch Numbers 


Distance 


Intervals 


of Cents 


oflnflnence 
1000 


Unison 


C 


1: 1 


«^>_ 





_^ 








8:9 




204 




Second 


D 


8: 9 


63:64 


204 


27 


1*4 


Supersecond 


D + 


7:8 


48:49 


231 


36 


1-8 


Sabminor Third 


^b- 


6:7 


85:86 


267 


49 


2-4 


Minor Third 


^b 


5:6 


24:25 


816 


70 


3-3 


Major Third 


E 


4:5 


85:86 


386 


49 


5-0 


Supermajor Third 


^ + 


7:9 


27 :28 


485 


63 


1-6 


Fourth 


F 


3:4 


20:21 


498 


85 


8-3 


Subminor Fifth 


o\>- 


5:7 


14:15 


583 


119 


2-8 


Fifth. 


Q 


2: 8 


15:16 


702 


112 


16-7 


Minor Sixth 


^b 


5:8 


24 :25 


814 


70 


2-5 


Major Sixth 


A 


3:5 


— 


884 




6-7 


* 






20:21 




85 




Snbminor Seventh . 


B\>' 


4:7 


85:86 


969 


49 


8-6 


Minor Seventh . 


Bh 


5:9 


9:10 


1018 


182 


2-2 


Octave 


c 


1:2 




1200 




50-0 



II 



The most perfect chord is the Unison, for which both compound tones have the 
same pitch. All its partial tones coincide, and hence no dissonance can occur 
except such as is contained in each compound separately (p. 1786). f 

It is much the same with the Octave, All the partisJ tones of the higher note 
of this interval coincide with the evenly numbered partials of the deeper, and re- 
inforce them, so that in this case also there can be no dissonance between two upper 
partial tones, except such as already exists, in a weaker form, among those of the 
deeper note. A note accompanied by its Octave consequently becomes brighter 
in quality, because the higher upper partial tones on which brightness of qusJity 
depends, are partly reinforced by the additional Octave. But a similar efifect would 
also be produced by simply increasing the intensity of the lower note vnthout add- 
ing the Octave ; the only difiference would be, that in the latter case the reinforce- 
ment of the different partial tones would be somewhat differently distributed. 

The same holds for the Twelfth and double Octave, and generally for all those 

* See Appendix XV. intervals between adjacent notes. See also 

t[Two columns have been added, shewing App. XX. sect. D. — Translator.] 
the cents in the intervals named, and in the 



188 



DEGREE OF HARMOMOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



PART n. 



cases in which the prime tone of the higher note coincides with one of the partial 
tones of the lower note, although as the interval between the two notes increases 
the difiference between consonance and dissonance tends towards obliteration. 

The cases hitherto considered, where the prime of one compound tone coincides 
with one of the partials of the other, may be termed absolute consonances. The 
second compound tone introduces no new element, but merely reinforces a part of 
the other. 

Unison and Octave disturb the next adjacent intervals considerably, in the sense 
assigned to this expression on p. 186d, so that the minor Second C i)|^ and the 
major Seventh C B, which differ from the Unison and Octave by a Semitone 
respectively, are the harshest dissonances in our scale. Even the major Second 
C Dy and the minor Seventh G B\^ which are a whole Tone apart from the dis- 
turbing intervals, must be reckoned as dissonances, although, owing to the greater 
U interval of the dissoncmt partial tones, they are much milder than the others. In 
the higher regions of the >scale their roughness is materially lessened by the 
increased rapidity of the beats. Since the dissonance of the minor Seventh is due 
to the second partial tone, which in most musical qualities of tone is much weaker 
than the prime, it is still milder than that of the major Second, and hence lies on 
the very boundary between dissonance and consonance. 

To find additional good consoncmces we must consequently go to the middle of 
the Octave, and the first we meet is the Fifth, Immediately next to it within the 
interval of a Semitone there are only the intervals 5 : 7 and 5 : 8 in our table, and 
these cannot much disturb it, because in all the better kinds of musical tones the 
7th and 8th partials are either very weak or entirely absent. The next intervals 
with stronger upper partials are the Fourth 3 : 4 and the major Sixth 3 : 5. But 
here the interval is a whole Tone, and if the tones 1 and 2 of the interval of the 
Octave could produce very little disturbing effect in the minor Seventh, the dis- 
f turbance by the tones 2 and 3, or by the vicinity of the Fifth to the Fourth and 
major Sixth must be insignificant, and the reaction of these two intervals with the 
tones 3 and 4 or 3 and 5 on the Fifth must be entirely neglected. Hence the Fifth 
remains a perfect consonance, in which there is no sensible disturbance of closely 
adjacent upper partial tones. It is only in harsh qualities of tone (harmonium, 
double-bass, violoncello, reed organ pipes) with high upper partial tones, and deep 
primes, when the number of beats is small, that we remark that the Fifth is some- 
what rougher than the Octave.* Hence the Fifth has been acknowledged as a 
consonance from the earliest times and by all musicians. On the other hand the 
intervals next adjacent to the Fifth are those which produce the harshest disso- 
nances after those next adjacent to the Octave. Of the dissonant intervals next 

* [The above disouaeion may be rendered numbers of the two prime tones which form 

easier by the following considerations, which the Fifth to be 2 and 8, and find those of their 

the student should illustrate or hear illus- upper partials thus, assuming C G to be the 

5[ trated on the Harmonical. Take the pitch two notes. 



No6. of the Partials 
Partials of lower note . 


1 2 

2 4 


8 
6 


4 6 

8 10 


6 
12 


7 8 
14 16 


Lower note ... 
Fifth or 2 : 8, upper note 


C c 
Q 


9 
9 


c' e' 
d' 


9' 
9' 


6'b c" 
h' 



Partials of upper note 
Nos. of the Partials 



8 
1 



9 
8 



12 
4 



15 
6 



We see that the principal beating tones 
are 14 and 16, or h')^ h\ the 7th partial of the 
lower and 6th of the upper; and 16 and 16, 
or h' c'\ the 6th of the upper and 8th of the 
lower note, and that these beats are unimpor- 
tant because the 7th and 8th partials are 
generally weak ; but if they are strong these 
beats being those of a Semitone and of nearly 
a Semitone, are very harsh. On the Har- 
monical it will be found that the 12th G g is 
faultless, but the 6th C G is decidedly harsh. 



The next beating partial tones are 8 and 9, or 
c' d\ the 4th partial of the lower and Srd of 
the upper note, and these being a whole Tone 
apart, the beats are not of importance even 
when strong, and with weak upper partials 
are insignificant. Similarly for the beats of 
9 and 10, or d' b\ the Srd partial of the upper 
and 5th of the lower note. On referring to the 
text it will be seen that the same intervals 
are there compared and in the same order as 
here.— TrantUUor,] 



OHAP. X. DEGREE OF HARMOKIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



189 



the Fifth, those in whioh the Fifth is flattened, that is which he between the Fifth 
and Fourth, and are disturbed firstly by the tones 2 and 3, and secondly by the 
tones 3 and 4, are more decidedly dissonant than those in which the Fifth is 
sharpened and which lie between the Fifth and major Sixth, because for the latter 
the second disturbance arises from the tone 3 and the weaker tone 5.* The 
intervals between the Fifth and Fourth are consequently always considered dis- 
sonant in musical practice. But between the Fifth and major Sixth lies the 
interval of the mifwr Sixth, which is treated as an imperfect consonance, and owes 
this preference mainly to its being the inversion of the major Third. On keyed 
instruments, as the piano, the same keys will strike notes which at one time 
represent the consonance C A\^, and at another the dissonance C G^f 

Next to the Fifth follow the consonances of the Fourth 3 : 4 and the major 
Sixths the chief disturbance of which arises usually from the Fifth. The Fourth 
is somewhat further from the Fifth (the interval is 8 : 9) than the major Sixth isl 
(the interval is 9 : 10), and hence the major Sixth is a less perfect consonance 
than the Fourth. But dose by the Fourth lies the major Third with the 4th and 
dth partials coincident, and hence when these partials are strongly developed, the 
Fourth may lose its advantage over the major Sixth. It is also well known that 
the old theoretical musicians long disputed as to whether the Fourth should be 
considered consonant or dissonant. The precedence given to the Fourth over the 
major Sixth and major Third, is rather due to its being the inversion of the Fifth 
than to its own inherent harmoniousness. The Fourth, the major Sixth and 
minor Sixth; are rendered less pleasant by being widened by an Octave (thus 
becoming the Eleventh, and major and minor Thirteenth), because they then lie 
near the Twelfth, and consequently the disturbance by the characteristic tones of 
the Twelfth 1 and 3, is greater, and hence also the adjacent intervals 2 : 5 for the 
Eleventh, and 2 : 7 for the Thirteenth, are more disturbing than are the 4 : 5 for 
the Fourth and the 4 : 7 for the Sixth in the lower Octave. { H 



* [Takiiig the scheme in the last note, and snpposing G to be altered first to (?|^ and then 
to ^1^, we may write the seveial schemes thus: 



No. of Partials of lower note 



8 



6 



8 



Lower Note 



Fifth ot2\^\ 

Flattened j- forms of the upper note •[ Q)^ 

Sharpened J I ii^ 



{ 



G 



9 


C 4f 


ff 6'b «" 


9 


d' 


it *' 


0b 


d'y 


f} 6'b 

a 1^ c 


at, 


•'b 



No. of Partials of upper note • 

If the Q^ were made sufficiently flat, we 
should have its 5th partial 6' j^ coinciding with 
the 7th partial of C, which, however, is never 
felt as a consonance, and the interval then 
becomes 5 : 7. This, however, never occurs 
in musical practice, where the h'^ from 0[> is 
always sharper than that from C, but this 
dissonance is not felt, the g^ g or tones 2 of the 
upper and 3 of the lower note, and c' <2'|^ or 
tones 3 of the upper and 4 of the lower note, 
producing the onief disturbance. If il|^ is 
taken sufficiently sharp for its 6th partial c" 
to coincide with the eighth of C we have the 
interval 6 : 8 or minor Sixth. Here again we 
have the disturbance from o^ g the tones 2 of 
the upper and 8 of the lower note, but the 
Moona disturbance is now from t*^ e' or tones 



8 



4 



8 of the upper and 6 of the lower note, instead 
of from d')f c' or tones 3 of the upper and 4 of 
the lower note, and as the tone 6 is weaker 
the disturbance on the whole is weaker. This 
is the case in musical practice. — TranaUUorJ] 

t[ThiB is the result of equal temperament, 
in which A^}^ which is 814 cents aoove C, is 
confounded with OJj^ which is only 772 cents ^ 
above O, a .diflerence of 42 cents. The in- 
terval c' a^'jf can be played on the Harmonical 
and at that pitch will be found good. The 
interval a^}y t\ which is the same as that of 
e' g'aS, but a major Third lower, will be found 
very harsh. — Translator.] 

^[Treating these intervals as in the pre- 
ceding notes we have : 



No. of Partials . 
Tjower note 
Fourth oiS :4k . 
No. of Partials . 


.12 8 
. C e g 

. F f 
1 2 


4 

d 
8 


6 6 7 
4 5 


8 

c" 
6 


No. of Partials . 
Lower note 
Eleventh or S:B 
No. of Partials . 


.12 8 
. C c g 


4 


6 6 7 
d g^ fe'b 

2 


8 
c" 
c" 
8 



190 



DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



PAET n. 



Next in the order of the consonances come the major and minor Third. The 
latter is very imperfectly delimited on instruments which, like the pianoforte, do 
not strongly develop the 6th partial of the compound tone, because it can then be 
imperfectly tuned without producing sensible beats. ''^ The minor Third is sensibly 
exposed to disturbance from the Unison, and the major Third from the Fourth ; 
and both mutually disturb each other, the minor Third coming off worse than the 
major, f For the harmoniousness of either interval it is necessary that the disturb- 
ing beats should be very rapid. Hence in the upper part of the scale these intervals 
are pure and good, but in the lower part they are very rough. All antiquity, there- 
fore, refused to accept Thirds as consonances. It was not till the time of Franco 
of Cologne (at the end of the twelfth century) that they were admitted as imperfect 
consonances. The reason of this may probably be that musical theory was developed 
among classical nations and in medieval times principally in respect to men's 
% voices, and in the lower part of this scale Thirds are far from good. With this we 
must connect the fact that the proper intonation of major Thirds was not dis- 
covered in early times, and that the Pythagorean Thirds with its ratio of 64 : 81, 
was looked upon as the normal form till towards the close of the middle ages.^ 



H 



No. of P&rtials . 
Lower note 
Major Sixth or 8 : 5 . 
No. of Partials . 


• 


1 2 

C e 
A 
1 


3 
9 


4 

a 
2 


5 

e' 
e' 
3 


6 7 

a' 
4 


8 
c" 




No. of Partials . 
Lower note 

Mqjor Thirteenth or 8 : 
No. of P&rtials . 


10 ! 


. 1 2 
. C c 


8 
9 


4 

a 

1 


5 


6 7 

9^ ,6'b 
a 

2 


8 9 


10 

d' 
8 


No. of Partials . 
Lower note 
Minor Sixth or 5 : 8 . 
No. of Partials . 


, 1 2 
C c 

, A\, 

1 


3 
9 


4 

& 

«b «'b 

2. 3 


5 


6 7 

g' 6'b 

4 


8 
d' 

5 




No. of Partials . 
Lower note 
Minor Thirteenth or 5 : 
No. of Partials . 


16, 


.12 3 
. C c g 
a 
1 


4 

b 


5 6 

a' 
2 


7 
} 


8 9 10 
c" d" e" 

«"b 

8 


12 
9" 

«"b 

4 


16 

c'" 
5 



These diagrams will make the text imme- 
diately intelligible, but as the notes refer to 
the ordinary notation the fact that / to (/ in 
the Fourth is a wider interval than gioain 
the major Sixth is not expressed. It is, how- 
ever, readily seen how much worse is the 
minor Sixth with g to a[^, and that in all 
these oases the disturbance arises from the 
2nd and 8rd partials which coincide for the 
Fifth. It is also seen how the disturbance is 
increased in the Eleventh and Thirteenths 
^ because one of the disturbing tones then 



becomes a prime, and hence sounds much 
louder. See also the table of partials on p. 
197c, d.— TrafwZator.] 

*[Ab the usual tempered tuning of the 
piano makes the minor Third greatly too flat, 
the circumstance mentioned in the text be- 
comes a great advantage on that instrument 
On the tempered harmonium even e' g\ e'* g" 
are very harsh, as compeu»d with the same 
intervals on the Harmonical. — Translator, '\ 

t [This will be made clearer by the follow- 
ing diagrams : 



No. of Partials . 
Lower note 
Major Third or 4 : 6 . 
No. of Partials . 


.12 3 4 
, C c g cf 
E e b 
12 3 




5 

d 
d 
4 


6 7 8 

9' b'\f c" 

6^ 6 


No. of Partials . 
Lower note 
Minor Third or 6 : 6 . 
No. of Partials . 


.12 3 4 
, C c g d 

^b «b *b 

12 3 


4 


6 

d 


6 7 8 

^ 6'b «" 
^ 6'b ^"b 
5 6 7 



The 6th partial of this E^ is not the same as 
the 7th partial of C, although the notation 
makes it appear so, but it is sharper in the 
ratio of 86 : 36, and hence if the partials were 
not so high would be very disturbing. It is 
seen that g' g'% are the 6th and 5th partials 
for the major Third, and e'^ e' the 4th and 
5th for the minor Third ; the interval being 
the same (24 : 25), the disturbance is worse in 



the latter case, because the partials are lower 
and hence louder. — Translator,'] 

X [The ordinary major Third on the tem- 
pered harmonium is verv little flatter than 
this, but still it is much less harsh. The 
HarmoniceJ does not contain a Pythagorean 
major Third, 64 : 81, the nearest approach 
being ''dl^ : d^ = 63 : 80, but it contains a Py- 
thagorean minor Third d/, which may be con- 



CHAP. X. DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



191 



The important influence exercised on the harmoniousness of the consonances, 
especially the less perfect ones, by the rapidity of the weak beats of the dissonant 
upper partials, has already been indicated. If we place all the intervals above the 
same bass note, the number of their beats in a second varies much, and is much 
greater for the imperfect than for the perfect consonances. But we can give all the 
intervals hitherto considered such a position in the scale that the number of their 
beats in a second should be the same. Since we have found that 33 beats in a 
second produce about the maximum amount of roughness, I have so chosen the 
position of the intervals in the following examples in musical notation, as to give 



trasted with the just minor Third dj. The 
following ftrrangement of the consonant in- 
tervals will shew the beating partials in eaoh 
case, and the exact ratios of their intervals. 
The number of the partial is subscribed in 
each case. The beating interval is inoffensive 
for 6 : 6, but its action becomes sensible for 
7 : 8, 8 : 9, and 9 : 10, and for 14 : 16, 15 : 16, 
24 : 25 the effect is decidedly bad if the tones 
are strong enough and the beats slow enough ; 
the strength depends on the lownees of the 



ordinal numbers of the beating partials, and the 
rapidity depends on their position in the scale. 
This must be taken into consideration, as in 
fig. 60, p. 198. A prefixed *, f, t, il draws at- 
tention to the beating partials. The order of 
the intervals is that of their relative harmoni- 5? 
ousness as assigned in my paper * On the 
Physical Constitution and Relations of Musical 
Chords,' in the Pfxx^edingz of the Royal Society ^ 
June 16, 1864, vol. xiU. p. 892, Table VIII., 
here re-arranged. 



Cc 



{' 



28456789 10 
2, 4, 6, 8, 10b 



Octave or 1 : 2, cents 1200 

O Q * T\ 4, 6, 'S. •IOb 12, tl47 fieg IS^ ^Oi^ 

Fifth or 2 : 3, cents 702 \ S^ 6^ *9, 12^ +16, 18, ^217 

Ce r~2. il 6^ b] lO l'^. •14- *)K la; 20; 



Ce \ '^i ^ ^z \ l^B 1^6 *i*7 *^% ^9» 

Major Tenth or 2 : 5, cents 1386 \ 6^ 10, ^5, 



'10 



20, 



r 1 2 3 
I 81 



8 



10 



6. 



9, 



Cg 

Twelfth or 1 : 3, cents 1902 

C F ( 3, 6, *y, i^ n^l5, 18, 2I7 24, J27, JSOj, 

Fourth or 3 : 4, cents 498 \ 4i *8, 12, +16, 20, 24, ^287 ^ 

CA T~Si 6» % 12; 1^; 18, +21, :24s 27^ SOu 

Major Sixth or 3 : 5, cents 884 \ 6^ MO, 16, +20, ^25, 3Q, 

CE T^~% 12, ♦le, 20, +24, 28; 32, J36s, 

Major Third or 4 : 6, cents 386 [ 5^ 10, ^5, 20, +25, 30, ^Sd, 



40, 
40. 



CE\^ 
Minor Third or 6 : 6, cents 316 

CA\f 
Minor Sixth or 5 : 8, cents 814 



10, 15, 2O4 •26, 30, +86, ^40, 46, 



60 



^ r 5, _ . 

\ 6, 12, 18, ^244 30, +86, ^42, [148, 

/ 61 10, •16, 2O4 +26c J30, 867 40, II 46, |1 60^0 
\ S, *16, +24, XB2, 40, |i48. 



Ce\f / 61 10, 15, 20, ^25, 30, +35, 40^ :46, :60,o 55„ 60„ 

Minor Tenth or 5 : 12, cents 1516 \ 12j *24, +36, ^484 60^ 

C f 7~8, 6r"*9, l2;~+r5,""+"l8, J2I7 :24, >277~ 30io ~ 

Eleventh or 3 : 8, cents 1698 \ •Si +16, ^243 

Ca TSi 6^ •9, 12, 16, +18, +21^ 24, +27, 30^ 

Ma. Thrtnth. or 3 : 10, cents 2084 \ 'lO, +20, ^SO, ^ 

/~6~10j, *I5, 2O4 26, +80, +367 40, +46^ +8^ 

\ 'le, +82, J48, 



Ca\f 
Mi. Thrtnth. or 5 : 16, cents 2014 



See note p. 195 for the intervals depending on 7. 



The last four of the above intervals are so 
rough that they are seldom reckoned as con- 
sonances. The order was determined merely 
by frequently sounding the intervals in just 
intonation on jnstly intoned reed instruments, 
and relates solely to the effect on my own ear. 
The greater richness of the major Tenth over 
the Twelfth made me prefer the former. The 
effect is very much like that of a compound 
tone, in which the prime is inaudible ; even 
the tones 1 and 3 are supplied partly by com- 
binational tones. Hence when a man's voice 
accompanies a woman's at a Third below (that 
is really a tenth) the effect is more agreeable 



than when another woman sings the real 
Third below, as long as the Thirds are major ; 
the contrary is the case when the Thirds are 
minor. In ordinary rules for harmony no dis- 
tinction is made between Tenths and Thirds, 
Fourths and Elevenths, &c. The above table 
shews that the differences are of extreme im- 
portance. The dissonant character attributed 
to the Fourth is apparently due to the Eleventh. 
As will be seen hereafter, the minor Tenth, 
the Eleventh, and both Thirteenths ought to 
be avoided or else treated as dissonances. — 
Translator,] 



^ 



192 



DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



PABT II. 



that number in every case. The intonation is sapposed to be that of the scale of 
C major with just intervals, but b\} represents the subminor Seventh of c (4 : 7).* 

fea& — , — \^ — -. — bfft - fajQ 




----^p: 



-z:i 



t 



^ 



BI 



B; 



16i : 16i 8, : ISj 8, : 9, 



7i:8, 7,: 9, 6, : T^ 6, : 7 



n- 



t 



I 



P 



2^=: 



Sh 



5 



4s, : 7, 5, : 8, 5^ : 6< 



4,: 6, 



m 



03 : O2 3j : Sj 2^ : 3] 



The prime tones of the notes in this example are all partials of C^, which 

makes 33 vibrations in a second, and hence their own pitch numbers and those 

f of their upper partials are multiples of 33 ; consequently the difiference of these 

pitch numbers, which gives the number of beats, must always be 33, 66, or some 

higher multiple of 33. 

In the low positions here assigned the beats arising from the dissonant upper 
partials are as effective as their intensity will allow, and in this case the Sixths, 
Thirds, and even the Fourth are considerably rough. But the major Sixth and 
major Third shew their superiority over the minor Third and minor Sixth, by 
descending lower down in the sccJe, and yet sounding somewhat milder than the 
others. It is also a well-known practical rule among musicians to avoid these 
close intervals in low positions, when soft chords are required, though there was 
no justification for this rule in any previous theory of chords. 

My theory of hearing by means of the sympathetic vibration of elastic 
appendages to the nerves, would allow of calcuUting the intensity of the beats 
of the different intervals, when the intensity of the upper partials in the corre- 
^ spending quahty of tone belonging to the instrument used, is known, and the 
intervals are so chosen that the number of beats in a second is the sama But 
such a calculation would be very different for different quahties of tone, and holds 
only for such a particular case as may be assumed. 

For intervals constructed on the same lower note a new factor comes into play, 
namely, the number of beats which occur in a second ; and the influence of this 
factor on the roughness of the sensation cannot be calculated directly by any fixed 
law. But to obtain a general graphical representation of the complicated relations 
which co-operate to produce the effect, I have made such a calculation, knowing 
that diagrams teach more at a glance than the most complicated descriptions, and 
have hence constructed figs. 60, A and B (p. 193). In order to construct them 
I have been forced to assume a somewhat arbitrary law for the dependence 
of roughness upon the number of beats. I chose for this purpose the simplest 
mathematical formula which would shew that the roughness vanishes when there 
^are no beats, increases to a maximum for 33 beats, and then diminishes as the 
number of beats increases. Next I have selected the quality of tone on the violin 
in order to calculate the intensity and roughness of the beats due to the upper 
partials taken two and two together, and from the final results I have constructed 
figs. 60, A and B, opposite. The base lines c'c", c"c'" denote those parts of the 
musical scale which lie between the notes thus named, but the pitch is taken to 
increase continuously [as when the finger slides down the violin string], and not by 
separate steps [as when the finger stops off definite lengths of the violin string]. 
It is further assumed that the notes or compound tones belonging to any individual 
part of the scale, are sounded together with the note c', which forms the constant 
lower note of all the intervals. Fig. 60 A, therefore, shews the roughness of all 
intervals which are less than an Octave, and fig. 60 B of those which are greater 



*[The ordinal numben of the partiala 
which beat 88 timee in a second, are here sab- 
Bcribed. Thns ^4 : 6, means that the ratio of 



the primes is 4 : 5, and that the beating par- 
tiidfl are the 4th of 4, and the 8rd of 5, having 
the ratio 16 : 16.— TVansIotor.] 



|^^.3F CONSONANCES. 193 

base line there are promineooes 
The height of these prominenoes 
Etl to the rou|^es8 produced by 
Id^ftien B, note of oorreepooding pitch 
1^ The roughnesses produced by the 
over the other.* It will be seen 



yiyyUBIi^S'^S^^C&'M'fife'^P* interrals encroach on each 
^■tSSWt M^i iM^SS^il l^eys remain, corresponding to the 
jyB^S^MfByS' Ipi^.^jy roMghnega oi the chord is com- 
'I V^^lfH^£^<W>^jSl^'^* Octave c' c" belong to the 

|li'.rl£%r 



|fSf*WS 



'^^uih /, the major Sixth a', and the 
:(^Shes6 intervals The minor Third 
than valleys, the bottoms of their 



•9»ji9.»ji3f.»ji3t»jt9' ■¥• ■¥• ■¥• "SE* ■"• 



'^1 







lEreater roughness of these intervals. 
IsSvolving 7, as 4 : 7. 5 : 7, 6 : 7.t H 
lOBe intervals of the first Octave are 
expressing the ratio was even ; 
or c'e", subminor Fourteenth 2 : 7 
are smoother than the Fifth 2 : 3 
mth 4 ; 7 or c'6'|» - , and subminor 
.tively deteriorated. The Eleventh 
han the major Tenth or c'e" ; the 
8txth, is similarly worse than the 
lird or c'e'\t, wheu increased to a 
ir c'a'b, when increased to a minor 

A-"- «<^ mr V^ff!^t^&S^i^'^\0ith« Interval 6:7isthe<cor between/ 
-< ■{ « -^ If tlub*<#t^>Sr:l:D^, uid the ioternJ 6 : 7 is t( 
» * "*#'S''H-;^:^:g33S51*tto(*'li— r™n»(ator.] 

"■' ■ 1t§M'M^^'^ " ' 



ty dairying a tine down from »'^ in 



194 



DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. 



PA&T U. 



Thirteenth or c'a''|>, fare still worse, on account of the increased disturbance of 
the adjacent intervals. The conclusions here drawn from calculation are easily 
confirmed by experiments on justly intoned instruments.* That they are also 
attended to in the practice of musical composition, notwithstanding the theoretical 
assumption that the nature of a chord is not changed by altering the pitch of any 
one of its constituents by whole octaves, we shall see further on, when considering 
chords and their inversions. 

It has already been mentioned that peculiarities of individual qualities of tone 
may have considerable effect in altering the order of the relative harmoniousness 
of the intervals. The quality of tone in the musical instruments now in use has 
been of course selected and altered with a view to its employment in harmonic com- 
binations. The preceding investigation of the qualities of tone in our principal 
musical instruments has shewn that in what are considered good qualities of tone 
IT the Octave and Twelfth of the prime, that is the 2nd and 3rd partials, are powerful, 
the 4th and 5th partials have only moderate strength, and the higher partials 
rapidly diminish in force. Assuming such a quality of tone, the results of this 
chapter may be summed up as follows. 

When two musical tones are sounded at the same time, their imited sound is 
generally disturbed by the beats of the upper partials, so that a greater or less part 
of the whole mass of sound is broken up into pulses of tone, and the joint effect is 
rough. This relation is called DissoncMce. 

But there are certain determinate ratios between pitch numbers, for which this 
rule suffers an exception, and either no beats at all are formed, or at least only 
such as have so little intensity that they produce no unpleasant disturbance of the 
united sound. These exceptional cases are called Consonances, 

1. The most perfect conscmcMces are those that have been here called cthsolute, 
in which the prime tone of one of the combined notes coincides with some partial 

U tone of the other. To this group belong the Octave, Twelfth, and double Octave, 

2. Next follow the Fifth and the Fourth, which may be called ^er/ec^ consonances, 
because they may be used in all psirts of the scale without any important disturb- 
ance of harmoniousness. The Fourth is the less perfect consonance and approaches 
those of the next group. It owes its superiority in musical practice simply to its 
being the defect of a Fifth from an Octave, a circumstance to which we shall return 
in a later chapter. 

3.. The next group consists of the major Sixth and the major Third, which 
may be called medial consonances. The old writers on harmony considered them 
as imperfect consonances. In lower parts of the scale the disturbance of the 
harmoniousness is very sensible, but in the higher positions it disappears, because 
the beats are too rapid to be sensible. But each, in good musical qualities of tone, 
is independently characterised, by the fact that any little defect in its intonation 
produces sensible beats of the upper partials, and consequently each interval is 
H sharply separated from all adjacent intervals. 

4. The imperfect consonances, consisting of the minor Third and minor Sixth, 
are not in general independently characterised, because in good musical qualities of 
tone the partials on which their definition depends are often not found for the 
minor Third, and are generally absent for the minor Sixth, so that small imper- 
fections in the intonation of these intervals do not necessarily produce beats, f 



fig. 60 A, it will be seen that e"\^ belongs to the 
little depression to the right of the fraction { 
between e"\f- and e". The slight depression 
for a"}^iB just under the fraction y^ to the left 
of a". The depression for e'\^ — is just to the 
left of that tore'}}. — Translator.] 

* [The student is strongly recommended 
to verify all these consonances on the Har- 
monica!, where b\f - , that is ^&k is placed on 
the g'^ digital. The Harmonica! does not con- 
tain e\} - , that is ''$\f, and hence, in place of 



c'«"|^— and &e'\f- , the student should take the 
same intervals a Fourth lower, as o? b'\f and 
g'' b\f. All the other notes are on the instru- 
ment in all the octaves. — Translator,] 

t [It must be recollected that in the minor 
Sixth the 2nd and 8rd partials form the Semi- 
tone 15 : 16, and the 8rd and 5th form the 
Semitone 24 : 25 (see note p. 191c), and that 
the resulting beats, wliich in good qualities of 
tone are never absent, will always be more 
powerful than those which arise from small 



CHAP. X. 



DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OP CONSONANCES. 



195 



They are all less suited for use in lower parts of the scale than the others, and 
they owe their precedence as consonances over many other intervals which lie on 
the boundaries of consonance and dissonance, essentially to their being indispens- 
able in the formation of chords, because they are defects of the major Sixth and ' 
major Third from the Octave or Fifth. The subminor Seventh 4 : 7 or &b'\} - is 
very often more harmonious than the minor Sixth 5 : 8 or c'a% in fact it is 
always so when the third partial tone of the note is strong as compared with the 
second, because then the Fifth has a more powerfully disturbing effect on the 
intervals distant from it by a Semitone, than the Octave on the subminor Seventh, 
which is rather more than^a whole Tone removed from it.* But this subminor 
Seventh when combined with other consonances in chords produces intervals which 
are all worse than itself, as 6 : 7, 5 : 7, 7 : 8, &c., and it is consequently not used 
as a consonance in modern music, f 

5. By increasing the interval by an Octave, the Fifth c'g' and major Third ^ 
c'e' are improved on becoming the Twelfth c'g" and major Tenth c'e'\ But the 



errors of intonation, even in qualities of tone * [Reverting to the diagrams before given 

in which an 8th partial is well developed. — (p. 191c note), we may oompare the effect of 
Translator,] these intervals thus : 



Minor Sixth or 5 : 8, cents 814 



8, 



15, 20, i2b, :30e 86^ 40, 
•16, t24, t824 4O5 



1145, ||50io 
11488 



CB\f- =C'5|> 4i *8a 

Subminor Seventh or 4 : 7, cents 969 *7i 



+12, I64 
+14, 



:205 J24e 28, 
J21, 284 



328 1136, 40i, 

i|d5B 



Hence for the minor Sixth the chief beats 
arise from the interval 15 : 16, or the 8rd 
partial of the lower and 2nd of the upper 
note, that is, from those tones which would 
coincide for the Fifth, which is what is meant 
in the text by saving that the interval is dis- 
turbed by the Fifth. But in the subminor 
Seventh the chief disturbance is from 7:8, 
or the prime of the upper and 2nd partial of 
the lower note, which would coincide for the 
Octave. The beats from the interval 12 : 14 
or 6 : 7 are hardly perceptible, but this is the 



interval which replaces the 15 : 16 in the 
minor Sixth, being due to those upper partials 
which would have coincided for the Fifth. 
Both CA^ and C^B\f can be played on the 
Harmonical, and the effect in the different 
Octaves should be compared. — Translator^] 

+ [In fig. 60 A (p. I93S), the bottom of thell 
valley of 4 : 7 above fr'j^ -, is just a little lower 
than that of 5 : 7, between /' and g\ and than 
that of 6:7, which, with that of 7 : 8, lies 
between c' and e'\). If we take the diagrams 
for these intervals we have : 



C E^- or GTB\f 6, 12, 18, 

Subminor Third or 6 : 7, cents 267 7i 14, 



'24, tSO. 1^86, 42^ §48, 1164, 60; 



►21, +284 :855 42, 



§49, 1156, 



10 



CG\f-OTET B\^ 5j 10, 'IS, +2O4 25, 80, 

Subminor Fifth or 5 : 7, cents 583 7i •14, +21, 284 



85, 40, 45, 50„ 
355 42, 49, 



CD+ OT^B^C 
Supersecond or7 : 8, cents 281 



7i 14, 



21, 



28^ 



►35, +42, 49, 66, 



81 16, 24, •824 +40, 48, 



56, 



68, 70io 
64. 



The second forms in these examples, G'^B}^, 
E''B\f, ''Bj^G, can be played on the Harmoni- 
cal. We see, then, that 6 : 7 is disturbed by 
a continual repetition of the same interval 
among its lower partials, and also by the 
intervals 21 : 24 = 7 : 8 from the 8rd and 4th 
partials, 28 : 30=14 : 15 from the 4th and 5th 
partials, and 35 : 36 from the 5th and 6th 
partials. On looking at the diagram, fig. 60 
A (p. 198c), it will be seen that of these four 
sources the first is chief, but the others are 
active. For the subminor Fifth 5 : 7 the creat 
disturbance is from 14 : 15, or the 2nd and 3rd 
partials, but there is also an active one from 
20 : 21, or the 4th and 3rd partials, and theseare 



almost the onlv ones noted in fig. 60 A. In the 
Supersecond the continual repetition of the in- 
terval 7 : 8 produces the chief effect, but 82 : 85 
from the 4th and 5th partials, and 40 : 42 
1= 20 : 21, from the 5th and 6th partials, also ^ 
produce much effect, as shewn in the fig. 60 A. 
The interval 7 : 9, which is much pleasanter, 
has not been considered by Prof.He]mholta,but 
is available in all Octaves on the Harmoni- 
cal. Mr. Poole distinguished 5 : 6, 6 : 7, 7 : 9, 
as the minor, minim, and maxim Third, here 
called minor,subminor,and super-major Third. 
There is also the wide (or super) minor Third 
14 : 17. I add the analysis of the two last, 
both of which are on the HarmonicaJ. 



Super-major Third or 7 : 9, cents 435 
Super-minor Third or 14 : 17, cents 336 



7x 



14, 21 
18, 



8 •28, 
*27, 



+85, 42, 497 ::56a 68, 
+864 45, t54, 68, 



14i 



28, 



42, 



17, 



34< 



»51, 



•664 



t68, 



t70- 



In the last there are a quantity of beating result is really superior to the Pythitforean 
partials, but if ^'^d"'\f be kept as here hiflh in minor Third 27 : 82, cents 294.— Tran«£Uor.] 
the scale, they will not dq h^C^rd^ ana the 

o2 



196 DEGREE OF HARMONIOUSNESS OF CONSONANCES. part n. 

Fourth c'/ and major Sixth da! become worse as the Eleventh c^ and major 
Thirteenth da*\ The minor Third c'e'|> and minor Sixth c'a'|>, however, become 
still worse as the minor Tenth c'0''|> and minor Thirteenth c'a''|^ , so that the latter 
intervals are far less harmonious than the subminor Tenth 3 : 7, c'e'^l^ - [or g^h'\i\^ 
and subminor Fourteenth 2 : 7, c'6"[> - . 

The order of the consonances here proposed is based upon a consideration of 
the harmoniousness of each individual interval independently of any connection 
with other intervals, and consequently without any regard to key, scale, and 
modulation. Almost all writers on musical theory have proposed similar orders 
for the consonances, agreeing in their general features with each other and with 
that here deduced from the theory of beats. Thus all put the Unison and Octave 
first, as the most perfect of all consonances ; and next in order comes the Fifth, 
after which the Fourth is placed by those who do not include the modulational 

V properties of the Fourth, but restrict their observation to the independent har- 
moniousness of the interval. There is great diversity, on the other hand, in 
the arrangement of the Sixths and Thirds. The Greeks and Romans did not 
acknowledge these intervals to be consonances at all, perhaps because in the un- 
accented Octave, within which their music, arranged for men's voices, usually lay, 
these intervals really sound badly, and perhaps because their ear was too sensitive 
to endure the trifling increase of roughness generated by compound tones when 
sounded together in Thirds and Sixths. In the present century, the Archbishop 
Chrysanthus of Dyrrhachium declares that modern -Greeks have no pleasure in 
polyphonic music, and consequently he disdains to enter upon it in his book on 
music, and refers those who are curious to know its rules, to the writings of the 
West.'"' Arabs are of the same opinion according to the accounts of all travellers. 
This rule remained in force even during the first half of the middle ages, when 
the first attempts were made at harmonies for two voices. It was not till towards 

H the end of the twelfth century that Franco of Cologne included the Thirds among 
the consonances. He distinguishes : — 

1. Perfect Consonances : Unison and Octave. 

2. Medial Consonances : Fifth and Fourth. 

3. Imperfect Consonances : Major and minor Thirds. 

4. Imperfect Dissonances : Major and minor Sixth. 

5. Perfect Dissonances : Minor Second, augmented Fourth, major and minor 
Seventh, "f 

It was not till the thirteenth and fourteenth centuries that musicians began to 
include the Sixths among the consonances. Philipp de Vitry and Jean de Muris J 
mention as perfect consonances the Unison, Octave, and Fifth ; as imperfect, the 
Thirds and Sixths. The Fourth has been cut out. The first author opposes the 
major Third and major Sixth, as more perfect, to the minor Third and minor 
Sixth. The same order is found in the Dodecachordon of Glareanus, 1557, § who 
fl merely added the intervals increased by an Octave. The reason why the Fourth 
was not admitted as either a perfect or an imperfect consonant, must be looked for 
in the rules for the progression of parts. Perfect consonances were not allowed 
to follow each other between the same parts, still less dissonances ; but imperfect 
consonances, as the Thirds and Sixths, were permitted to do so. But on the other 
hand the perfect consonances. Octaves, and Fifths were admitted in chords on 
which the music paused, as in the closing chord. Here, however, the Fourth of 
the bass could not occur because it does not occur in the triad of the tonic. Again 
a succession of Fourths for two voices was not admitted, as the Fourth and Fifth 
were too closely related for such a purpose. Hence so far as the progression of 

* SfWfniriKhv fi4ya rrjs MovaiKris xapii Xpvtr- 1852, p. 49. 
dvBov. Tfpyftrrri, 1832, cited by Coussemaker, X Coussemaker, ibid. p. 66 and p. 68. 

Histoire de Vhannofiie, p. 5. § [This is the date of the abstract by 

fGerbert, Scriptores eoclesitistici de Mu- WoneggarofLithuania,the date of the original 

sica SacrcL Saint- Blaise, 1784, vol. iii. p. 11. work is 1547, ten years earlier. — TranskUor,] 
—Coussemaker, Histoire de V harmonies Paris, 



CHAPS. X, XI. 



BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



W 



parts was concerned, the Fourth shared the properties of dissonances, and it was at 
once placed among them ; but it would have been better to have placed it in an inter- 
mediate class between perfect and imperfect consonances. As far as harmonious- 
ness is concerned, there can be no doubt that, for most qualities of tone, the Fourth 
is much superior to the major Third and major Sixth, and beyond all doubt better 
than the minor Third and minor Sixth. But the Eleventh, or Fourth increased 
by an Octave, sounds far from well when the third partial tone is in any degree 
strong.* 

The dispute as to the consonance or dissonance of the Fourth has been con- 
tinued to the present day. As late as 1840, in Dehn's treatise on harmony we find 
it asserted that the Fourth must be treated and resolved as a dissonance ; but Dehn 
certainly puts a totally different interpretation on the question in dispute by laying 
it down that the Fourth of any bass within its key and independently of the 
intervals with which it is combined, has to be treated as a dissonance. Otherwise IT 
it has been the constant custom in modem music to allow the reduplication of the 
tonic to occur as the Fourth of the dominant in conjunction with the dominant 
even in final chords, and it was long so used in these chords, even before Thirds 
were allowed in them, and in this way it came to be recognised as one of the superior 
consonances, f 



CHAPTER XL 



BEATS DUE TO OOMBINATIOHAIi TONES. 



When two or more compound tones are sounded at the same time beats may arise 
from the combinational tones as well as from the harmonic upper partials. In 
Chapter YII. it was shewn that the loudest combinational tone resulting from two f 



*[See the Eleventh analysed in p. 191c, 
footnote. — Translator. ] 

t The following general view of the partials 
of the first 16 harmonics of C 66 (which, with 
the exception of the 11th and 13th, din be 



studied on the Harmonical},will shew generally 
how they affect each other in any combination. 
The number of vibrations of each partial of 
each harmonic is given, whence the beats can 
be immediately found. 



Partials 
of C 


1 
C 

66 

132 

198 

264 

330 

396 

462 

528 

594 

660 

726 

792 

858 

924 

990 

1056 

1122 

1188 

1254 

1320 

1386 

1452 

1518 

1584 

1650 

1716 

1782 

1848 

1980 

2112 


2 

c 


3 

</ 

198 

396 

594 

792 

990 

1188 

1386 

1584 


4 
c' 

264 

528 

792 

1056 

1320 

1584 


5 
e' 

330 

660 

990 

1320 

1650 


6 

396 
792 

1188 
1584 


7 

462 

924 

1386 


8 

528 
1056 

2112 


9 


10 
e" 

660 

1320 

1980 


11 
11/" 

726 
1518 


12 
9" 

792 
ir)84 


13 

858 
1716 


14 

924 

1848 


15 

990 
1980 


16 

c"' 

1056 
2112 


1 

2 

3 

4 

5 

6 

7 

8 

9 

10 

11 

12 

13 

14 

15 

16 

17 

18 

19 

20 

21 

22 

23 

24 

25 

26 

27 

28 

30 

32 


132 
264 

396 

528 

660 

792 

924 

1056 

1188 

1320 

1452 

1584 


594 

1188 
1782 



II 



198 



BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



PA.BT n. 



generating tones is that oorresponding to the difference of their pitoh numbers, or 
the differential tone of the first order. It is this combinational tone, therefore, 
which is chiefly effective in producing beats. Even this loudest combinational tone» 
is somewhat weak, unless the generators are very loud ; the differential tones of 
higher orders, and the summational tones, are still weaker. Beats due to such 
weak tones as those last mentioned cannot be observed unless all other beats which 
would disturb the observer are absent, as, for instance, in sounding two simple 
tones, which are entirely free from upper partials. On the other hand the beats of 
the first differential tones [owing to difference of pitch and quality] can be heard 
very well at the same time as those due to the harmonic upper partials of com- 
pound tones, by an ear accustomed to hear combinational tones. 

The differential tones of the first order alone, and independently of the com- 
binational tones of higher orders, are capable of causing beats (1) when two 

H compound tones sound together, (2) when three or more simple or compound 
tones sound together. On the other hand beats generated by combinational tones 
of higher orders have to be considered when two simple tones sound together. 

We commence with the differential tones of compound tones. In the same 
way that the prime tones in such cases develop combinational tones, any pair of 
upper partials of the two compounds will also develop combinational tones, but 
such tones will diminish very rapidly in intensity as the upper partials become 
weaker. When one or more of these combinational tones nearly coincide with 
other combinational tones, or the primes or upper partials of the generators, beats 
ensue. Let us take as an example a slightly incorrectly tuned Fifth, having the 
pitch numbers 200 and 301, in place of 200 and 300, as in a justly intoned Fifth. 
We calculate the vibrational numbers of the upper partials by multiplying those 
of the primes by 1, 2, 3, and so on. We find the vibrational numbers of the dif- 
ferential tones of the first order, by subtracting these numbers from each other, 

H two and two. The following table contains in the first horizontal line and vertical 
column the vibrational numbers of the several partials of the two compound tones, 
and in their intersections the differences of those numbers, which are the pitch 
numbers of the differential tones due to them. 





ParUala ot the Fifth 






301 


602 


908 




•S 5J r 200 
^•S5 800 

Ss uooo 


101 
99 
299 
499 
699 


402 
202 
2 
198 
898 


708 
508 
803 
108 
97 


X 

- 


Combi- 
national 
Tones 



If we arrange these tones by pitch we find the following groups : — 

2 97 198 299 898 499 600 699 800 903 

IT 99 200 801 400 508 602 708 

101 202 808 402 
108 



1000 



The number 2 is too small to correspond to a combinational tone. It only 
shews the number of beats due to the two upper partials 600 and 602.* In all the 
other groups, however, tones are found whose vibrational numbers differ by 2, 4, or 
6, and hence produce respectively 2, 4, and 6 beats in the same time that the two 
first-named partials produce 2 beats. The two strongest combinational tones are 
101 and 99, and these also are well distinguished from the rest by their low pitch. 

We observe in this example that the slowest beats due to the combinational 
tones are the same in number as those due to the upper partials [600 and 602] . 
This is a general rule and applies to all intervals, f 

*[The last three, 800, 908, 1000, are f [But the beats of the upper partials are 

simply non-beating upper partials. — Trans- always distingnished by their high pitch. — 
later.] Translator.] 



CHAP. XI. 



BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



199 



Further it is easy to see that if in our example we replaced 200 and 301, by 
the numbers 200 and 300 belonging to the perfect Fifth, all the numbers in our 
table would become multiples of 100, and hence all the different combinational and 
upper partial tones which now beat would become coincident and not generate any 
beats. What is here shown to be the case in this example for the Fifth is also true 
for all other harmonic intervals.* 

The first differential tones of compounds cannot generate heats, except when the 
upper parpials of the same compounds generate them, and the rapidity of the beats is 
the same in both cases, supposing that the series of upper partials is complete. Hence 
the addition of combinational tones makes no essential difference in the results 
obtained in the last chapter on investigating the beats due to the upper partials 
only. There can be only a slight increase in the strength of the beats, f 

But the case is essentially different when two simple tones are soimded together, 
so that there are no upper partials to consider. If combinational tones were not IT 
taken into account, two simple tones, as those of tuning-forks or stopped organ 
pipes, could not produce beats unless they were very nearly of the same pitch, and 
such beats are strong when their interval is a minor or major Second, but weak for 
a Third and then only recognisable in the lower parts of the scale (p. 171d), and 
they gradually diminish in distinctness as the interval increases, without shewing 
any special differences for the harmonic intervals themselves. For any larger 
interval between two simple tones there would be absolutely no beats at all, if 
there were no upper partial or combinational tones, and hence the consonant 
intervals discovered in the former chapter would be in no respect distinguished 
from adjacent intervals ; there would in fact be no distinction at all between wide 
consonant intervals and absolutely dissonant intervals. 

Now such wider intervals between simple tones are known to produce beats, 
although very much weaker than those hitherto considered, so that even for such 
tones there is a difference between consonances and dissonances, although it is IT 
very much more imperfect than for compound tones. And these facts depend, as 
Scheibler shewed, t on the combinational tones of higher orders. 

It is only for the Octa/oe that the first differential tone sufficed. If the lower 
note makes 100 vibrations in a second, while the imperfect Octave makes 201, the 
first differential tone makes 201 - 100 = 101, and hence nearly coincides with the 
lower note of 100 vibrations, producing one beat for each 100 vibrations. There 
is no difficulty in hearing these beats, and hence it is easily possible to distinguish 
imperfect Octaves from perfect ones, even for simple tones, by the beats produced 
by the former. § 

For the Fifth, the first order of differential tones no longer suffices. Take an 
imperfect Fifth with the ratio 200 : 301 ; then the differential tone of the first 
order is 101, which is too far from either primary to generate beats. But it forms 
an imperfect Octave with the tone 200, and, as just seen, in such a case beats ensue. 
Here they are produced by the differential tone 99 arising from the tone 101 and IT 



* This is proved mathematically in Ap- 
pendix XVI. 

t [The great difference in the pitch of the 
two sets of beats, which are not necessarily 
even Octaves of each other, keeps them well 
apart. The beating partials, in this case 600, 
602, and the beating differentials, here 101 and 
99, are entirely removed from each other. — 
Tranilator,'] 

X [* The physical and musical Tonometer, 
which makes evident to the eye, by means of 
the pendulum, the absolute vibrations of the 
tones, and of the principal kinds of combina- 
tional tones, as well as the most precise exact- 
ness of equally tempered and mathematical 
chords, invented and executed by Heinrioh 
Scheibler, silk manufacturer in Gref eld. ' (Der 



physikalischaundmusihaUsche T(mmM8er,&o.) 
—Essen, G. D. Badeker, 1884, pp. viii. 80, 5 
lithographed Tables (called 8 on title-page), 
and an engraving of tuning-forks and waves. 
A most remarkable pamphlet, but unfortu- 
nately veiy obscurely written, as the author 
says in his preface, to * write clearly and briefly 
on a scientific subject is a skill {Fertigkeit) 1 do 
not possess, and have never attempted.' See 
also App. XX. sect. B. No. 7. I do not find 
anywhere that Scheibler attempted to shew 
that combinational tones existed, especially 
intermediate ones ; he merely assumed them 
and found the beskts.-^TranalatorJ] 

§ [See App. XX. sect. L. art. 8, latter part 
of d, — Translator,] 



200 



BEATS DUE TO COlfBINATIONAL TONES. 



PABT U. 



the tone 200, and this tone 99 makes two beats in a second with the tone 101. 
These beats then serve to distinguish the imperfect from the justly intoned Fifth 
even in the case of two simple tones. The number of these beats is also exactly 
as many as if they were beats due to the upper partial tones.* But to observe 
these beats the two primary tones must be loud, and the ear must not be distracted 
by any extraneous noise. Under favourable circumstances, however, they are not 
difficult to hear, j- 

For an imperfect Fourth^ having, say, the vibrational numbers 300 and 401, 
the first differential tone is 101 ; this with the tone 300 produces the differential 
tone 199 of the second order, and this again with the tone 401 the differential tone 
202 of the third order, and this makes 3 beats with the differential tone 199 of the 
second order, that is, precisely as many beats as would have been generated by the 
upper partial tones 1200 and 1203, if they had existed. These beats of the Fourth 
IT are very weak even when the primary tones are powerful. Perfect quiet and great 
attention are necessary for observing them.| And after all there may be a doubt 
whether by strong excitement of the primary tones, weak partials may not have 
arisen, as we already considered on p. 1596, c.§ 

The beats of an imperfect major Third are scarcely recognisable, even under the 
most favourable conditions. If we take as the vibrational numbers of the primary 
tones 400 and 501, we have : — 

501 - 400 — 101, the differential tone of the first order 
400-101 = 299, „ „ „ second,. 

501-299 = 202, „ „ „ third „ 

400-202 = 198, „ „ „ fourth „ 



The tones 202 and 198 produce 4 beats. Scheibler succeeded in counting these 

beats of the imperfect major Third.** I have myself believed that I heard them 

% under favourable circumstances. But in any case they are so difficult to perceive 

that they are not of any importance in distinguishing consonance from dissonance. 

Hence it follows that two simple tones making various intervals adjacent to the 
major Third and sounded together would produce a uniform uninterrupted mass of 
sound, without any break in their harmoniousness, provided that they do not 
approach a Second too closely on the one hand or a Fourth on the other. My own 
experiments with stopped organ pipes justify me in asserting that however much 
this conclusion is opposed to musical dogmas, it is borne out by the fact, provided 
that really simple tones are used for the purpose, ff It is the same with intervals 
near to the major Sixth ; these also shew no difference as long as they remain 
sufficiently far from the Fifth and Octave. Hence although it is not difficult to 
tune perfect major and minor Thirds on the harmonium or reed pipes or on the 
violin, by sounding the two tones together and trying to get rid of the beats, it is 
perfectly impossible to do so on stopped organ pipes or tuning-forks without the 
m aid of other intervals. It will appear hereafter that the use of more than two 
tones will allow these intervals to be perfectly tuned even for simple tones. 

Intermediate between the compound tones possessing many powerful upper 
partials, such as those of reed pipes and violins, and the entirely simple tones of 
tuning-forks and stopped organ pipes, lie those compound tones in which only the 



* [But, as before, the pitch is very differ- 
ent. — Translator.] 

t [Scheibler, ibid, p. 21. I myself suc- 
ceeded in hearing and counting them.^Trana- 
kUor.] 

:^ [Scheibler says, p. 24, they are heard as 
well as for the Fifth. I have not found it so. 
Translator,] 

§ [Supposing the pitch numbers of the 
mistuned Fourth are 800 and 401, then the 
beating upper partials would be 1200 and 
1208, a very high pitch; but the beating 
differentials are 202 and 199, which are so 



much lower in pitch and so inharmonic to the 
others that there is no danger of confusing 
th em. — Translator. ] 

** [Scheibler, ibid. p. 26, says only * as beats 
of this kind are too indistinct,* he uses another 
method for tuning the major Third. See 
note*, p. 208d. He also calculates the inter- 
mediate tones differently. But neither he nor 
any one seems to have tried to verify their 
existence, which is doubtful. — TranalcUor.] 

ft [Or at any rate tones without the 4th 
partial, which those of stopped organ pipes 
do not possess. — Translator.] 



CHAP. XI. BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. 201 

lowest of the upper partials are audible, such as the tones of wide open organ pipes 
or the human voice when singing some of the obscurer vowels, as oo in too. For 
these the partials would not suffice to distinguish all the consonant intervals, but 
the addition of the first differential tones renders it possible. 

A. Compound Tones consisting of the prime and its Octave. These cannot 
delimit Fifths and Fourths by beats of the partials, but are able to do so by those 
of the first differential tones. 

a. Fifth. Let the vibrational numbers of the prime tones be 200 and 801, 
which are accompanied by their Octaves 400 and 602 ; all four tones are then 
too far apart to beat. But the differential tones 

301 - 200 = 101 
400 - 301 = 99 



Difference 2 f 

give two beats. The number of these beats again is precisely the same as if they 
had been produced by the two next upper partials.* Namely 

2 X 301 - 3 X 200 = 2 

b. Fourth. Let the vibrational numbers of the primes be 300 and 401, and of 
the first upper partials 600 and 802 ; these cannot produce any beats. But the 
first differential tones give 3 beats, thus f : — 

600 - 401 = 199 

802 - 600 = 202 

Difference 3 
For Thirds it would be necessary to take differential tones of the second order 
into account. 

B. Compound Tones consisting of the prime and Twelfth. Such tones are pro- 
duced by the narrow stopped pipes on the organ {Quintaten, p. S3d, note). These f 
are related in the same way as those which have only the Octave. 

a. Fifth. Primes 200 and 301, upper partials 600 and 903. First differential 
tone 

903 - 600 - 303 
Fifth = 301 



Number of beats 2 
b. Fourth. Primes 300 and 401, upper partials 900 and 1203. First differen- 
tial tone 

1203 - 900 = 303 
Lower prime = 300 

Number of beats 3 
Even in this case the beats of the Third cannot be perceived without the help of 
the weak second differential tones. IT 

C. Compound Tones having both Octave and Twelfth as audible pa/rtials. Such 
tones are produced by the wide (wooden) open pipes of the organ {Principaly p. 93{2', 
note). The beats of the upper partials here suffice to delimit the Fifths, but not 
the Fourths. The Thirds can now be distinguished by means of the first differential 
tones. 

a. Major Third. Primes 400 and 601, with the Octaves 800 and 1002, and 
Twelfths 1200 and 1503. First differential tones X 

1002 - 800 = 202 
1200 - 1002 = 198 



Number of beats 



* [The same in number, but observe that existed would beat at pitch 1200. — Translator.} 
the first set of beats are at pitch 100, and the X [These are the same two beating tones 

second at pitch 600.— 3Van<la^.] as calcplated on p. 2006, but they are quite 

t [At pitph 200, whereas the partials if they differently derived. — TranslaJtoT.'] 



202 BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. part n. 

b. Minor Third. Primes 600 and 601, Octaves 1202, Twelfths 1500 and 1803. 
Differential tones * 

1500 - 1202 » 298 
1803 - 1500 = 303 

Number of beats 5 

c. Major Sixth, Primes 300 and 501, Octaves 600 and 1002, Twelfths 900 
and 1503. Differential tones 

600 - 501 = 99 
1002 - 900 = 102 



Number of beats 3 

In fact not only the beats of imperfect Fifths and Fourths, but also those 
T of imperfect major and minor Thirds are easily heard on open organ pipes, and 
can be immediately used for the purposes of tuning. 

Thus, where upper partials, owing to the quality of tone, do not suffice, the 
combinational tones step in to make every imperfection in the consonant intervals 
of the Octave, Fifth, Fourth, major Sixth, major and minor Third immediately 
sensible by means of beats and roughness in the combined sound, and thus to dis- 
tinguish these intervals from all those adjacent to them. It is only perfectly simple 
tones that so far make default in determining the Thirds ; and for them also the 
beats which disturb the harmoniousness of imperfect Fifths and Fourths, are 
relatively too weak to affect the ear sensibly, because they depend on differential 
tones of higher orders. In reality, as I have already mentioned, two stopped pipes, 
giving tones which lie between a major and a minor Third apart, will give just as 
good a consonance as if the interval were exactly either a major or a minor Third. 
This does not mean that a practised musical ear would not find such an interval 
T strange and unusual, and hence would perhaps call it false, but the immediate im- 
pression on the ear, the simple perception of harmoniousness, considered indepen- 
dently of any musical habits, is in no respect worse than for one of the perfect 
intervals. + 

Matters are very different when more than two simple tones are sounded 
together. We have seen that Octaves are precisely limited even for simple tones 
by the beats of the first differential tone with the lower primary. Now suppose 
that an Octave has been tuned perfectly, and that then a third tone is interposed 
to act as a Fifth. Then if the Fifth is not perfect, beats will ensue from the first 
differential tone. 

Let the tones forming the perfect Octave have the pitch numbers 200 and 400, 
and let that of the imperfect Fifth be 301. The differential tones are 

400 - 301 =. 99 
f 301 - 200 = 101 

Number of beats 2 

These beats of the Fifth which lies between two Octaves are much more 
audible than those of the Fifth alone without its Octave. The latter depend on 
the weak differential tones of the second order, the former on those of the first 
order. Hence Scheibler some time ago laid down the rule for tuning tuning-forks, 
first to tune two of them as a perfect Octave, and then to sound them both at 
once with the Fifth, in order to tune the latter.^ If Fifth and Octave are both 
perfect, they also give together the perfect Fourth. 

The case is similar, when two simple tones have been tuned to be a perfect 

* [This wa.8 not given for simple tones be- for cases where neither partial nor combina- 

fore, but Scheibler cuculates the result in that tional tones are present, App. XX. sect. L. 

case, p. 26, and says he could use it still less art. 7. — Translator.] 
than for the major Third. — Translator.] X [I bave been unable to find the passage 

t [See Prof. Preyer's theory of consonance referrad to.— -TrafislcUor.] 



CHAP. XI. 



BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



203 



Fifth, and we interpose a new tone between them to act as a major Third. Let the 
perfect Fifth have the pit6h nimibers 400 and 600. On intercalating the impure 
major Third with the pitch nmnber 501 in lieu of 500, the differential tones are 

600 - 501 = 99 
501 - 400 = 101 



Number of beats 2* 

The major Sixth is determined by combining it with the Fourth. Let 300 and 
400 be the vibrational numbers of a perfect Fourth, and 501 that of an imperfect 
major Sixth. The differential tones are 

601 - 400 = 101 
400 - 300 = 100 



Number of beats 1 

If we tried to intercalate an interval between the tones forming a perfect 
Fourth, and having the vibrational numbers 300 and 400, it could only be the sub- 
minor Third with the vibrational number 350. Taking it imperfect and = 351, we 
have the differential tones 

400 - 361 = 49 
351 - 300 = 51 

Number of beats 2 

These intervals 8 : 7 and 7 : 6 are, however, too close to be consonances, and 
hence they can only be used in weak discords (chord of the dominant Seventh).f 

The above considerations are also applicable to any single compound tone con- 
sisting of several partials. Any two partials of sufficient force will also produce IT 
differential tones in the ear. If, then, the partials correspond exactly to the series 
of harmonic partials, as assigned by the series of smaller whole numbers, all these 
differentials resulting from partials coincide exactly with the partials themselves, 
and give no beats. Thus if the prime makes n vibrations in a second, the upper 
partials make 2n, 3n, 4n, &c., vibrations, and the differences of these numbers are 
again n, or 2n, or 3n, &c. The pitch numbers of the summational tones fall also 
into this series. 

On the other hand, if the pitch numbers of the upper partials are ever so 
sUghtly different from those giving these ratios, then the combinational tones will 
differ from one another and from the upper partials, and the result will be beats. 
The tone therefore ceases to make that uniform and quiet impression which a 
compound tone with harmonic upper partials always makes on the ear. How con- 
siderable this influence is, we may hear from any firmly attached harmonious 
string after we have fastened a small piece of wax on any part of its length. This, T 
as theory and experiment alike shew, produces an inharmonic relation of the 
upper partials. If the piece of wax is very small, then the alteration of tone is 
also very small. But the slightest mistuning suffices to do considerable harm 
to the tunefulness of the sound, and renders the tone dull and rough, like a tin 
kettle. 



* [On this was founded Scheibler*B method 
of tuning the peifect major Thiid (alluded to 
in p. 20(V2', note) and also the tempered major 
Third. 

First tune a perfect Fifth, and then an 
auxiliary Fifth, 2 vib. sharper. Then if the 
major Third is perfect we have A 220, Ct 276, 
E 882 and 275 - 220 » 55, 382 - 275 » 57, and 
57 - 55 = 2. Hence the tuning of C|j( must 
be altered till the differential tones beat 2 in 
a second. 

For the tempered major Third we have, 



using the perfect Fifth, A 220, Ctt 277-1824, 
^880. Then, 277-1824 - 220 = 57-1824, 880- 
277-1824=^52-8176 and 57*1824 = 52-8176 »= 
4*8648, and hence the tuning of the inter- 
mediate fork must be altered till these beats 
are heard. These are Schei bier's own ex- 
amples, p. 26, reduced to ordinary double 
vibrations. — 2Vafw2ator.] 

t [In actual practice, for the chord of the 
dominant Seventh the interval is 4 : 7^, the in- 
terval of the just subminor Seventh 4 : 7 not be- 
ing used, even in just intonation. — Translator,] 



204 BEATS DUE TO COMBINATIONAL TONES. part n. 

Herein we find the reason why tones with harmonic upper partials play such a 
leading part in the sensation of the ear. They are the only sounds which, even 
when very intense, can produce sensations that continue in undisturbed repose, 
without beats, corresponding to the purely periodic motion of the air, which is the 
objective foundation of these tones. I have already stated as a result of the 
summary which I give of the composition of musical tones in Chapter Y. , No. 2, 
p. 119a, that besides tones with harmonic upper partials, the only others used (and 
that also generally in a very subordinate manner) are either such as have a section 
of the series of harmonic upper partials (like those of well tuned bells), or such 
as have secondary tones (as those in bars) so very weak and so far distant from 
their primes, that their differentials have but little force and at any rate do not 
produce any distinct beats. 

Collecting the results of our investigations upon beats, we find that when two 
IT or more simple tones are sounded at the same time, they cannot go on sounding 
without mutual disturbance, unless they form with each other certain perfectly 
definite intervals. Such an undisturbed flow of simultaneous tones is called a 
consonance. When these intervals do not exist, beats arise, that is, the whole 
compound tones, or individual partial and combinational tones contained in them 
or resulting from them, alternately reinforce and enfeeble each other. The tones 
then do not coexist undisturbed in the ear. They mutually check each other's 
uniform flow. This process is called dissonance,* 

Combinational tones are the most general cause of beats. They are the sole 
cause of beats for simple tones which lie as much as, or more than, a minor Third 
apart, f For two simple tones they sufl&ce to delimit the Fifth, perhaps the 
Fourth, but certainly not the Thirds and Sixths. These, however, will be strictly 
delimited when the major Third is added to the Fifth to form the common major 
chord, and when the Sixth is united with the Fourth to form the chord of the 

f Sixth and Fourth, .. 

Thirds, however, are strictly delimited, by means of the beats of imperfect 
intervals, in a chord of two compound tones, each consisting of a prime and the 
two next partial tones. The beats of such intervals increase in strength and dis- 
tinctness, with the increase in number and strength of the upper partial tones 
in the compounds. By this means the difference between dissonance and conso- 
nance, and of perfectly from imperfectly tuned intervals, becomes continually more 
marked and distinct, increasing the certainty with which the hearer distinguishes 
the correct intervals, and adding much to the powerful and artistic effect of succes- 
sions of chords. Finally when the high upper partials are relatively too strong (in 
piercing and braying qualities of tone), each separate tone will by itself generate 
intermittent sensations of tone, and any combination of two or more compounds of 
this description produces a sensible increase of this harshness, while at the same 
f time the large number of partial and combinational tones renders it difficult for the 
hearer to follow a complicated arrangement of parts in a musical composition. 

These relations are of the utmost importance for the use of different instru- 
ments in the different kinds of musical composition. The considerations which 
determine the selection of the proper instrument for an entire composition or for 
individual phrases in movements written for an orchestra are very multifarious. 
First in rank stands mobility and power of tone in the different instruments. On 
this there is no need to dwell. The bowed instruments and pianoforte surpass all 
others in mobility, and then follow the flutes and oboes. To these are opposed the 
trumpets and trombones, which commence sluggishly, but surpass all instruments 
in power. Another essential consideration is expressiveness, which in general 
depends on the power of producing with certainty any degree of rapid alterations 
in loudness at the pleasure of the player. In this respect also bowed instruments, 

*[See Prof. Preyer's addendum to this fLButsee App. XX. sect. L.art. 3.— IVofw- 

theory in App. XX. sect. L. art. 1 .^TransUUor.] lator,] 



CHAP. XL DISSONANCE FOR DIFFERENT QUALITIES OF TONE. 206 

and the human voice, are pre-eminent. Artificial reed instruments, both of wood 
and brass, cannot materially diminish their power without stopping the action of 
the reeds. Flutes and organ pipes cannot greatly alter the force of their tone 
without at the same time altering their pitch. On the pianoforte the strength with 
which a tone commences is determined by the player, but not its duration ; so that 
the rhythm can be marked delicately, but real melodic expression is wanting. All 
these points in the use of the above instruments are easy to observe and have long 
been known and allowed for. The influence of quahty proper was more dffiicult 
to define. Our investigations, however, on the composition of musical tones have 
given us a means of taking into account the principal differences in the effect of 
the simultaneous action of different instruments and of shewing how the problem 
is to be solved, although there is still a large field left for a searching investigation 
in detail. 

Let us begin with the simple tones of wide stopped organ pipes. In themselves H 
they are very soft and mild, dull in the low notes, and very tuneful in the upper. 
They are quite unsuited, however, for combinations of harmony according to 
modem musical theory. We have already explained that simple tones of this kind 
discriminate only the very small interval of a Second by strong beats. Imperfect 
Octaves, and the dissonant intervals in the neighbourhood of the Octave (the 
Sevenths and Ninths), beat with the combinational tones, but these beats are 
weak in comparison with those due to upper partials. The beats of ihiperfect 
Fifths and Fourths are entirely inaudible except under the most favourable condi- 
tions. 'Hence in general the impression made on the ear by any dissonant interval, 
except the Second, differs very little from that made by consonances, and as a 
consequence the harmony loses its character and the hearer has no certainty in his 
perception of the difference of intervals.* If polyphonic compositions containing 
the harshest and most venturesome dissonances are played upon wide stopped 
organ pipes, the whole is uniformly soft and harmonious, and for that very reason H 
also indefinite, wearisome and weak, without character or energy. Every reader 
that has an opportunity is requested to try this experiment. There is no better 
proof of the important part which upper partial tones play in music, than the im- 
pression produced by music composed of simple tones, such as we have just 
described. Hence the wide stopped pipes of the organ are used only to give 
prominence to the extreme softness and tunefulness of certain phrases in contra- 
distinction to the harsher effect of other stops, or else, in connection with other 
stops, to strengthen their prime tones. Next to the wide stopped organ pipes as 
regards quality of tone stand flutes and the flue pipes on organs (open pipes, blown 
gently). These have the Octave plainly in addition to the prime, and when blown 
more strongly even produce the Twelfth. In this case the Octaves and Fifths are 
more distinctly delimited by upper partial tones ; but the definition of Thirds and 
Sixths has to depend upon combinational tones, and hence is much weaker. The 
musical character of these pipes is therefore not much unlike that of the wide II 
stopped pipes aJready described. This is well expressed by the old joke that nothing 
is more dreadful to a musical ear than a flute-concerto, except a concerto for two 
flutes, f But in combination with other instruments which give effect to the con- 
nection of the harmony, the flute, from the perfect softness of its tone and its 
great mobility, is extraordinarily pleasant and attractive, and cannot be replaced 
by any other instrument. In ancient music the flute played a much more im- 
portant part than at present, and this seems to accord with the whole ideal of 
classical art, which aimed at keeping everything unpleasant from its productions, 
confining itself to pure beauty, whereas modem art requires more abundant means 

* [But see Prof. Preyer in App. XX. sect. L. a concerto or peculiar piece of music for one 

art. 7. — Translator,] instrument, and secondly as a concert^ or piece 

t [In the original, * dass einem musikal- of music for several instruments, cannot be 

ischen Ohre nichts schrecklicher sei als ein properly rendered in the translation. — Trans^ 

Fldtenconcert, ausgenommen ein Concert von lator.] 
sswei Floten.' The pun on * Concert,' first as 



206 



DISSONANCE FOR DIFFERENT QUALITIES OF TONE. 



PAST U. 



of expression, and consequently to a oertain extent admits into its circle what in 
itself would be contrary to the gratification of the senses. However this be, the 
earnest friends of music, even in classical times, contended for the harsher tones 
of stringed instruments in opposition to the effeminate flute. 

The open organ pipes afford a favourable means of meeting the harmonic 
requirements of polyphonic music, and consequently form the principal stops.* 
They make the lower partials distinctly audible, the wide pipes up to the third, the 
narrow ones (geigen principal^) up to the sixth partial tone. The wider pipes 
have more power of tone than the narrower ; to give them more brightness the 
8-foot stops, which contain the ' principal work,' are connected with the 4-foot 
stops, which add the Octave to each note, or the principal is connected with the 
geigen principal^ so that the first gives power and the second brightness. By this 
means qualities of tone are produced which contain the first six partial tones in 

f moderate force, decreasing as the pitch ascends. These give a very distinct feeling 
for the purity of the consonant intervals, enabling us to distinguish clearly between 
consonance and dissonance, and preventing the unavoidable but weak dissonances 
that result from the higher upper partials in the imperfect consonances, from be- 
coming too marked, but at the same time not allowing the hearer's appreciation of 
the progression of the parts to be disturbed by a multitude of loud accessory tones. 
In this respect the organ has an advantage over all other instruments, as the 
player is able to mix and alter the qualities of tone at pleasure, and make them 
suitable to the character of the piece he has to perform. 

The narrow stopped pipes {Quintaten),^ for which the prime tone is ac- 
companied by the Twelfth, the reed-flute {Bohrfl<>te),^ where the third and fifth 
partials are both present, the conical open pipes, as the goat-horn {Oemshom)** 
which reinforce certain higher partialsff more than the lower, and so forth, serve 
only to give distinctive qualities of tone for particular parts, and thus to separate 

f them from the rest. They are not well adapted for forming the chief mass of the 
harmony. 

Very piercing qualities of tone are produced by the reed pipes and com/pound 
stops Xi on the organ. The latter, as already explained, are artificial imitations of 
the natural composition of all musical tones, each key bringing a series of pipes 
into action, which correspond to the first three or first six partial tones of the 
corresponding note. They can be used only to accompany congregational singing. 
When employed alone they produce insupportable noise and horrible confusion. 
But when the singing of the congregation gives overpowering force to the prime 
tones in the notes of the melody, the proper relation of quality of tone is restored, 
and the result is a powerful, well-proportioned mass of sound. Without the 
assistance of these compound stops it would be impossible to control a vast body 
of sound produced by unpractised voices, such as we hear in [(xerman] churches. 
The hunum voice is on the whole not imlike the organ in quality, so far as 

f harmony is concerned. The brighter vowels, of course, generate isolated high 
partial tones, but these are so unconnected with the rest that they can have no 
universal and essential effect on the sound of the chords. For this we must look 
to the lower partials, which are tolerably uniform for all vowels. But of course in 
particular consonances the characteristic tone of the vowels may play an important 
part. If, for example, two human voices sing the major Third h^ d' on the vowel 
a m father, the fourth partial of h\) (or 6"|>), and the third partial of d* (or a"), fall 
among the tones characteristically reinforced by A^ and consequently the imperfec- 
tion of the consonance of a major Third will come out harshly by the dissonance 
a" V*\), between these upper partials ; whereas if the vowel be changed to o in no, 
the dissonance disappears. On the other hand the Fourth h\f e*\^ sounds perfectly 



♦ [See p. 1414', note %,—Translaior.'] 
+ [See p. 141d, note. — TranslcUor,] 
t [See p. 83d, note.^Tran8lator.] 
§ [See p. 9id't note.— -TranaUitor.] 



•♦ [See p. 94d, note,—Trafulator,] 
ft [Generally the 4th, 6th, and 7th.- 
Translator.^ 

IfX [See p. 57<i', note. — Translator.] 



CHAP. XI. DISSONANCE FOR DIFFERENT QUALITIES OF TONE. 



207 



well on the vowel a in father^ beoause the higher note e'\^ has the same upper par- ' 
tial b"\^ as the deeper b\}» But if a in father be inclined towards a in /aZZ, or a in 
faty the upper partials f and e")^ or else d"* and e"'\) might interrupt the con- 
sonance. This serves to shew, among other things, that the translation of the 
words of a song from one language into another is not by any means a matter 
of indifference for its musical effect.'* 

Disregarding at present these reinforcements of partials due to the characteristic 
resonance of each vowel, the musical tones of the human voice are on the whole 
accompanied by the lower partials in moderate strength, and hence are well adapted 
for combinations of chords, precisely as the tones of the principal stops of the 
organ. Besides this the human voice has a peculiar advantage over the organ and 
all other musical instruments in the execution of polyphonic music. The words 
which are sung connect the notes belonging to each part, and form a clue which 
readily guides the hearer to discover and pursue the related parts of the whole body H 
of sound. Hence polyphonic music and the whole modem system of harmony 
were first developed on the human voica Indeed, nothing can exceed the musical 
effect of well harmonised part music perfectly executed in just intonation by prac- 
tised voices. For the complete harmoniousness of such music it is indispensably 
necessary that the several musical intervals should be justly intoned, and our pre- 
sent singers f unfortunately seldom learn to take just intervals, because they are 
accustomed from the first to sing to the accompaniment of instruments which are 
tuned in equal temperament, and hence with imperfect consonances. It is only 
such singers as have a delicate musical feeling of their own who find out the 
correct result, which is no longer taught them. 

Richer in upper partials, and consequently brighter in tone than the human 
voice and the principal stops on the organ, are the bowed instruments, which con- 
sequently fill such an important place in music. Their extraordinary mobility and 
expressiveness give them the first place in instrumental music, and the moderate K 
acuteness of their quahty of tone assigns them an intermediate position between 
the softer flutes and the braying brass instruments. There is a slight difference 
between the different instruments of this class ; the tenor and double-bass have a 
somewhat acuter and thinner quality than the violin and violoncello, that is, they 
have relatively stronger upper partials. The audible partials reach to the sixth or 
eighth, according as the bow is brought nearer the finger-board for pia/nOj or nearer 
the bridge for forte, and they decrease regularly in force as they ascend in pitch. 
Hence on bowed instruments the difference between consonance and dissonance is 



* [Also, it shews how the musical effect of 
different stanzas in a ballad, though sung to the 
same written notes, will constancy vary, quite 
independently of difference of expression. This 
is often remarkable on the dosing cadence of 
the stanza. As the vowel changes from a in 
fcUh&r, to a in mat ; e in fnet, or i in ai^, or 
again to o in not, u in but, and u in put^ the 
musical result is totally different, though the 
pitch remains unaltered. To shew the effect 
of the different vowels throughout a piece of 
music, I asked a set of about 8 voices to sing, 
before about 200 others, the first half of See 
the conquering hero oomes, first to lah, then to 
lee, and then to loo. The difference of effect 
was almost ludicrous. Much has to be studied 
in the relation of the qualities of vowels to the 
effect of the music. In this respect, too, the 
piteh chosen for the tonic will be found of great 
importance. — Translator,] 

t [This refers to Qermany, not to the Eng- 
lish Tonic Solfaists, nor to the English mad- 
rigal singers. On Dec. 27, 1869, at a meeting 
of the Tonic Solfa Oollege I had an unusual 
opportunity of contrasting the effect of just 



and tempered intonation in the singing of the 
same choir. It was a choir of about 60 mixed 
voices, which had gained the prize at the In- 
ternational Exhibition at Paris in 1867, and 
had been kept well together ever since. After 
singing some pieces without accompaniment, IT 
ana hence in the just intonation to which the 
singers had been trained, and with the most 
delightful effect of harmony, they sang a piece 
with a pianoforte accompaniment. Of course 
the pianoforte itself was inaudible among the 
mass of sound produced by sixty voices. But 
it had the effect of perverting their intonation, 
and the whole charm of the sinking was at 
once destroyed. There was nothing left but 
the everyday singing of an ordinary choir. 
The disillusion was complete and the effect 
most unsatisfcMstory as a conclusion. If the 
same piece of music or succession of chords in 
O major or G minor, without any modulation, 
be played first on the Harmonical and then be 
contrasted with an ordinary tempered har- 
monium, the same kind of difference will be 
felt, but not so strongly. — Translator.] 



208 



DISSONANCE FOR DIFFERENT QUALITIES OF TONE. 



PABT H. 



clearly and distinctly marked, and the feeling for the justness of the intervals very 
certain ; indeed it is notorious that practised violin and violoncello players have a 
very delicate ear for distinguishing differences of pitch. On the other hand the 
piercing character of the tones is so marked, that soft song-like melodies are not 
well suited for bowed instruments, and are better given to flutes and clarinets in 
the orchestra. Full chords are also relatively too rough, since those upper partiais 
which form dissonant intervals in every consonance, are sufficiently strong to make 
the dissonance obtrusive, especially for Thirds and Sixths. Moreover, the ini> 
perfect Thirds and Sixths of the tempered musical scale are on bowed instruments 
very perceptibly different in effect from the justly intoned Thirds and Sixths when 
the player does not know how to substitute the pure intervals for them, as the ear 
requires. Hence in compositions for bowed instruments, slow and flowing progres- 
sions of chords are introduced by way of exception only, because they are not 

f sufficiently harmonious ; quick movements and figures, and arpeggio chords are 
preferred, for which these instruments are extremely well adapted, and in which 
the acute and piercing character of their combined sounds cannot be so distinctly 
perceived. 

The beats have a peculiar character in the case of bowed instruments. Regular, 
slow, numerable beats seldom occur. This is owing to the minute irregularities in 
the action of the bow on the string, already described, to which is due the well- 
known scraping effect so often heard. Observations on the vibrational figure 
shew that every little scrape of the bow causes the vibrational curve to jump sud- 
denly backwards or forwards, or in physical terms, causes a sudden alteration in the 
phase of vibration. Now since it depends solely on the difference of phase whether 
two tones which are sounded at the same time mutually reinforce or enfeeble each 
other, every minutest catching or scraping of the bow will also affect the flow of the 
beats, and when two tones of the same pitch are played, every jump in the phase will 

IT suffice to produce a change in the loudness, just as if irregular beats were occurring 
at unexpected moments. Hence the best instruments and the best players are 
necessary to produce slow beats or a uniform flow of sustained consonant chords. 
Probably this is one of the reasons why quartettes for bowed instruments, when 
executed by players who can play solo pieces pleasantly enough, sometimes sound 
so intolerably rough and harsh that the effect bears no proper ratio to the slight 
roughness which each individual player produces on his own instrument.* When 
I was making observations on vibrational figures, I found it difficult to avoid the 
occurrence of one or two jumps in the figure every second. Now in solo-playing 
the tone of the string is thus interrupted for almost inappreciably minute instants, 
which the hearer scarcely perceives, but in a quartette when a chord is played for 
which all the notes have a common upper partial tone, there would be from four 
to eight sudden and irregular alterations of loudness in this common tone every 
second, and this could not pass unobserved. Hence for good combined performance, 

^ a much greater evenness of tone is required than for solo-playing, f 

The pia/noforte takes the first place among stringed instruments for which the 
strings are struck. The previous analysis of its quality of tone shews that its 
deeper octaves are rich, but its higher octaves relatively poor, in upper partial tones. 
In the lower octaves, the second or third partial tone is often as loud as the prime, 
nay, the second partial is often louder than the prime. The consequence is that 



* [To myself, one of the principal reasons 
for the painful effect here alluded to, which is 
unfortunately so extremely well known, is the 
fact that the players not having been taught the 
nature of just intonation, do not accommodate 
the pitches of the notes properly. When 
quartette players are used to one another they 
overcome this difficulty. But when they learn 
thus, it is a mereaccommodation of thedifferent 
intervals by ear to the playing of (say) the 
leader. (See App. XX. sect. Q. art. 7.) The real 
relations of the just tones are in fact not gen- 



erally known. If the music notes could be 
previously marked by duodenals, in the way 
suggested in App. XX. sect. E. art. 26, much 
of this difficulty might be avoided from the 
first. But the marking would require a study 
not yet commenced by the greater number of 
musicians. — Translator. "] 

t[On violins combinational tones are 
strong. I have been told that violinists watch 
for the Octave differential tone, in tuning their 
Fifths.— Trans iator.] 



CHAP. XI. DISSONANCE FOR DIFFERENT QUALITIES OF TONE. 209 

the dissonances near the Octave (the Sevenths and Ninths) are almost as harsh as 
the Seconds, and that diminished and augmented Twelfths and Fifths are rather 
rough. The 4th, 5th, and 6th partial tones, on the other hand, on which the Thirds 
depend, decrease rapidly in force, so that the Thirds are relatively much less dis- 
tinctly delimited than the Octaves, Fifths, and Fourths. This last circumstance is 
important, because it makes the sharp Thirds of the equal temperament much more 
endurable upon the piano than upon other instruments with a more piercing quality 
of tone, whereas the Octaves, Fifths, and Fourths are delimited with great distinct- 
ness and certainty. Notwithstanding the relatively large number of upper partial 
tones on the pianoforte, the impression produced by dissonances is far from being so 
penetrating as on instruments of long-sustained tones. On the piano the note is 
powerful only at the moment when it is struck, and rapidly decreases in strength, 
so that the beats which characterise the dissonances have not time to become 
sensible during the strong commencement of the tone ; they do not even begin IT 
until the tone is greatly diminished in intensity. Hence in the modem music 
written for the pianoforte, since the time that Beethoven shewed how the charac- 
teristic peculiarities of the instrument were to be utilised in compositions, we find 
an accumulation and reduplication of dissonant intervals which would be perfectly 
insupportable on other instruments. The great difference becomes very evident 
when an attempt is made to play recent compositions for the piano on the har- 
monium or organ. 

That instrument-makers, led solely by practised ears, and not by any theory, 
should have found it most advantageous to arrange the striking place of the 
hammer so that the 7th partial tone entirely disappears, and the 6th is weak 
although actually present,* is manifestly connected with the structure of our system 
of musical tones. The dth and 6th partial tones serve to delimit the minor 
Third, and in this way almost all the intervals treated as consonances in modem 
music are determined on the piano by coincident upper partials ; the Octave, Fifth, IT 
and Fourth by relatively loud tones ; the major Sixth and major Third by weak 
ones; and the minor Third by the weakest of all. If the 7th partial tone 
were also present, the subminorf Seventh 4 : 7, as c'^^'b, would injure the har- 
moniousness of the minor Sixth ; the subminor Fifth 5 : 7, as €'"^6% that of the 
Fifth and Fourth ; and the subminor Third 6 : 7, as g''^b% that of the minor Third ; 
without any gain in the more accurate determination of new intervals suitable for 
musical purposes. 

Mention has already been made of a further peculiarity in the selection of 
quality of tone on the pianoforte, namely that its upper notes have fewer and weaker 
upper partial tones than the lower. This difference is much more marked on the 
piano than on any other instrument, and the musical reason is easily assigned. The 
high notes are usually played in combination with much lower notes, and the 
relation between the two groups of notes is given by the high upper partials of the 
deeper tones. When the interval between the bass and treble amounts to two or IT 
three Octaves, the second Octave, higher Third and Fifth of the bass note, are in 
the close neighbourhood of the treble, and form direct consonances and dissonances 
with it, without any necessity for using the upper partials of the treble note. 
Hence the only effect of upper partials on the highest notes of the pianoforte 
would be to give them shrillness, without any gain in respect to musical definition. 
In actual practice the construction of the hammers on good instruments causes 
the notes of the highest Octaves to be only gently accompanied by their second 
partials. This makes them mild and pleasant, with a flute-like tone. Some 
instrument-makers, however, prefer to make these notes shrill and piercing, • like 
the piccolo flute, by transferring the striking place to the very end of the highest 
strings. This contrivance succeeds in increasing the force of the upper partial 

* [But see Mr. Hipkins* observations on The 7th partial was very distinct on the pianos 
pp. 77, 78, note. — Translator,] Mr. Hipkins examined. See also App. XX. 

t [For these terms see the table on p. 187. sect. I^.—Tramlator.] 

P 



210 DISSONANCE FOR DIFFERENT QUALITIES OF TONE. pabt n. 

tones, but gives a quality of tone to these strings which does not suit the character 
of the others, and hence certainly detracts from their charm. 

In many other instruments, where their construction does not admit of such 
absolute control over the quality of tone as on the pianoforte, attempts have been 
made to produce similar varieties of quality in the high notes, by other means. 
In the bowed instruments this purpose is served by the resonance box, the proper 
tones of which lie within the deepest Octaves of the scale of the instrument. Since 
the partial tones of the sounding strings are reinforced in proportion to their 
proximity to the partial tones of the resonance box, this resonance will assist the 
prime tones of the higher notes, as contrasted with their upper partials, much 
more than it will do so for the deep notes. On the contrary, the deepest notes of 
the violin will have not only their prime tones, but also their Octaves and Fifths 
favoured by the resonance; for the deeper proper tone of the resonance box 
flies between the prime and 2nd partial, and its higher proper tone between 
the 2nd and 3rd partials. A similar effect is attained in the compowid stops of 
the organ, by making the series of upper partial tones, which are represented by 
distinct pipes, less extensive for the higher than for the lower notes in the stop. 
Thus each digital opens six pipes for the lower octaves, answering to the first six 
partial tones of its note ; but in the two upper octaves, the digital opens only three 
or even two pipes, which give the Octave and Twelfth, or merely the Octave, in 
addition to the prime. 

There is also a somewhat similar relation in the human voice, although it 
varies much for the different vowels. On comparing the higher and lower notes 
which are sung to the same vowel, it will be found that the resonance of the cavity 
of the mouth generally reinforces relatively high upper partials of the deep notes 
of the bass, whereas for the soprano, where the note sung comes near to the charac- 
teristic pitch of the vowel, or even exceeds it, all the upper partials become much 
f weaker. Hence in general, at least for the open vowels, the audible upper partials 
of the bass are much more numerous than those of the soprano. 

We have still to consider the artificial reed instruments, that is the wind instru- 
ments of wfiod and brass. Among the former the clarinet, among the latter the 
horn are distinguished for the softness of their tones, whereas the bassoon and 
hautbois in the first class, and the trombone and trumpet in the second represent 
the most penetrating qualities of tone used in music. 

Notwithstanding that the keyed horns used for so-called concerted music have 
a far less braying quality of tone than trumpets proper, which have no side holes, 
yet the number and the force of their upper partial tones are far too great for the 
harmonious effect of the less perfect consonances, and the chords on these instru- 
ments are very noisy and harsh, so that they are only endurable in the open air. 
In artistic orchestral music, therefore, trumpets and trombones, which on account 
of their penetrative power cannot be dispensed with, are seldom employed for 
f harmonies, except for a few and if possible perfect consonances. 

The clarinet is distinguished from all other orchestral wind instruments by 
having no evenly numbered partial tones. "^ To this circimistance must be due many 
remarkable deviations in the effect of its chords from those of other instruments. 
When two clarinets are playing together all of the consonant intervals will be 
delimited by combinational tones alone, except the major Sixth 3 : 5, and the 
Twelfth 1 : 3. But the differential tones of the first order, which are the strongest 
among all combinational tones, will always suffice to produce the beats of imperfect 
consonances. Hence it follows that in general the consonances of two clarinets 
have but little definition, and must be proportionately agreeable. This is really the 
case, except for the minor Sixth and minor Seventh, which are too near the major 
Sixth, and for the Eleventh and minor Thirteenth, which are too near the Twelfth. 
On the other hand, when a clarinet is played in combination with a violin or oboe, 
the majority of consonances will have a perceptibly different effect according as 

* [But Bee Mr. Blaikley's observations, supra, p. 99b, note. — Translator.] 



CHAPS. XI. xn. THE CONSONANT CHORDS. 211 

the clarinet takes the upper or the lower note of the chord. Thus the major 
Third d' f% will sound better when the clarinet takes d* and the oboe/j^ so that 
the 5th partial of the clarinet coincides with the 4th of the oboe. The 3rd and 
4th and the 5th and 6th partials, which are so disturbing in the major Third, ^ 
cannot here be heard, because the 4th and 6th partials do not exist on the clarinet. 
But if the oboe takes d* and the clarinet /iL the coincident 4th partial will be 
absent, and the disturbing 3rd and 5th present. For the same reason it follows 
that the Fourth and minor Third will sound better when the clarinet takes the 
upper tone. I have made experiments of this kind with the clarinet and a bright 
stop of the harmonium, which possessed the evenly numbered partial tones, and 
was tuned in just intonation f and not in equal temperament. When h\) was played 
on the clarinet, and e'|^, d\ d'j^, in succession on the harmonium, the major 
Third h\^ d* sounded better than the Fourth h)^ e'\f, and much better than the 
minor Third b\f d'\^. If, retaining b\^ on the clarinet, I played/, g\^y g in succession 5| 
on the harmonium, the major Third g\^ b\f was rougher, not merely than the Fourth 
/ b\}y but even than the minor Third g b\f. 

This example, to which I was led by purely theoretical considerations that 
were immediately confirmed by experiment, will serve to shew how the use of 
exceptional qualities of tone will affect the order of agreeableness of the conso- 
nances which was settled for those usually heard. 

Enough has been said to shew the readiness with which we can now account 
for numerous peculiarities in the effects of playing different musical instruments 
in combination. Further details are rendered impossible by the want of sufficient 
preliminary investigations, especially into the exact differences of various qualities 
of tone. But in any case it would lead us too far from our main purpose to pursue 
a subject which has rather a technical than a general interest. 



CHAPTER XII. 

CHORDS. 

Ws have hitherto examined the effect of sounding together only two tones which 
form a determinate interval. It is now easy to discover what will happen when 
more than two tones are combined. The simultaneous production of more than 
two separate compound tones is called a chord. We will first examine the har- 
moniousness of chords in the same sense as we examined the harmoniousness of 
any two tones sounded together. That is, we shall in this section deal exclusively 
with the isolated effect of the chord in question, quite independently of any musical 
connection, mode, key, modulation, and so on. The first problem is to determine 
under what conditions chords are consonant^ in which case they are termed concords. 
It is quite clear that the first condition of a concord is that each tone of it should % 
form a consonance with each of the other tones ; for if any two tones formed a 
dissonance, beats would arise destro3ring the tunefulness of the chord. Concords 
of three tones are readily found by taking two consonant intervals to any one 
fundamental tone as c, and then seeing whether the new third interval between 
the two new tones, which is thus produced, is also consonant. If this is the case 
each one of the three tones forms a consonant interval with each one of the 
other two, and the chord is consonant, or is a concord.^ 

Let us confine ourselves in the first place to intervals which are less than an 
Octave. The consonant intervals within these limits, we have found to be : 1) the 
Fifth c gr, I ; 2) the Fourth c/, ^ ; 3) the major Sixth ca, | ; 4) the major Third 
c e, f ; 5) the minor Third ce\}, }\ 6) the minor Sixth c a\f, | ; to which we may 

* [See table on p. 191, note. — Translator.] third are dissonant with each other, I call the 

t [Try the Harmonical and olarinet. — result a * con-dissonant triad '• See App. XX. 

Translator.] sect. E. art. 5.— -Translator.] 
X[U two tones each consonant with a 

p2 



212 



THE CONSONANT CHORDS. 



PART 11. 



add 7) the subminor or natural Seventh c'^b\}, I, which approaches to the minor 
Sixth in harmoniousness. The following table gives a general view of the chords 
contained within an Octave. The chord is supposed to consist of the funda- 
mental tone Cy some one tone in the first horizontal line, and some one tone of 
the first vertical column. Where the line and column corresponding to these 
two selected tones intersect, is the name of the interval which these two latter 
tones form with each other. This name is printed in italics when the interval is 
consonant^ and in Roman letters when dissonant, so that the eye sees at a glance 
what concords are thus produced. [Under the name, the equivalent internal in 
cents has been inserted by the Translator.] 



If 



H 



c 




702 


498 


884 


386 


^b« 
316 


^b« 

814 


702 












498 


major 
Second 

1 
204 











^1 

884 


major 
Second 

V- 

182 


major 
Third 

1 
886 








386 


minor 
Third 

316 


minor 
Second 

H 
112 


Fourth 

1 

498 








816 


major 
Third 

386 


major 
Second 

182 


superfluous 
Fourth 

H 
568 


minor 
Second 

H 

70 






814 


minor 
Second 

112 


minor 
Third 

% 
316 


minor 
Second 

H 

70 


diminished 
Fourth 

« 
428 


Fourth 
498 




969 


subminor 
Third 

i 
267 


sub 
Fourth 

H 
471 


subminor 
Second 

H 
85 


subminor 
Fifth 

t 
583 


sub 
Fifth 

II 

658 


submajor 
Second 

H 

155 



From this it follows that the only consonant triads or chords of three notes, 
that can possibly exist within the compass of an Octave are the following : — 

^ 1) C E G 2) CE\^ G 

3) CF A 4:) CF A\^ 

5) CE\) A\) 6) CE A* 

The two first of these triads are considered in musical theory as the funda- 
mental triads from which all others are deduced. They may each be regarded as 
composed of two Thirds, one major and the other minor, superimposed in different 
orders. The chord G E G^ in which the major Third is below, and the minor 
above, is a major triad. It is distinguished from all other major triads by having 
its tones in the closest position, that is, forming the smallest intervals with each 
other. It is hence considered as the fundamental chord or basis of all other major 
chords. The triad C E\} G, which has the minor Third below, and the major above, 
is the fundamental chord of all minor triads. 



* [The reader ought to hear the whole set 
of triads that could be formed from the table, 
at least all exclusive of those formed by the 
last line. The ordinary tuning of the harmo- 



nium, organ, and piano does not permit this. 
But they can all (inclusive of those formed by 
the last line) be played on the Harmonical. — 
Trofnslator,] 



CHAP. xn. DIFFERENCE BETWEEN MAJOR AND MINOR CHORDS. 213 

The next two chords, C F A and G F A\^j are termed, from their composition, 

chords of the Sixth and Fourth, written . [C to F being a Fourth, and C to -4 

a major, but C ix> A\f & minor Sixth]. If we take G, instead of C for the funda- 
mental or bass tone, these chords of the Fourth and Sixth become G, C E and 
G, C E}}. Hence we may conceive them as having been formed from the funda- 
mental major and minor triads C E G and C E\} (r, by transposing the Fifth G an 
Octave lower, when it becomes (r^. 

The two last chords, C E\^ A^ and C E A, are termed chords of the Sixth and 

Third, or simply chords of the Sixth, written „ [C to -EJ being a major Third, and G 

to E\} 2k minor Third ; and C to A b, major Sixth, and C to il^ a minor Sixth]. If 
we take E as the bass note of the first, and E\} as that of the second, they become 
E G c, E\} G c, respectively. Hence they may be considered as the transpositions IT 
or inversions of a fundamental major and a fundamental minor chord, C E G, 
C E\} G, in which the bass note C is transposed an Octave higher and becomes c. 
Collecting these inversions, the six consonant triads will assume the following 
form [the numbers shewing their correspondence with the forms on p. 212(2] : — 

1) C E G 2) G E\^ G 

5) E G c 6) E\^ G c 

3) Gee 4) G c e\) 

We must observe that although the natural or subminor Seventh ^^[^ forms a 
good consonance with the bass note 0, a consonance which is indeed rather superior 
than inferior to the minor Sixth G A\^y yet it never forms part of any triad, because 
it would make worse consonances with all the other intervals consonant to G than 
it does with G itself. The best triads which it can produce are G E^ B\^=^^:5 :7, 
and G (?^ -Bb = 4 : 6 : 7. In the first of these occurs the interval ^ J5|> « 5 : 7, f 
(between a Fourth and Fifth,) in the latter the subminor Third G^ i?|> = 6 : 7.* 
On the other hand the minor Sixth makes a perfect Fourth with the minor Third, 
so that this minor Sixth remains the worst interval in the chords of the Sixth and 
Third, and of the Sixth and Fourth, for which reason these triads can still be con- 
sidered as consonant. This is the reason why the natural or subminor Seventh is 
never used as a consonance in harmony, whereas the minor Sixth can be employed, 
although, considered independently, it is not more harmonious than the subminor 
Seventib. 

The triad G E A\^ to which we shall return [Chap. XVII. Dissonant Triads, 
No. 4], is very instructive for the theory of music. It must be considered as a 
dissonance, because it contains the diminished Fourth E A\f, having the interval 
ratio 14' Now this diminished Fourth E A\^ is so nearly the same as a major 
Third E Gjt, that on our keyed instruments, the organ and pianoforte, the two 
intervals are not distinguished. We have in fact IT 

E A\^^ 
or, approximatively {^ ^b) =* (-^ 

On the pianoforte it would seem as if this triad, which for practical purposes may 
be written either G E A\} or G E Gjf^, must be consonant, since each one of its 
tones forms with each of the others an interval which is considered as consonant 
on the piano, and yet this chord is one of the harshest dissonances, as all musicians 
are agreed, and as any one can convince himself immediately. On a justly intoned 
instrument [as the Harmonical] the interval E A\} is immediately recognised as 
dissonant. This chord is well adapted for shewing that the original meaning of 
the intervals asserts itself even with the imperfect tuning of the piano, and deter- 
mines the judgment of the ear. | 

* [Add the consonance G^J3|yZ)=6 : 7 : 9. — cents, difference 42 cents, the great diesis. 
Translator.] See App. XX. sect. D. — Translator.] 

i[E A^ haa 428 cents, and E G| has 386 X [Inserting the values of the intervals in 




214 DIFFBRBNOE BBTWEBN MAJOR AND MINOR CHORDS, part ii. 

The harmonious effect of the various inversions of triads already found depends 
in the first place upon the greater or less perfection of the consonance of the several 
intervals they contain. We have found that the Fourth is less agreeable than the 
¥ilth, and that minor are less agreeable than major Thirds and Sixths. Now the 
triad 

GEO has a Fifth, a major Third, and a minor Third 
E G C ff ek Fourth, a minor Third, and a minor Sixth 
G C E yy & Fourth, a major Third, and a major Sixth 

C E\} G ,, a Fifth, a minor Third, and a major Third 
E\} G C „ a Fourth, a major Third, and a major Sixth 
G G E\^ „ a Fourth, a minor Third, and a minor Sixth 

For just intervals the Thirds and Sixths decidedly disturb the general tuneful - 
IT ness more than the Fourths, and hence the major chords of the Sixth and Fourth 
are more harmonious than those in the fundamental position, and these again 
than the chords of the Sixth and Third. On the other hand the minor chords of 
the Sixth and Third are more agreeable than those in the fundamental position, 
and these again are better than the minor chords of the Sixth and Fourth. This 
conclusion will be found perfectly correct for the middle parts of the scale, pro- 
vided the intervals are all justly intoned. The chords must be struck separately, 
and not connected by any modulation. As soon as modulational connections 
are allowed, as for example in a concluding cadence, the tonic feeling, which finds 
repose in the tonic chord, disturbs the power of observation, which is here the 
point of importance. In the lower parts of the scale either major or minor Thirds 
are more disagreeable than Sixths. 

Judging merely from the intervals we should expect that the minor triad 
G E\} G would sound as weU as the major J^ G, as each has a Fifth, a major 
11 and a minor Third. T^his is, however, far from being the case. The minor triad 
is very decidedly less harmonious than the major triad, in consequence of the 
combinational tones, which must consequently be here taken into consideration. 
In treating of the relative harmoniousness of the consonant intervals we have seen 
that combinational tones may produce beats when two intervals are compounded, 
even when each interval separately produced no beats at all, or at least none 
distinctly audible (pp. 2006-2046). 

Hence we must determine the combinational tones of the major and minor 
triads. We shall confine ourselves to the combinational tones of the first order 
produced by the primes and the first upper partial tones. In the following 
examples the primes are marked as minims, the combinational tones resulting 
from these primes are represented by crotchets, those from the primes and first 
upper partials by quavers and semiquavers. A downward sloping line, when 
placed before a note, shews that it represents a tone slightly deeper than that 
IT of the note in the scale which it precedes. 

1.) Major Triads with their Combinational Tones : * 

cents, the two chords, A^^ 886 C 886 i?, sknd triads does not apply to tempered chords, in 

C 886 El 386 GJJL are seen to he identical, none of which are any of the intervals purely 

hut when the first is inverted to O 886 Ei consonant.— TransZa^or.] 
428 ^'[> it becomes different from the other. * [As all the differentials must be harmonics 

Both, however, remain harshly dissonant. On of C 66, if we represent this note b^ 1, the 

tempered instruments of course they become harmonics and hence differentials will all be 

identical C 400 ^ 400 GJL C 400 ^ 400 ^l)^, and contained in the series 
are very harsh. The definition of consonant 



1 


2 


3 


4 


5 


6 


7 


8 


9 


10 


11 


12 


18 


14 


15 


16 


c 


c 


9 


c' 


e' 


g' 


'n 


c" 


d" 


e" 


Uf't 


9" 


isa" 


76"b 


b" 


c'" 



First C/ior<i.— The notes will then be 4, 6, 6, Second Chord,— Notea 5, 6, 8 ; Octaves 10, 

represented by minims, and their Octaves 8, 12, 16. 
10, 12, which are not given in notes. 1) Crotchets, 6-6=1, 8-6 = 2, 8-5=3. 

1) Crotchets, 6-4 = 6-5=1, 6-4 = 2. 2) Quavers, 10-8=12- 10=2, 12-8=4. 

8) Quavers, 12-10=2, 8-5=3. 3) Semiquaver8,12- 5=7, 16-6=10, (but 

4) Semiquavers, 12-5=7, 12-4=8. this is also an audible partial,) 16-5»11, 



CHAP. xn. DIFFERENCE BETWEEN MAJOR AND MINOR CHORDS. 



215 




:^=^W 



-IT 

r 




:^ 



^ite 



:=1= 



B^ 



2.) Minor Triads with their Combinational Tones : 



^IB 




u 



In the major triads the combinational tones of the first order, and even the 
deeper combinational tones of the second order (written as crotchets and quavers) 
are merely doubles of the tones of the triad in deeper Octaves. The higher 
combinational tones of the second order (written as semiquavers) are extremely 
weak, because, other conditions being the same, the intensity of combinational 
tones decreases as the interval between the generating tones increases, with which 
again the high position of these combinational tones is connected. I have always ^ 



which being more than half an equal Semi- 
tone (51 cents) above equally tempered /" is 
represented on the staff as a flattened f% 

Third Chord.-^li^otes, 6, 8, 10 ; Octaves 12, 
16,20. 

1) Crotchets, 10-8=8-6=2, 10-6=4. 

2) Quavers, 12-10=2, 12-8=4. 
8) Semiquavers, 20-6=14. 

Mow far these higher notes marked by 
semiquavers are efiEeotive, except possibly 
when they beat with each other, or with some 
partials of the original notes, remains to be 



proved. — Translator,] 

*[In minor chords the case is different. 
On referring to the list of harmonics in the 
last note, it will be seen that the only minor 
chord is 10, 12, 15 or e" g" h'\ and this is the 
chord upon the major Third above the third 
Octave of the fundamental. Hence in the 
example where the chord taken is d e']j g' 
and its inversions, the harmonics must be 
formed on A,)j which is the same interval 
below c'. The list of harmonics in these 
examples is therefore 



123456789 

A,}, A,\f E\^ A\f c 0b Vb (^ &b 

18 20 21 22 24 25 26 27 28 

6'b c" '^"b "^"b «"b «" 'T /' Vb 

The omitted harmonics are not used in this 
investigation, though differentials of higher 
orders occur up to the 48th harmonic. 

First CTiofd.— Notes 10, 12, 15 ; Octaves 20, 
24 80. 

' 1) Crotchets, 12-10=2, 16-12=8, 15- 
10=5. 

2) Quavers, 20-15=5, 20-12=8, 24-15 
=9. 

8) Semiquavers, 24-10=14, 80-12=18, 
30-10=20. 

Seamd Chord.— l^oies 12, 15, 20; Octaves 
24 30 40. 

* 1) Crotchets, 15-12=8, 20-15=5, 20- 
12=8. 

2) Quavers, 24-20=4, 24-15=9, 80-20 
= 10. 

8) Semiquavers, 80-12=18, 40-15=25, 
40-12=28. 



// 



14 

Vb 

40 



15 
9' 



16 

«'b 



10 11 12 13 

C "d'b ^\> "/ 

30 82 83 39 

g" a"b "a"b ^'C 

Third C^Mrd.— Notes 15, 20, 24; Octaves 51 
30 40 48. 

* 1) Crotchets. 24 - 20= 4, 20 - 15= 5, 24 - 15 
=9 

2) Quavers, 80-24=6, 30-20=10, 40- 
24=16 

8) Semiquavers, 40-15=25, 48-20=28, 
48 - 15= 83. This I have here represented as 
^a"^ because it is the Twelfth above ^^d% but 
in the text it is called a flattened a" because it 
is almost the one-sixth otC"= 528. In fact on 
the Harmonical, i x 528=880, and A^,\^ would 
be i' C, = |- 33 =26-8, so that 38 x 26-3 =867-9 
vibrations. The interval 880 : 867*9 has 24 
cents, and hence a" is more than a comma too 
sharp. The same observation applies as in 
the last footnote regarding the audible effect 
of the high notes, i^en not beating with each 
other, or with audible partials.— 2ran«2ator.] 



216 



DIFFERENCE BETWEEN MAJOR AND MINOR CHORDS. part n 



been able to hear the deeper combinational tones of the second order, written as 
quavers, when the tones have been played on an harmonium, and the ear was 
assisted by the proper resonators : * but I have not been able to hear those written 
with semiquavers. They have been added merely to make the theory complete. 
Perhaps they might be occasionally heard from very loud musical tones having 
powerful upper partials. But they may be certainly neglected in all ordinary 
cases. 

For the minor triadSj on the other hand, the combinational tones of the first 
order, which are easily audible, begin to disturb the harmonious effect. They are 
not near enough indeed to beat, but they do not belong to the harmony. For the 
fundamental triad, and that of the Sixth and Third [the two first chords] , these 
combinational tones, written as crotchets, form the major triad A\^ G E}), and for 
the triad of the Sixth and Fourth [the third chord], we find entirely new tones, 

V A\}, B\^y which have no relations with the original triad.f The combinational 
tones of the second order, however (written as quavers), are sometimes partly 
above and generally partly below the prime tones of the triad, but so near to them, 
that beats must arise; whereas in the corresponding major triads the tones of 
this order fit perfectly into the original chord. Thus for the fundamental minor 
triad in the example, c' e'\^ g\ the deeper combinational tones of the second order 
give the dissonances a^ h^ c', and similarly for the triad of the Sixth and Third, 
e'b 9f ^"' A^^ ^^^ *^® ins^ of the Sixth and Fourth g' c" e"|> we find the disso- 
nances b\} d and g^ a'|>. This disturbing action of the combinational tones on the 
harmoniousness of minor triads is certainly too slight to give them the character 
of dissonances, but they produce a sensible increase of roughness, in comparison 
with the effect of major chords, for all cases where just intonation is employed, 
that is, where the mathematical ratios of the intervals are preserved. In the 
ordinary tempered intonation of our keyed instruments, the roughness due to the 

f combinational tones is proportionably less marked, because of the much greater 
roughness due to the imperfection of the consonances. Practically I attribute 
more importance to the influence of the more powerful deep combinational tones 
of the first order, which, without increasing the roughness of the chord, introduce 
tones entirely foreign to it, such as those of the A^ and B^ major triads in the case 
of the G minor triads. The foreign element thus introduced into the minor chord 
is not sufficiently distinct to destroy the harmony, but it is enough to give a 
mysterious, obscure effect to the musical character and meaning of these chords, 
an effect for which the hearer is unable to account, because the weak combinational 
tones on which it depends are concealed by other and louder tones, and are audible 
only to a practised ear. \ Hence minor chords are especially adapted to express 
mysterious obscurity or harshness. § F. T. Vischer, in his Esthetics (vol. iii. 
§ 772), has carefully examined this character of the minor mode, and shewn how 
it suits many degrees of joyful and painful excitement, and that all shades of 
T feeling which it expresses agree in being to some extent * veiled * and obscure. 

Every minor Third and every Sixth when associated with its principal oom- 



* [See note f on p. 157d. — Translator,] 

t [From the list of harmonics on p. 215c 
it will be seen that these tones occur as lower 
harmonics of the tone whence the minor chords 
are derived. — Translator.] 

t [The Author is of course always 8pea)dng 
of chords in j ust intonation. When tempered, 
as on the harmonium, even the major chords 
are accompanied by unrelated combinational 
tones, sufficiently close to beat and sufficiently 
loud for Scheibler to have laid down a rule 
for counting the beats in order to verify the 
correctness of the tempered tuning (see p. 
203c2). But still the different effects of the two 
chords are very marked. — Translator.] 

§[The English^ names major and minor 



were chosen because the first Third in the 
fundamental position is major in the first case 
and minor in the second. In German the 
terms are dur and moll^ that is, hard and 
soft,] It is well known that the names dur 
and moll are not connected with the hard or 
soft character of the pieces of music written 
in these modes, but are historically derived 
from the angular form of b and the rounded 
form of b, which were the B durum and B 
molle of the medieval musical notation. [The^ 
probable origin of the forms b tl ^ j^ i^ given 
from observations on the plates in Gaforius's 
Theoricum Opus Harmonicae Disdplinaefl^QO, 
the earliest printed book on music, in a foot- 
note, infr^, p. 312(2. — Translator.] 



CHAP. XII. INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 217 

binational tone, becomes at once a major chord. C is the combinational tone of 
the minor Third e' g* ; c of the major Sixth g e\ and g of the minor Sixth e' c".* 
Since, then, these dyads naturally produce consonant triads, if any new tone is 
added which does not suit the triads thus formed, the contradiction is necessarily 
sensible. 

Modem harmonists are unwilling to acknowledge that the minor triad is less 
consonant than the major. They have probably made all their experiments with 
tempered instruments, on which, indeed, this distinction may perhaps be allowed 
to be a little doubtful. But on justly intoned instruments f and with a moderately 
piercing quality of tone, the difference is very striking and cannot be denied. The 
old musicians, too, who composed exclusively for the voice, and were consequently 
not driven to enfeeble consonances by temperament, shew a most decided feeling 
for that difference. To this feeling I attribute the chief reason for their avoidance 
of a minor chord at the close. The medieval composers down to Sebastian Bach ^ 
used for their closing chords either exclusively major chords, or doubtful chords 
without the Third ; and even Handel and Mozart occasionally conclude a minor 
piece of music with a major chord. Of course other considerations, besides the 
degree of consonance, have great weight in determining the final chord, such as 
the desire to mark the prevailing tonic or key-note with distinctness, for which 
purpose the major chord is decidedly superior. More upon this in Chapter XV. 

After having examined the consonant triads which lie within the compass of an 
Octave, we proceed to those with wider intervals. We have found in general that 
consonant intervals remain consonant when one of their tones is transposed an 
Octave or two higher or lower at pleasure, although such transposition has some 
effect on its degree of hannoniousness. It follows, then, that in all the consonant 
chords which we have hitherto found, any one of the tones may be transposed 
some Octaves higher or lower at pleasure. If the three intervals of the triad were 
consonant before, they will remain so after transposition. We have already seen H 
how the chords of the Sixth and Third, and of the Sixth and Fourth, were thus 
obtained from the fundamental form. It follows further that when larger inter- 
vals are admitted, no consonant triads can exist which are not generated by the 
transposition of the major and minor triads. Of course if such other chords could 
exist, we should be able by transposition of their tones to bring them within the 
compass of an Octave, and we should thus obtain a new consonant triad within 
this compass, whereas our method of discovering consonant triads enabled us to 
determine every one that could lie within that compass. It is certainly true that 
slightly dissonant chords which lie within the compass of an Octave are sometimes 
rendered smoother by transposing one of their tones. Thus the chord \\\\\yOx 
0, ^^|>, ^-Bb>+ ^s slightly dissonant in consequence of the interval 1 : J; the 
interval 1 : ^, or subminor Seventh, does not sound worse than the minor Sixth ; 
the interval ^ : |^ is a perfect Fifth. Now transposing the tone ^E|^, an Octave 
higher to ^^, and thus transforming the chord into 1 : { : ^, we obtain 1 : ^ in ^ 
place of 1 : ^, and this is much smoother, indeed it is better than the minor Tenth 
of our minor scale 1 : \S§ and a chord thus composed, which I have had carefully 
tuned on the harmonium, although its unusual intervals produced a strange effect, 
is not rougher in sound than the worst minor chord, that of the Sixth and Fourth. 
This chord, C, ^^1^, ^eb, is also much injured by the unsuitable combinational tones 
G^ and F.** Of course it would not be worth while to introduce such strange 



* [For c' : gf' = 6 : 6, diff. 6-5=1 or C; \ [See these intervals examined in p. 196, 

g : «' = 3 : 6, diff. 5 - 3 = 2 or c ; «' : c" = 6 : 8, note *. — TramlaUyr .1 
diff. 8 - 6 = 8 or g.— Translator,] §[The intervals 6:7 = ^': "^b^ 3 : 7 = gf 

t See Chapter XVI. for remarks upon just : "^1% and 5 : 12 = e : g' can be tried and 

and tempered intonation, and for a justly in- compared on the Harmonica!. — Translator,] 
toned instrument suitable for such experi- ** [The ratios are 12 : 21 : 28, and 21 - 12 

ments. [The Harmonical can also be used. = 9, but 9 : 12 = 3 : 4, hence if 12 is C, 9 is O,, 

See App. XX. sect. F. for this and other in- Again 28 - 12 = 16, 12 : 16 = 8 : 4 and hence 

struments.] 16 is F, — Translator.] 



218 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



PART n. 



tones as "^B]^, ^ej^, into the scale for the sake of a chord which in itself is not 
superior to the worst of our present consonant chords, and for which the tones 
could not be transposed without greatly deteriorating its efiect.* 

The transposition of some tones in a consonant triad, for the purpose of widen- 
ing their intervals, affects their harmoniousness in the first place by changing the 
intervals. Major Tenths, as we found in Chapter X. p. 1956, sound better than 
major Thirds, but minor Tenths worse than minor Thirds, the major and minor 
Thirteenth worse than the minor Sixth (p. 196a). The following rule embraces all 
the cases : — Those intervals in which the smaller of the two numbers expressing the 
ratios of the pitch numbers is bven, are impboved by having one of their tones 
transposed by an Octave, because the numbers expressing the ratio are thus 
diminished. 



H 



The Fifth 

The major Third . 

The sulnninor Third 



2 : 8 becomes the Twelfth . . 2 
4:6 ,, major Tenth . 4 

6:7 „ sttbminor Tenth 6 



It 



6 = 1 
10 = 2 
14 = 3 



3 
5 

7. 



Those intervals in which the smaller of the two numbers expressing the ratio of 
the vibrational numbers is odd, are made wobsb by having one of their tones 
transposed by an Octave, as the Fourth 3 : 4 [which becomes the Eleventh 3 : 8], 
the minor Third 5 : 6 [which becomes the minor Tenth 5 : 12], and the Sixths 
[major] 3 : 5, and [minor] 5 : 8 [which become the Thirteenths, major 3 : 10 and 
minor 5 : 16]. 

Besides this the principal combinational tones are of essential importance. 
An example of the first combinational tones of the consonant intervals within 
the compass of an Octave is given below, the primary tones being represented 
by minims and the combinational tones by crotchets, as before, f 



H 




4- 



z^--: -i^ 



4- 



-G- 



T 



r^ 



a: 



cl 



1 



i 



-zi 



Si 



i 



I 



r 



a 



^=P 



-:3:- 



I 



lNTBBVAL.Octave.Doubl.Oct. Fifth. Twelfth. Fourth. Eleventh. Maj.Third. Major Tenth 

Ratio. 4:8 2:8 4:6 4: 12 8:4 3:8 4:5 4: 10 

Difference. 4628 15 1 6 



U 




« 



jO 



i 



■«H 



Z* 



f 



.LZ 



s^ 



-& 



^. 



m 



IKTBRVAL. Min. Third. Minor Tenth. Maj.Sixth. Maj. Thirteenth. Min.Sixth. Min.Thirteenth. 

Ratio. 5:6 6: 12 3:6 3: 10 6:8 5: 16 

Difference. 17 2 7 3 11 

The upwards sloping line prefixed to/" denotes a degree of sharpening of about 
a quarter of a Tone [53 cents] ; and the downwards sloping line prefixed to b'\^ 
flattens it [by 27 cents] to the subminor Seventh of c. Below the notes are added 



* [They are, however, insisted on by Poole, 
see App. XX. sect. F. No. 6. — Translator.] 

t [Some of the bars and numbers have been 
changed to make all agree with the footnote to 



p. 214<i. All these notes and their combina- 
tional notes can by this means be played on 
the Harmonical. — Translator.] 



CHAP. XII. 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



219 



the names of the intervals, the numbers of the ratios, and the dififerenoes of 
those numbers, giving the pitch numbers of the several oombinational tones. 

We find in the first place that the oombinational tones of the Octave, Fifth, 
Twelfth, Fourth, and major Third are merely transpositions of one of the primary 
tones by one or more Octaves, and therefore introduce no foreign tone. Hence these 
five intervals can be used in all kinds of consonant triads, without disturbing the 
efifect by the combinational tones which they introduce. In this respect the major 
Third is really superior to the major Sixth and the Tenth in the construction of 
chords, although its independent hannoniousness is inferior to that of either. 

The double Octave introduces the Fifth as a combinational tone. Hence if the 
fundamental tone of a chord is doubled by means of the double Octave, the chord 
is not injured. But injury would ensue if the Third or Fifth of the chord were 
doubled in the double Octave. 

Then we have a series of intervals which are made into complete major triads II 
by means of their combinational tones, and hence produce no disturbance in 
major chords, but are injurious to minor chords. These are the Eleventh, imnor 
Third, major Tenth, major Sixth, and minor Sixth. 

But the minor Tenth, and the major and minor Thirteenth cannot form part of 
a chord without injuring its consonance by their combinational tones. 

We proceed to apply these considerations to the construction of triads. 

1. Major Tbiads. 

Major triads can be so arranged that the combinational tones remain parts of 
the chord. This gives the most perfectly harmonious positions of these chords. 
To find them, remember that no minor Tenths and no [major or minor] Thirteenths 
are admissible, so that the minor Thirds and [both major and minor] Sixths must 
be in their closest position. By taking as the uppermost tone first the Third, then ^ 
the Fifth, and lastly the fundamental tone, we find the following positions of these 
chords, within a compass of two Octaves, in which the combinational tones (here 
written as crotchets as usual) do not disturb the harmony. 

The most Perfect Positions of Major Triads* 
12 3 4 5 6 




When the Third lies uppermost, the Fifth must not be more than a major 
Sixth below, as otherwise a [major] Thirteenth would be generated. But the fun- 
damental tone can be transposed. Hence when the Third is uppermost the only 
two positions which are undisturbed are Nos. 1 and 2. When the Fifth lies 
uppermost, the Third must be immediately under it, or otherwise a minor Tenth 



* [Calculation according to list of har- 
monics, p. 214^, footnote. 

1) Chord 4, 6, 10. Differentials 6 - 4 » 2, 
10 - 6 = 4, 10 - 4 = 6, which is also one of the 
tones. 

2) Chord 6, 8, 10. Differentials 8 - 6 = 
10 - 8 = 2, 10 - 6 = 4. 

3) Chord 4, 10, 12. Differentials 12-10 
= a, 10 - 4 = 6, 12 - 4 = 8. 

4) Chord 8, 10, 12. Differentials 10-8 



= 12 - 10 = 2, 12 - 8 = 4. 

6) Chord 8, 6, 8. Differentials 5 -8 =2, 
8-6 = 8 (which is also one of the tones), 
8-8 = 6 (which is also one of the tones). 

6) Chord 6, 6, 8. Differentials 6-6=1. 
8-6 = 2, 8-5 = 3. 

These chords should be studied on the 
Harmonical, and the combinational tones lis- 
tened for, and afterwards the tones played as 
substantive notea.— Translator.] 



220 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



FA&T n. 



would be produced ; but the fundamental tone may be transposed. Finally, when 
the fundamental tone is uppermost, the major Third can lie only in the position of 
a minor Sixth below it, but the Fifth may be plaoed at pleasure. Hence it follows 
that the only possible positions of the major chord which will be entirely free from 
disturbance by combinational tones, are the six here presented, among which we 
find the three dose positions Nos. 2, 4, 6 already mentioned [p. 215a], and three 
new ones Nos. 1, 8, 5. Of these new positions two (Nos. 1, 3) have the funda- 
mental tone in the bass, just as in the primary form, and are considered as open 
positions of that form, while the third (No. 5) has the Fifth in the bass, just as in the 
chord of the Sixth and Fourth [of which it is also considered as an open position]. 
The chord of the Sixth [and Third] (No. 6), on the other hand, admits of no opener 
position [if it is to remain perfectly free from combinational disturbance]. 

The order of these chords in respect to harmoniousness of the intervals is, 

H perhaps, the same as that presented above. The three intervals of No. 1 (the 

Fifth, major Tenth, and major Sixth) are the best, and those of No. 6 (the Fourth, 

minor Third, and minor Sixth) are relatively the most unfavourable of the 

intervals that occur in these chords. 

The remaining positions of the major triads present individual unsuitable com- 
binational tones, and on justly intoned instruments are unmistakably rougher than 
those previously considered, but this does not make them dissonant, it merely puts 
them in the same category as minor chords. We obtain all of them which lie 
within the compass of two Octaves, by making the transpositions forbidden in the 
last cases. They are as follows, in the same order as before, No. 7 being made 
from No. 1, and so on : — 



The less Perfect Positions of Major Triads,* 
8 9 10 11 



12 



ir 




Musicians will immediately perceive that these positions of the major triad are 
much less in use. The combinational tone ^b'\}, gives the positions 7 to 10 some- 



* [Calculation in continuation of the last 
note. 

7) Chord 8, 4, 10. Differentials 4-8 = 1, 
10 - 4 = 6, 10 - 8 = 7. 
^ 8) Chord 8, 8, 10. Differentials 10 - 8 = 2, 
8 - 8 = 6, 10 - 8 = 7, which gives the interval 
7 : 8 with the tone 8. 

9) Chord 4, 5, 12. Differentials 5-4=1, 
12 - 4 = 8, 12 - 5 = 7, the two last differential 
tones heing 7:8. 

10) Chord 5, 8, 12. Differentials 8-5 = 8, 
12 - 8 = 4, 12 - 5 = 7, which gives the inter- 
val 7 : 8 with the tone 8. 

11) Chord 5, 6, 16. Differentials 6-5=1, 
16-6=10, 16-5 = 11, which two last form the 
dissonant trumpet interval 11 : 10 of 165 cents 
or ahoat three-quarters of an equal tone. 

12) Chord 5, 12, 16. Differentials 16 - 12 
= 4. 12 - 5 = 7. 16 - 6 = 11, which forms the 
same dissonant trumpet interval 11 : 10, but 
this time with one of the tones, and therefore 
more harshly. 

All these 12 chords should be well studied 
on the Harmonical, and for the first 10, the 



differential tones can be played also as sub- 
stantive notes (remembering that "^B}^ is on the 
Q\^ digital), which will enable the student to 
acquire a better idea of the roughness. The 
tones 11 and 18 could not be introduced among 
the first 4 Octaves on the Harmonical with- 
out incurring the important losses of /" and 
a". But if we take the chords an Octave 
higher we can play "/'" and *'a'". 

The chords should also be played in lower 
and higher positions, not only as Octaves of 
those given, but from the other major chords 
on the Harmonical as FA^C, OBiD,A^^E% 
E^\f O B^\f. Particular attention should be 
paid to the contrasting of the positions 1 and 7, 
2 and 8, 8 and 9, 4 and 10, 5 and 11, 6 and 
12. Unless the ear acquires the habit of 
attending to these differences it will not pro- 
perly form the requisite conceptions of major 
chords. For future purposes the results should 
also be contrasted with those obtained by play- 
ing the same chords on a tempered instrument, 
— if possible of the same pitch, A 440. — Trans- 
lator,] 



CHAP. xn. 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



221 



thing of the character of the chord of the dominant Seventh in the key of F 
major, c e g b\^. The two last, 11 and 12, are much the least pleasing ; indeed they 
are decidedly rougher than the better positions of the minor chord. 



2. Minor Tbiadb. 

No minor chord can be obtained perfectly free from false combinational tones, 
because its Third can never be so placed relatively to the fundamental tone, as not 
to produce a combinational tone unsuitable to the minor chord. If only one such 
tone is admitted, the Third and Fifth of the minor chord must lie close together 
and form a major Third, because in any other position they would produce a second 
unsuitable combinational tone. The fundamental tone and the Fifth must never 
be so placed as to form an Eleventh, because in that case the resulting combina- 
tional tone would make them into a major triad. These conditions can be fulfilled ^ 
by only three positions of the minor chord, as follows : — 

The most Perfect Positions of Minor Triads.* 
12 3 




The remaining positions which do not sound so well are : — 

The less Perfect Positions of Minor Truids.f 
4 6 6 7 8 9 10 11 



H 



12 




* [Calculation according to the list of har- 
monics on p. 215c, footnote. 

1) Chord 24, 30, 40. Differentials 80-24 
=6,40-30=10,40-24:^16. 

2) Chord 20, 24, 80. Differentials 24-20 
= 4, 30 - 24=6, 30 - 20= 10. 

3) Chord 10, 24, 30. Differentials 30-24 
= 6, 24-10=14,30-10=20. 

These can also be studied on the Har- 
monica], and the differentials to Nos. 1 and 2 
can be plajed as snbstantiye tones. Not so 
No. 3, bnt the effect may be felt by playing the 
chord a major Third higher as eg'b'f being the 
10, 24, 30 harmonics of C,. and^ying the dif- 
ferentials G, ^6)^, s' whion can be played as 
substantive tones, but being so low will make 
the effect very rough. — TranslatorJ] 

t [Calculation in continuation of the last 
note. 

4) Chord 12, 15, 40. Differentials 15-12 
=3,40-15=25, 40-12=28. 



5) Chord 12, 30, 40. Differentials 40-30 
= 10,40-12 = 18,40-12=28. m 

6) Chord 15, 20, 24. Differentials 24-20 
= 4,20-15=5,24-16=9. 

7) Chord 12, 20, 30. Differentials 20-12 
= 8,80-20=10, 30-12=18. where 18 forms 
the dissonance 20 : 18=10 : 9 with the tone 
20. 

8) Chord 10, 15, 24. Differentials 15-10 
=5. 24-15=9, 24-10=14, which forms the 
dissonant interval 15 : 14 with one of the tones 
15. 

9) Chord 10, 12, 30. Differentials 12 - 10 
= 2, 30-12=18, 80-10=20, the two last form 
together the dissonance 20 : 18=10 : 9. 

10) Chord 15, 20, 48 referred to A ,^. In- 
terpret by taking the Octaves below the num- 
bers in p. 215c, note. Differentials 20-15= 
5=0; 48-20=28= Yl,, 48- 15 = 83 = ^a% 
see p. 215d', note, towards the end of the ob- 
servations on the Thvrd Chord, 



222 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



PART 11. 



The positions Nos. 4 to 10 each produce two unsuitable combinational tones, 
one of which necessarily results from the fundamental tone and its [minor] Third ; 
the other results in No. 4 from the Eleventh G G, and in the rest from the trans- 
posed major Third E\} O. The two last positions, Nos. 11 and 12, are the worst 
of all, because they give rise to three unsuitable combinational tones [two of which 
beat with original tones]. 

The influence of the combinational tones may be recognised by comparing the 
different positions. Thus the position No. 3, with a minor Tenth c' e"\} and major 
Third e"\} g"y sounds unmistakably better than the position No. 7, with major 
Tenth e'|> g" and major Sixth e*\} d\ although the two latter intervals when struck 
separately sound better than the two first. The inferior effect of chord No. 7 is 
consequently solely due to the second unsuitable combinational tone, h%. 

This influence of bad combinational tones is also apparent from a comparison 
H with the major chords. On comparing the minor chords Nos. 1 to 3, each of which 
has only one bad combinational tone, with the major chords Nos. 11 and 12, each 
of which has two such tones, those minor chords will be found really pleasanter 
and smoother than the major. Hence in these two classes of chords it is not the 
major and minor Third, nor the musical mode, which decides the degree of harmo- 
niousness, it is wholly and solely the combinational tones. 

Four Part Chords or Tetrads, 

It is easily seen that all consonant tetrads must be either major or minor triads 
to which the Octave of one of the tones has been added.* For every consonant 
tetrad must admit of being changed into a consonant triad by removing one of its 
tones. Now this can be done in four ways, so that, for example, the tetrad G E G c 
gives the four following triads : — 

f C E G, C E c, E Gc, G G c. 

Any such triad, if it is not merely a dyad, or interval of two tones, with the 
Octave of one added, must be either a major or a minor triad, because there are 
no other consonant triads. But the only way of adding a fourth tone to a major 
or minor triad, on condition that the result should be consonant, is to add the 
Octave of one of its tones. For every such triad contains two tones, say and G, 
which form either a direct or inverted Fifth. Now the only tones which can be 
combined with G and (? so as to form a consonance are E and E^ ; there are no 
others at aU. But E and E\^ cannot be both present in the same consonant chord. 



11) Chord 15, 40, 48 referred to A,^,\^ as in 
last onord. 

Differentials 48 - 40»8=^^, 40- 15 =: 25 
=e\ 48 - 15«33="a> as in last chord, whioh 
see 
H 12) Chord 15, 24, 40 referred to A,„^, 
Differentials 24 - 15 = 9 = B|^, 40 - 24 => 16 = ak 
40-15=»25=»«' where the differentials 16, 25 
form the dissonant intervals 16 : 15, 25 : 24 
with the two tones 15 and 24 respectively. All 
these chords can be studied on the Harmonioal, 
and their differentials can be played as sub- 
stantive tones in Nos. 6, 7, and 12. No. 8 can 
be taken a major Third higher as in chord 
No. 8 of the last note, that is as e' b' g" giving 
the differentials, e, d, ''bj^ which can be played. 
Also No. 9 may be played as e' g' b" giving dif- 
ferentials c,d",e", Nos. 4 and 5 do not a^mit 
of such treatment because 0'"|^ is not on the 
instrument. Nos. 10 and 11 cannot be so played 
because ^^a'|^ is not on the instoniment. In 
fact it is the 8Srd harmonic of ^l^^^j^s 18*15, and 
this (see footnote p. 215d\ remarks on Third 
Chord,) « 88 X 18-15» 488-95 vib. ; whereas a =^ 
440, and hence is too sharp by the interval 



440: 433*95 or 24 cents, rather more than a 
comma. 

The student should try all the minor chords 
not only in different positions in Octaves, but 
with all the other minor chords on the Har- 
monioal, namely, FA^^C, OB^^D, D^FA^ 
(which contrast with the dissonance DFA^ 
for future purposes), A-fiE^, E-flB^, also in 
different Octaves, till the ear learns to distin- 
guish these 12 different forms. 

Finally the 12 forms of the major should 
be contrasted with the corresponding 12 forms 
of the minor triad, for the three possible cases 
FA^C and FA^UC ; CE^Q and CE^^Q ; 
QB^D and QB^)jV, To merely read over these 
pages by eye instead of studying them by ear 
is useless, and ordinary tempered instruments 
only impede instead of assisting the investi- 
gator. — Translator,'] 

*[That is, if we exclude the harmonic 
Seventh from consideration, as on p. 195d, 
those who admit it (as Mr. Poole, App. XX. 
sect. F. No. 6) consider CEfi'^B^ to be a per- 
fectly consonant tetrad. — Translator,] 



CHAP. xn. 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



223 



and hence every consonant chord of four or more parts, which contains C and G, 
must either contain E and some of the Octaves of 0, E, G, or else E\} and some of 
the Octaves of C, E\}, G. 

Every consonant chord of three or more parts will therefore he either a major or a 
minor chords and may be formed from the fundamental position of the major and 
minor triad, by transposing or adding the Octaves above or below some or all of its 
three tones. 

To obtain the perfectly harmonious positions of major tetrads, we have again 
to be careful that no minor Tenths and no [major or minor] Thirteenths occur. 
Hence the Fifth may not stand more than a minor Third above, or a Sixth below 
the Third of the chord ; and the fundamental tone must not be more than a 
Sixth above the Third. When these rules are carried out, the avoidance of the 
minor Thirteenths is effected by not taking the double Octave of the Third and 
Fifth. These rules may be briefly enunciated as follows : Those w^jor chords are % 
most harmonious in which the fundamental tone or the Fifth does not lie more than 
a Sixth above the Third, or the Fifth does not lie more than a Sixth above or 
below it The fundamental tone, on the other hand, may be as far below the Third 
as we please. 

The corresponding positions of the major tetrads are found by combining any 
two of the more perfect positions of the major triads which have two tones in 
common, as follows, where the lower figures refer to the positions of the major triads 
already given. 



The most Perfect Positions of Major Tetrads within the Compass of 

Two Octaves* 




f 



1 + 2 1 + 8 1 + 4 1 + 6 2+4 2 + 6 2 + 6 8 + 4 8 + 6 4 + 6 5 + 6 

We see that chords of the Sixth and Third must lie quite close, as No. 7 ; f 
and that chords of the Sixth and Fourth I must not have a compass of more than 
an Eleventh, but may occur in all the three positions (Nos. 5, 6, 11) in which it 
can be constructed within this compass. Chords which have the fundamental tone 
in the bass can be handled most freely. 

It will not be necessary to enumerate the less perfect positions of major tetrads. U 
They cannot have more than two unsuitable combinational tones, as in the 12th 
position of the major triads, p. 220c. The major triads of C can only have the 
false combinational tones marked ^6^ and ^y [that is, with pitch numbers bearing 
to that of C the ratios 7 : 1, or 11 : 1]. 

Minor tetrads, like the corresponding triads, must at least have one false com- 
binational tone. There is only one single position of the minor tetrad which has 
only one such tone. It is No. 1 in the following example, and is compounded of 
the positions Nos. 1 and 2 of the minor triads on p. 2216. But there may be as 



* [These major tetrads can all be played on 
the Harmonical, and should be tried in every 
position of Octaves and for all the major chords 
on the instrument, namely F AiC, C E. (?, 
G Bi A A^\f C E% E^\, Q B% till the ear is 
perfectly familiar with the different forms and 
the student can tell them at once and desig- 
nate them by their number in this list on hear- 



ing another person play them,— Translator,^ 
t [This chord has the Third both lowest and 

highest and is marked », but is more com- 
monly marked 6. — Translator.] 

Z [These chords have the Fifth lowest and 

are m8J:ked^,— Translator.] 



224 



INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 



PART n. 



many as 4 false combinational tones, as, for example, on combining positions Noe. 
10 and 11 of the minor triads, p. 221c. 

Here follows a list of the minor tetrads which have not more than two false 
combinational tones, and which lie within the compass of two Octaves. The false 
combinational tones only are noted in crotchets, and those which suit the chord are 
omitted. 



Best Positions of Minor Tetrads* 



8 




1+2 



1+3 



1+7 



2+3 2+6 2 + 7 2+9 



3 + 8 



1+6 



The chord of the Sixth and Fourth [marked . ] occurs only in its closest posi- 

tion, No. 5 ; but that of the Sixth and Third [marked o] is found in three positions 

(Nos. 3, 6, and 9), namely, in all positions where the compass of the chord does 
not exceed a Tenth ; the fundamental chord occurs three times with the Octave of 
the fundamental note added (Nos. 1, 2, 4), and twice with the Octave of the Fifth 
added (Nos. 7, 8). 

In musical theory, as hitherto expounded, very little has been said of the 
IT influence of the transpiosition of chords on harmonious effect. It is usual to give 
as a rule that dose intervals must not be used in the bass, and that the intervals 
should be tolerably evenly distributed between the extreme tones. And even these 
rules do not appear as consequences of the theoreticaJ views and laws usually given, 
according to which a consonant interval remains consonant in whatever part of the 
scale it is taken, and however it may be inverted or combined with others. They 
rather appear as practical exceptions from general rules. It was left to the 
musician himself to obtain some insight into the various effects of the various 
positions of chords by mere use and experience. No rule could be given to guide 
him. 

The subject has been treated here at such length in order to shew that a right 
view of the cause of consonance and dissonance leads to rules for relations which 
previous theories of harmony could not contain. The propositions we have enun- 



^ * [Calculation of the combinational tones, 
by the list of harmonics in p. 215c. 

1) Ohord 20, 24, 80, 40. Difierentials 
24-20^4=:il[^, 40-24 = 16=a'[^. 

2) Chord 10, 24, 80, 40. Differentials 
24-10=14=y^ 40-24 = 16=a'k 

3) Chord 12, 15, 20, SO. Differentials 
20-12=8 = 0^, 80-12 = 18=6>. 

4) Chord 10, 20, 24, 80. Differentials 
24-20=4=:il|,, 24-lO=14 = Yl>. 

5) Chord 15, 20, 24, 80. Differentials 
24-20=4=i4|^, 24-15=9=61,. 

6) Chord 12, 20, 24, 80. Differentials 
24-20=4=i4|,, 20-12=8=al,. 30-12=18= 
b% 

7) Chord 10, 12, 15, 80. Differentials 
12-10=2=^,1,, 80-12 = 18=6'b. 

8) Chord 10, 15, 24, 80. Differentials 

24-15=9=6b, 24-10= 14 = Vb- 

9) Chord 12, 15, 20, 24. Differentials 



24-20=4=ilk 20-12=8=ok 24-16=9 = 

These chords should all be studied on the 
Harmonical. With the exception of Nos. 2, 4, 
7, 8, the differentials can also be played on it 
as substantive tones. But they can be trans- 
posed. Thus No. 2 may be played as a 9' y «" 
giving the differentials 72>|,, c\ No. 4 will be- 
come e' e" g" b" giving the differential ^5'^, 
which can be played. No. 7 becomes a' g' h' 6" 
giving the differentials C and d". No. 8 be- 
comes a' b'g"b" giving the differentials d' and 
76'!,. These chords should also be studied in 
all the minor forms on the Harmonical, not 
only in different Octaves, but on all the minor 
chords on that instrument, viz., DiFAi,AiCEi, 
EfiB,, FA^\^Gy CE^)fG, OB^\,D, till the ear 
recognises the form, and the student can name 
the number of the position to another person's 
playing. — TranskUor,^ 



CHAP. XII. INVERSIONS OF CHORDS. 225 

oiated agree, however, with the practice of the best composers, of those, I mean, 
who studied vocal music principally, before the great development of instrumental 
music necessitated the general introduction of tempered intonation, as any one 
may easily convince himself by examining those compositions which aimed at 
producing an impression of perfect harmoniousness. Mozart is certainly the com- 
poser who had the surest instinct for the delicacies of his art. Among his vocal 
compositions the Ave verum corptis is particularly celebrated for its wonder- 
fully pure and smooth harmonies. On examining this little piece as one of the 
most suitable examples for our purpose, we find in its first clause, which has 
an extremely soft and sweet efifect, none but major chords, and chords of the 
dominant Seventh. All these major chords belong to those which we have noted 
as being the more perfectly harmonious. Position 2 occurs most frequently, and 
then 8, 10, 1, and 9 [of p. 223c]. It is not till we come to the final modulation of 
this first clause that we meet with two minor chords, and a major chord in an U 
unfavourable position. It is very striking, by way of comparison, to find that the 
second clause of the same piece, which is more veiled, longing, and mystical, and 
laboriously modulates through bolder transitions and harsher dissonances, has 
many more minor chords, which, as well as the major chords scattei*ed among 
them, are for the most part brought into unfavourable positions, until the final 
chord again restores perfect harmony. 

Precisely similar observations may be ms^Le on those choral pieces of Palestrina, 
and of his contemporaries and successors, which have a simple harmonic construc- 
tion without any involved polyphony. In transforming the Roman Church music, 
which was P&lestrina's task, the principal weight was laid on harmonious effect in 
contrast to the harsh and unintelligible polyphony of the older Netherlands system, 
and PbJestrina and his school have really solved the problem in the most perfect 
manner. Here also we find an almost uninterrupted flow of consonant chords, with 
some dominant Sevenths, or dissonant passing notes, charily interspersed. Here f 
also the consonant chords wholly, or almost wholly, consist of those major and 
minor chords which we have noted as being in the more perfect positions. Only 
in the final cadence of a few clauses, on the contrary, in the midst of more powerful 
and more frequent dissonances, we find a predominance of the unfavourable posi- 
tions of the major and minor chords. Thus that expression which modem music 
endeavours to attain by various discords and an abundant introduction of dominant 
Sevenths, was obtained in the school of Pftlestrina by the much more delicate 
shading of various inversions and positions of consonant chords. This explains 
the harmoniousness of these compositions, which are nevertheless full of deep and 
tender expression, and sound like the songs of angels with hearts affected but 
undarkened by human grief in their heavenly joy. Of course such pieces of music 
require fine ears both in singer and hearer, to let the delicate gradation of expres- 
sion receive its due, now that modem music has accustomed us to modes of 
expression so much more violent and drastic. f 

The great majority of major tetrads in P&Iestrina's Stahat mater are in the ' 
positions 1, 10, 8, 5, 3, 2, 4, 9 [of p. 223c], and of minor tetrads in the positions 
9, 2, 4, 3, 5, 1 [of p. 224a]. For the major chords one might almost think that 
some theoretical rule led him to avoid the bad intervals of the minor Tenth and 
the [major or minor] Thirteenth. But this rule would have been entirely useless 
for minor chords. Since the existence of combinational tones was not then 
known, we can only conclude that his fine ear led him to this practice, and that 
the judgment of that ear exactly agreed with the rules deduced from our theory. 

These authorities may serve to lead musicians to allow the correctness of my 
arrangement of consonant chords in the order of their harmoniousness. But 
any one can convince himself of their correctness on any justly intoned instrument 

* [Inoludins both the modem kingdom of 1582, was bom in Hainault in the present 
the Netherlands or Holland, and 4ihe still more Belgiam. — Translator,'] 
modem kingdom of Belgium. Josquin, 1450- 

Q 



226 



RETROSPECT. 



PABT n. 



[as the Harmonioal]. The present system of tempered intonation oertainly oblit- 
erates somewhat of the more delicate distinctions, without, however, entirely 
destroying them. 



Having thus concluded that part of our investigations which rests upon purely 
scientific principles, it will be advisable to look back upon the road we have travelled 
in order to review our gains, and examine the relation of our results to the views of 
older theoreticians. We started from the acoustical phenomena of upper partial tones, 
combinational tones and beats. These phenomena were long well known both to 
musicians and acousticians, and the laws of their occurrence were, at least in their 
essential features, correctly recognised and enunciated. We had only to pursue 
these phenomena into further detail than had hitherto been done. We succeeded 
in finding methods for observing upper partial tones, which rendered comparatively 

IT easy an observation previously very difficult to make. And with the help of this 
method we endeavoured to shew ttiat, with few exceptions, the tones of all musical 
instruments were compounded of partial tones, and that, in especial, those qualities 
of tone which are more particularly favourable for musical purposes, possess at 
least a series of the lower partial tones in tolerable force, while the simple tones, 
like those of stopped organ pipes, have a very unsatisfactory musical effect, 
although even these tones when loudly sounded are accompanied in the ear itself 
by some weak harmonic upper partials. On the other hand we found that, for the 
better musical qualities of tone, the higher partial tones, from the Seventh onwards, 
must be weak, as otherwise the quality, and every combination of tones would be 
too piercing. In reference to the beats, we hs^l to discover what became of them 
when they grew quicker and quicker. We found that they then fell into that 
roughness which is the peculiar character of dissonanca The transition can be 
effected very gradually, and observed in all its stages, and hence it is apparent to 

f the simplest natural observation that the essence of dissonance consists merely * in 
very rapid beats. The nerves of hearing feel these rapid beats as rotigh and 
unpleasant, because every intermittent excitement of any nervous apparatus affects 
us more powerfully than one that lasts unaltered. With this there is possibly 
associated a psychological cause. The individual pulses of tone in a dissonant 
combination give us certainly the same impression of separate pulses as slow beats,, 
although we are unable to recognise them separately and count them ; hence they 
form a tangled mass of tone, which cannot be analysed into its constituents. The 
cause of the unpleasantness of dissonance we attribute to this roughness and 
entanglement. The meaning of this distinction may be thus briefly stated : Con- 
sonance is a continuous, dissonance an intermittent sensation of tone. Two con- 
sonant tones flow on quietly side by side in an undisturbed stream ; dissonant 
tones cut one another up into separate pulses of tone. This description of the 
distinction at which we have arrived agrees precisely with Euclid's old definition, 

f < Consonance is the blending of a higher with a lower tone. Dissonance is 
incapacity to mix, when two tones cannot blend, but appear rough to the ear.'f 

After this principle hsA been once established there was nothing further to do 
but to inquire under what circumstances, and with what degree of strength, beats 



* [ But see also Prof. Preyer, in App. XX. 
sect. L. art. 7, intnk.—Tranalator.'] 

t Budides, ed. Meibomius, p. 8 : "Eo-n 8i 
<rvp^9t¥ia ijukv KpSffis Bio ^Syyoty, ^vr^pov Kcd 
fiapvrdpov. Ata^wta Sh roivamiov S{fo ^96yy^f^ 
&/ii|(a, fiii oXttv Tc icpo^i^ai, kkXk rpaxvy^rjyai 
T^y lucoiy. [In tianslating this passage in the 
text, I have endeavoured to make the distinc- 
tion of fii^is and Kpuris ; the former is taken to 
be of the nature of a mechanical, and the 
latter a chemical mixture. Mixing and blend- 
ing seem to convey the notion. In irv/u^«Wa 
(which Euclid admitted only for the Octave, 



Fifth, and Fourth) he felt that the tones 
blended. But the Sio^wWa (which he applies 
to all other intervals, for he used Pythagorean 
major and minor Thirds, which are really dis- 
sonant) he found to consist in their not even 
mixing^ not even forming a mechanical, much 
less a chemical unit, so that he goes on to ex- 
plain that this non-mixing of the two tones 
consisted in inabttity to blind^ and resulted in 
producing a r<mghnes$, as contradistinguished 
from a blending in the ear. The Umea are 
^6yyoi, properly tones sung, but used even for 
tones of the lyre. — Translator.} 



CHAP. xn. 



RETROSPECT. 



227 



would arise in the various combinations of tones through either the partial or the 
combinational tones. This investigation had hitherto been completely worked out 
by Scheibler for the combinational tones of two simple tones only. The law of 
beats being known, it became easy to extend it to compound tones. Every 
theoretical conclusion on this field can be immediately checked by a proper 
observation, when the analysis of a mass of tone is facilitated by the use of 
resonators. All these beats of partial and combinational tones, of which so much 
has been said in the last chapter, are not inventions of empty theoretical specula- 
tion, but rather facts of observation, and can be really heard without difficulty by 
any practised observer who performs his experiments correctly. The knowledge 
of the acoustic law facilitates our discovery of the phenomena in question. But 
all the assertions on which we depend for establishing a theory of consonance and 
dissonance, such as was given in the last chapters, are founded wholly and solely 
on a careful analysis of the sensations of hearing, an analysis which a practised IT 
ear could have executed without any theoretical assistance, although of course 
the task was immensely facilitated by the guidance of theory and the assistance of 
appropriate instruments of observation. 

For these reasons the reader is particularly requested to observe that my hypoth- 
esis concerning the sympathetic vibration of Gorti's organs inside the ear has no 
immediate connection whatever with the explanation of consonance and dissonance. 
That explanation depends solely upon observed facts, on the beats of partial tones 
and the beats of combinational tones. Yet I thought it right not to suppress my 
hypothesis (which must of course be regarded solely as an hypothesis), because it 
gathers all the various acoustical phenomena with which we are concerned into 
one sheaf, and gives a dear, intelligible, and evident explanation of the whole 
phenomena and their connection. 

The last chapters have shewn, that a correct and careful analysis of a mass of 
sound under the guidance of the principles cited, leads to precisely the same dis- IT 
tinctions between consonant and dissonant intervals and chords, as have been 
established under the old theory of harmony. We have even shewn that these 
investigations give more particular information concerning individual intervals 
and chords than was possible with the general rules of the former theory, and 
that the correctness of these rules is corroborated both by observation on justly 
intoned instruments and the practice of the best composers. 

Hence I do not hesitate to assert that the preceding investigations, founded 
upon a more exact analysis of the sensations of tone, and upon purely scientific, 
as distinct from esthetic principles, exhibit the true and sufficient cause of conso- 
nance and dissonance in music. 

One circumstance may, perhaps, cause the musician to pause in accepting 
this assertion. We have found that from the most perfect consonance to the 
most decided dissonance there is a continuous series of degrees, of combinations of 
sound, which continually increase in roughness, so that there cannot be any sharp ^ 
line drawn between consonance and dissonance, and the distinction would therefore 
seem to be merely arbitrary. Musicians, on the contrary, have been in the habit 
of drawing a sharp line between consonances and dissonances, allowing of no 
intermediate links, and Hauptmann advances this as a principal reason against 
any attempt at deducing the theory of consonance from the relations of rational 
numbers.* , 

As a matter of fact we have already remarked that the chords of the natural 



* Harmonik und Metrikj p. 4. [At the 
same time, by accepting equal temperament 
they accept as consonant a series of tones 
which really form only one consonant interval 
(the Octave) and only two others even approzi- 
matively consonant (the Fifth and Fourth), 
while the commonest intervals on which har- 
mony rests, the Thirds, with their inversions 
the Sixths, are not merely dissonant but, on 



the sustained tones of the voice for example, 
aroasly dissonant. It is difficult for any ear 
brought up among these dissonances, to under- 
stand the real distinction between consonance 
and dissonance. Hence the absolute necessity 
of testing all the above assertions by a justly 
intoned instrument such as the Harmonical. 
— Translator.] 

q2 



228 RETROSPECT. part ii. 

or subminor Seventh 4 : 7 [c' to ^5'|^ on the Harmonioal], and of the snbminor 
Tenth 3 : 7 [^ to ^&'|^] in many qualities of tone sound at least as well as the 
minor Sixth 5 : 8 [e' to c"], and that the subminor Tenth really sounds better 
than the ordinary minor Tenth 5 : 12 [e* to g"]. But we have already noticed a 
circumstance of great importance for musical practice which gives the minor Sixth 
an SMlvantage over the intervals formed with the number 7. The inversion of the 
minor Sixth gives a better interval, the major Third [e' c" inverted gives c' d'], and 
its importance as a consonance in modem music is especially due to this very 
relation to the major Third ; it is essentially necessary, and justified, just because 
it is the inversion of the major Third. On the other hand the inversion or trans- 
position of an interval formed with the number 7 leads to intervals worse than 
itself. Hence, as it is necessary, for the purposes of harmony, to have the power 
of transposing the parts at pleasure, we have a sufficient reason for drawing the 

IT line between the minor Sixth on the one hand, and the intervals characterised 
by 7 on the other. It is not, however, till we come to construct scales, which we 
shall have to consider in the next chapter, that we find decisive reasons for making 
this the boundary. The scales of modem music cannot possibly accept tones 
determined by the number 7* But in musical harmony we can only deal with 
chords formed of notes in the scale. Intervals characterised by 5, as the Thirds 
and SixthSy occur in the scale, as well as others characterised by 9, as the major 
Second 8 : 9, but there are none characterised by 7, which should form the trans- 
ition between them. Here, then, there is a real gap in the series of chords arranged 
according to the degree of their harmonious effect, and this gap serves to determine 
the boundary between consonance and dissonance. 

The decision does not depend, then, on the nature of the intervals themselves 
but on the construction of the whole tonal system. This is corroborated by the 
fact that the boundary between consonant and dissonant intervals has not been 

H always the same. It has been already mentioned that the Greeks always repre- 
sented Thirds as dissonant, and although the original Pythagorean Third 64 : 81, 
determined by a series of Fifths, was not a consonance, yet even when the natural 
major Third 4 : 5 was afterwards included in the so-called syntono-diatonic mode 
of Didymus and Ptolemaeus, it was not recognised as a consonance. It has 
already been mentioned that in the middle ages, first the Thirds and then the 
Sixths were acknowledged as imperfect consonances, that the Thirds were long 
omitted from the final chord, and that it was not till later that the major, and 
quite recently the minor Third was admitted in this position. It is quite a mis- 
take to suppose, with modern musical theorists, that this was merely whimsical 
and unnatural, or that the older composers allowed themselves to be fettered by 
blind faith in Greek authority. The last was certainly partly true for writers on 
musical theory down to the sixteenth century. But we must distinguish carefully 
between composers and theoreticians. Neither the Greeks, nor the great musical 

f composers of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, were people to be blinded by 
a theory which their ears could upset. The reason for these deviations is to be 
looked for rather in the difference between the tonal systems in early and recent 
times, with which we shall become acquainted in the next part. It will there be 
seen that our modem system gained the form under which we know it through the 
influence of a general use of harmonic chords. It was only in this system that a 
complete regard was paid to all the requisitions of interwoven harmonies. Owing 
to its strict consistency, we were not only able to allow many licences in the use 
of the more imperfect consonances and of dissonances, which older systems had to 
avoid, but we were often required to insert the Thirds in final chords, as a mode 
of distinguishing with certainty between the major and minor mode, in cases 
where this distinction was formerly evaded. 

* [Poole's scale f g a^ '^b\f c' d' e'^ f\ and monic, which is the only acoustical justifica- 

Bosanquet*s and White's tempered imitation tion for the greatly harsher dominant Seventh, 

of ^6'|>, properly 969 cents, as 974 cents, shew — TrainXoXar^ 
the feeling that exists for using the 7th har- 



CHAP. XII. RETROSPECT. 229 

Bat if the boundary between consonance and dissonance has really changed 
with a change of tonal system, it is manifest that the reason for assigning this 
bomidary does not depend on the intervals and their individual musical effect, but 
on the whole construction of the tonaJ system. 

The enigma which, about 2500 years ago, Pythagoras proposed to science, 
which investigates the reasons of things, * Why is consonance determined by the 
ratios of small whole numbers ? * has been solved by the discovery that the ear 
resolves all complex sounds into pendular oscillations, according to the laws of 
sympathetic vibration, and that it regards as harmonious only such excitements of 
the nerves as continue without disturbance. The resolution into partial tones, 
mathematically expressed, is effected by Fourier's law, which shews how any 
periodically variable magnitude, whatever be its nature, can be expressed by a 
sum of the simplest periodic magnitudes.* The length of the periods of the 
simply periodic terms of this sum must be exactly such, that either one or two T 
or three or four, and so on, of their periods are equal to the period of the 
given, magnitude. This, reduced to tones, means that the pitch numbers of the 
partial tones must be exactly once, twice, three times, four times, and so on, 
respectively, as great as that of the prime tone. These are the whole numbers 
which determine the ratios of the consonances. For, as we have seen, the con- 
dition of consonance is that two of the lower partial tones of the notes combined 
shall be of exactly the same pitch ; when they are not, disturbance arises from 
beats. Ultimately, then, the reason of the rational numerical relations of Pytha- 
goras is to be found in the theorem of Fourier, and in one sense this theorem may 
be considered as the prime source of the theory of harmony, f 

The relation of whole numbers to consonance beccune in ancient times, in 
the middle ages, and especially among Oriental nations, the foundation of extrava- 
gant and fanciful speculation. ' Everything is Number and Harmony,' was the 
characteristic principle of the Pythagorean doctrina The same numerical ratios IT 
which exist between the seven tones of the diatonic scale, were thought to be found 
again in the distances of the celestial bodies from the central fire. Hence the 
harmony of the spheres, which was heard by Pythagoras alone among mortal men, 
as his disciples asserted. The numerical speculations of the Chinese in primitive 
times reach as far. In the book of Tso-kiu-ming, a friend of Confucius (b.c. 500), 
the five tones of the old Chinese scale were compared with the five elements of 
their natural philosophy — water, fire, wood, metal, and earth. The whole numbers 
1, 2, 3 and 4 were described as the source of all perfection. At a later time the 
12 Semitones of the Octave were connected with the 12 months in the year, and so 
on. Similar references of musical tones to the elements, the temperaments, and 
the consteUations are found abundantly scattered among the musical writings of 
the Arabs. The harmony of the spheres plays a great part throughout the middle 
ages. According to Athanasius Kircher, not only the macrocosm, but the micro- 
cosm is musical. Even Eeppler, a man of the deepest scientific spirit, could not T 
keep himself free from imaginations of this kind. Nay, even in the most recent 
times, theorising friends of music may be found who will rather feast on arith- 
metical mysticism than endeavour to hear upper partial tones. 

The celebrated mathematician Leonard Euler I tried, in a more serious and 
more scientific manner, to found the relations of consonances to whole numbers 
upon psychological considerations, and his theory may certainly be regarded as the 
one which found most favour with scientific investigators during the last century, 
although it perhaps did not entirely satisfy them. Euler § begins by explaining 
that we are pleased with everything in which we can detect a certain amount of 

* Namely magnitudes which vaiy as sines tance by Prof. Preyer. See infra, App. XX. 

and cosines. sect. L. art. 7,— Translator.] 

t[The coincidences or non-coincidences of X TeiUamen novae theoriae Musicae, Petro- 

combinational tones, which are independent of poll, 1789. 
Foarler's law, are also considered of impor- § Loc. cit. chap. ii. § 7. 



230 RETROSPECT. pabt ii. 

perfection. Now the perfection of anything is determined by the co-operation of 
all its parts towards the attainment of its end. Hence it follows that wherever 
perfection is to be found there must be order ; for order consists in the arrange- 
ment of all parts by a certain law from which we can discover why each part Ues 
where it is, rather than in any other place. Now in any perfect object such a law 
of arrangement is determined by the end to be attained which governs all the 
parts. For this reason order pleases us more than disorder. Now order can be 
perceived in two ways : either we know the law whence the arrangement is de- 
duced, and compare the deductions from this law with the arrangements observed ; 
or, we observe these arrangements and endeavour to determine the law from them. 
The latter is the case in music. A combination of tones will please us when we 
can discover the law of their arrangement. Hence it may well happen that one 
hearer finds it and that another does not, and that their judgments consequently 

T differ. 

The more easily we perceive the order which characterises the objects contem- 
plated, the more simple and more perfect will they appear, and the more easijy and 
joyfully shall we acknowledge them. But an order which costs trouble to discover, 
though it will indeed also please us, will associate with that pleasure a certain 
degree of weariness and sadness {tristitia). 

Now in tones there are two things in which order is displayed, pitch and 
duration. Pitch is ordered by intervals, duration by rhythm. Force of tone might 
also be ordered, had we a measure for it. Now in rhythm two or three or four 
equally long notes of one part may correspond with one or two or three of another, 
in which the regularity of the arrangement is easily observed, especially when fre- 
quently repeated, and gives considerable pleasure. Similarly in intervals we should 
derive more pleasure from observing that two, three, or four vibrations of one tone 
coincided with one, two, or three of another, than we could possibly experience if 

T the ratios of the time of vibration were incommensurable with one another, or at 
least could not be expressed except by very high numbers. Hence it follows that 
the combination of two tones pleases us the more, the smaller the two numbers 
by which the ratios of their periods of vibration can be expressed. Euler also 
remarked that we could better endure more complicated ratios of the periods of 
vibration, and consequently less perfect consonances, for higher than for deeper 
tones, because for the former the groups of vibrations which were arranged to 
occur in equal times, were repeated more frequently than in the latter, and we 
were consequently better able to recognise the regularity of even a more involved 
arrangement. 

Hereupon Euler develops an arithmetical rule for calculating the degree of 
harmoniousness of an interval or a chord from the ratios of the periods of the 
vibrations which characterise the intervals. The Unison belongs to the first 
degree, the Octets to the second, the Twelfth and Double Octave to the third, the 

IT Fifth to the fourth, the Fourth to the fifth, the major Tenth and Eleventh to the 
sixth, the major Sixth and major Third to the seventh, the minor Sixth and minor 
Third to the eighth, the subminor Seventh 4 : 7 to the ninth, and so on. To the 
ninth degree belongs also the major triads both in its closest position and in the 
position of the Sixth and Fourth, The major chord of the Sixth and Third 
belongs, however, to the tenth degree. The minor triads both in its closest and 
in its position of the Sixth and Third, also belongs to the ninth degree, but its 
position of the Sixth and Fourth to the tenth degree. In this arrangement the 
consequences of Euler's system agree tolerably well with our own results, except 
that in determining the relation of the major to the minor triad, the influence of 
combinational tones was not taken into account, but only the kinds of interval. 
Hence both triads in their close position appear to be equally harmonious, although 
again both the major chord of the Sixth and Third, and the minor chord of the 
Sixth and Fourth, are inferior with him as with us.* 

*The principle on which Euler calculated the degrees of harmoniousness for intervals 



CHAP. ZU. 



RETROSPECT. 



231 



Euler has not confined these speculations to single consonances and chords, but 
has extended them to their results, to the construction of scales, and to modula- 
tions, and brought out many surprising specialities correctly. But without taking 
into account that Euler's system gives no explanation of the reason why a conso- 
nance when slightly out of tune sounds almost as well as one justly tuned, and much 
better than one greatly out of tune, although the numerical ratio for the former is 
generally much more complicated, it is very evident that the principal difficulty 
in Euler's theory is that it says nothing at all of the mode in which the mind con- 
trives to perceive the numerical ratios of two combined tones. We must not forget 
that a man left to himself is scarcely aware that a tone depends upon vibrations. 
Moreover, immediate and conscious perception by the senses has no means of 
discovering that the numbers of vibrations performed in the same time are different, 
greater for high than for low tones, and that determinate intervals have deter- 
minate ratios of these numbers. There are certainly many perceptions of theT 
senses in which a person is not precisely able to account for the way in which he 
has attained to his knowledge, as when from the resonance of a space he judges of 
its size and form, or when he reads the character of a man in his features. But 
in such cases a person has generally had a large experience in such relations, which 
helps hiin to form a judgment in analogous circumstances, without having the 
previous circimistances on which his judgment depends clearly present to his mind. 
But it is quite different with pitch numbers. A man that has never made physical 
experiments has never in the whole course of his life had the slightest opportunity 
of knowing anything about pitch numbers or their ratios. And almost every one 
who delights in music remains in this state of ignorance from birth to death. 

Hence it would certainly be necessary to shew how the ratios of pitch numbers 
can be perceived by the senses. It has been my endeavour to do this, and hence 
the results of my investigation may be said, in one sense, to fill up the gap which 
Euler's left. But the physiologicaJ processes which make the difference sensible IT 
between consonance and dissonance, or, in Euler's language, orderly and disorderly 
relations of tone, ultimately bring to light an essential difference between our 
method of explanation and Euler's. According to the latter, the human mind 
perceives commensurable ratios of pitch numbers as such; according to our 
method, it perceives only the physical effect of these ratios, namely, the continuous 
or intermittent sensation of the auditory nerves.* The physicist knows, indeed, 
that the reason why the sensation of a consonance is continuous is that the ratios 
of its pitch numbers are commensurable, but when a man who is unacquainted 
with physics, hears a piece of music, nothing of the sort occurs to him,f nor does 
the physicist find a chord in any respect more harmonious because he is better 
acquainted with the cause of its harmoniousness.^ It is quite different with the 
order of rhythm. That exactly two crotchets, or three in a triplet, or four quavers 



and chords, is here annexed, beoanse its con- 
sequenoes are veiy correofe, if combinational 
tones are disregarded. When p is a prime 
number, the degree is =p. All other numbers 
are products of prime numbers. The number 
of the degree for a product of two factors a and 
b, for which separately the numbers of degree 
are « and fi respectively = a + /3 - 1. To find 
the number of the degree of a chord, which can 
be expressed hy p: q: r: s, dc, in smallest 
whole numbers, Euler finds the least common 
multiple oipj g, r, <, &c., and the number of 
its degree is that of the chord. Thus, for 
example : 
The number of the degree of 2 is 2, and of 8 is 3, 

of 4 =1 2 X 2, it is 2 + 2 - 1 =:= 8, 
of 12 » 4 X 8, it is 8 + 8 - 1 =» 5, 
of 60 B 12 X 6, it is 6 + 6 - 1 « 9. 

That of the major triad 4 : 5 : 6 is that of 60, 



because 60 is the least common multiple of a- 
4, 6, 6, that is, the least number which all of 
them will divide without a remainder. 

• [With possibly Prof. Preyer's addition, 
see App. Xa. sect. L. art. 7. — Trarulator,^ 

t [In point of fact, as he always hears tem- 
pered tones, he never hears the exact com- 
mensurable ratios. Indeed, on account of the 
impossibility of tuning with perfect exactness, 
the exact ratios are probably never heard, 
except from the double siren and wave-siren. — 
Translator,] 

X [Does a man breathe more easily and 
aerate his blood better because he knows the 
constitution of the atmosphere and its relation 
to his carbonised blood ? Does a man feel a 
weight greater or less, because he knows the 
laws of gravitation ? These are quite similar 
questions. — Translator,] 



232 RETROSPECT. pabt n. 

go to one minim is perceived by any attentive listener without the least instruction. 
But while the orderly relation (or commensurable ratio) of the vibrations of two 
combined tones, on the other hand, undoubtedly affects the ear in a certain way 
which distinguishes it from any disorderly relation (incommensurable ratio), this 
difference of consonance and dissonance depends on physical, not psychological 
grounds. 

The considerations SMlvanced by Bameau * and d' Alembert f on the one side, and 
Tartini | on the other, concerning the cause of consonance agree better with our 
theory. The last founded his theory on the existence of combinational tones, 
the two first on that of upper partisJ tones. As we see, they had found the 
proper points of attack, but the acoustical knowledge of last century did not allow 
of their drawing sufficient consequences from them. According to d'Alembert, 
Tartini's book was so darkly and obscurely written that he, as well as other well- 

ir instructed people, were unable to form a judgment upon it. D'Alembert's book, 
on the other hand, is an extremely dear and masterly performance, such as was 
to be expected from a sharp and exact thinker, who was at the same time one of 
the greatest physicists and mathematicians of his time. Bameau and d'Alembert 
lay down two facets as the foundation of their system. The first is that every 
resonant body audibly produces at the same time as the prime (gSnerateur) its 
Twelfth and next higher Third, as upper partials (Jiarmcmiques), The second is 
that the resemblance between any tone and its Octave is generally apparent. The 
first fact is used to shew that the major chord is the most natural of all chords, 
and the second to establish the possibility of lowering the Fifth and the Third by 
one or two Octaves without altering the nature of the chord, and hence to obtain 
the major triad in all its different inversions and positions. The minor triad is 
then found by the condition that all three tones should have the same upper partial 
or harmonic, namely, the Fifth of the chord (in fact C, ^|^, and O have all the same 

T upper partial g*). Hence although the minor chord is not so perfect and natural 
as the major, it is nevertheless prescribed by nature. 

In the middle of the eighteenth century, when much suffering arose from an 
artificial social condition, it may have been enough to shew that a thing was 
natural^ in order at the same time to prove that it must also be beautiful and 
desirable. Of course no one who considers the great perfection and suitability of 
all organic arrangements in the human body, would, even at the present day, deny 
that when the existence of such natural relations have been proved as Bameau 
discovered between the tones of the major triad, they ought to be most carefully 
considered, at least as starting-points for further research. And Bameau had 
indeed quite correctly conjectured, as we can now perceive, that this fact was the 
proper basis of a theory of harmony. But that is by no means everything. For 
in nature we find not only beauty but ugliness, not only help but hurt. Hence the 
mere proof that anything is natural does not suffice to justify it esthetically. 
f Moreover if Bameau had listened to the effects of striking rods, bells, and mem- 
branes, or blowing over hollow chambers, he might have heard many a perfectly 
dissonant chord. And yet such chords cannot but be considered equally natural. 
That all musical instruments exhibit harmonic upper partials depends upon the 
selection of qualities of tone which man has made to satisfy > the requirements of 
his ear. 

Again the resemblance of the Octave to its fundamental tone, which was one 

of Bameau's initial facts, is a musical phenomenon quite as much in need of 

explanation as consonance itself. 

No one knew better than d'Alembert himself the gaps in this system. Hence 

* [TrcM de Vharmonie riduUe d des pHn- 1762. 

oipes natiireUt 1121. — Translator,] X\Traitato (2i Musica secondo la vera 

iEUmerUs de Musique, suivant lee prin- soiengadelV annonia, Padova, 1751. — Trans- 

cipesdeM. Bameau, jpax'M.,d*Alemh&tt, Lyon, lator,] 



CHAP. xn. RETROSPECT. 233 

in the preface to his book he especially guards himself against the expression : 
'Demonstration of the Principle of Harmony,' which Eameau had used. He 
declares that so far as he himself is concerned, he meant only to give a well- 
connected and consistent account of all the laws of the theory of harmony, by 
deriving them from a single fundamental fact, the existence of upper partial tones 
or harmonics, which he assumes as given, without further inquiry respecting its 
source. He consequently limits himself to proving the natwralness of the major 
and minor triads^ In his book there is no mention of beats, and hence of the 
real source of distinction between consonance and dissonance. Of the laws of beats 
very httle indeed was known at that time, and combinational tones had only been just 
brought under the notice of French savants, by Tartini (1761) and Romieu (1753). 
They had been discovered a few years previously in Germany by Sorge (1746), but 
the fact was probably httle known. Hence the materials were wanting for building 
up a more perfect theory. f 

Nevertheless this attempt of Rameau and d'Alembert is historically of great im- 
portance, in so far as the theory of consonance was thus for the first time shifted from 
metaphysical to physical ground. It is astonishing what these two thinkers effected 
with the scanty materials at their command, and what a clear, precise, comprehensive 
system the old vague and lumbering theory of music became under their hands. 
The important progress which Rameau made in the specially musical portion of the 
theory of harmony will be seen hereafter. 

If, then, I have been myself able to present something more complete, I owe it 
merely to the circumstance that I had at command a large mass of preliminary 
physical results, which had accumulated in the century that has since elapsed. 



PART III. 

THE RELATIONSHIP OF MUSICAL TONES, 

SCALES, AND TONALITY. 



CHAPTER XIII. 

GBNEBAL VIBW OF THB DIFFERBNT FHINOIPLBB OF MUSICAL STYLE IN THE 

DEVELOPMENT OF MUSIC. 

Up to this point our investigation has been purely physical. We have analysed 
the sensations of hearing, and investigated the physical and physiological causes 
for the phenomena discovered, — partial tones, combinational tones, and beats. In 

1 the whole of this research we have dealt solely with natural phenomena, which 
present themselves mechanically, without any choice, to all living beings whose 
ears are constructed on the same anatomical plan as our own. In such a field, 
where necessity is paramount and nothing is arbitrary, science is rightfully called 
upon to establish constant laws of phenomena, and to demonstrate strictly a strict 
connection between cause and efifect. As there is nothing arbitrary in the pheno- 
mena embraced by the theory, so also nothing arbitrary can be admitted into the 
laws which regulate the phenomena, or into the explanations given for their occur- 
rence. As long as anything arbitrary remains in these laws and explanations, it is 
the duty of science (a duty which it is generally able to discharge) to exclude it, by 
continuing the investigations. 

But in this third part of our inquiry into the theory of music we have to furnish 
a satisfactory foundation for the elementary rules of musical composition, and here 
we tread on new ground, which is no longer subject to physical laws alone, although 

^the knowledge which we have gained of the nature of hearing, will still find 
numerous applications. We pass on to a problem which by its very nature belongs 
to the domain of esthetics. When we spoke previously, in the theory of conso- 
nance, of agreeable and disagreeable, we referred solely to the immediate impression 
made on the senses when an isolated combination of sounds strikes the ear, and 
paid no attention at all to artistic contrasts and means of expression ; we thought 
only of sensuous pleasure, not of esthetic beauty. The two must be kept strictly 
apaxt, although the first is an important means for attaining the second. 

The altered nature of the matters now to be treated betrays itself by a purely 
external characteristic. At every step we encounter historicEd and national dif- 
ferences of taste. Whether one combination is rougher or smoother than another, 
depends solely on the anatomical structure of the ear, and has nothing to do with 
psychological motives. But what degree of roughness a hearer is inclined to 
endure as a means of musical expression depends on taste and habit ; hence the 
boundary between consonances and dissonances has been frequently changed. Bimi- 



CHAP. xm. PHYSICAL AND ESTHETICAL PRINCIPLES COMPARED. 236 

laorly Scales, Modes, and their Modulations have undergone multifarious alterations, 
not merely among uncultivated or savage people, but even in those periods of the 
world's history and among those nations where the noblest flowers of human culture 
have expanded. 

Hence it follows, — ^and the proposition is not even now sufficiently present to 
the minds of our musical theoreticians and historians — that the system of Scales, 
Modes, and Harmonic Tissues does not rest solely upon inalterable natural laws, but 
is also, at least partly, the result of esthetical principles, which have already changed, 
and will still further change, with the progressive development of humanity. 

But it does not follow from this that the choice of those elements of musical art 
was perfectly arbitrary, and that they do not aUow of being derived from some 
more general law. On the contrary the rules of any style of art form a well- 
connected system whenever that style has attained a full and perfect development. 
These rules of art were certainly never developed into a system by the artists them- T 
selves with conscious intention and consistency. They are rather the result of ten- 
tative exploration or the play of imagination, as the artists think out or execute 
their plans, and by trial gradually discover what kind or manner of performance 
best pleases them. Yet science can endeavour to discover the motors, whether 
psychological or technical, which have been at work in this artistic process. Scien- 
tific esthetics have to deal with the psychological motor ; scientific physics with 
the technical. When the artist's aim in the style he has adopted, and its prin- 
cipal direction, have once been rightly conceived, it can be more or less correctly 
determined why he was forced to follow this or that rule, or employ this or that 
technical means. In musical theory, namely where the peculiar physiological 
functions of the ear, while not immediately present to conscious self-examination, 
play an important part, a large and rich field is thrown open for scientific investi- 
gation to shew the necessary character of the technical rules for each individual 
direction in the development of our art. f 

It does not rest with natural science to characterise the chief problem worked 
out by each school of art, and the elementary principle of its style. This must be 
gathered from the results of historical and esthetical inquiry. 

The relation we have to treat may be illustrated by a comparison with archi- 
tecture, which, like music, has pursued essentially different directions at different 
times. The Greeks, in their stone temples, imitated the original wooden construc- 
tions ; that was the principle of their architectural style. The whole division and 
arrangement of their decorations clearly shew that it was their intention to imitate 
wo^en constructions. The verticality of the supporting columns, the general 
horizontality of the supported beam, forced them to divide all the subordinate parts 
for the great majority of cases into vertical and horizontal lines. The purposes of 
Grecian worship, which performed its principal functions in the open air, were 
satisfied by erections, of this kind, in which the internal spaces were necessarily 
narrowly limited by the length of the stone or wooden beams which could be em- T 
ployed. The old Italians (Etruscans), on the other hand, discovered the principle 
of the arch, composed of wedge-shaped stones. This discovery rendered it pos- 
sible to cover in much more extensive buildings with arched roofs, than the Greeks 
could do with their wooden beams. Among these arched buildings the halls of 
justice (basil'icae)' became important, as is well known, for the subsequent develop- 
ment of architecture. The arched roof made the circular arch the chief principle 
in division and decoration for Roman {Byzantine) art. The columns, pressed by 
heavy weights, were transformed into pillars, on which, after the style was fully 
developed, columns merely appeared in diminished forms, half sunk in the mass of 
the pillar, as simply decorative articulations, and as the downward continuation of 
the ribs of the arches which radiated towards the ceiling from the upper end of the 
pUlar. 

In the arch the wedge-shaped stones press against each other, but as they all 
uniformly press inwards, each one prevents the other from falling. The most 



236 PHYSICAL AND ESTHETICAL PRINCIPLES COMPARED, pabt iil 

powerful and most dangerous degree of pressure is exerted by the stones in the 
horizontal parts of the arch, where they have either no support or no obliquely 
placed support, and are prevented from falling solely by the greater thickness of 
their upper extremities. In very large arches the horizontal middle portion is con- 
sequently the most dangerous, and would be precipitated by the slightest yielding 
of the materials. As, then, medieval ecclesiastical structures assumed continu- 
ally larger dimensions, the idea occurred of leaving out the middle horizontal part 
of the arch altogether, and of making the sides ascend with moderate obliquity 
until they met in a pointed arch. From thenceforward the pointed arch became 
the dominant principle. The building was divided into sections externally by the 
projecting buttresses. These, and the omnipresent pointed arch, made the outlines 
hard, and the churches became enormously high. But both characters suited the 
vigorous minds of the northern nations, and perhaps the very hardness of the forms, 

T thoroughly subdued by that marvellous consistency which runs through the varied 
magnificence of form in a gothic cathedral, served to heighten the impression of 
immensity and power. 

We see here, then, how the technical discoveries which were associated with 
the problems as they rose successively created three entirely distinct principles of 
style — the horizontal line, the circular arch, the pointed aroh — and how at each 
new change in the main plan of construction, all the subordinate individualities, 
down to the smallest decorations, were altered accordingly ; and hence how the 
individual rules of construction can only be comprehended from the general prin- 
ciple of construction. Although the gothic style has developed the richest, the 
most consistent, the mightiest and most imposing of architectural forms, just as 
modem music among other musical styles, no one would certainly for a moment 
think of asserting that the pointed arch is nature's original form of all architectural 
beauty, and must consequently be introduced everywhere. And at the present day 

T it is well known that it is an artistic absurdity to put gothic windows in a Greek 
building. Conversely any one can unfortunately convince himself on visiting most 
of our gothic cathedrals how detestably unsuitable to the whole effect are those 
numerous little chapels of the renaissance period built in the Greek or Roman style. 
Just as little as the gothic pointed arch, should our diatonic major scale be regarded 
as a natural product At least such an expression is quite inapplicable, except in 
so far as both are necessary and natural consequences of the principle of style 
selected. And just as little as we should use gothic ornamentation in a Greek 
temple, should we venture upon improving compositions written in ecclesiastical 
modes, by providing their notes with marks of sharps and flats in accordance with 
the scheme of our major and minor harmonies. The feeling for historical artistic 
conception has certainly made little progress as yet among our musicians, even 
among those who are at the same time musical historians. They judge old music 
by the rules of modem harmony, and are inclined to consider every deviation from 

Tit as mere unskilfulness in the old composer, or even as barbarous want of 
taste.* 

Hence before we proceed to the construction of scales and rules for a tissue of 
harmony, we must endeavour to characterise the principles of style, at least for 
the chief phases of the development of musical art. For present purposes we may 
divide these into three principal periods : — 

1. The Homophonic or Unison Music of the ancients, to which also belongs the 
existing music of Oriental and Asiatic nations. 

2. The Polyphonic Music of the middle ages, with several parts, but without re- 
gard to any independent musical significance of the harmonies, extending from the 
tenth to the seventeenth century, when it passes into 

3. Ha/rmonic or Modem Music, characterised by the independent significance 

* Thus in B. G. Kiesewetter's historico- dently an exaggerated zeal to deny everythinff 
musical writings, which are otherwise so rich which will not fit into the modem major and 
in facts indus&ously collected, there is evi- minor modes. 



CHAP. XIII. 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIC MUSIC. 



237 



attributed to the harmonies as such. Its sources date back from the sixteenth 
century. 

1. HoMOPHONic Music. 

One part music is the original form of music with all people. It still exists 
among the Chinese, Indians, Arabs, Turks, and modem Greeks, notwithstanding 
the greatly developed systems of music possessed by some of these nations. * That 
music in the time of highest Grecian culture, neglecting perhaps individual instru- 
mental ornamentation, cadences, and interludes, was written in one part, or that 
the voices at most sang in Octaves, can now be considered as established. In the 
problems of Aristotle we find the question : * Why is the consonance of the Octave 
alone sung ? For this and no other consonance is played on the mag&dis '. This 
was a harp-shaped instrument [with a bridge dividing the strings at one-third 
their length]. In another place he remarks that the voices of boys and men form IT 
an Octave in singing, f 

One part music, considered independently and unaccompanied by words, is too 
poor in forms and changes, to develop any of the greater and richer forms of art. 
Hence purely instrumental music at this stage is necessarily limited to short 
dances or marches. We really find no more among nations that have no harmonic 
music. I Performers on the flute § have certainly repeatedly gained the prize in 
the Pythian games, but it is possible to perform feats of execution in instrumental 
music in concise forms of composition, as, for example, in the variations of a 
short melody. That the principle of varying (/LLcra^SoXi;) a melody with reference 
to dramatical expression (ftifii/crig), was known to the Greeks, follows also from 
Aristotle. He describes the matter very plainly, and remarks that choruses must 
simply repeat the melodies in the antistrophes, because it is easier for one than 
for several to introduce variations. But public competitors {aytavurraC) and actors 
(vwoKpirai) are able to grapple with these difficulties.** f 



* [See App. XX. sect. K. for some of these 
scales. — Translator. ] 

t Ata ri ri diit Toawu avfK^via ^€tcu fUvn ; 
tMyaSi(ou<n yhp ra^rriv, iWriv W ovStfiiay. 
Prob. xix. 18. [Translated in the text.] Ai^ 
ri ^9i6y itrri rh <r&fJUl>wvoy rov 6fio<p<&you ; "H kcA 
rh fihv kvripwvov trvfiffwySy icrri 8iA tccut&v; iK 
irafdMV ykp y4wv koX hx^p&v yiyfrai rh ianiipofyoy * 
oi Ziecrcuri rafs rSyois, &s y^rrj irphs rify iirdrriy. 
Prob. xix. 89. [* Why is a consonant union of 
voices pleasanter than a single voice ? Is the 
singing of voice against voice, a consonant 
union of voices in Octaves ? This singing of 
voice against voice occurs when young boys and 
men sing together, and their tones di£Eer as the 
highest from the lowest of the scale.'] Towards 
the end of the songs the instrumental ac- 
companiment seems to have separated itself 
from the voice. Probably this is what is meant 
by the krousis in the passage TcXcvr»(rais 
8* CIS rabrhy, ty Kalxoiyhyrh fpyoy avfifialytiyiyf' 
trOeUt KoBdirtp r o7 s ^vh r^y^9fiy Kpoiovtrr koI 
yitp odroi rii &\Xm ob irpotravKovyrts, iity cis rav- 
rhy Ka.r€urTp4<f>cfa'iyf w^paiyowrt fuiWoy rtf rdKti 
9i \vTown reus frph rov r4\ovs 9i€ulHtpcus, r^ rh 
4k tiui/p6po»v rh Kovyhyt ffSctrrov ^k rov hih veur&y 
yiye<r$ai, Arist. Prob. xix. 39. [*But when 
they end in the same, the matter is precisely 
similar to what occurs whsn they play an ac- 
companiment to a song. For the accompany- 
ists do not follow the rest, but when the singers 
return to the same, they please more in the end, 
than thev displease in the differences before 
the end, by which means the common part in 
what is generally different, pleases more than 
anything but the Octave.'] See also Plutarch, 
De Musica, xix. xzviii. That the Greeks knew 



the effect of consonances and did not like it, 
appears by the following passage from Aristotle, 
De Attdibilibiis, ed. Bekker, p. 801 : ' For this 
reason we understand a single speaker better 
than many who are saying the same things at 
the same time. And so with strings. And 
much less, when flute and lyre are played at 
the same time, because the voices are confused 
by the others. And this is very plain for the 
consonances. For both tones are concealed, 
one by the other.* Ai^ kuI fuiWoy iyhs iuco^yrts 
cvylefity, ^ roWuy &fia rodirit \cy6ymy ' KoBdv^p 
Koi irl r&y xopS£v ■ Koi wokh ^rroy, trvy Tpo<r- 
av\f ris ifM Ktd Ki$apl(ff, 8i^ rh (TvyxftffBai rhs 
^yia virh r&y iripny. OIk liKiffra Si rovro 4vi 
r&y ffvfKfwytwy ^ay€p6y iffrty. ^Kfuportpovs yitp 
iktroKphmffBcu <rvf/ifi<Uy€i roi/s lixovs 6ir* &AA^Amf. 

:{:[In Java long pieces of music in non- 
harmonic scales occur to accompany actions 
and develop the feeling of a plot. Many instru - 
ments play together, but there is no harmony. 
— Translaior.] 

§ TheavA.oi were perhaps more like our oboes. 

**[Ai^ rl ol fi.€y ySfioi ovic 4y iyri(rrp6^ou 
hroiovyro ' al 8i &Wai ^Sal alxoputal; *H 5ti ol 
fi^y y6ftoL iycayiffruy iarca^t w^ ^817 fufieitrOai 
^vyati4yny kcX Hiar^iyttrBcUt ^ ^^ ^iytro fjLtucpii 
Koi ToXvctS^s; KaBdrep oZy koX rh. /i4Kri rg 
/jufi-fiffd liKoKoiBfi &cl mpa yiy6ft€yeu MaWov 
yitp TV fi4\€t itydryten fiifieTtrBai, ^ rois ^^ifuuri. 
Al h Kcti ol iiB^pOfifioi, 4irftSii fiifiirrucol iytyoyro, 
oltK ^ri lfx^i;<riy kyrurrp6^ovst irp6r€poy 9\ elxoy. 
kirioy 8i, tri rh rtaXaihy ol 4\€6Btpoi 4x6ptvoy 
abroi. IloWohs oiy ity»yurrucSs fitiy^ xo^cir^y 
^y. "Cicrrt 4yapfi6yia fiiwoy fi4\ri 4y^oy. Mcra- 
PdW€iy yitp iroWits fitrafioKhs r^ 4yl ^oy^ 4| 
TOif iFoWo7s, KoX r^ ityttyiffrpt ^ rois rh ^Co? 



f 



2^ 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIC MUSIC. 



PART III. 



Extensive works of art, in homophonio mnsio, are only possible in oonneotion 
with poetry, and this was also the way in which music was applied in classical 
antiquity. Not only were songs (odes) and religious hymns sung, but even 
tragedies and long epic poems were performed in some musical manner, and 
accompanied by the l3nre. We are scarcely in a condition to form a conception of 
how this was done, because modern taste points in precisely the opposite direction, 
and demands from a great declaimer or public reader that he should produce a 
dramatic effect true to nature by the speaking voice alone, rating all approach to 
singing as one of the greatest of faults. Perhaps we have some echoes of the 
ancient spoken song in the singing tone of Italian declaimers, and the Uturgical 
recitations (intoning) of the Boman Catholic priests. Indeed, attentive observa- 
tion on ordinary conversation shews us that regular musical intervals involun- 
tarily recur, although the singing tone of the voice is concealed under the noises 
1 which characterise the individual letters, and the pitch is not held firmly, but is 
frequently allowed to glide up and down. When simple sentences are spoken 
without being affected by feeling, a certain middle pitch is maintained, and it is 
only the emphatic words and the conclusions of sentences and clauses which are 
indicated by change of pitch.* The end of an afi&rmative sentence followed by a 
pause, is usually marked by the voice falling a Fourth from the middle pitch. An 
interrogative ending rises, often as much as a Fifth above the middle pitch. For 
example a bass voice would say : 



m 



»: 



i 



^^ 



± 



leh bin spa - tzie 
I twoe been walk 



ren g« - gem - gen. 
ing this mom - ing. 



IT 



Bi 



&: 



^^m: 



t=t 



I 



Bist du spa - tzie - ren ge - gan - gen ? 
Have you been walk - ing this mom - ing ? 

Emphasised words are also rendered prominent by their being spoken about a Tone 
higher than the rest,*!* and so on. In solemn declamation the alterations of pitch 
are more numerous and complicated. Modem recitative has arisen from attempt- 
ing to imitate these alterations of pitch by musical notes. Its inventor, Giacomo 
Peri, in the preface to his opera of Eurydice^ published in 1600, distinctly says as 
much. An attempt was then made to restore the declamation of ancient tragedies 
by means of recitative. Ancient recitative certainly differed somewhat from 
modem recitative, by preserving the metre of the poems more exactly, and by 



^vKdrrovfTi. At* h kv\o6or§pa iToiOvyro aJbrots 
T& /i^Xi). 'H h\ atrriffrpo^ost airAovy. *ApiOfths ydp 
4arif KoA iyl fierpurai, Th 8* alrrh cUnov ical iiSri 
rk ii\v hirh r^r <nci)inii ovk ht^rlarpoipa^ r& 8^ rov 
Xopov hnlffrpoipa. 'O fi^y yhp ^oKpir^s dywriirr^s 
[jcal fjufjkrrrfi5''\ 6 Ji X^P^'t firroy fufiurtu. Arist. 
Prob, xix. 15. * Why are themes {nomoi) not 
used in antistrophio singing, while all other 
choral singing is employed? Is it because 
themes belong to public performers who are 
already able to imitate and extend, and hence 
would make their song long and veiy figu- 
rate ? For melodies, like words, follow imi- 
tation and change. It is more necessary for 
melody to imitate, than for words. Where- 
foQ9 dithyrambic poets also when they became 
mimetic, disused their previous antistrophic 
singing. The reason is that formerly gentle- 
men (eleutheroi) used to sing the choruses 
themselves. It was difficult for many to sing 
like public performers. So they rather intoned 



suitable melodies. For it is easier for one to 
make numerous variations than for many to 
do so, and for a public performer than for 
those who retained old usage. Hence the 
melodies were made simpler for them. Now 
antistrophic singing is simple, for it depends 
on number, and is measured by a unit. The 
same reason shews why the parts of the actors 
are not antistrophic, but those of the chorus 
are so. For the actor is a public performer 
[and a mime], but the chorus does not imitate 
so well.' — Translator.] 

* [Prof. Helmholtz's observations on speak- 
ing must be read in reference to North German 
habits only. — Translator,] 

fBy no means uniformly, even in North 
Germany. The habits of different nations 
here vary greatly. In Norway and in Sweden 
the voice is regularly raised on unemphatio 
syllables. In Scotland the emphasis is often 
marked by lowering the pitch. — Translator.] 



CHAP. xni. 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIO MUSIC. 



239 



having no accompanying harmonies. Nevertheless our recitative, when well per- 
formed, will give us a better conception of the degree in which the expression of 
the words can be enhanced by musical recitation, than we can obtain from the 
monotonous repetition of the Boman liturgy, although the latter perhaps is more 
nearly related in kind to ancient recitation than the former. The settlement of 
the Boman liturgy by Pope Gregory the Great (a.d. 590 to 604) reaches back to a 
time in which reminiscences of the ancient art, although faded and deformed, 
might have been in some degree handed down by tradition, especially if, as we are 
probably entitled to assume, Gregory really did little more than finally establish 
the Boman school of singing which had existed from the time of Pope Sylvester 
(a.d. 314 to 335).* The majority of these formulae for lessons, collects, &c., 
evidently imitate the cadence of ordinary speech. They proceed at an equal 
height ; particular, emphatic, or non-Latin words are somewhat altered in pitch ; 
and for the punctuation certain concluding forms are prescribed, as the following Y 
for lessons, according to the customs of Miinster.f 



P 



jp=w: 



i 1 i- =l 



-p — n — p. 



-w^=w 



t=t=t: 



t 



1=f 



Sic can - ta com - ma^ sic du - o punc -ta : sic ve - ro punc-tum. 
Thus sing the com - ma, and thus the co - Ion : and thus the full stop. 




Sic sig-nvm in- ter-ro-ga - ti - o - nis ? 
Thus sing the mark of ih - ter • ro - ga - tion ? 

These and similar final formulae were varied according to the solemnity of the 
feast, the subject treated, the rank of the priest that sang and that answered, and IT 
so on.f It is easy to see that they strove to imitate the natural cadences of 
ordinary speech, and to give them solemnity by eliminating their individual irregu- 
larities. Of course in such fixed formula no regard can be paid to the grammatical 
sense of the clauses, which suffers much in various ¥m.ys from the intoning. 
Similarly we may suppose that the ancient tragic poets prescribed the cadences of 
speech to their actors, ahd preserved them by a musical accompaniment. And 
since ancient tragedy kept much further aloof from immediate external realism than 
our modem drama, as is shewn by the artificial rhythms, the unusual rolling words, 
the immovable strange masks, it could admit of a more singing tone for declamation 
than would, perhaps, please our modem ears. Then we must remember that by 
emphasising or increasing the loudness of certain words, and by rapidity or slow- 
ness of speech, or pantomimic action, much life can be thrown into delivery of this 
kind, which would certainly be insufferably monotonous if not thus enlivened. 

But in any case homophonic music, even when in olden time it had to ac- 1* 
company extensive poems of the highest character, necessarily played an utterly 
subordinate part. The musical turns must have entirely depended on the changing 
sense of the words, and could have had no independent artistic value or connection 
without them. A peculiar melody for singing hexameters throughout an epic, or 
iambic trimeters throughout a tragedy, would have been insupportable. | Those 



* [These are the dates of his reign. 
Hallah says the sohool was founded in a.d. 
SQO.—Translator.^ 

t Antony, * Lehrbuoh des Gregorianisohen 
Kirohengesanges ' [MantMl of Oregorian 
Church-fnuBic], Mtinster, 1829. According to 
the information collected by F^tis (in his 
Histovre ginirale de MusiquSf Paris, 1869, 
vol. i. chap, vi.), it has become doubtful 
whether this system of declamation with pre- 
scribed cadences, is not rather to be deduced 



from the Jewish ritual chants. In the oldest 
manuscripts of the Old Testament, there are 
26 different signs employed to denote cadences 
and melodic phrases of this kind. The fact 
that the corresponding signs of the Greek 
Church are Egyptian demotic characters, 
hints at a still older Egyptian origin for this 
notation. 

t [We must remember that the Greek and 
Latin so-called accents consisted solely in 
alterations of pitch, and hence to a certain 



240 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIO MUSIC. 



FAB.T lU. 



melodies (ko/mk) which were allotted to odes and tragic choruses, were cerfcainly 
freer and more independent For odes there were also well-known melodies (the 
names of some of them are preserved) to which fresh poems were oontiniially 
composed. 

In the great artistic works just mentioned, then, music mnst have been entirely 
subordinate ; independently, it could only have formed short pieces. Now this is 
closely connected with the development of homophonic music as a musical system. 
Among the nations who possess such music we always find certain degrees of pitch 
selected for the melodies to move in. These scales are very various in kind, partly, 
it would seem, very arbitrary, so that many appear to us quite strange and incom- 
prehensible, and yet the best gifted among those nations which possess them, as 
the Greeks, Arabs, and Indians, have developed them in an extremely subtile and 
varied manner. [See App. XX. sect. E.] 

When speaking of these systems of tones, it becomes, a question of essential 

T importance for our present purpose, to inquire whether they are based upon any 
determinate reference of all the tones in the scale to one single principal and 
fundamental tone, the tonic or key-note. Modem music effects a purely musical 
internal connection among all the tones in a composition, by making their rela- 
tionship to one tone as perceptible as possible to the ear. This predominance 
of the tonic, as the link which connects all the tones of a piece, we may, with 
F^tis, term the principle of tonality. This learned musician has properly drawn 
attention to the fact that tonality is developed in very different degrees and 
manners in the melodies of different nations. Thus in the songs of the modem 
Greeks, and chants of the Greek Church, and the Gregorian tones of the Boman 
Church, they are not developed in a manner which is easy to harmonise, whereas, 
according to F6tis,* it is on the whole easy to add accompanying harmonies 
to the old melodies of the northern nations of German, Celtic, and Sclavonic 
origin. 

V It is indeed remarkable that though the musical writings of the Greeks often 
treat subtile points at great length, and give the most exact information about all 
other peculiarities of the scale, they say nothing intelligible about a relation which 
in our modem system stands first of all, and always makes itself most distinctly 
sensible. The only hints to be found concerning the existence of the tonic are 
not in especial musical writings, but as before in the works of Aristotle, who 
asks : — 

' Why is it that if any one alters the tone on the middle string (fLco-i;) after the 
others have been tuned, and plays, every thing sounds amiss, not merely when he 
comes to this middle tone, but throughout the whole melody? but if he alters the 
tone played by the forefinger f or any other, the difference is only perceived when 
that string is struck ? Is there a good reason for this ? All good melodies often 
employ the tone of the middle string, and good composers often come upon it, 
and if they leave it recur to it again ; but this is not the case with any other 

IT tone.' Then he compares the tone of the middle string with conjunctions in 
language, such as ' and ' [and Hhen '], without which language could not exist, and 
proceeds to say : * In this way the tone of the middle string is a link between 
tones, especially of the best tones, because its tone most frequently recurs '.| 



extent determined a melody. See Dionysias 
of HalicamaBSUB, iripi <rwB4<r€9ts hvoitjimvy 
chap, xi., where we also find that in his day 
(first century before Christ) the musical com- 
posers transgressed at pleasure the rules of 
both accent and quantity. But if the written 
accents in Greek, and the accents as deter- 
mined by the rules of grammarians in Latin, 
are carefully examined, it will be found that 
every line in a Greek or Latin poem had its 
own distinct melody, the art of the poet being 
shewn by the great variability of pitch con- 



joined with a constant quantity of rhythm. — 
Translator.'] 

*F6tiB, Biographic wMverselle des Mmi- 
d&ns, vol. i. p. 126. 

t [The forefinger is 6 \txw6st the note 
played by it is ^ Klxaa^os, accent and gender 
both differing. — Translator.'] 

X Ai^ t/, ^^i^ fi4y ris r^y /i4<my icir4<rp iifJuStv^ 
kpfUcas [9i] rhs (kKKas x^P^'* i^^XPV^ '''^ 
iprydy^ ov fi6yoy trav Kark rhy riii iiimis yhni- 
roi <f>B6yyoyf Xvir«<, koI ^idy^rat kyApfUMrroy, 
iXKk kqX Kwrh r^y (kWify fif\t^9lay * 4ky B^ r^y 



CHAP. xin. 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIC MUSIC. 



241 



And in another place we find the same question with a slightly different answer, 
' Why do the other tones sound badly when the tone of the middle string is 
altered ? but if the tone of the middle string remains, and one of the others is 
altered, the altered one alone is spoiled ? Is it because that all are tuned and have 
a certain relation to the tone of the middle string, and the order of each is deter- 
mined by that ? The reason of the tuning and connection being removed, then, 
things no longer appear the same.'* In these sentences the esthetic significance of 
the tonic, under the name of ' the tone of the middle string,' is very accurately 
described. To this we may add that the Pythagoreans compared the tone of the 
middle string with the sun, and the other tones in the scale with the planets, j- It 
appears as if it had been usual to begin with the tone of the middle string above 
mentioned, for we read in the 33rd problem of Aristotle : * Why is it more agree- 
able to proceed from high pitch to low pitch, than from low pitch to high pitch ? Can 
it be that we thus begin at the beginning ? for the tone of the middle string is also T 
the leader of the tetrachord and highest in pitch. The second way would be to begin 
at the end instead of at the beginning. Or can it be that tones of lower pitch 
sound nobler and more euphonious after tones of high pitch P ' | This seems also to 
shew that it was not the custom to end with the tone of the middle string, which 
commenced, but with the tone of lowest pitch [produced by the uppermost string 
or Hypate], of which last tone Aristotle, in his 4th problem, says that, as opposed 
to its neighbour, the tone of lowest pitch but one, [due to the string of highest 
position but one, or Parhypate,] it is sung with complete relaxation of all the effort 
that is felt in the other. § These words of Aristotle may certainly be applied to 
the national Doric scale of the Greeks, which, increased by Pythagoras to eight 
tones, was as follows : — 



ZM^4p^i¥ lUwov, Zraif KiK€ivp rls XP^^^! *^ 
c6X<fya»s rovTo <rvfifi€dyei ; rdyra yitp t& XP^*^^ 
fi4Kiit iroWdKis rf fi^aj^ Xf*^^^' i^*"-^ ircCvrcs ol 
ipyoBol irot9}ra2, wvKvit irphs r^y fi4<niy iwayrwri ■ 
K^ iar^KBwri rax^f iirayipxoyrcu * irphs 9^ AWtiv 
otrtts olfi€fx(<ty. KoBdirtp ix r&y \6yuy ivlwy 
i^atptO^yrtty ffwHitruMy^ ovk ttrnv 6 \6yos 'EWriy- 
uc6s ' (oloy rh rh, Koi rh rol) Kat fyiot 8i ovB^y 
AvtroScTi * 8i^ rh rois fA}y, kytKyKcuoy tJyai xp^^^^^ 
xoWdKiSt ^ oifK iffrai \6yoi *YJ<Xi^vik6s * ro7f Si, 
/i^ * o0Ta» Koi r&y ^6yy»y ii fi4ffi^, Surw^p frM^C' 
/165 iiTTij icol fidXurra r&y Ka\&y, 81A rh irKttordKis 
iyvwdpx^iy rhy pB^yyoy abriis^ Arist. Prob, xiz. 
20. This pcMsage has also been partly quoted 
by Ambrosch. [The names of Qreek tones 
were those of the strings on the lyre by which 
they were played, just as if in English we were- 
to call the tones g, d\ a', a", the tones of the 
fourth, third, second, and first strings respec- 
tively, because they are produced as the open 
notes of these strings cm the violin, and con- 
tracted them to fourth, ikirdf &c., only omit- 
ting the word string. As the violin when held 
sideways in playing, throws the g string upper- 
most, and the e" string the lowermost, we 
might in the same way call g tiie * uppermost 
note,' trdrji, although lowest in pitch, and e" 
the * lowermost note,' H^, although highest 
in pitch. Then d might be called the middle, 
fi4<rri, being really the key-note of the violin 
and one of the two middle strings. This iUus- 
trates the Greek names very closely, for the 
lyre was held with the string sounding the 
lowest note, uppermost. See the scale on the 
next page.— 2Van«Za^or.] 

* Alii rl, 4iiv fikp 17 fi4ini KiytiBri, iral cu AxXat 
yopSol iixowri ipOeYy6fjLtyM * (one of my col- 
leagues. Prof. Stark, conjectures that in place 
of ^€yy6tAfycUf which makes nonsense, we 



should read ^$§ip6fi€yat *) iky 9h aZ j^ fthy ti4yji, 
T&y 8' iK\My rls KiyriB^, KiyjiBtiira fUyji <p94y- f 
ytrat; (for which Prof. Stark again proposes 
ip0€ip€rai ;) *H 8ti rh rjpfi6a-$eu 4irr\y i.trdo'tusy [rh 
9k fx^^" """^^ ^P^f ''^'^ At^<ri|y iirdffeus], icol ^ rd^ts 
il indtrn^St ffSij 9i iK§lyriy ; iip$4yros ody rov alriov 
rod ^pfi6(rBai koDl rov avy4xoyros^ ovk in 6fioi»s 
^ytrat (nrdpx^*»' Arist. Prob, zix. 36. 

fNicomachus, Ha/mumice, lib. i. p. 6, 
ed. Meibomii. [The following is Nicomachus*s 
arrangement of the comparison, with his 
reasons : 

Saturn hypate, as being highest in position, 
ticaroy yhp rh ky^aroy. 

Jupiter parhypiite, as next highest to 
Saturn. 

Mars lichanos or hypermese, as between 
Jupiter and the Sun. 

The Sun meas, as lying in the middle, the 
fourth from either end, middlemost string and 
planet. f 

Mercury pa/nvmsse, as lying between the 
Sun and Venus. 

Venus pa/ranecUie, as lying just above the 
moon. 

The moon neat^, as being lowest of all in 
position and next tlxe earth, jcal ykp y4aroy, rh 
KwAraroy, — TranslaUir.'] 

X Aik rl €{fapfioirr4rtpoy iirh rov 6^4os M rh 
fiaphj ^ imh rov fiap4os M rh 6^6; Tl4rfpoy 6rt 
rh iarh r^s ^X^^ ylyerai ipxeirScu ; ^ ykp fi4(rfi 
«ral ifytfiky 6^vrdrri rov r€rpax4p9ov. Th 9h oitK 
&v* ipx^^t ^^^* ^'^ rtKevriis. *H 9ri rh fiaph 
iiirh rov 6^4os ytyymSrtpov, ical €v^y6r€pov ; 
Arist. Prob, xix. 88. 

§ Ai& rl 9h rairnv \r^y iramnrdrriy^ x^^***' 
[^ovcri], r^y Si tvdniy pffiws * xeiroi 9U<ris 
4Kar4pas ; fl Urt fitr* Mtrtws 1^ vwdrri, ital &/ia 
fAtrk rify (rOffrcuriy i\a<pphy rh liya fidXKeiy; 
Arist. Prob* xix. 4. 



242 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIC MUSIC. 



FABT HI. 



F ParhypSte .... 



uppennost string] 

^^ - [vopvini'ni next to uppennoBt string] 

Q LichSnoe .... [xixwos forefinger string] 
A MSse (tone of middle string) . [fUtni middle string] 



Tetraohord of 
highest pitch 



'B PttramSse .... [wapafiitni next to middle string] 

G Trite [rptrji third string] 

D Paranete .... [Topairtrni next to lowermost string] 

E Nets [rftrti lowermost string] 



In modem phraseology the last description dted from Aristotle implies that the 
Parhypatd was a kind of descending ' leading note ' to the Hypatd. In the leading 
tone there is perceptible effort, which ceases on its falling into the fundamental 
tone. 

If, then, the tone of the middle string answers to the tonic, the Hypatg, which 

f is its Fifth, will answer to the dominant. For our modem feeling it is far more 
necessary to dose with the tonic than to begin with it, and hence we usually take 
the final tone of a piece to be its tonic without further inquiry. Modem music, 
however, usually introduces the tonic also in the first beat of the opening bar. 
The whole mass of tone is developed from the tonic and returns into it. Modem 
musidans cannot obtain complete repose at the end unless the series of tones con- 
verges into its connecting centre. 

Ancient Greek music seems, then, to have deviated from ours by ending on the 
dominant instead of the tonic. And this is in full agreement with the intonation 
of speech. We have seen that the end of an affirmative sentence is likewise 
formed on the Fifth next below the prindpal tone.* This peculiarity has also 
been generaUy preserved in modem recitative, in which the singer usually ends on 
the dominant ; the accompanying instruments then make this tone part of the 
chord of the dominant Seventh, leading to the tonic chord, and thus make a dose 

f on the tonic in accordance with our present musical feeling. Now since Greek 
music was cultivated by the recitation of epic hexameters and iambic trimeters, 
we should not be surprised if the above-mentioned peculiarities of chanting were 
BO predominant in the melodies of odes that Aristotle could regard them as the 
rule.f 

From the facts just adduced it follows (and this is what we are chiefly con- 
cerned with) that the Greeks, among whom our diatonic scale first arose, were not 
without a certain esthetic feding for tonality, but that they had not devdoped it so 
decisivdy as in modem music. Indeed, it does not appear to have even entered 
into the technical rules for constmcting mdodies. Hence Aristotle, who treated 
music esthetically, is the only known writer who mentions it; musical writers 
proper do not speak of it at all. And unfortunatdy the indications furnished by 
Aristotle are so meagre, that doubt enough still exists. For example, he says 
nothing about the differences of the various musical modes in reference to their 

«- principal tone, so that the most important point of all from which we should wish 
to regard the construction of the musical scale, is almost entirely obscured. 

The reference to a tonic is more distinctly made out in the scales of the old 
Christian ecclesiastical music. Originally the four so-called authentic scales were 
distinguished, as they had been laid down by Ambrose of Milan (elected Bishop 
A.D. 374, died A.D. 398). Not one of these agrees with any one of our scales. The 
four plagal scales afterwards added by Gregory, are no scales at all in our sense of 
the word. The four authentic scales of Ambrose X are : 



*[This would be entirely crossed by the 
andent Qreek system of j^tch-acoents, just as 
it now is by a similar system in Norwegian, 
where the pitch may rise for both affirmative 
and interrogative sentencea See p. 2S9d', 
note :^ — Translator.'] 

t Among the presumed ancient melodies 
which have been handed down to us, the frag- 



ment of the Homeric Ode to Demeter, which 
has been published by B. Marcello, shews the 
above-mentioned peculiarity very distinctly. 

:r[Mr. Bockstro in his article *Ambro- 
sian Chant,' in Grove's Dictionary of Mtuic, 
states that this attribution of four authentic 
scales to St. Ambrose has not been proved.— 
^analator,] 



QHAP. XUI. 



PERIOD OF HOMOPHONIO MUSIC. 



243 



l)DEFGABcd 
2)EFGABede 
3) F G A B c d e f 
4)GABedefg 

Perhaps, however, the ohange of B into B\^ was allowed from the first, and 
this would make the first scale agree with our descending scale of D minor, and the 
third scale would become our scale of F major. The old rule was that songs in 
the first scale should end in D, those in the second in E, those in the third in F, 
and those in the fourth in G, This marked out these tones as tonics in our sense 
of the word. But the rule was not strictly observed. The conclusion might fall 
on other tones of the scale, the so-called coronal tones, and at last the confusion 
became so great that no one was able to say exactly how the scale was to be 
recognised, all kinds of insufficient rules were formulated, and at last musicians 
clung to the mechanical expedient of fixing upon certain initial and concluding f 
phrases, called tropes, as characterising the scale. 

Hence although the rule of tonality had been already remarked in these 
medieval ecclesiastical scales, the rule was so unsettled and admitted so many 
exceptions, that the feeling of tonality must have been much less developed than 
in modem music. 

The Indians also hit upon the conception of a tonic, although their music is 
likewise unisonal. They called the tonic Ansa,* Indian melodies as transcribed 
by English travellers, seem to be very like modem European melodies, f F^tis 
and Coussemaker t have made the same remark respecting the few known remains 
of old German and Celtic melodies. 

Although, therefore, homophonic music was [possibly] not entirely without a ref- 
erence to some tonic, or predominant tone, such a tone was beyond aU dispute much 
more weakly developed than in modem music, where a few consecutive chords 
sufSce to establish the scale in which that portion of the piece is written. The f 
cause of this seems to me traceable to the undeveloped condition and subordinate 
part which characterises homophonic music. Melodies which move up and down 
in a few tones which are easily comprehended, and are connected, not by some 
musical contrivance, bub by the words of a poem, do not require the consistent 
application of any contrivance, to combine them. Even in modem recitative 
tonality is much less firmly established than in other forms of composition. The 
necessity for a steady connection of masses of tone by purely musical relations, 
does not dawn distinctly on our feeling, until we have to form into one artistic 
whole large masses of tone, which have their own independent significance without 
the cement of poetry. 



* Jones, On the Music of the Indians^ 
traxiBlated by Dalberg, pp. 86, 87. [Sir W. 
Jones's traot, with many others, is reprinted 
in Sourindro Mohun Tagore's Hindu Music 
from Various Authors. This is what he says 
of the ans'a, p. 149 of Tagore: * Since it 
appears from the Nir&yan [a Sanscrit treatise 
on masio], that 86 modes are in general use, 
and the rest very rarely applied to practice, I 
shall exhibit only the scales of the 6 B4^as 
[tunes] and 80 Bftginis [female personification 
of times in Hindu music] according to S6ma. 
. . . Three distinguished sounds in each mode 
[as SirW. Jones translates rdg] are called araha^ 
nydsa, ans'a, and the writer of the Nardyan 
defines them in the two following couplets. 
[I give the translation only.] " The note called 
graha is placed at the b^inning, and that 
named nydsa at the end of a song ; that note, 
which displays the peculiar melody, and to 
which all the others are subordinate, that, 
which is always of the greatest use, is like a 
sovereign, though a mere ans^a or portion." 



*' By the word vddi" savs the commentator, 
** he means the note, which announces and 
ascertains the B4ga [tune], and which may be 
considered as the parent and origin of the 
graha and nydsa" This clearly shews, I think ^ 
[says Sir W. Jones], that the ans'a must be 
the tonic; and we shall find that the two 
other notes are generally its third and fifth, 
or the mediant and dominant. In the poem 
entitled Mdgha there is a musical simile, 
which may illustrate and confirm our idea. 
[I give the translation only.] "From the 
greatness, from the transcendent qualities of 
that hero, eager for conquest, other kings 
match in subordination to him, as other notes 
are subordinate to the ans^a" ' — Translator,] 

t [The construction and time are very 
different. The scales are extremely variable. 
The results are very imperfectly represented 
by ourpresent musical notation. — Translator.] 

X Mistoire de VHarmonia au moyen Age^ 
Paris, 1852, pp. &-7. 



b2 



lU PERIOD OF POLYPHONIC MUSIC. part ni. 

2. Polyphonic Music. 

The second stage of musical deyelopment is the polyphonic music of the middle 
ages. It is usual to cite as the first invented part-music, the so-called organum or 
diaphony, as originally described by the Flemish monk Hucbald at the beginning 
of the tenth century. In this, two voices are said to have proceeded in Fifths or 
Fourths, with occasional doublings of one or both in Octaves. This would pro- 
duce intolerable music for modem ears. But according to O. Paul * the meaning 
is not that the two voices sang at the same time, but that there was a respon- 
sive repetition of a melody in a transposed condition, in which case Hucbald would 
have been the inventor of a principle which subsequently became so important in 
the fugue and sonata. 

The first undoubted form of part-music intentionally for several voices, was the 

T so-called discantus, which became known at the end of the eleventh century in 
France and Flanders. The oldest specimens of this kind of music which have 
been preserved are of the following description. Two entirely different melodies 
— and to all appearance the more different the better — were adapted to one another 
by slight changes in rhythm or pitch, until they formed a tolerably consonant whole. 
At first, indeed, there seems to have been an inclination for coupling a liturgical 
formula with a rather ' slippery ' song. The first of such examples could scarcely 
have been intended for more than musical tricks to amuse social meetings. It was 
a new and amusing discovery that two totally independent melodies might be sung 
together and yet sound well. 

The principle of discant was fertile, and its nature was suitable for develop- 
ment at that period. Polyphonic music proper was its issue. Different voices, 
each proceeding independently and singing its own melody, had to be united in 
such a way as to produce either no dissonances, or merely transient ones which 

T were readily resolved. Consonance was not the object in view, but its opposite, 
dissonance, was to be avoided. All interest was concentrated on the motion of the 
voices. To keep the various parts together, time had to be strictly observed, and 
hence the influence of discant developed a system of musical rhythm, which again 
contributed to infuse greater power and importance into melodic progression. 
There was no division of time in the Gregorian Cantus firmus. The rhythm of 
dance music was probably extremely simple. Moreover, melodic movement in- 
creased in richness and interest as the parts were multiplied. But the establish- 
ment of an artistic connection between the different voices, which, as we have seen, 
were at first perfectly free, required a new invention, and this, though it cropped 
up at first in a very humble form, has ended by obtaining predominant importance 
in the whole art of modern musical composition. This invention consisted in 
causing a musical phrase which had been sung by one voice to be repeated by 
another. Thus arose canonic imitation, which may be met with sporadically as 

f early as in the twelfth century, f This subsequently developed into a highly 
artistic system, especially among Netherland composers, who, it must be owned, 
ended by often shewing more calculation than taste in their compositions. 

But by this kind of polyphonic music — the repetition of the same melodic 
phrases in succession by different voices — ^it first became possible to compose 
musical pieces on an extensive plan, owing* their connection not to any union with 
another fine art — poetry, but to purely musical contrivances. This kind of music 
also was especially suited to ecclesiastical songs, in which the chorus had to express 
the feelings of a whole congregation of worshippers, each with his own peculiar 
disposition. It was, however, not confined to ecclesiastical compositions, but was 
also applied to secular songs (madrigals). The sole form of harmonic music yet 
known, which could be adapted to artistic cultivation, was that founded on canonic 

* Oeschichte des Claviers [Histoiy of the nos, PI. xxvii. No. iv., translated in p. xscriL 
Pianoforte], Leipzig, 1868, p. 49. No. xzix. 

t Goussemaker, loc, cit. Discant : Custodi 



CHAP. xra. PERIOD OF POLYPHONIC MUSIC. 246 

repetitions. If this had been rejected, nothing but homophonio music remained. 
Hence we find a number of songs set as strict canons or with canonical repetitions, 
although they were entirely unsuited for such a heavy form of composition. Even 
the oldest examples of instrumental compositions in several parts, the dance music 
of 1529,* are written in the form of madrigals and motets, a character of composition 
which, more freely treated, lasted down to the suites of S. Bach and Handel's 
times. Even in the first attempts at musical dramas in the sixteenth century, 
there was no other way of making the personages express their feelings musically, 
than by causing a chorus behind or upon the stage to sing over some madrigals in 
the fugue style. It is scarcely possible for us, from our present point of view, to 
conceive the condition of an art which was able to build up the most complicated 
constructions of voice parts in chorus, and was yet incapable of adding a simple 
accompaniment to the melody of a song or a duet, for the purpose of filling up 
the harmony. And yet when we read how Giacomo Peri's invention of recitative ^ 
with a simple accompaniment of chorus was applauded and admired and what 
contentions arose as to the renown of the invention ; what attention Viadana 
excited when he invented the addition of a Basso continuo for songs in one or 
two parts, as a dependent part serving only to fill up the harmony f ; it is impos- 
sible to doubt that this art of accompanying a melody by chords (as any amateur 
can now do in the simplest manner possible) was completely unknown to musicians 
up to the end of the sixteenth century. It was not till the sixteenth centiury that 
composers became aware of the meaning possessed by chords as forming an harmonic 
tissue independently of the progression of parts. 

To this condition of the art corresponded the condition of the tonal system. 
The old ecclesiastical scales were retained in their essentials, the first from D to d, 
the second from jE7 to c, the third from F to /, and the fourth from G to (7. Of these 
the scale from Ftof was useless for harmonic purposes, because it contained the 
Tritone F — B, in place of the Fourth F — B\f, Again, there was no reason forT 
excluding the scales from C to c and A to a. And thus the ecclesiastical scales 
altered under the influence of polyphonic music. But as the old unsuitable names 
were retained notwithstanding the changes, there arose a terrible confusion in the 
meaning attached to modes. It was not till nearly the end of this period that 
a learned theoretician, Glarean, undertook in his Dodecachordon (Basle 1547) to 
put some order into the theory of modes. He distinguished twelve of them, six 
authentic and six plagal, and assigned them Greek names, which were, however, 
incorrectly transferred. However, his nomenclature for ecclesiastical modes has 
been generally followed ever since. The following are Glarean's six authentic eccle- 
siastical modes, keys or scales, with the incorrect Greek names he assigned to 
them. 



Ionic 


. CDEFGABc 


Doric . 


. DEFGABcd 


Phrygian 


. EFGABcde 


Lydian 


. F G A B c d e f 


Mixolydian . 


. GABcdefg 


Eolic . 


A B c d e f g a 



Ionic answers to our major, Eolic to our minor system. Lydian was scarcely 
ever used in polyphonic music owing to the false Fourth F — B, and when it was 
employed it was altered in many different ways. 

Inability to judge of the musical significance of a connected tissue of harmonies 
again appears in the theory of the keys, by the rule, that the key of a polyphonic 
composition was determined by considering the separate voices independently. 
Glarean in certain compositions attributes different keys to the tenor and bass, the 
soprano and alto. Zarlino assumes the tenor as the chief part for determining the 
key. 

* Winterfeld, Johannes Oabrieli und sein Zeitalier^ vol. ii. p. 41. 
t Winterfeld, ibid,^ vol. ii. p. 19 and p. 59, 



246 PERIOD OF HARMONIC MUSIC. part m. 

The practioal consequences of this neglect of harmony are conspicuous in 
various ways in musical compositions. The composers confined themselves on the 
whole to the diatonic scsJe; 'accidentals/ or signs of alterations of tone, were seldom 
used. The Greeks had introduced the depression of the tone BioB}^in& peculiar 
tetrachord, that of the synemmenoif and this was retained. Besides this fjL cA 
and gjt were used, to introduce leading tones in the cadences. Hence modulation, 
as we understand it, from the key of one tonic to that of another with a different 
signature was almost entirely absent. Moreover, the chords used by preference 
down to the end of the fifteenth century, were formed of the Octave and Fifth 
without the Third, and such chords now sound poor and are avoided as much as 
possible. To medieval composers who only felt the want of the most perfect con- 
sonances, these chords appeared the most agreeable, and none others might be used 
at the close of a piece. The dissonances which occur are universally those which 
f arise from suspended and passing tones ; chords of the dominant Seventh, which, 
in modem harmony, play such an important part in marking the key, and in con- 
necting and facilitating progressions, were quite unknown. 

Great, then, as was the artistic advance in rhythm and the progression of parts, 
during this period, it did little more for harmony and the tonal system tlwn to 
accumulate an undigested mass of experiments. Since the involved progression of 
the parts gave rise to chords in extremely varied transpositions and sequences, the 
musicians of this period could not but hear these chords and become acquainted 
with their effects, however little skill they shewed in making use of them. At any 
rate, the experience of this period prepared the way for harmonic music proper, and 
made it possible for musicians to produce it, when external circumstances forced on 
the discovery. 

3. Harmonic Music. 

T Modern harmonic music is characterised by the independent significance of its 
harmonies, for the expression and the artistic connection of a musical composition. 
The external inducements for this transformation of music were of various kinds. 
First there was the Protestant ecclesiastical chorus. It was a principle of Protes- 
tantism that the congregation itself should undertake the singing. But a congre- 
gation could not be expected to execute the artistic rhythmical labyrinths of 
Netherland polyphony. On the other hand, the founders of the new confession, 
with Luther at their head, were far too penetrated with the power and significance 
of music, to reduce it at once to an unadorned unison. Hence the composers of 
Protestant ecclesiastical music had to solve the problem of producing simply 
harmonised chorales, in which all the voices progressed at the same time. This 
excluded those canonic repetitions of the same melodic phrases in different parts, 
which had hitherto formed the chief unity of the whole piece. A new connecting 
principle had to be looked for in the sound of the tones themselves, and this was 

f found in a stricter reference of all to one predominant tonic. The success of this 
problem was facilitated by the fact that the Protestant hymns were chiefly adapted 
to existing popular melodies, and the popular songs of the Germanic and Celtic 
races, as already remarked, betrayed a stricter feeling for tonality in the modem 
sense, than those of southern nations. Thus as early as in the sixteenth century, 
the system of the harmony of the ecclesiastical Ionic mode (our present major) 
developed itself with tolerable correctness, so that these chorales do not strike 
modern ears as strange, although they were still without many of our later contri- 
vances for marking the key, as, for example, the chord of the dominant Seventh. 
On the other hand, it was much longer before the other ecclesiastical modes, in har- 
monising which much uncertainty still prevailed, were fused into the modem minor 
mode. The Protestant ecclesiastical hymns of that time produced great effects 
on the feelings of contemporaries — a fact emphasised on all sides in the liveliest 
language, so that no doubt can exist that the impression made by such music, was 
something as new as it was peculiarly powerful. 



CHAP. xni. 



PERIOD OF HARMONIC MUSIC. 



247 



In the Roman Church also a desire arose for altering their music. The divisions 
of polyphonic music scattered the sense of the words, and made them unintelligible 
to the unpractised public, and occasioned even a learned and cultivated hearer great 
difficulties in endeavouring to disentangle the knot of voices. In consequence of 
the proceedings of the Council of Trent, and by an order of Pope Pius IV. (a.d. 
1559-1565), Itiestrina (a.d. 1524-1594) carried out this simplification and embel- 
lishment of ecclesiastical music, and the simple beauty of his compositions is said to 
have prevented the complete banishment of part music from the Roman liturgy. 
Palestrina, who wrote for choruses of singers practised in their art, did not entirely 
drop the more complicated progression of parts found in polyphonic music, but by 
appropriate sections and divisions he separated and connected both the mass of 
tones and the mass of voices, and generally distributed the latter into several dis- 
tinct choirs. The voices also are more or less frequently heard together in such 
progressions as were used in chorales, and in this case consonant chords greatly f 
predominated. By this means he made his pieces more comprehensible and 
intelligible, and in general extremely agreeable to the ear. But the deviation of 
ecclesiastical modes from the new modes invented in modem times for the treat- 
ment of harmonies, is nowhere so remarkable as in the compositions of Palestrina, 
and those of contemporary Italian composers of ecclesiastical music, among whom 
Giovanni Gkkbrieli, a Venetian, should be particularly named. P^estrina was a 
pupil of Claude Ooudimel (a Huguenot, slain at Lyons in the massacre of St. 
Bartholomew), who had harmonised French psalms in a way which, when the scale 
was major, was but very slightly different from modem habits. These psalm 
melodies had been borrowed, or at least imitated from popular songs. Hence Pales- 
trina was certainly acquainted with this mode of treatment, through his teacher, 
but he had to deal with themes from the Gregorian Gantus firmus that moved in 
ecclesiastical tones, which he was forced to maintain strictly even in pieces where 
he himself invented or adapted the melodies. Now these modes necessitated a f 
totally different harmonic treatment, which sounds very strange to modems. As 
a specimen I will only cite the commencement of his eight-part Stdbat mater. 




Sta - bat 



ma 



ter do 



lo 



ro - 



sa 



Here, at the commencement of a piece, just where we should require a steady 
characterisation of the key, we find a series of chords in the most varied keys, IT 
from A major to F major, apparently thrown together at haphazard, contrary to all 
our rules of modulation. What person that was ignorant of ecclesiastical modes 
could guess the tonic of the piece from this commencement ? As such we find D 
at the end of the first strophe, and the sharpening of C to C!| in the first chord 
also points to D. The principal melody too, which is given to the tenor, shews 
from the commencemenb that D is the tonic. But we do not get a minor chord of D 
till the eighth bar, wheresbs a modem composer would have been forced to introduce 
it in the first good place he could find in the first bar. 

We see from these characters how greatly the nature of the whole system of 
ecclesiastical modes differed from our modem keys. We cannot but assiune that 
masters like P&lestrina founded their method of harmonisation upon a correct feel- 
ing for the peculiar character of those modes, and that, as they could not fail to be 
acquainted with the contemporary advances in Protestant ecclesiastical music, 
their work was neither arbitrary nor unskilful. 



848 PEBIOD OF HARMONIC MUSIC. past m. 

What we mis8 in such examines as the one just addooed, is first, that the tonio 
chord does not {^y the same prominent part at the very commencement that is 
assigned to it in modem music In the latter, the tonic cbard has the same 
prominent and connecting significance among chords as the tonic or key-note 
among the tones of the scale. Next we miss altogether that feding for the con- 
nection of consecutive chords which in modem times has led to the very general 
custom of giving them a common tona This is evidently related to the fact that, 
as we shall see hereafter, it was not possiUe in the old ecclesiastical modes to 
produce chains of chords so closely connected with each other and with the tonic 
chord, as in the modem major and minor modes. 

Hence, although we recognise in Fblestrina and Grabrieli a delicate artistic 
sensitiveness for the esthetic eflfect of separate chords of various kinds, and in so 
Y far a certain independent significance in their harmonies, yet we see that the means 
of establishing an internal connection in the tissue of chords had still to be dis- 
covered. This problem, however, required a reduction and transformation of the 
previous scales, to our major and minor. On the other hand, this reduction 
sacrificed the great variety of expression which depended on diversity of scale. 
The old scales partly form transitions between major and minor, and partly enhance 
the character of the minor, as in the ecclesiastical Phrygian mode [p. 2^6d]. This 
diversity being lost, it had to be replaced by new contrivances, such as the trans- 
position of the scales for dififerent tonics, and the modulational passage from one 
key to another. 

This transformation was completed during the seventeenth century. But the 
most active cause for the development of harmonic music is due to the commence- 
ment of opera. This had been occasioned by a revival of acquaintance with 
T classical antiquity, and its avowed object was to rehabilitate ancient tragedy, which 
was known to have been recited musically. Here arose immediately the problem 
of allowing one or two voices to execute solos ; but these again had to be harmo- 
nised so as to fit in between the choruses, which were treated in the polyphonic 
manner, the object being to make the solo parts stand prominently forward and 
keep the accompanying voices well under. These conditions first gave rise to 
Recitative, invented by Giacomo Peri and Caccini in 1600, and solo songs with 
airs, invented by Glaudio Monteverde and Viadana. The new view taken of 
harmony shews itself in written music by the appearance of figured basses in the 
works of these composers. Every figur^ bass note represented a chord, so that 
the chords themselves were settled, but the progression of the parts of which they 
were constituted was left to the taste of the player. And thus what was merely 
secondary in polyphonic music, became principal, and conversely. 

Opera also necessitated the discovery of more powerful means of expression 
f than were admissible in ecclesiastical music. Monteverde, who was extremely 
prolific in inventions, is the first composer who used chords of the dominant 
Seventh without preparation, for which he was severely blamed by his contempo- 
rary Artusi. Generally we find a bolder use of dissonances, which were employed 
independently, to express sharp contrasts of expression, and not, as before, as 
accidental results of the progression of parts. 

Under these influences, even as early as in Monteverde's time, the Doric, 
Eolic, and Phrygian ecclesiastical modes [p. 254c, d] began to be transformed and 
fused into our modem minor mode. This was completed in the seventeenth cen- 
tury, and these modes were thus made more suitable for giving prominence to the 
tonic of the harmony, as will be more fully shewn hereafter. 

We have already given an outline of the nature of the influence which these 
changes exerted on the constitution of the tonal system. The mode of connecting 
musical phrases hitherto in vogue — canonic repetitions of similar melodic figures 
— had necessarily to be abandoned as soon as a simple harmonic accompaniment 



CHAP* xni. PERIOD OP HARMONIC MUSIC. 249 

had to be subordinated to a melody. Hence some new means of artistic connection 
had to be discovered in the sound of the chords themselves. This was effected, 
first by making the harmonies refer their tones much more definitely to one pre- 
dominant tonic than before, and secondly by giving fresh strength to the rela- 
tions between the chords themselves and between all other chords and the tonic 
chord. In the course of our investigations we shall see that the distinctive pecu- 
liarities of the modem system of tones can be deduced from this principle, and 
that the principle itself is very strictly carried out in our present music. In 
reality the mode in which the materials of music are now worked up for artistic 
use, is in itself a wondrous work of art, at which the experience, ingenuity, and 
esthetic feeling of European nations has laboured for between two and three thou- 
sand years, since the days of Terpander and Pythagoras. But the complete for- 
mation of the essential features as we now see it, is scarcely two hundred years 
old in the practice of musical composers, and theoretical expression was not given T 
to the new principle till the time of Bameau at the beginning of last century. In 
the historical point of view, therefore, it is wholly the product of modern times, 
limited nationcJly to the German, Roman, Celtic, and Sclavonic races. 

With this tonal system, which admits great wealth of form with strictly defined 
artistic consistency, it has become possible to construct works of art, of much 
greater extent, and much richer in forms and parts, much more energetic in 
expression, than any producible in past ages ; and hence we are by no means 
inclined to quarrel with modern musicians for esteeming it the best of all, and 
devoting their attention to it exclusively. But scientifically, when we proceed to 
explain its construction and display its consistency we must not forget that our 
modem system was not developed from a natural necessity, but from a freely 
chosen principle of style ; that beside it, and before it, other tonal systems have 
been developed from other principles, and that in each such system the highest 
pitch of artistic beauty has been reached, by the successful solution' of more limited T 
problems. 

This reference to the history of music was necessitated by our inability in this 
case to appeal to observation and experiment for establishing our explanations, 
because, educated in a modem system of music, we cannot thoroughly throw our- 
selves back into the condition of our ancestors, who knew nothing about what we 
have been familiar with from childhood, and who had to find it all out for them- 
selves. The only observations and experiments, therefore, to which we can appeal, 
are those which mankind themselves have undertaken in the development of music* 
If our theory of the modem tonal system is correct it must also suffice to furnish 
the requisite explanation of the former less perfect stages of development. 

As the fundamental principle for the development of the European tonal 
system, we shall assume that the whole mass of tones and the connection of har- 
monies must stand in a close and always distinctly perceptible relationship to some 
arbitrarily selected tonic, and that the mass of tone which forms the whole compo- % 
sitiony must be developed from this tonic, and must finally return to it. The 
ancient world developed this principle in homophonic music, the modem world in 
harmonic music. But it is evident that this is merely an esthetical principle, not 
% natural law. 

The correctness of this principle cannot be established d priori. It must 
be tested by its results. The origin of such esthetical principles should not be 
ascribed to a natural necessity. They are the inventions of genius, as we previously 
endeavoured to iUustrate by a reference to the principles of architectural style. 



250 PROGRESSION BY INTERVALS. pabt nr. 

CHAPTER XIV. 

THB TONALITY OF HOMOPHONIG MUSIC. 

Musio was forced first to select artistically, and then to shape for itself, the material 
on which it works. Painting and sculpture find the fundamental character of their 
materials, form and colour, in nature itself, which they strive to imitate. Poetry 
finds its materials ready formed in the words of language. Architecture has, 
indeed, also to create its own forms ; but they are partly forced upon it by 
technical and not by purely artistic considerations. Music alone finds an infi- 
nitely rich but totally shapeless plastic material in the tones of the human voice and 
artificial musical instruments, which must be shaped on purely artistic principles, 
unfettered by any reference to utility as in architecture, or to the imitation of 

T nature as in the fine arts, or to the existing symbolical meaning of sounds as in 
poetry. There is a greater and more absolute freedom in the use of the material 
for music than for any other of the arts. But certainly it is more difficult to make 
a proper use of absolute freedom, than to advance where external irremovable land- 
marks limit the width of the path which the artist has to traverse. Hence also the 
cultivation of the tonal material of music has, as we have seen, proceeded much 
more slowly than the development of the other arts. 
It is now our business to investigate this cultivation. 

The first fact that we meet with in the music of all nations, so far as is yet 
known, is that alterations of pitch in melodies take place by intervals^ and not by 
contintLous transitions. The psychological reason of this fact would seem to be 
the same as that which led to rhythmic subdivision periodically repeated. All 
melodies are motions within extremes of pitch. The incorporeal material of tones 
is much more adapted for following the musician's intention in the most delicate 

f and pliant manner for every species of motion, than any corporeal material, how- 
ever light. Graceful rapidity, grave procession, quiet advance, wild leaping, all 
these different characters of motion and a thousand others in the most varied 
.combinations and degrees, can be represented by successions of tones. And as 
music expresses these motions, it gives an expression also to those mental con- 
ditions which naturally evoke similar motions, whether of the body and the voice, or 
of the thinking and feeling principle itself. Every motion is an expression of the 
power which produces it, and we instinctively measure the motive force by the 
amount of motion which it produces. This holds equally and perhaps more for the 
motions due to the exertion of power by the human will and human impulses, 
than for the mechanical motions of external nature. In this way melodic pro- 
gression can become the expression of the most diverse conditions of human dis- 
position, not precisely of humBin feelings^* but at least of that state of sensitiveness 
which is produced by feelings. In English the phrase out of tune, unstrung, and 

fin German the woid stimrming, literaJly tuning, are trancd^erred from music to 
mental states. The words are meant to denote those peculiarities of mental con- 
dition which are capable of musical representation. I think we might appro- 
priately define gemiithsstimmung, or mental tune, as representing that general cha- 
racter temporarily shewn by the motion of our conceptions, and correspondingly 
impressed on the motions of our body and voice. Our thoughts may move fast or 
slowly, may wander about restlessly and aimlessly in anxious excitement, or may 
keep a determinate aim distinctly and energetically in view ; they may lounge 
about without care or effort in pleasant fancies, or, driven back by some sad 
memories, may return slowly and heavily from the spot with short weak steps. 
All this may be imitated and expressed by the melodic motion of the tones, and 
the listener may thus receive a more perfect and impressive image of the ' tune ' of 

* Hansliok seems to me to have the advan- means of clearly obaracterising the object of 
tage over other esthetic writers in this point, feeling, 
because music, unassisted by poetry, has no 



OHAP. XIY. 



PROGRESSION BY INTERVALS. 



261 



another person's mind, than by any other means, except perhaps by a very perfect 
dramatic representation of the way in which such a person really spoke and acted. 

Aristotle also formed a similar conception of the effect of music. In his 29th 
problem he says : * Why do rhythms and melodies, which are composed of sound, 
resemble the feelings ; while this is not the case for tastes, colours, or smells ? Can 
it be because they are motions, as actions are also motions ? Energy itself belongs 
to feeling and creates feeling. But tastes and colours do not act in the same way.'* 
And at the end of the 27th problem he says: 'These motions, i.e. rh3rthms and 
melodies, are active, and action is the sign of feeling '.f 

Not merely music but even other kinds of motions may produce similar effects. 
Water in motion, as in cascades or sea waves, has an effect in some respects 
similar to music. How long and how often can we sit and look at the waves 
rolling in to shore ! Their rhythmic motion, perpetually varied in detail, produces 
a peculiar feeling of pleasant repose or weariness, and the impression of a mighty f 
orderly life, finely linked together. When the sea is quiet and smooth we can 
enjoy its colouring for a while, but this gives no such lasting pleasure as the rolling 
^^ves. Small undulations, on the other hand, on small surfaces of water, follow 
one another too rapidly, and disturb rather than please. 

But the motion of tone surpasses all motion of corporeal masses in the delicacy 
and ease with which it can receive and imitate the most varied descriptions of 
expression. Hence it arrogates to itself by right the representation of states of 
mind, which the other arts can only indirectly touch by shewing the situations 
which caused the emotion, or by giving the resulting words, acts, or outward 
appearance of the body. The union of music to words is most important, because 
words can represent the cause of the frame of mind, the object to which it refers, 
and the feeling which lies at its root, while music expresses the kind of mental 
transition which is due to the feeling. When different hearers endeavour to de- 
scribe the impression of instrumental music, they often adduce entirely different f 
situations or feelings which they suppose to have been symbolised by the music. 
One who knows nothing of the matter is then very apt to ridicule such enthusiasts, 
and yet they may have been all more or less right, because music does not represent 
feelings and situations, but only frames of mind, which the hearer is unable to 
describe except by adducing such outward circumstances as he has himself noticed 
when experiencing the corresponding mental states. Now different feelings may 
occur under different circumstances and produce the same states of mind in dif- 
ferent individuals, while the same feelings may give rise to different states of mind. 
Love is a feeling. But music cannot represent it directly as such. The mental 
states of a lover may, as we know, shew the extremest variety of change. Now 
music may perhaps express the dreamy longing for transcendent bliss which love 



* Aik rC ol pv$fAo\ Ktd rk fi4\ii ^v^ odffay 
IjBfiruf toucw ' ol 9^ X^f^^ «^i ^^* oM r^ 
Xp^/Mtra Kol al ^fxai ; *H 8ri Ktrficrtis €l(r\pf iMnrtp 
Koi al wpd^€is ; Ijiri 9^ ^ fi^w Mpytia iiSiichy, Koi 
voi«i 1i$os * ol M xv/M)} ical rii xP^A^'''''<^^^t^^(riir 
dftolus. Arist. Proh. ziz. 29. 

t [The above words conclude the problem, 
which it seems best to cite in full. Ai& rl ri 
iutoifffrlir fA^yoy ^os ^x*' ^^f' oltrBrir&y; jcoi yitp 
ii» p &ycv \^ov yJXot, ifiMS fx^i JjBos * &\A* oO 

Srt Klyritrut l^ei fiovoyovxh ^f ^ i^6ipos ^fias kwu; 
Toia^ fily yhp iccU roXs &\Xoi5 5irctpx«t KOfuyhp 
ical rh XP^F^ [i^^] ''h^ ^t*' * i^^^ rris lwofi4yris 
r^ Toio^^ ^6^ cUffBa^SfitBa Kirfiatus. A0Tif 
ih lx« &fioi6rrira, iv t« rots ^vBfuns koI 4y rf 
r&p ^6yymtf rd^u r&y h^iwv koI fiap4w¥^ ovk iv 
rS fti^u. *AXX* 9^ ffvfi^yia ohx fx^t i|0or. *Ey 
Ji Toij &XXoff al<r$iiro7s rouro oinc tcrw, Al 8i 
Ktrfi<r9is alreut wpoKrucal tltriy. A< 8^ wpd^tis, liBovs 
tnifuurla ivrt Arist. Prob. xix. 27. Which we 
may perhaps translate thus : * Why is soun4 



the only sensation which excites the feelings ? 
Even melody without words has feeling. But 
this is not the case for colour, or smell, or 
taste. Is it because they have none of the 
motion which sound excites in us ? For the 
others excite motion ; thus colour moves the 
eye. But we feel the motion which follows 
sound. And this is alike, in rhythm, and 
alteration in pitch, but not in united sounds. 
Sounding notes together does not excite feel- 
ing. This is not the case for other sensations. 
Now these motions stimulate action, and this 
action is the sign of feeling.' Aristotle seems 
to have required motion to excite feeling, and 
in sounding two notes toaeth^, there was no 
motion of one towards the other. It is evi- 
dent that he had not the slightest inkling of a 
progression of harmonieSf and this utter blank 
in his mind is one of the strongest proofs that 
the Greeks had never tried harmony. *Kpiiovla 
had the modem meaning of melody ; fu\<fZia 
was words set to muBio. — Translator,) 



K>2 PROGRESSION BY INTERVAI^. part in. 

may excite. But precisely the same state of mind might arise from religious 
enthusiasm. Hence when a piece of music expresses this mental state it is not 
a contradiction for one hearer to find in it the longing of love, and another the 
longing of enthusiastic piety. In this sense Yischer's rather paradoxical state- 
ment that the mechanics of mental emotion are perhaps best studied in their 
musical expression, may be not altogether incorrect. We really possess no other 
means of expressing them so exactly and delicately. 

As we have seen, then, melody has to express a motion, in such a manner that 
the hearer may easOy, clearly, and certainly appreciate the character of that motion 
by immediate perception. This is only possible when the steps of this motion, 
their rapidity and their amount, are also exactly mecuurable by immediate sensible 
perception. Melodic motion is change of pitch in time. To measure it perfectly, 
the length of time elapsed, and the distance between the pitches, must be measur- 
ir able. This is possible for immediate audition only on condition that the altera- 
tions both in time and pitch should proceed by regular and determinate degrees. 
This is immediately clear for time, for even the scientific, as well as ail other 
measurement of time, depends on the rhythmical recurrence of similar events, the 
revolution of the earth or moon, or the swings of a pendulum. Thus also the 
regular alternation of accentuated and unaccentuated sounds in music and poetry 
gives the measure of time for the composition. But whereas in poetry the con- 
struction of the verse serves only to reduce the external accidents of linguistic 
expression to artistic order ; in music, rhythm, as the measure of time, belongs to 
the inmost nature of expression. Hence also a much more delicate and elaborate 
development of rhythm was required in music than in verse. 

It was also necessary that the alteration of pitch should proceed by intervals, 
because motion is not measurable by immediate perception unless the amount of 
space to be measured is divided off into degrees. Even in scientific investigations 
IT we are unable to measure the velocity of continuous motion except by comparing 
the space described with the standard measure, as we compare time with the seconds 
pendulum. 

It may be objected that architecture in its arabesques, which have been 
justly compared in many respects with musical figures, and which also shew 
a certain orderly arrangement, constantly employs curved lines and not lines 
broken into determinate lengths. But in the first place the art of arabesques really 
began with the Greek meander, which is composed of straight lines set at right 
angles to each other, following at exactly equal lengths, and cutting one another 
off in degrees. In the second place, the eye which contemplates arabesques can 
take in and compare all parts of the curved lines at once, and can glance to and 
fro, and return to its first contemplation. Hence, notwithstanding the continuous 
curvature of the lines, their paths are perfectly comprehensible, and it became 
possible to renounce the strict regularity of the Grecian arabesques in favour of 
IT the curvilinear freedom. But whilst freer forms are thus admitted for individual 
small decorations in architecture, the division of any great whole, whether it be a 
series of arabesques or a row of windows or columns, &c,, throughout a building, is 
still tied down to the simple arithmetical law of repetition of similar parts at equal 
intervals. 

The individual parts of a melody reach the ear in succession. We cannot per- 
ceive them all at once. We cannot observe backwards and forwards at pleasure. 
Hence for a clear and sure measurement of the change of pitch, no means were 
left but progression by determinate degrees. This series of degrees is laid down 
in the musical scale. When the wind howls and its pitch rises or falls in insensible 
gradations without any break, we have nothing to measure the variations of pitch, 
nothing by which we can compare the later with the earlier sounds, and compre- 
hend the extent of the change. The whole phenomenon produces a confused, un- 
pleasant impression. The musical scale is as it were the divided rod, by which we 
measure progression in pitch, as rhythm measures progression in time. Hence 



CHAP. XIV. RATIONAL CONSTRUCTION OF DIATONIC SCALES. 263 

the analogy between the scale of tones and rhythm naturally occurred to musical 
theoreticians of ancient as well as modem times. 

We consequently find the most complete agreement among all nations that use 
music at all, from the earliest to the latest times, as to the separation of certain 
determinate degrees of tone from the possible mass of continuous gradations 
of sound, all of which are audible, and these degrees form the scale in which 
the melody moves. But in selecting the particular degrees of pitch, deviations 
of national taste become immediately apparent. The number of scales used by 
different nations and at different times is by no means small. 

Let us inquire, then, what motive there can be for selecting one tone rather 
than another in its neighbourhood for the step succeeding any given tone. We 
remember that in sounding two tones together such a relation was observed. We 
found that under such circumstances certain particular intervals, namely the con- 
sonances, were distinguished from all other intervals which were nearly the same, f 
by the absence of beats. Now some of these intervals, the Octave, Fifth, and 
Fourth, are found in all the musical scales known.* Recent theoreticians that 
have been born and bred in the system of harmonic music, have consequently 
supposed that they could explain the origin of the scales, by the assumption that 
all melodies arise from thinking of a harmony to them, and that the scale itself, 
considered as a melody of the key, arose from resolving the fundamental chords 
of the key into their separate tones. This view is certainly correct for modem 
scales ; at least these have been modified to suit the requirements of the harmony. 
But scales existed long before there was any knowledge or experience of harmony at 
all. And when we see historically what a long period of time musicians required 
to learn how to accompany a melody by harmonies, and how awkward their first 
attempts were, we cannot feel a doubt that ancient composers had no feeling at all 
for harmonic accompaniment, just as even at the present day many of the more 
gifted Orientals are opposed to our own harmonic music. We must also not forget T 
that many popular melodies, of older times or foreign origin, scarcely admit of any 
harmonic accompaniment at all, without injury to their character. 

The same remark applies to Rameau's assumption of an * understood ' funda- 
mental bass in the construction of melodies or scales for a single voice. A modem 
composer would certainly imagine to himself at once the fundamental bass to the 
melody he invents. But how could that be the case with musicians who had never 
heard any harmonic music, and had no idea how to compose any ? Granted that 
an artist's genius often unconsciously * feels out ' many relations, we should be 
imputing too much to it if we asserted that the artist could observe relations of 
tones which he had never or very rarely heard, and which were destined not to be 
discovered and employed till many centuries after his time. 

It is clear that in the period of homophonic music, the scale could not have 
been constructed so as to suit the requirements of chordal connections uncon- 
sciously supplied. Yet a meaning may be assigned, in a somewhat altered form, IT 
to the views and hypotheses of musicians above mentioned, by supposing that the 
same physical and physiological relations of the tones, which become sensible 
when they are sounded together and determine the magnitude of the consonant 
intervals, might also have had an effect in the construction of the scale, although 
under somewhat different circumstances. 

Let us begin with the Octave, in which the relationship to the fundamental tone 
is most remarkable. Let any melody be executed on any instrument which has a 
good musical quality of tone, such as a human voice ; the hearer must have heard 
not only the primes of the compound tones, but also their upper Octaves, and, less 
strongly, the remaining upper partials. When, then, a higher voice afterwards 
executes the same melody an Octave higher, we hear again a part of what we 
heard before, namely the evenly numbered partial tones (p. idd) of the former 

* [It will be seen in App. XX. sect. K. that the Fourth and Fifth are often materially in- 
exact or designedly altered. — Translator.] 



254 RELATIONSHIP OF COMPOUND TONES. , pabt hi. 

compound tones, and at the same time we hear nothing that we had not previously 
hea^d. Henoe the repetition of a melody in the higher Ootaye is a real repetition 
of what has been previoasly heard, not of all of it, but of a part.* If we allow a 
low voice to be accompanied by a higher in the Octave above it, the only part 
music which the Greeks employed, we add nothing new, we merely reinforce the 
evenly numbered partials. In this sense, then, the compound tones of an Octave 
above are really repetitions of the tones of the lower Octaves, or at least of part of 
their constituents. Hence the first and chief division of our musical scale is that into 
a series of Octaves. In reference to both melody and harmony, we assume tones 
of diJQferent Octaves which bear the same name, to have the same value, and, in 
the sense intended, and up to a certain point, this assumption is correct. An 
accompaniment of Octaves gives perfect consonance, but it gives nothing additional ; 
it merely reinforces tones already present. Hence it is musically applicable for 
T increasing the power of a melody which has to be brought out strongly, but it has 
none of the variety of polyphonic music, and therefore is felt to be monotonouSy 
and it is consequently forbidden in polyphonic music. 

What is true of the Octave is true in a less degree for the Twelfth. If a melody 
is repeated in the Twelfth we again hear only what we had already heard, but the 
repeated part of what we heard is much weaker, because only the third, sixth, 
ninth, &c., partial tone is repeated, whereas for repetition in the Octave, instead of 
the third partial, the much stronger second and weaker fourth partial is heard, and 
in place of the ninth, the eighth and tenth occur, &c. Hence repetition of a 
melody in the Twelfth is less complete than repetition in the Octave, because only 
a smaller part of what had been already heard is repeated. In place of this 
repetition in the Twelfth, we may substitute one an Octave lower, namely in the 
Fifth. Bepetition in the Fifth is not a pure repetition, as that in the Twelfth is. 
Taking 2 for the pitch number of the prime tone, the partials are (197c, d) 

for the fundamental compound .2 4 6 8 10 12 

for the Twelf til .... 6 12 

for the Fifth .... 3 6 9 12 

When we strike the Twelfth we repeat the simple tones 6 and 12, which already 
existed in the fundamental compound tone. When we strike the Fifth, we continue 
to repeat the same simple tones, but we also add two others, 3 and 9. Hence for 
the repetition in the Fifth, only a part of the new sound is identical with a part of 
what had been heard, but it is nevertheless the most perfect repetition which can 
be executed at a smaller interval than an Octave. This is clearly the reason why 
unpractised singers, when they wish to join in the chorus to a song that does not 
suit the compass of their voice, often take a Fifth to it. This is also a very evident 
proof that the uncultivated ear regards repetition in the Fifth as natural. Such 
an accompaniment in the Fifth and Fourth is said to have been systematically 
developed in the early part of the middle ages. Even in modem music, repetition 
IT in the Fifth plays a prominent part next to repetition in the Octave. In normal 
fugues the theme, as is well known, is first repeated in the Fifth ; in the normal 
form of instrumental pieces, that of the Sonata, the theme in the first movement 
is transposed to the Fifth, returning in the second part to the fundamental tone. 
This kind of imperfect repetition of the impression in the Fifth induced the Greeks 
also to divide the interval of the Octave into two equivalent sections, namely two 
Tetra^hords. Our major scale on being divided in this manner would be : — 

c d e f g a h c^ d* e' f 



I. II. lU. 



* [Some oonsiderations have been omitted, powerful as in the higher tone. The upper 

probably by design. The quality of tone of partials of the higher tone, which are still 

the voice whioh sings the Octave above is quite effective, would be iaaudible in the lower 

materially different. The evenly numbered tone. — TraniUUorJ] 
partials of the lower tone are by no means so 



CHAP. XIV. RELATIONSHIP OF COMPOUND TONES. 265 

The succession of tones in the second tetrachord is a repetition of that in the 
first, transposed a Fifth.* To pass into the Octave division, the successive tetra- 
chordsmust be alternately separate and connected. They are said to be connected, 
or conjunct^ when, as in II. and III., the last tone c of the lower becomes the first 
of the higher tetrachord ; and separate, or disjunct^ when, as in I. and 11., the last 
tone of the lower is different from the upper. In the second tetrachord ^ to c, every 
ascending series of tones necessarily leads to c' as the final tone, and this & is also 
the Octave of the fundamental tone of the first tetrachord. Now this c' is the Fourth 
of g, the fundamental tone of the second tetrachord. To make the succession of 
tones the same in both tetrachords, the lower tetrachord had to be increased by the 
tone/ which answers to c\ The Fourth/, however, would have su^ested itself 
in the same way as the Fifth, independently of this analogy of the tetrachords. 
The Fifth is a compound tone in which the second partial is the third partial of the 
fundamental compound tone ; the Fourth is a compoimd tone in which the third IT 
partial is the same as the second of the Octave. Hence the limits of the two 
analogous divisions of the Octave are settled, namely : — 

c— /, g—&, 

but the mode of filling up these gaps remains arbitrary, and different plans for 
doing so were adopted by the Greeks themselves at different periods, and others 
again by other nations. But the division of the scale into octaves, and the octave 
into two analogous tetrachords, occurs everywhere, almost without exception. 

Boethius {De Musica, lib. i. cap. 20) informs us that according to Nicomachus 
the most ancient method of tuning the lyre down to the time of Orpheus, con- 
sisted of open tetrachords. 



with which certainly it was scarcely possible to construct a melody. But as it f 
contained the chief degrees of the pitch of ordinary speech, a lyre of this kind 
might possibly have served to accompany declamation. 

The relationship of the Fifth, and its inversion the Fourth, to the fundamental 
tone, is so close that it has been acknowledged in all known systems of music, f 
On the other hand, many variations occur in the choice of the intermediate tones 
which have to be inserted between the terminal tones of the tetrachord. The 
interval of a Third is by no means so clearly defined by easily appreciable partial 
tones, as to have forced itself from the first on the ear of unpractised musicians. 
We must remember that even if the fifth partial tone existed in the compound 
tones of the musical instruments employed, it would have had to contend with the 
much louder prime tone, and would also have been covered by the three adjacent 
and lower partials. As a matter of fact, the history of musical systems shews that 
there was much and long hesitation as to the tuning of the Thirds. And the doubt 
is even yet felt when Thirds are used in pure melody, unconnected with any bar- IT 
monies. I must own that on observing isolated intervals of this kind, I cannot 
come to perfectly certain results, but I do so when I hear them in a well-constructed 
melody with distinct tonality. The natural major Thirds of 4 : 5 thus seem to me 
calmer and quieter than the sharper major Thirds of our equally tempered modem 
instruments, or with the still sharper major Thirds which result from the Pytha- 
gorean tuning with perfect Fifths. Both of the latter intervals have a strained 
effect. Most of our modem musicians, accustomed to the major Thirds of the 
equal temperament, prefer them to the perfect major Thirds, when melody alone is 
concerned. But I have convinced myself that artists of the first rank, like Joachim, 
use the Thirds of 4 : 5 even in melody. For harmony there is no doubt at all. 

*[ThiB applies to the Pythagorean soale whereas (^ to a is a minor Tone and a to 6 a 

and hence to Qreek music, and also to all major Tone. These distinctions were of course 

tempered music. But in just intonation c to d pui^sely omitted in the text. — 2Vo9M2ator.] 
is a major Tone, and d to « a minor Tone, f [But see App. ^X. sect. K,—Tranalaior,'] 



256 RELATIONSHIP OP COMPOUND TONES. pakt ui. 

Every one chooses the natural major Thirds. In Chapter XVI. I shall describe an 
instrument which will enable any one to perform experiments of this kind.* 

Under these circumstances another principle for determining the small intervals 
of the scale was resorted to during the infancy of music, and seems to be still 
employed among the less civilised nations. This principle, which has subsequently 
had to yield to that of tonal relationship, consists in an endeavour to distinguish 
equal intervals by ear, and thus make the differences of pitch perceptibly uni- 
form. 

This attempt has never prevailed over the feeling of tonal relationship for 
the division of the Fourth, at least in artistically developed music. But in the 
division of smaller intervals we shall find it applied as an auxiliary in many of the 
less usual divisions of the Greek tetrachord and in the scales of Oriental nations. 
But arbitrary divisions which are independent of tonal relationship, disappeared 
f everywhere in exact proportion to the higher development of the musical art. 

We will now inquire what kind of a scale we should obtain by pursuing to its 
consequences the natural relationship of the tones. We shall consider musical 
tones to be related in the first degree which have two identical partial tones ; and 
related in the second degree^ when they are both related in the first degree to some 
third musical tone. The louder the coincident in proportion to the non-coincident 
partials of compound tones related in the first degree, the closer is their relation- 
ship and the more easily will both singers and hearers feel the common character 
of both the tones. Hence it follows that the feeling for tonal relationship ought to 
differ with the qualities of tone : and I believe that this states a fact in nature, 
because flutes and the soft stops of organs, on which chords are somewhat colour- 
less owing to an absence of upper partials and a consequent incomplete definition 
of dissonances, retain much of the same colourless character in melodies. This, 
I think, depends upon the fact, that, for such qualities of tone, the recognition of 
Tthe natural intervals of the Thirds and Sixths, and perhaps even of the Fourths 
and Fifths, does not result from the immediate sensation of the hearer, but at most 
from his recollection. When he knows that on other instruments and in singing 
he has been able by immediate sensation to recognise the Thirds and Sixths as 
naturally related tones, he acknowledges them as well-known intervals even when 
executed by a flute or on the soft stops of an organ. But the mere recollection of 
an impression cannot podsibly have the same freshness and power as the immediate 
sensation itself. 

Since the closeness of relationship depends on the loudness of the coincident 
upper partial tones, and those having a higher ordinal number are usually weaker 
than those having a lower one, the relationship of two tones is generally weaker, 
the greater the ordinal number of the coincident partials. These ordinal numbers, 
as the reader will recollect from the theory of consonant intervals, also give the 
ratio of the vibrational numbers of the corresponding notes. 
f In the following table, the first horizontal line contains the ordinal numbers of 
the partial tones of the tonic c, and the first vertical column those of the corre- 
sponding tone in the scale. Where the corresponding vertical columns and hori- 
zontal lines intersect, the name of the tone of the scale is given for which this 
coincidence holds. Only such notes are admitted as are distant from the tonic by 
less than an Octave. Below each degree of the scale are placed the two ordinal 
numbers of the coincident partials, which will serve as a scale for measuring the 
closeness of the relationship. 

* [Other experimental instruments will be not so harsh but quite near enough to shew its 

described in App. XX. sect. F. The Harmoni- character. For the intervals used by violinists, 

cal gives only the just major Third 4 : 5. Its see also App. XX. sect. G. arts. 6 and 7. — 

nearest approach to the Pythagorean 64 : 81, Translator.'] 
or 408 cents, is B[^ : D i= 68 : 80, or 418 cents, 



CHAP. XIV. 



PENTATONIC SCALES. 



257 



Partial Tones of the Tonic 




1 


2 


3 


4 


5 


6 


1 


c 
1 : 1 


1:2 










2 


C 
2:1 


c 
2 :2 


9 
2: 3 


2:4 






3 




8: 2 


e 
8 :d 


3{4 


a 
8 :5 


8:6 


4 




C 
4 :2 


O 

4:8 


c 
4:4 




4:6 


9 
4:6 


5 






5 :8 


5 :4 


c 
6:6 


0b 
6:6 


6 






C 
6:8 


I?' 
6:4 


ii 
6:6 


6:6 



T 



In this systematio comparison we find the following series of notes lying in 
the octave above the fundamental note c, and related to the tonic c in the first 
degree, arranged in the order of their relationship : 



c 
1:1 



r 

c 
1 :2 



9 
2: 3 



/ 
3: 4 



a 
3:5 



and the following series in the descending octave : 



c 
1 :1 



G 
1 :2 



F 
3:2 



G 
4:3 



5:3 




4:5 



5:4 



eb 
5:6 



6:5 



The series is discontinued when the resultant intervals become very dosa 
Intervals adapted for practical use must not be too close to be easily taken and f 
distinguished. What is the smallest interval admissible in a scale is a question 
which different nations have answered differently according to the different 
direction of their taste, and perhaps also according to the different delicacy of 
their ear. 

It seems that in the first stages of the development of music many nations 
avoided the use of intervals of less than a Tone, and hence formed scales, which 
alternated in intervals from a Tone to a Tone and a half. According to examples 
collected by M. F^tis,* a scale of this kind is found not only among the Chinese 
but also among the other branches of the Mongol race, among the Malays of Java 
and Sumatra, the inhabitants of Hudson's Bay, the Papuas of New Guinea, the 
inhabitants of New Caledonia, and the Fullah negroes.f The five-stringed lyre 
(Eissar) of the inhabitants of North Africa and Ab3r8sinia, which is represented in 
the bas-reliefs of the Assyrian palaces as an instrument played on by captives, was 
also, according to Yilloteau, t tuned by the scale of five degrees : ^ 

g — a — b — d' — e'§ 

Traces of an ancient scale of this kind are clearly furnished by the five-stringed 
lyre or lute (KiOdpa) of the Greeks. At least Terpander (circa b.o. 700-650), who 
played a conspicuous part in the development of anciept Greek music, and who 
added a seventh string to the former Cithara of six strings, used a scale composed 
of a tetrachord and a trichord, having the compass of an Octave and tuned 
thus : — 



e 



f—g — a — h-^ — d; 



,r *♦ 



* Histoire GSnSrale de la Musiqttet Paris, 
1869, vol. i. 

t [See App. XX. sect. K. for pentatonic 
scales in Java, China, and Japan. — Trans- 
latorJ] 

X bescriptions des Instruments de Mtisique 
des Orientaux; chap. xiii. in the Description 



de VEgypte, £tat Modeme. 

§ [This is probably only a rude approxi- 
mation or a guess. See App. XX. sect. K. for 
observations on existing pentatonic scales actu- 
ally heard. — Translator,'] 

** Nicomachus makes Philolaus say (edit. 
Meibomii, p. 17), * From the Hypate (e) to the 

S 



258 



PENTATONIC SCALES. 



PART III. 



in which there is no c\ and the upper tetrachord has no interval of a Semitone, 
although there is an interval of this kind in the lower.* 

Olympos (circa B.C. 660-620)^ who introduced Asiatic flute music into Greece 
and adapted it to Greek tastes, transformed the Greek Doric scale into one of five 
tones, the old enharmonic scale 

b -^ c e -^f at 

This seems to indicate that he brought a scale of five tones with him from Asia, 
and merely borrowed the use of the intervals of a Semitone from the Greeks. 
Among the more cultivated nations, the Chinese and the Celts of Scotland and 
Ireland still retain the scale of five notes without Semitones, although both have 
also become acquainted with the complete scale of seven notes. 

Among the Chinese, a certain prince Tsay-3ru is said to have introduced the 

? scale of seven notes amid great opposition from conservative musicians. The 
division of the Octave into twelve Semitones, and the transposition of scales have 
also been discovered by this intelligent and skilful nation. But the melodies tran- 
scribed by travellers mostly belong to the scale of five notes. The Gaels and Erse 
have likewise become acquainted with the diatonic scale of seven tones by means 
of psalmody, and in the present form of their popular melodies the missing tones 
are sometimes just touched as appoggiature or passing notes. These are, however, 
in many cases merely modem improvements, as may be seen on comparing the 
older forms of the melodies, and it is usually possible to omit the notes which do 
not belong to the scale of five tones without impairing the melody. This is not 
only true of the older melodies, but of more modem popular airs which were com- 
posed during the last two centuries, whether by learned or unlearned musicians. 
Hence the Gaels as well as the Chinese, notwithstanding their acquaintance with 
the modem tonal system, hold fast by the old.| And it cannot be denied that by 

f avoiding the Semitones of the diatonic scale, Scotch airs receive a peculiarly bright 
and mobile character, although we cannot say as much for the Chinese. Both 
Gaels and Chinese make up for the small number of tones within the Octave by 
great compass of voice. § 

The scale of five tones admits of a certain variety in its construction. Assume 
c as the tonic and add to it the nearest related notes in the ascending Octave, tUl 
you come to a Semitone. This gives 

c — c —g—f — a. 

The next note e would form a Semitone with /. In the descending Octave we find 
in the same way 

c—G — F—G — Eb. 

The great gaps in the scales between c and / in the first, and between G and c 

^ in the second are filled up by tones related in the second degree. Since the tones 

related to the Octave can only be repetitions of those directly related to the tonic, 



Mese (a) was a Fourth, from the Mese (a) to 
the Note {e') a Fifth, from the Nete {e') to the 
Trite (6) a Fourth, from the Trite (6) to the 
Hypate {e) a Fifth '. This shews that c, not 6, 
was the missing note. 

* [The upper tetrachord was thus reduced 
to a trichord, while the lower remained a per- 
fect tetrachord. If we take Pythagorean into- 
nation the cents are e 90 / 204 g 204 a 204 
6 294 d' 204 e\— Translator.] 

f [Taking Pythagorean intonation, the 
cents in the intervals are 6 90 c 406 90 / 408 
a 204 6. The account of the popular tuning 
of the Ko-to, the national Japanese instru- 
ment, furnished by the Japanese, but in Euro- 
pean notes, at the International Health Exhi- 



bition in London, 1884, gives many varieties 
of this scale, see App. Xa. sect. K« Japan. — 
Translator.] 

t Chinese Melodies, in AmbroBoh*s Oe- 
schiekte der Musik, vol. i. pp. 80, 84, 85. Of 
Scotch melodies there is a fine collection 
with reference to the authorities and the older 
forms in G. F. Graham's Songs of Scotland, 
8 vols. Edinburgh, 1869. The modern piano- 
forte accompaniment which has been adaed, is 
often ill eifough suited to the character of the 
airs. 

§ [Exclusive of the two drones there are 
only 9 tones on the bagpipe. For the whole 
of these observations see App. XX. sect. K. — 
Translator,] 



CHAP. XIV. 



PENTATONIC SCALES. 



259 



the next tones to be considered are those related to the upper Fifth g^ and lower 
Fifth F, and these are d (the Fifth above the upper Fifth g) and B\) (the Fifth 
below the lower Fifth F), We thus obtain the scales* 



1) Ascending 

2) Descending 



c 
1 
C 
1 



— d — ^f—g — a — 







7 ¥ 

E\^ — F- 






4 



S 

8 
7 



2 

i« 



2 



But in place of the tones more distantly related to the tonic in the first degree, 
both systems of tones related in the second degree might be used, and this would 
give a scale resulting from a simple progression by Fifths, as 



3) 



1 



d-^f-g- 
I 



9 



4 



h\, — c' 
^ 2 



Then there are also some more irregular forms of this scale of five tones, in 
which the major Third e replaces the Fourth/, which is more nearly related to the 
tonic c. This transformation is probably due to the modem preference for the 
major mode, and it has made its appearance in very many Scotch melodies. The 
scale is then 



4) 



c- 

1 



d — e — 







6 

T 



g — a — 

8 6 

¥ ¥ 



0' 

2 



in which all the notes are related in the first degree, but for which the nearest notes 
to the tonic, either way, are a Tone and a Semitone distant from it, has not yet 
been discovered in actual use. 

The above five forms of the scale of five tones can all be so transposed that 
they can be played on the black notes of a piano without touching the white ones.f 
This is the well-known simple rule for composing Scotch melodies. | Any one of 



If 



The examples of a sinular exchange of the Fifth g for the minor Sixth a\^ are 
doubtful. This would give the scale 

5) C — >^B\^ — F—^A\^ — B\,—c 

1 6 4 8 lA Q 

The scale 6) c — ^-^e]) — / — g — a — ^^c 

1 4 3 5 Q «r 



*[In the following investigation the 
Author all along assumes hannonio forms of 
the intervals, which are certainly modem. 
The cents in the five forme cited, as deter- 
mined from the ratios given, are : 

1) c 201 d 294/204 9 204 a 316 c'. 

2) C 316 E^\f 182 F 204 G 294 B\^ 204 c. 

3) c 204 <2 294 / 204 9 294 &|^ 204 c'. 



1) 4200(tt800/B200dC200 

2) ^ ($300)9 200 {^200 

3) 9S2OO 

4) ,. >S 200 9« 200 

5) ^|300 c|200 d|d0O/( 200 0S 200 

And this shews that all five are formed by a 
simple succession of tempered Fifths, for the 
five black notes imranged in order of Fifths are 
/| 700 4 700 ^ 700 dk 700 €&, The piano 
being tuned in equal temperament gives very 
nearly perfect fifths, and hence very weU 
imitates a succession of five notes thus tuned. 
If, hoiyever, the Fifths are perfect, then every 
200 and 300 cents in the above scheme becomes 
204 and 294, differences which few ears will 
perceive in melody. 

t[Mr. Colin Brown, Euing Lecturer on 
the Science, Theory, and History of Music, 




4) c 204 d 182 «i 816 g 182 a. 316 c\ 
6) C 316 E^\, 182 F 316 A^^ 204 B»h 182 c 
6) c 316 «ib 182 / 204 ^ 182 a^ 316 c— 
Trantlator,'] 

fin the following way — the numbers re- 
ferring to the schemes in this page, and the 
corresponding i cents, of course, belonging to 
equal temperament : 



300 /If 200^ 
300/'J ^ 



Anderson^s College, Glasgow, in Tha Thistle, 
'a miscellany of Scottish song, with notes 
critical and Mstorical ; the mel(^ies arranged 
in their natural modes ; with an introduction, 
ezplainins the construction and characteristics 
of Scottish music, the Principles, Laws, and 
Origin of Melody * (Glasgow, Dec. 1883), says, 
p. viii. : * The pentatonic form of the scale is 
used in Scotland, but not to a greater extent 
than in the national music of some other 
countries. A general idea seems to prevail 
that Scottish music can be played upon the 
five blackdigitals of the pianof orte,representing 

s2 



f 



260 



PENTATONIC SCALES. 



PA&T in. 



the five black notes may then be used as a tonic, but the B\f or Ajj^ having no Fifth 
{F or Ejt) among the black notes has a very doubtful effect as a tonic. 

The following are examples of the use of these various scales of five tones : — 
1. The First Scale without Third or Seventh. Chinese, after John Barrow.* 



f:^-^ w= ^ 



■^^m 



5=^4:: 




2. To the Second ScaU, without Second or Sixth, belong most Scotch airs which 
have a minor character. In the modem forms of these airs one or other of the 
missing tones is often transiently touched. Here follows an older form of the air 
called Cockle Shells :-{- 



^.. 




^^^^.^^s i gg^^ 




m 



s 



^ 




it±3t 



t=t 



■^ *- 



^ 



:1- 



^--# 




^^^rnimm^ "i^^m^- 






what is popularly known as the Oaledonian 
scale, but any one who will take the trouble 
to examine Scottish music will find that not 
more than a twentieth part of our old melodies 
are pentatonic, or constructed upon this form 
of the scale. In Dauney^s work, where the 
Skene MSS. (the oldest collection extant) are 
noted, this statement is fully verified.* I nave 
examined the first 86 airs as printed in The 
Thistle^ and I found only one which was 
fl- strictly pentatonio, p. 61, No. 8, Lament for 
^ RiMridh Mor^ Macleod of Macleod — Dun- 
vegan 1626. But in nearly a quarter of the airs 
the Semitones were introduced by an unac- 
cented note which looked to be modem, as in 
Boy'i Wife^ p. 10, and the Banks and Braes o' 
Bonnie Doon, p. 48, on the last of which Mr. 
Brown observes, p. 49: *With pentatonic 
theorists Ye Banks and Braes is a favourite 
example of this assumed peculiarity of Scottish 
music. But it can only be brought into the 
pentatonic scale by being played in an incom- 
plete form.' The only places in which the 
Seventh ^ occurs are the cadence e' /'& g'jj^ a' 
(which occurs twice, and is evidently out of 
character, and should be e' f'jt a' a'), and the 
flourished ad libitum cadence f'jl^s'' d" c''|&" 
containing the Fourth d (which should clearly 
be f'i e" c"i 6'). And many of the others 
can be probably * restored * in a similar fashion. 



Thus of Roy*s Wife Mr. Brown himself says, 
p. 11, * played as a dance tune it is pentatonic,' 
and g^ves the substitutes for his version, which 
are clearly the more ancient forms. Mr. Brown 
gives as the marks of Scotch music (pp. ix., x.) 
1. its modal character, being constructed on 
the ancient seven modes ; 2. its modulation or 
change of mode, which is constant ; 8. almost 
absence of transition or change of key; 4. 
preponderance of minor forms of the scale; 
6. almost absence of sharp Sevenths in the 
minors ; 6. cadences on to every note of the 
scale, and double cadences closing on an unac- 
cented note, which are simple (repeating the 
cadential tone) or compound (the unaccented 
tone differing from the preceding). — J^rans- 
IcUorJ] 

* [Scale, tempered d 200 « 800 ^ 200 a 9CX) 
b 800 d'. That is, no /| and no (^ All 
these scales are merely the best representa- 
tives in European notation of the sensations 
produced by the scales on European listeners. 
They cannot be received as correct represen- 
tations of the notes actually played. — Trans- 
lator.] 

fPlayford's Dancing Master, ed. 1721. 
The first edition appeared in 1657. — Songs of 
Scotland, vol. iii. p. 170. [Scale, d 800 f 200 
9 200 a 800 c' 200 (2', without e or b^.-^Trans- 
lator.] 



CHAP. XIV. 



PENTATONIO SCALES. 



261 



3. For the Third ScaXe, without Third and Sixth. Gaelic. Probably an old 
bagpipe tune.* 

— V- 




<*^ 



^^1 




t^^^ 



E^i 



Blytbe>blytheand mer-ry are we, Blythe are we, one and a'; 
Oan-ty daya we've often seen ; A night like this we ne - ver saw. 




The ffloam-inff saw us all sit down, And mei-kle mirth has been our fa '. Then 



W^^^^^^^^^^^ 



let the toast and sang go round, Till chan - ti - cleer be - gins to craw : 

4. To the Fourth Scale^ without Fourth or Seventh, belong most Scotch airs 
which have the character of a major mode. Since dozens of Scotch tunes of this 
kind are to be found in every collection, and are perfectly well known, I give here 
a Chinese temple hymn, after Bitschurin,-!- as an example : 




2^: 



■^- 






.a. 



t 



"O- 



^^i£ 



?3 



X 



mm 



-&■ 



x; rp--; 



I 



G- 



3=1 



zi: 



i 



72: 



X 



2i 



-G' 



t 



-G- 



:pr 



^ 



rq=r: 



pi^ 



5. For the Fifth Scale, without Second and Fifth, I have found no perfectly 
pure examples. But there are melodies with either only the Fifth or else with a f 
mere transient use of both Second and Fifth. In the latter case the mirurr Second 
is used, giving it the character of the ecclesiastical Phrygian tone, for example in 
the very beautiful air, AvXd Bobin Oray. I give an example with the tonic /t 
in which the Second {gjt or g) is altogether absent, and the fifth c^ is only once 
transiently touched, so tnat it might just as well have been omitted. 




i 



h 



Willi ye 
Let us 



the braes 



Jgf^ES 



SEt 



^m 




quhid - der^ Where the blae - her 

Finery 



ries grow, 'Mang the 



U^^^^^^^^^^ 



!>■ 



f 



bon - nie bloom - in' hea - ther ; Where the 

Sport the 





1^^ 



^^i3=s 



rae, 


Light • 


. ly 


bound 


• ing 


the 


ge - ther. 


day. 


On 


the 


braes 


0* 


Bal 


- quhid - der ? 



* There is a Chinese tune of the same kind 
in AmhroBoh, loc, cit. vol. i. p. 84, second piece. 
Another, with a single occurrence of the Sixth, 
My Peggie is a young thing, may be seen in 
Songs of Scotland, vol. iii. p. 10. [Scale, 
200 /| 800 a 200 6 900 d' 200 0', without g 
or c. On the bagpipe, see App. XX. sect. E. 



Probably the scale of the bagpipe has been 
unaltered since its importation from the East, 
and it probably never could have played such 
a scale as it is here supposed capable of per- 
forming.— Translator.] 

t Ambrosch, loc, cit, vol. i. p. 80. To the 
same class belongs the first piece on p. 85 after 



TETRACHORD8. 



PAST m. 



We mi^i also in this example ai»iuiie b as the kmic, and regud ihe ooncliiBions 
86 formed upon the dominant and sobdominant in the (dd-fiashioned way.* In 
these scales of five tones the determination of ihe tonic is much more doubtful 
than in the scales of seven tones. 

The rule usually given for the Gaelic and Chinese scales, to omit the Fourth 
and Seventh, applies therefore only to the fourth of the above scales, which cor- 
responds to our major scale. True this scale is often used in the usual Scotch 
airs of the present day, and is profaaUy due to the reaction of our modem tonal 
system. But the examples here adduced shew that every possible position may be 
assumed by the tonic in the scale of five tones, if indeed we allow these scales to 
have a tonic at alL In Scotch mdiodies the omissions in both major and minor 
scales are so contrived as to avoid the intervals of a Semitone, and substitute for 
them intervals of a Tone and a ball Among the Chinese airs, however, I have 
Y found one which belongs rather to the old Greek enharmonic system, to be con- 
sidered presently, and it will be exfJained at the same time (p. 265c). 

We now proceed to the construction of scales with seven degrees. The first 
form was developed in Greece under the influence of the tetrachordal divisions. 
The ancient Greek melodies had a small compass and few degrees, a peculiarity 
especially emphasised even by later authors, as Plutarch, but it is also found among 
most nations in the early stages of their musical cultivation. Hence the scale was 
at first formed within a less compass than an Octave, namely within the tetrachord. 
On looking within this compass for the tones nearest related to the limiting tonic 
(jU<nj), we find only the Thirds. Thus if we assume e (the last tone in the tetra- 
chord, b — e) as a tonic, its next related tone within the compass of that tetrachord 
is c, the major Third below e. This gives : — 

1. The ancient enharmonie tetrachord of Olympos — 

m b^^e e 

ill 

Archytas was the first to settle that the tuning ot c:e must be 4 : 5 in the 
enharmonic mode. The next most closely related tone to e would be the minor 
Third below it. Adding this we obtain : — 

2. The older chromatic tetrachord of the Greeks — 



b 
i 



cwclt — -^e 

4, 5^ 1 



The method of tuning the intervals here assigned agrees with the data of 
Eratosthenes (in the third century before Christ). The interval between c and c^ 
in this case corresponds to the small ratio || [a 70 cents], which is less than the 
Semitone |} [ » 112 cents]. Next to it comes the much wider interval, c^ — e, 
corresponding to a minor Third. We should obtain a more even distribution of 
V intervals, by measuring the minor Third upwards from the lowest tone of the 
tetrachord. This gives rise to 
3. The diatonic tetrachord — 

b>^c — d — e 
1 



1 

4 



4 



9 
TIT 



This is the tuning assigned by Ptolemy for the diatonic tetrachord. Here we 



Barrow and Amiot. [Scale, / 200 jf 200 a 800 
c' 200 d' 800/', without &|^ ot e.— Translator,-] 
* [Taking /s as the Tonic, the scale would 
be No. 6, without Second and Fifth thus : 

y|SOOa2OO6 8OO(2 2OO02OOy| 

but taking b as the tonic the scale would be 
No. 2 without Second and Sixth, as 

6 800 (2 200 200/1 800 a 200 5 

which is altogether different. Any reference 



to tonic, dominant and subdomlnant, implies 
harmonic scales, which pentatonic scales could 
not have been originally. Mr. G. Brown gives 
this air {Thistle, p. 198) as here printed, but 
says it varies between his modes of the 8rd 
(Greek Doric, Ecclesiastical Phrygian) and 5th 
of the scale (Or. Ionic, Eccl. Mixolydian). 
The spelling of the words has been corrected 
by his edition.— 2Van«{ator.] 



CHAP. XIV. 



TETRACHORDS. 



263 



must observe that if e continued to be regarded as the tonic, d would have only a 
distant relation with it in the second degree through the auxiliary tone h. If two 
tetrachords had been connected, as was very early done, thus : 

b a 

a closer connection in the second degree between d and e might have been obtained 
by tuning d as a Fifth below a. Taking e as 1, a will be ^, and the Fifth below it 
is d » |. We thus obtain the tetrachord 



4. 



h 
i 



c — d — e 
1 



4 
T 



8 



which agrees with the tuning assigned by Didymus (in the first century before 
Christ). IT 

According to the old theory of Pythagoras, which will be examined presently, 
all the intervals of the diatonic scale should be tuned by means of intervals of a 
Fifth, giving : 



5. 



c — d 



4 



81 
FT 



9 
S 



e 
1 



243 

?6ir 



V 

'S 



9 

8" 



The tetrachord thus obtained is the Greek Doric, which is considered as normal, 
and made the basis of all considerations on other scales. Accordingly those tones 
which formed the lower tones of the semitonic intervals of the scale, were, at least 
theoretically, considered as the immovable limiting tones of the tetrachord while 
the intermediate tones might change their position. Practically the intonation of 
even these fixed tones was a little changed, as Plutarch tells us, which may mean 
that in the Lydian, and Phrygian modes, &c., the tonic is not selected from one off 
these so-called fixed tones of the tetrachords. Thus we shall see further on, that 
when d is the tonic, the b in the natural intonation of such a scale does not form a 
perfect Fifth with e. 

The tetrachord could, however, be differently completed by inserting tones which 
formed major or minor Thirds with either of the extreme tones. 

Two minor Thirds give the Phrygian tetrachord — 



6. 



d 
i 



e 

6 



f-g 
1 



If a major Third were taken upwards from the lower extreme tone, and a minor 
Third downwards from the upper extreme, we should obtain the Lydian Tetrachord — 



7. 



c — d — e 

I 



ft 






1 



8. Two major Thirds, asin&^^c — dtt^^d, would form a variety of the chro- 
matic scale, which does not seem to have been used, or at any rate not to have been 
distinguished from the chromatic form.* 



* [Adopting the notation explained later on 
in this chapter, these tetrachords may be ac- 
curately written as follows : Nos. 1, 8, 4 and 7 
maybe played as they stand on the Harmonical, 
and Nos. 2, 6, 8 by transposition as shewn 
below, but No. 5 requires the six notes forming 
6 perfect Fifths, and these do not occur on the 
Harmonical, but can be played sufficiently well 
on any tempered harmonium. Between the 
names of the notes are inserted the number of 
cents in the interval between them. Bj re- 
ferring to the table called the Duodenanum, 
App. XX. sect. E. art. 18, which employs the 
same notation, the exact position of the notes 



may be seen, and the correctness of the trans- 
positions verified. 



1. OlympoB 

2. Old Chromatic . 

(play . 
8. Diatonic . 

4. Didymus. 

5. Doric 



&i 112 c' 886 0/ 

6, 112c'70c9'j3l6«j' 

a 1120^1^70 a; 816 c') 



112 c' 204 d' 182 «,' 
&i 112 c' 182 dj' 204 0/ 
&90c' 2O4d'2O4 0' 
(not playable on the Harmonical) 

6. Phrygian . . d 182 e^ 134 p 182 g 

(play . g 162 a^lUb^^ 182 c') 

7. Lydian . . c 182 c2j 204e. 112 / 

8. Unused . . b^ 112c' 274 di%112ei' 

(play . gll2a,|>274 6ill2c') 



264 



rETRACHORDS. 



pAur ni. 



These are all the normal snbdivisions of the tetrachord that ha^e been nsed. 
But other sabdiTisions occur which the Greeks themselves termed trraUofuU 
{dXoya),* and we do not know with certainty how far they were practically used. 
One of them, the io/t diatonic mode, makes nse of the interval 6 : 7, which is at 
any rate very near to a natural consonance, being that between the Fifth and the 
snbminor Seventh of the fundamental note, an interval occasionally used in har- 
monic music when unaccompanied singers take the minor Seventh of the chord of 
the dominant Seventh. The intervals f are : 



9. 



3:4 



21 

TIT 

>^ , 



10 



— > 
8 
T 



6:7 

By lowering the Lichanos the ParhypatS is also flattened. However, the small 
IT interval |^ is very nearly the Pythagorean Semitone, which expressed approxi- 
mately is |§. 

The equal diatonic mode of Ptolemy, which was divided thus : I 



10. 



3:4 



12 
IT 



1 1 
TTF 

• 



\0 



6:6 



contained a perfect minor Third divided as evenly as possible. 

There is a similar succession of tones, in an inverse order, in the modem 
Arabic scale as measured by the Syrian, Michael Meshaqah.§ In this case the 
Octave is divided into twenty-four Quartertones ** ; the tetrachord 10 has ten of 
them, its lowest interval four, and each of the upper intervals three. Under these 
circumstances the two upper intervals together form very nearly a minor Third, 
f which, as in the equal diatonic scale of the Greeks, is divided into two equal 
intervals, without paying regard to any sensible relationship of the intermediate 
tone thus produced. 

The doser the interval, the more easy and certain is its division into two 
intervals, by the mere feeling for dififerenoe of pitch. This is, in particular, pos- 
sible for intervals which approach to the limits at which differences of pitch are 



If the minor Thirds d/ and $ g were taken 
at fNrthagorean » 294 cents, tetraohord 6 
would become <i 204 90 / 204 gf, which is 
more intelligible. 

On refening to App. ZX. sect. D. the 
ratios correspondiDg to each of these numbers 
o! cents will be found. — Tramlator.] 

* [That is, strictly, having a ratio not ex- 
pressible by whole numbers. — TransUUor,] 

t [The notes which would form tetraohord 
IT 9 might be written in the Translator's nota- 
tion, descending from left to right, 

^b^ 86 Oi 182 g 281 V 

The three first notes could be played on the 
Harmonioal. The interval 281 cents could be 
played on it downwards as c' 281 ^6|^ but the 
whole tetraohord cannot be played on it. 
Here 80 cents represent 21 : 20, while the 
Pythagorean Semitone 266 : 248 is 90 cents. 
The difference is small but perceptible. — 
Tran$lator,] 

t [Using the notation "/ for the 11th har- 
monic of c, so that >i is equivalent to 88 : 32 
or 63 cents, tetrachord 10 may be written 
downwards : 

g 161 "/ 166 0^ 182 d. 

This is simply, in order, the 12, 11, 10, and 9th 
hannonic of c, and can be played on the horn 
or trumpet, and on the 6th octave of the Har- 



i 



monical, as d'" e^'" " /'" g'", downwards as 
"'"/"' «j'" d'". The division of the minor 
bird gf : 0] = 816 cents into 161 and 166 oents 
is of course only approximative. But it is a 
purely natural tetracnord of which g 204/112 0, 
182 d is a deformation. — TranslcUor,'] 

§ Journal 0/ the American Oriental Society, 
vol. i. p. 178, 1847. 

** [If the Octave is divided equally into 24 
quarters, each of which is half an equial Semi- 
tone or 60 cents, we can write it by using the 
additional sign ij (a turned \^, standing for q 
the initial of miarter) to represent an added 
Quartertone, $ being two Quartertones, and 
f^ three Quartertones, thus ascending c c^ 
cH<Af\doT descending ddk^d\^c(\Cf using d^ 
as the equivalent of ^ Then the principal 
scale of Meshaqah (see App. XX. sect. K.) is 

a2006 160c'^ 160(2' 200«' 160/'^ I6O9' 200a'. 

Hence the tetrachord a:d\ which represents 
10 in the text, has one interval of 200 cents or 
4 Quartertones, and two of 160 cents or 3 
Quartertones. This interval of 8 Quartertones 
represents the trumpet intervals 'y : y == 11 : 12 
== 151 cents, and 6 : "/ = 10 : 11 = 166 oents, 
and was introduced into Arabia by the lutist 
Zalzal, who died about 1000 years ago, and ia 
much used in the East. — Translator.] 



OHAP. XIV. 



TETRACHORDS. 



2d5 



distinguishable by the ear. The distinctness with which the yet sensible difference 
can be felt then furnishes a measure of its magnitude. In this sense we have 
probably to explain the possibility of the later enharmonic mode of the Greeks, 
which, however, had already fallen into disuse in the time of Aristoxenus, and was 
perhaps hunted up again by later writers as an antiquarian curiosity. In this 
mode the Semitone of the ancient enharmonic mode already mentioned (No. 1, 
p. 2625) was again subdivided into two Quartertones, so that a tetrachord was 
produced like the chromatic one, but with closer intervals between the adjacent 
tones. The division of this enharmonic tetrachord * was 



11. 



3:4 



88 



31 



6 
T 



This Quartertone can only be considered as a transition in the melodic move- 
ment towards the lowest extreme of the tetrachord. A similar interval occurs in ^ 
this way in existing Oriental music. A distinguished musician whom I requested 
to pay attention to it on a visit to Cairo, wrote to me as follows : ' This evening 
I have been listening attentively to the song on the minarets, to try to appreciate 
the Quartertones, which I had not supposed to exist, as I had thought that the 
Arabs sang out of tune. But to-day as I was with the dervishes I became certain 
that such Quartertones existed, and for the following reasons. Many passages 
in litanies of this kind end with a tone which was at first the Quartertone and 
then ended in the pure tone.f As the passage was frequently repeated, I was able 
to observe this every time, and I found the intonation invariable. ' The Greek 
writers on music themselves say that it is difficult to distinguish the enharmonic 
Quartertones.^ 

The later interpreters of Greek musical theory have mostly advanced the 
opinion that the above-mentioned differences, which the Greeks called colourings 
(xp^ol), were merely speculative and never came into practical use.§ They con- % 
sider that these distinctions were too delicate to produce any esthetic effect except 
on an incredibly well cultivated ear. But it seems to me that this opinion could 
never have been entertained or advanced by modem theorists, if any of them had 
practically attempted to form these various tonal modes and to compare them by 
ear. On an harmonium which will shortly be described I am able to compare 



* [It is not to be supposed that these 
two Quartertones, difiering only by two cents 
(82 : 81 = 65 cents, 81 : 80 = 57 cents), were 
exactly produced. The lutist or lyrist would 
tune his Fourth c : /by ear (tolerably correctly), 
then a major Third below/ or d^\f also by ear 
(and probably very incorrectly on account of 
the great difficulty of tuning a major Third), 
and then would by feeling divide the remaining 
interval in halves as well as he could. Using 
c : 0^ for the approximate Quartertone he 
would have (iboutt c56d\56d'\^ 886/, or some- 
thing sufficiently like it. Meshaqah*s c 50 
cc| 50 c^ 400 / would doubtless have been near 
enough. Probably no two lyrists tuned alike. 
My experience of tuning by ear is quite against 
any approach to the accuracy which the figures 
in the text would imply. — Translator.'] 

t [Probably the effect was like that which 
I heard produced by Raja B4m P41 Singh on 
his Sitdr. Here the tone of the note, played 
by pressing the string against a fret, was sharp- 
ened a quarter of a Tone bv sliding the finger 
along the fret (thus deflecting the string 
and increasing the tension), and then it was 
allowed to glide on to the proper note by 
straightening the string without replucking 
it. I determined the amount of sharpening 
hy observing the distance of deflection, and 
then, at leisure, meiwuring by my forks the 



number of vibrations for the sharpened and 
normal note, which gave the interval as 48 
cents. The effect was very peculiar, but can 
of course be easily imitated on the violin. On 
the classical Indian instrument, the Vina, the 
freta are very high, sometimes about an inch. 
Hence by pressing down the string behind the 
fret, the tension could be greatly increased, and 
as much as a Semitone could be easily added, 
so that the scale could be indefinitely altered 
without changing the frets, which were fixed ^ 
with wax. On the Arabic Rabab and the 
curious Chinese fiddles, which have no frets or 
finger-board, a note could be instantaneously 
sharpened in a similar manner by pressing 
more strongly. — Translator.'] 

% [And yet a quarter of a Tone is between 2 
and 8 commas, and all the difficulties of tuning 
in just and tempered intonation arise from in- 
tervals of a single comma or less. — Translator.] 

§ Even Bellerman is of this opinion 
(Tonleiter der Qrieehen, p, 27). Westphal, 
in his Fragmenten der Urieehischen Rhyth- 
miker^ p. 209, has collected passages from 
Greek writers proving the real practical use of 
these intervals. According to Plutarch (De 
Musica^ pp. 88 and 39), the later Greeks had 
even a preference for these surviving archaic 
intervals. 



266 VARIOUS DIATONIC SCALES. part m. 

natural intonation with Pythagorean, and to play the diatonic mode at one time 
after the method of Didymus and at another after that of Ptolemy, and also to 
make other deviations. It is not at all diffioult to distinguish the difference of a 
comma |^ in the intonation of the different degrees of the scale, when well-known 
melodies are performed in different * colourings,' and every musician with whom I 
have made the experiment has immediately heard the difference. Melodic passages 
with Pythagorean Thirds have a strained and restless effect, while the natural 
Thirds make them quiet and soft, although our ears are habituated to the Thirds 
of the equal temperament, which are nearer to the Pythagorean than to the natural 
intervals. Of course where delicacy in any artistic observations made with the 
senses, comes into consideration, modems must look upon the Greeks in general 
as unsurpassed masters. And in this particular case they had very good reason 
and abundance of opportunity for cultivating their ear better than ours. From 
IT youth upwards we are accustomed to accommodate our ears to the inaccuracies of 
equal temperament, and the whole of the former variety of tonal modes, with their 
different expression, has reduced itself to such an easily apprehended difference as 
that between major and minor. But the varied gradations of expressions which 
moderns attain by harmony and modulation, had to be effected by the Greeks and 
other nations that use homophonic music, by a more delicate and varied gradation of 
the tonal modes. Can we be surprised, then, if their ear became much more finely 
cultivated for differences of this kind than it is possible for ours to be ? 

The Greek scale was soon extended to an octave. Pythagoras is said to have 
been the first to establish the eight complete degrees of the diatonic scale. At first 
two tetrachords were connected in such a way as to have a common tone, the fiuni : 



' . ' 

f which produced a scale of seven degrees. Then this scale was changed into the 
follovring form : 



e^^f — g — a — 6w — d — e 

y , ' 

and thus made to consist of a tetrachord and a trichord, of which mention has 
already been made (p. 257(2). Finally Lichaon of Samos (according to Boethius), 
or Pythagoras (according to Nicomachus), completed the trichord into a tetrachord, 
and thus established a scale consisting of two disjunct tetrachords. 

The diatonic scale thus obtained could be continued either way at pleasure by 
adding higher and lower octaves, and it then produced a regularly alternating 
series of Tones and Semitones. But for each piece of music a portion only of this 
unlimited diatonic scale was employed, and the tonal systems were distinguished 
by the character of the portions selected. 

These sectional scales might be produced in very different ways. The first 
f practical object which necessarily forces itself on attention, as soon as an instru- 
ment with a limited number of strings, like the Greek lyre, is used for executing a 
piece of music, is, of course, that therd should be a string for every musical tone 
required. This prescribes a certain series of tones which must be provided and 
tuned on the instrument. Now as a rule when a certain series of tones is thus 
prescribed as a scale for the tuning of a lyre, no question is raised as to whether a 
tonic is to be distinguished or not, or if so which it should be. A tolerable number 
of melodies may be found in which the lowest tone is the tonic : others in which 
an interval below the tonic is touched ; and others, again, in which the Fifth or 
Fourth above the Octave below the tonic is used. This is the kind of difference 
between the authentic and plagal scales of the middle ages. In the authentic 
scales the deepest tone of the scale, in the plagal its Fifth below or Fourth above, 
was the tonic ; thus : * — 

* [See Mr. Bookstro'g article, * Modes Eoole- on ' Gregorian Modes,' vol. i. p. 625, in Grove's 
siastical,' vol. ii. p. 840, and Rev. T. Helmore's Dictionary of Music, What Prof. Helmholtz 



CHAP. XIV. VARIOUS DIATONIC SCALES. 267 

FiBST AUTHBMTIC ECCLESIASTICAL SCALE, tonic d. 



d — e — / — g — a — b — c — d 
V . ^ 

Fourth Plagal Scale, tonio g, 
d — e — f — g — a — b — c — d 

V ^ / 

The scales were looked upon as oomposed of a Fifth and a Fourth, as the 
braces shew. In the authentic tone the Fifth lay below; in plagal, above. 
Now if we have nothing else before us but a scale of this kind, which marks out 
the accidental compass of a series of melodies, we can collect but little respect- 
ing the key. Such scales themselves may be fittingly termed accidental. They 
comprise, among others, the medieval plagal scales. On the other hand, those T 
scales which, like the modem, are bounded at each extremity by the tonic, may be 
termed essential. Now practical needs clearly lead in the first place to accidental 
scales alone. When a lyre had to be tuned to accompany the human voice in 
unison, it was indispensably necessary that all the tones required should be present 
There was no immediate practical need for marking the tonic of a song sung in 
unison, or even to become fully aware that it had a tonic at all. In modem 
music, where the structure of the harmony essentially depends on the tonic, the 
case is entirely different. Theoretical considerations on the structure of melody 
could alone lead to distinguishing one tone as tonic. It has been already mentioned 
in the preceding chapter, that Aristotle, as a writer on esthetics, has left a few 
notices indicating such a conception, but that the authors who have specially 
written on music say nothing about it. 

In the best times of Greece, song was usually accompanied by an eight-stringed 
lyre, tuned so as to embrace an Octave of tones selected from the diatonic scale, f 
These were the following : 



r "1 

d — e — f — g — a — b — c — d 



3. Doric e — f — g — a — b — c — d — e 



^ 



4. Hypolydian / — g — a — b — c — d — t — f 



y 



_>» 



5. Hypophrygian (Ionic) . g — a — b — c — d — e — / — g 



6. Hypodoric (Eolic or Locriau) . a — b — c — d — c — J — g — a 



7. Mixolydian b — c — d — e — / — g — a — i— (c) ' 

Hence any one of the tones in the diatonic scale could be used as the initial 
or final extremity of such a tonal mode. The Lydian and Hypolydian scales 
contain Lydian, the Phrygian and Hypophrygian contain Phrygian, and the Doric 
and Hypodoric contain Doric tetrachords. In the Mixolydian two Lydian tetra- 
chords seem to have been assumed, one of which was divided, as shewn by the braces 
in the above examples.* 

oallfl the Umic was tenned the final. What on the piano and organ in equally tempered 
was the exact intonation of this musio it is intonation, as their ancestors played them 
perhaps impossible to say. Perhaps we may in meantone intonation. But either of the 
assume it to have been Pythagorean, as latter admit of being harmonised ; not so the 

former, so that there is an essential difference. 
d204690/204sr204a204&90c204d. — IVons/ator.] 



Of course, modem musicians play them 



* [By a reference to p. 263d, note, it will be 



268 



VARIOUS DIATONIC SCALES 



PART iir. 



The scales or tropes of the best Greek period have hitherto been considered as 
essential, that is the lowest tone or hypate has been considered as the tonic. But 
I cannot find any definite ground for thi^ assumption. What Aristotle says, as we 
have seen, makes the middle tone or mesif function as the tonic, but yet it cannot 
be denied that other attributes of our tonic belong to the hypate* Whatever may 
have been the real state of the case, whether the mese or hypate be regarded as the 
tonic, whether the scales be considered as all authentic or all plagal, it is extremely 
probable that the Greeks, among whom we first find the complete diatonic scale, 
took the liberty of using every tone of this scale as a tonic, just as we have seen 
that every one of the five tones forming the scales of the Chinese and Gaels 
occasionally functions as a tonic. The same scales are also found, probably 
handed down immediately by ancient tradition, in the ancient Christian ecclesi- 
astical music. 

Hence if we disregard the chromatic and enharmonic scales, and the apparently 
arbitrary scales of the Asiatics, none of which have shewn themselves capable of 
IT further development,f homophonic vocal music developed seven diatonic scales, 
which differ from one another in about the same way as our major and minor 
scales. These differences will be better appreciated by making them all begin 
with the same tonic c. t 



seen that this paragraph materially alters the 
intonation from what would result from a 
mere beginning of each mode with a different 
note of the Pythagorean or diatonic scale. I 
therefore repeat tne scales as defined by this 
paragraph in the notation explained on pp.276a 
to 277a and note*, and write between each pair 
of notes the number of cents in the interval 
between each pair of notes, which will be found 
useful in future comparisons. These scales 
% should be traced) out on the Duodenarium, 
App. XX. sect. E. art. 18. They cannot be 
pli^ed on the Harmonical. 

1. Lvdian, c 182 d, 201 ^j^ 112/ 204 y 182 a ^ 204 

6, 112 c 

2. Phrygian, d 182 e^ 184 /^ 182 ^ 204 a 182 
&i 134 c^ 182 d 

8. Doric, 090/204^2040 204 590c204 

(2 2040 
4. Hypolydian, f20ig 182 a, 204 hi 112 c 182 

di 204 01 112/ 
6. Hypophrygian (Ionic), y 204 a 182 b^ 112 

e 204 (i 182 01 184 /1 182 g 
6. Hypodoric (Eolio or Locrian), a 204 b 90 

c 204 d 204 90/ 204 y 204 a 
7 Mizolydian, 6, 112 c 182 d^ 204 0^ 112 / 204 

g 182 Oi 204 b^,— Translator.] 

*R. Westphal, in*his Oeachichte der alien 
^wnd mittelalterlichen Musik, Breslau, 1864, 
which is unfortunately still incomplete,UBes the 
previous citations from Aristotle, to feime an 
nvpothesis on the tonic and final ciadence of the 
above scales. But he applies the remarks of 
Aristotle only to the Doric, Phrygian, Lydian, 
Mlxolydian and Locrian scales, and not to the 
Eolic and Ionic, which were also known at 
that time, although the ground for their ex- 
clusion is not apparent. In the first four of 
these he takes the mese as tonic and the 
hypate as the terminal tone. In those scales 
distinguished by the prefix Hypo-, the hypate 
was both tonic and terminal; but in those 
having the prefix Syntono-^ the hypate was 
both the terminal and the Third of tne tonic, 
and the same was the case perhaps for the 
Boeotian scale, which is only mentioned once. 
Hence it follows that the minor scale of A 
occurs as Doric with the terminal 0, as Hypo- 



doric with the terminal a, as Boeotian with 
the terminal c. Moreover the Mixolydian 
would be a minor scale of B, with a minor 
Second, and a terminal in b ; the Locrian a 
minor scale of D with a major Sixth, and a 
terminal in a ; the Phrygian, Hypophrygian or 
lastic, and the Syntonoiastic, major scales of 
G, with a minor Seventh, the terminals being 
df g, and b respectively. Finally the Lydian, 
Hypolydian and Syntonolydian would be 
major scales of F, with superfluous Fourth, 
and with the terminals c,/, and a respectively. 
But according to Westphal the normal major 
scale was entirely absent. If the Ionic were 
interpreted according to the words of Aristotle, 
it would yield a correct major scale. The 
tonic F with B (instead of B\^) as its Fourth, 
has a totally impossible appearance to modem 
musical feeling. 

t[In India there is a highly developed 
system with a vast variety of scales. — TranS' 
lator.-] 

X [Continuing to use the notation of p. 2686, 
note, these transposed scales may be written 
as follows. As the order is different from that 
in p. 267c, the numbers there used are added 
in ( ). The number of cents in each interval 
will complete the identification. I give only 
the Ancient Greek names, and the names pro- 
posed by Prof. Helmholtz. 

1. Lydian — Mode of the First (Major) (1), 

c 182 (2i 204 01 112 / 204 ^ 182 o^ 204 
61 112 c 

2. Ionic or Hypophrygian — Mode of the 

Fourth (5), c 204 (2 182 e^ 112 / 204 9 182 
ay 134 b^^ 182 c 
8. Phrygian — Mode of the minor Seventh (2), 
c 182 di 184 0i|^ 182 / 204 9 182 a, 134 
&1M82C 

4. Eolic — Mode of the minor Third (Minor) 

(6), c 204 d 90 0|^ 204 / 204 ^ 90 a|^ 204 
6|^204c 

5. Doric — Mode of the minor Sixth (S), c 90 

d\f 204 e^ 204/204 g 90 d|> 204 &[^ 204 c 

6. Mixolydian — Mode of the minor Second (7), 

c 112 d^\f 182 e^ 204/112 g^^ 204 a^j^ 182 
6[^204c 

7. Syntonolydian — Mode of the Fifth, not in 



CHAF. XIV. 



VARIOUS DIATONIC SCALES. 



269 



Ancient Qreek Names 



1. Lydian . . . . 

2. Ionic or Hypophxygian 
S. Phiygian 

4. Eolio . . . . 

5. Doric . . . . 

6. jMizolydian 

7. 1 Syntonolydian . 



Scales beginning with c 



c-d 
c-d 






-g -a -6 -c* 
-g -a -hW-c* 
-g -a -by-ef 
-g -c^-lyj-c' 



c- 

c 

e 



-d^-e^-f -g -ak-6K-c' 
-d -e -/|f-^ -<* -ft -C 



Glarean's 

Ecclesiastical 

Names 



lonio 

Mixolydian 
Doric 
Eolio 



Proposed new 
Names* 



Phrygian 

^Lydii 



iian 



{ 



Mode of the : — 
First imaior) 
Fourth 

minor Seventh 
minor Third 

minor Sixth 
minor Second 
Fifth 



To assist the reader I have added the names assigned to the ecdesiastical 
modes by Glarean, which were wrongly distributed among the scales owing to his 
confusing the older tonal modes with the later (transposed) minor Greek scales, IF 
but which are more known among musicians than the proper Greek names. But 
I shall not use Glarean's names without expressly mentioning that they refer to an 
ecclesiastical mode. It would be really better to forget them altogether. The old 
numerical notation of Ambrose was much more suitable, but as his figures have 
been altered again and do not suffice for all modes, I have ventured to propose a 
new nomenclature in the above table, which will save the reader the trouble of 
memorising the systems of Greek names, of which Glarean's are certainly wrong, 
and the others are also perhaps not quite consectly applied. The principle of the 
new nomenclature is this. By ' the mode of Fourth of C7,' is meant a mode of 
which C is the tonic, but which has the same zigyuxture (or additional % and ^ 
signs) as the major scale formed on the Fourth of the diatonic scale beginning 
with G ; that is on F, The minor Seventh, minor Third, minor Sixth, and minor 
Second must always be understood as the intervals intended in this case.f If the 
major intervals were selected the tonic would not occur in their scales. Thus IT 
' the mode of the minor Third of C is the sccde with the tonic (7, having the 
signature of E\^ major (that is J5|>, E\^, ^|>), because E\^ is the minor Third of G ; 
this is therefore G minor, at least as it is played in the descending scale. I hope 
the reader will have Ho difficulty in understanding what is meant by this notation. % 

This was the tonal system in the best times of Greek art, up to the Macedonian 
empire. Airs were at first limited to a tetrachord, as is still often the case in the 
Eoman Catholic liturgy. They were afterwards extended to an Octave. Longer 
scales were not necessary for singing, as the Greeks refused to employ the straining 
upper notes, and unmetaJlic deep notes of the human voice. Modern Greek songs, 
of which Weitzmann has made a collection, § have also a surprisingly small com- 
pass. If Phrynis (victor in the P^nathenaic competitions, B.C. 457) added a ninth 
string to his cithara, the chief advantage of the arrangement was to allow of 
passing from one kind of scale to another. 

The later Greek scale, which first occurs in Euclid's works of the third century ^ 
B.G., embraces two octaves, thus arranged : 



the former table under this name, but 

reaUy the Hypolydian (4), c 204 d 182 d^ 204 

/J 112 g 182 Oi 204 h, 112 c 

Befer to the Duodenarium, App. XX. 
sect. E. art. l%,—Tr(mslator.'] 

* [If we Rubtraot each of the numbers in 
the names of the modes here proposed, from 
9 (reckoning 1 as 8 its Octave), we obtain the 
numbers on p. 267c, which shew the number of 
the note in the major scale determined by the 
signature, on which the special scale begins. 
Thus as 9 less 7 is 2, tbe mode of the minor 
Seventh is that numbered 2 on pp. 267c, 268c. 
If we call the major scale, when reduced to a 
harmonisable form, 1. do, 2. re, 3. r»t, 4. /a, 
5. so, 6. Za, 7. ti, then these transformed modes 



may be csJled witb the Tonic Sol-faists the do, 
re, mi, &c., modes respectively. — Translator. "] 

t[The qualification mvMT will therefore 
be always used in this translation, and has 
been inserted in the above table. — Translator,^ 

it [In App. XX. sect. E. No. 10, I have 
endeavoured to deduce scales for harmonic use, 
from a general theoiy of harmony which de- 
termines the precise value of each tone as 
part of a chord, and I have given precise 
names for them, there exemplified. This har- 
monic deduotion of scales is quite independent 
of the historical melodic deduction in the text. 
— Translator.'] 

§ Oeschichie der Griechischen Afusi/c.Berlin, 
1856. 



270 



LATER GREEK SCALES. 



PART m. 



added Tone 



Proslambcmom'enos 



lowest Tetrachord 



Tetra. hyp'aton 



f middle Tetrachord 
.a 



disjunct Tetra. 
T. diezeug'mendn 



1 



c 
d' 



Tetra, mes'on 



^1 I conjunct Tetr. 
' T, synem'mendn 



f 



superfluous Tetr. 
T. hyperbolai'on 



This scheme gives first the Hypodoric [Eolic, or Locrian] scale * for two 
Octaves, and then an added tetrachord which introduces a b\^ in addition to the b, 
and thus, in modern language, allows of modulation from the principal scale into 
that of the subdominant. j- 

This scale, essentially of a minor character, was transposed, and thus a new 
series of scales were generated that correspond with the (descending) minor scales 
of modern music. To these were applied the old names of the tonal nodes, by 
giving originally to each minor mode the name belonging to that tonal mode 
which was formed by the section of the minor scale which lay between the 
extreme tones of the Hypodoric I scale. According to the Greek method of repre- 
senting the notes, these extreme tones would have to be written /••>/. Their 
IT actual pitch was probably a Third lower. Thus the minor scale of D was called 
Lydian, because in this scale — 

the section of the scale lying between the extreme tones / and / belonged to the 
Lydian tonal mode. In this way the old names of the tonal modes altered their 
meaning into those of tonal keys. The following table shews the correspondence 
of these names : — 



1) Hypo-doric 

2) Hvpo-ionic 

(deeper Hypo-phiygian) 
8) Hypo-phrygian 

4) Hypo-eolic 

(deeper Hypo-Iydian) 

5) Hypo-lydian 

% 6) Doric 

7) Ionic 

(deeper Phrygian) 



= F minor 
=^ ^ minor 

= O minor 
= Oji minor 

= A minor 

= B[9 minor 

= B minor 



8) Phrygian 

9) EoUc 

(deeper Lydian) 

10) Lydian 

11) Hyper-dor ic 
(Mixo-lydian) 

12) Hyper-ionic 
(higher Mixo-lydian) 

13) Hyper-phr^gian 
(Hyper-mixo-lydian) 

14) Hyper-eolic 

15) Hyper-lydian 



= C minor 
= Cj^ minor 

= D minor 
= £|^ minor 

= E minor 

= / minor 

= /ft minor 
=: g minor 



1 



OB 

a 
o 



no 



Within each of these scales each of the previously mentioned tonal modes 
might be formed, by using the corresponding part of the scale. Besides this it 
was possible to pass into the conjunct tetrachord and thus modulate into the tonal 
key of the subdominant. 

The experiments on transposition which formed the basis of these scales 



*[See No. 6, of p. 267c, text, assuming 
Pytha|;orean intonation. — J^anslatorJ] 

t Singularly enough this species of musical 
scale has been preserved in the Zillerthal in 
Tyrol, for the wood-harmonicon. This scale 
has two rows Qi b{^» One forms a regular 



diatonic scale with the disjunct tetrachord. 
The other, which lies deep, has the conjunct 
tetrachord in its upper part. 

^[This seems to be an error for Hypo- 
lydian, No. 4 of p. 267c, of which the extreme 
tones are / and /. — TransUUor,] 



OHAF. XIV. 



ECCLESIASTICAL SCALES. 



271 



shewed that the Octave might be considered as composed approximately of twelve 
Semitones. Even Aristoxenus knew that by taking a series of twelve Fifths we 
reached a tone that was at least very near to a higher Octave of the initial tone. 
Thus in the series 

he identified e^ with /, and by thus closing the series of tones he obtained a cycle 
of Fifths. Mathematicians denied the fact, and with reason, because if the Fifths 
are taken perfectly true, ^ is a little sharper than /. For practical purposes, 
however, the error was quite insensible, and might be justly neglected in homo- 
phonic music in particular.* 

This closes the development of the Greek tonal system. Complete as is our 
acquaintance with its outward form, we know but little of its real nature, because 
the examples of melodies which we possess are not only few in number, but very IT 
doubtful in origin. 

Whatever may have been the nature of tonality in Greek scales, and however 
numerous may be the questions about it that are still unresolved, yet so far as the 
theory of the general historical development of tonal modes is concerned we learn 
all we want from the laws of the earliest Christian ecclesiastical music, which at 
its commencement touched upon the ancient construction as it died out. In the 
fourth century of our era. Bishop Ambrose, of Milan, established four scales for 
ecclesiastical song, which in the untransposed diatonic scale were : 

First mode : d — e — / — g — a — b — c — d mode of the minor Seventh. 
Second mode : e — / — g — a — b — c — d — e mode of the minor Sixth. 
Third mode : / — g — a — b — c — d — e — /mode of the Fifth (unmelodic) 
Fourth mode : g — a — b — c — d — e — / — g mode of the Fourth. 

The variable character of the tone b, which was transmutable into b\^ in the IT 
later Greek scales, remained, and produced the following scales : — 



First: 

Second : 

Third: 
Fourth : 



d — e — / — g — a — b\} — c — d mode of the minor Third. 

e—f—g — a — b\}- 

f — g — a — ib — c — d — e — / mode of the First (major), 
g — a — b\f — c — d — e — / — g mode of the minor Seventh. 



, f mode of the minor Second 

\(immelodic). 



There can be no doubt that these Ambrosian scales are to be regarded as 
essential (see p. 2672^), for the old rule is that melodies in the first are to end in d, 
those in the second in e, those in the third in /, and those in the fourth in ^, and 
this marks the initial tones of the scale as tonics. We may certainly assume that 
this arrangement was made by Ambrose for his choristers as a practical simplifica- 
tion of the old musical theory, which was overloaded with an inconsistent nomen- 
clature. And this leads us to conclude that we were right in conjecturing that the f 
similar older Greek scales could have been really used as different essential scales. 

Pope Gregory the Great inserted between the Ambrosian essential scales the 
same number of accidental scales (p. 267a), called plagal, proceeding from the 
Fifth to the Fifth of the tonic. The Ambrosian scales were, then, called authentic 



* It is by no means an unimportant fact, 
for our appreciation of the Greek scale, that a 
flute was found in the royal tombs at Thebes 
in Egypt (now in the Florentine Museum, 
No. 2688), which, according to M. F^tis, who 
examined it, gave an almost perfect scale of 
Semitones for about an Octave and a half; 
namely. 

Series of primes, a b\f b c' c'ji d^ 
First upper partial tones, a' b'\f b' c" c"8 d" 
Second upper partial tones, e"/"/"*^" g"S «" 
Thirdupperpartialtones,a"6"b6"c"'c'"|d" 



Representations of such flutes are found in 
the very oldest Egyptian monuments. They 
are very long, the holes are all near the end, 
and hence the arms must have been greatly 
stretched, giving the player a characteristic 
position. The Greeks can scarcely have been 
ignorant of this scale of Semitones. That it 
was not introduced into their theory till after 
the time of Alexander, clearly shews the pre- 
ference they gave to the diatonic scale. [M. 
F^tis's deductions must be treated with much 
caution. — Translator,'] 



272 



RATIONAL CONSTRUOTION OF DIATONIC SCALES. 



PART in. 



for distinction. The existence of these plagal ecclesiastical scales helped to increase 
the confusion which broke over the ecclesiastical scales towards the end of the 
middle ages, as composers began to neglect the rules which fixed the tenninal 
tones, and this confusion assisted in favouring a freer development of the tonal 
system. This confusion also shewed, as we remarked in the last chapter (p. 2436), 
that no feeling for the thorough predominance of the tonic was much developed 
in the middle ages. But a step, at least, was made in advance of the Greeks, by 
recognising as a rule that the piece should close on the tonic, although this rule 
was not always observed. 

Glarean endeavoured in 1547 to reduce the theory of the scales to order again, 
in his Dodecachordon. He shewed by an examination of the musical compositions 
of his contemporaries, that na;, and not four ^ authentic scales should be distinguished, 
and adorned them with the Greek names in the table on p. 269a. Then he assumed 
IT six plagal scales, and hence on the whole distinguished twelve modes, whence the 
name of his book. Hence down to the sixteenth century essential and accidental 
scales were reckoned as parts of one series. Among Glarean's scales one is 
unmelodic, namely the mode of the Fifth, which he calls the Lydian. There are 
no examples of these to be found, as we know from a careful examination of 
medieval compositions made by Winterfeld,* and this confirms Plato's opinion of 
the Mixolydian and Hypolydian modes. 

Hence there remains the following five melodic tonal modes applicable strictly 
for homophonic and polyphonic vocal music, namely : 





In our Nomenclature 


Ancient Greek 


Glarean' 8 Names 


Scale 


1 

2 
8 
4 
5 


Major Mode .... 
Mode of the Fourth 
Mode of the minor Seventh 
Mode of the minor Third 
Mode of the minor Sixth 


Lydian 

Ionic 

Phrygian 

Eolic 

Doric 


Ionic 

Mixolydian 

Doric 

Eolic 

Phrygian 


C-c 
G-g 
D-d 
A-a 

E-e 



IT 



The rational construction of these scales when extended to the Octave or beyond 
the Octave results from the principle of tonal relationship already explained.^ The 
limits of the extent to which tones related in the first degree should be used, are 
determined by the necessity of avoiding intervals too dose to be distinguished with 
certainty. The larger gaps thus left have to be filled with the tones most nee(rly 
related in the second degree. 

The Chinese and Gaels made the whole Tone Y- [ = 182 cents] the smallest 
interval. I The Orientals, as we have seen, still retain Quartertones. The Greeks 
experimented with them, but soon gave them up and kept to the Semitone ^ 
[»112 cents] as the smallest. 

European nations have followed Greek habits, and retained the Semitone j^ as 
T the limit. The interval between E\} (f ) [ = 316 cents] and -E (J) [ = 386 cents], and 
between A\^ (f) [»814 cents] and A (^) [ = 884 cents], in the natural scale is 
smaller, being || [ = 70 cents], and we consequently avoid using both E\} and E, 
or both A\} and A in the same scale. We thus obtain the following two series of 
intervals between the most nearly related tones for ascending and descending 
scales: 

Ascending : c e — / — g — a c' 

6 IH 10 6 

Descending: c A\^ — G — F—E\^ C 

5 10 9 10 6 

4 TT « TT" Z 



* von Winterfeld's Johatmes Gabrieli und 
sein ZeitaUer, Berlin, 1884, vol. i. pp. 73 to 
108: 

t[The following is not an attempt to 
restore the Greek originals, which have already 
been treated, but to form harmonic scales on 



the same, and these are obtained by another 
process in App. XX. sect. E. art. 9. — Trans- 
tator.'] 

X [I have found much smaller intervals in 
Chinese instruments. See App. XX. sect. K. 
— Translator,] 



OHiLP. XIV. RATIONAL CONSTRUCTION OF DIATONIC SCALES. 273 

The numbers below the series shew the intervals between the two tones between 
which they are plaoed.''^ 

It is at onoe seen that the intervals from and to the tonic are too large, and 
might be further divided. But as we have come to the limits of relationship in 
the first degree, we have to fill these gaps by tones related in the second degree. 

The closest relationship in the second degree is necessarily furnished by the 
tones most nearly related to the tonia Among these the Octave stands first. The 
tones related to the Octave of the tonic are of course the same as those related to 
the tonic itself ; but by passing to the Octave of the tonic we obtain the descending 
in place of the ascending scale, and conversely. 

Thus, ascending from c we found the follovring degrees of our major scale — 

c e — / — g — a c' 

But taking the tones related to c', we obtain—- f. 

c eb — / — 9 — ab <5' 

Hence the second degree of relationship to the tonic gives an ascending minor 
scale. In this scale ^ is given as the major Sixth below c\ But it has also the 
weak relationship to c marked by 5 : 6. Now we found that the sixth partial of a 
compound tone was dearly audible in many qualities of tone for which the seventh 
or eighth could not be heard ; for example, on the pianoforte, the narrower organ 
pipes, and the mixture stops of the organ. Hence the relationship expressed by 
5 : 6 may often become evident as a natural relationship in the first degree. This, 
however, could scarcely be the case for the relationship c — ab or 5 : 8. Hence it 
is more natural to change e into eb ^^^^^ ^ ^^ ^b ^ ^^^ ascending scale. The 
latter, ab, can only be related to the tonic in the second degree. The three 
ascending scales in order of intelligibility are, therefore — f f 

c — / — g — a c' 

c «b— / — 9 — » o' 

c eb —f—9 — (^\> c* 

These distinctions based on a relationship in the second degree, through the 
medium of the Octave, are certainly very slight, but they make themselves felt 
in the well-known transformation of the ascending minor scale, to which these 
distmotions dearly refer. 

Descending from c, instead of the rdations in the first degree, given in 

c A]f—0 — F—E\f C 

we may assume relations in the second degree, that is of the deeper C, and 
obtain 

c ,A — G — F—E C f 

In the latter, A is connected with the initial tone by the distant relationship in the 
first degree, 5 : 6, and E only by a relationship in the second degree. Hence the 
third descending scale 

c A — G — F—E\^ C 

which we also found as an ascending scale. For descending scales we have there- 
fore the following series. { 

* [With the Bubsequent notation and inter- c S86 a, 112 / 204 ^ 182 a^ 816 o' 

yals expressed in cents : c 816 e^K 182 / 204 (r 182 a, 816 c' 

c 886 e, 112 f 204 g 182 a, 316 C ^ ^^^ *'^ 182 / 204 f^ ^^^'fci^ . 

c 386 il^b 112 O 204 P 182 E^^ 816 C lYonsuuor.j 

Translator.] ^ [These are the same three scales as in 

t [With the subsequent notation and inter- the last note, read backwards. — TranslatorJ] 
vals in cents: 



274 



RATIONAL CONSTRUCTION OF DIATONIC SCALES. 



PART II f. 



c A\^ — G — F — E\^ C 

c A —G — F—E\) G 

c A —G — F—E C 

Qenerally, since all Ootaves of the tonic, distant or near, higher or lower are 
so closely related that they can be almost identified with it, all higher and lower 
Octaves of the individual degrees of the scale are almost as closely related to the 
tonic, as those of the next adjacent tonic of the same name. 

Next to the relations of the Octave & of c, follow those of g, the Fifth above, 
and F the Fifth below c. We must therefore proceed to study their effect in the 
construction of the scale. Let us begin with the relations of g, the Fifth above 
the tonic* 



ASOBNDIKG SCALES. 

Belated to c : c e — / — g — a c' 

IT Belated Uyg: c d e\f g b — c 

Uniting the two, we have — 

1) The Major Scale (Lydian mode of the ancient Greeks) : 

c — d — e — / — g — a — b — c' 

-10 548 6 16 

The change of e into e^ is here facilitated by its second relationship to g. This 
gives — 

2) The Ascending Minor Scale : 

c — d — «b — / — 9 — ^ — ^ — ^' 







9 



4 
IT 



8 
7 



6 



16 



DBSOBNDINQ 80ALBS. 

_A\^ — G — F—E\^ C 



G E\^ — D — C 



Belated to c : c - 
Belated to ^ : c B\^ 
giving :— 

8) The Descending Minor Scale (Hypodoric or Eolic mode of the ancient 
Greeks — our mode of the minor Third) : 

c — B\^ — A\^ — G — F—E\f — J) — C 



9 



H 
T 



8 



4 



6 






or in the mixed scale, changing A\^ into A. 



* [In the complete notation, and with 
intervals in cents, these scales are : 

ABCBNDnra Sgalbs. 

Belated to e : c 886 0. 112 / 204 ^ 182 Oi 316 c' 
Related to g : c 204 d 112 6^1^ 886 ^ 886 h^ 112 c' 

1) Major Scale : 

fc 204 d 182 01 112 / 204 9 182 a^ 204 6j 112 c 
This is not quite the Greek Lydian, see p.268d', 
note X, No. 1. It is 1 C ma.ma.ma. of App. XX. 
sect. E. ark 9, 1. 

2) The A8cend4ng Minor Scale : 

e 204 <i 112 e^^ 182/ 204 g 182 a^ 204 b^ 112 c' 
This is 1 C ma.mi.ma. {ibid. III.). 

Dbscending Scalbs. 

Belated to c : c 886 ^^b ^^^ ^ ^^04 if* 182 

^'k 816 C 
Belated to g : cl82 B^b ^^^ <^ ^^ ^'b ^^^ 

D 204 C 

8) The Deecending Minor Scale : 
c 182 £'b 204 A^^ 112 Q QOi F1B2 E^\f 112 

D204C 
This is not quite the Greek Eolio, see p. 268d\ 
note X, No. 4. It is 1 C mi.mi.mi. (ibid. VIII.). 

4) Mode of the Minor Seventh : 
c 182 B^b ^9^ A^ 182 O 20i F 182 E^\^ 112 

D204C 



This is different from the Greek Phrygian, 
p. 268 d\ note ^ No. 8, in the two last intervals. 
It is 1 C ma.mi.mi. {ibid. VII.). 

ASGBNDDrO SOAIAB. 

Belated to c : c 886 e^ 112/204 g 182 a^ 316 e' 
Belated to F : c 182 (2^ 816 / 886 a^ 112 
&b204c' 

5) Mode of the Fourth : 

c 182 d] 204 <4 112/ 204 9 182 a^ 112 6^ ^^4 e' 
This is not quite Greek Ionic or Hypophrygian, 
p. 26&d', note ti No. 2. It is 5 ^ ma.ma.nuL 
{ibid. I.). 

6) New form of mode of the minor Seventh : 
182 d^ 184 tf^b 182/ 204 9 182 a^ 112 &b ^04 c' 
This is 5 ^ ma.ma.mi. {ibid. V.). 

DBBcsmoiNO Scales. 
Belated to c : c 886 A^^ 112 (? 204 J* 182 

JEJ^b 816 C 
Belated to F : e 204 B^ 112 A^ 386 ^ 886 

D^b 112 C 

7) Mode of the minor Sixth : 

c 204 Bb 132 ^^b 112 O 204 F 182 E^^ 204 

D»b 112 C 
This is not quite the Greek Doric, p. 268d', 
note t. No. 5. It is 6 ^mi.mi.mi. {Oid. VIII.). 
■^Translator.'] 



CHAP. XIV. RATIONAL CONSTRUCTION OF DIATONIC SCALES. 276 

4) Mode of the minor Seventh (ancient Greek Phrygian) : 

c-^B\, — A — — F—E\f---D — C 

2 6 3 4 9 1 

T IT Y IT T ¥ ^ 

On examining the relations of F, the Fifth below the tonio c, the following scales 
result: 

ASCENDING SCALES. 

Related toe: c e — / — g — a c' 

Related to F:c — d / a — fe|> — c' 

This gives — 

5) The mode of the Fourth (andent Qreek Hypophrygian or Ionic) : 

c — d — e — / — g — a — b\^ — c' 

-110 ft 4 .1 5 16 n 

^ ~Jf- T S "S "8" ~S~ ^ 

By changing e into e\}j we again obtain — IT 

6) The mode of the minor Seventh^ but with a different determination of the 
intercalary tones d and 6|>, from those in No. 4 : 

c — d — eb — / — 9 — «— ^b — c' 

-I 10 8 4 3 5 16 Q 

DESCENDING SCALES. 

Related toe: c A\^ — G — F—E\p C 

Relatedtoi?':c — 5b — il F D\f — C 

giving :— 

7) The mode of the minor Sixth (ancient Greek Doric) : 

c — B\f — A\^ — G — F—E\^ — D\^ — C 

0168846161 AT 

In this way the melodic tonal modes of the ancient Greeks and Christian 
Church have all been rediscovered by a consistent method of derivation. As long 
as homophonic vocal music is alone considered, all these tonal modes are equally 
justified in their construction. 

The scales have been given above in the order in which they are most naturally 
deduced. But, as we have seen, each of the three scales 

c e — / — g — a & 

c fib — f—9 — <^ c' 

c fib — / — 9 — «b c' 

can be played either upwards or downwards, although the first is best suited to 
ascending and the last to descending progression, and hence the gaps of any one of 
them may be filled up with either the relations of F or the relations of g, or even 
one gap with those of F and the other with those of g. 

The pitch numbers of the tones directly related to the tonic are of course fixed* 
and unchangeable, because they are given by the condition that the tones should 
form consonances with the tonic, and are thus more strictly determined than by any 
more distant connection. On the other hand, the intercalary tones related in the 
second degree are by no means so precisely fixed. 

Taking c =* 1, we have for the Second — 

1) the d derived from ^ a^, [ » 204 cents] 

2) the d derived from /= ^ - |o x |, [ - 182 cents] 

3) the d\f derived from/=U, [ = 112 cents] 

* Thus I cannot agree ^th Hauptmann, damental bass d. But this would indicate a 

in allowing a Pythagorean a, the Fifth above d, distinct modulation into major, which is not 

in the ascending minor scale of c. D'Alembert required when the natural relations of the 

introduces the same tone even in the major tones to the tonic ace preserved. See Haupt- 

scale, by passing from gtob through the fun- mann, Harntonik und MeWik, p. 60. 

T 2 



276 



RATIONAL CONSTRUCTION OF DIATONIC SCALES. 



PART in. 



and for the Seventh — 



1) the b derived from g^^,[^ 1088 cents] 

2) the b\^ derived from g «7, [» 1018 cents] 

3) the 6b derived from/ = V -It ^t» [ = 996 cents] 



Hence while b and d\} are given with certainty, b\} andtd are uncertain. Either of 
them may be distant from the tonic by the major Tone f [ » 204 cents] or the 
minor Tone ^ [=182 cents]. 

In order henceforth to mark this difference of intonation with certainty and 
without ambiguity, we will introduce a method of distinguishing the tones deter- 
mined by a progression of Fifths, from those given by the relationship of a Third 
to the tonic. We have already seen that these two methods of determining the 
tones lead to somewhat different pitches, and hence in accurate theoretical re- 
IT searches both kinds of tones must be kept distinct, although in modem music they 
are practically confused. 

The idea of this notation belongs to Hauptmann, but as the capital and small 
letter which he uses, and which I also, in consequence, employed in the first edition 
of this book, have a different meaning in our method of writing tones, I now intro- 
duce a slight modification of his notation. 

Let be the initial tone, and write * its Fifth (7, the Fifth of this Fifth D, and 
so on. In the same way let the Fourth of C be 2^, the Fourth of this Fourth B}^, 
and so on. In this way we have a series of Tones, here written with simple 
capitals, all distant from each other by a perfect Fifth or a perfect Fourth : f 

B\^±F±C±a±D±A±E,&o. 

The pitch of every tone in the whole series is, therefore, known when that of any 
one is known. 
«- The major Third of C, on the other hand, will be expressed by Ei^ that of J^ by 
Au and so on. Hence the series of tones 

^bi + Di - F + ill - C + JS7i - G + Bi - i) + FjJI - il, &c, 

is a series of alternate ms^jor and minor Thirds. It is therefore clear that the 
Tones 

A ± -^1 ± ^1 ± -^1 ± ^i#» &c-» 

also form a series of perfect Fifths. 

We have already found that the tone D^, that is the minor Third below or major 
Sixth above F, is lower in pitch than the tone 2), which would be reached by a 
series of Fifths from F, and that the difference of pitch is that known as a comma^ 
the numerical value of which is f^, or musically about the tenth part of a whole 
Tone. I Since, then, D ±A and Di± A^BJ^e both perfect Fifths, A must be also a 
^ comma higher than A j, and so also every letter with an inferior number, as 1, 2, 3, &o., 
attached to it, will represent a tone which is 1, 2, 3, &c., commas lower in pitch than 



* Die Natvr der Hamumik und MeUrik^ 
Leipzig, 1858, pp. 26 and following. I cannot 
but join with 0. E. Naumann in expressing 
my regret that so many delicate musical ap- 
perceptions as this work contains, should have 
been needlessly buried under the abstruse ter- 
minology of Hegelian dialectics, and hence 
have been rendered inaccessible to any large 
circle of readers. 

t[Prof. Helmholtz uses (-) between the 
letters in all such cases. I have taken the 
liberty from this place onwards, whenever a 
line or combination of Thirds occurs to leave 
( - ) only in the just minor Thirds of 316 cents, 
to use ( I ) in the Pythagorean minor Thirds 
of 294 cents, as Prof. Helmholtz does subse- 



quently, and change (~) into (+) for the 
major Third of 8^ cents. In the case of 
Fifths which consist of a major and a minor 
Third 702=886-1- 816 cents, the symbol is 
properly ± which I here also take the liberty 
to use. For other intervals I shaU use (...) for 
( - ), and generally give the precise interval in 
cents elsewhere. I trust that this change wiU 
be found suggestive as well as convenient, and 
may therefore not be considered presump- 
tuous. — TrafMiator,'\ 

^[The comma 81 : 80 is just over 21^ 
cents, for which I use 22 cents, see App. Xx! 
sect. A. art. 4, and sect. D. Hence a major 
tone of 204 cents contains about 9^ commas. 
— TraTislaUyr,^ 



CHAP. XIV. 



INTRODUCTION OF MORE PRECISE NOTATION. 



277 



that represented by the same letter with no inferior number attached, as is easily 
seen by carrying on the series. 

A major triad will therefore be written thus : 

+ Bi-G 

and a minor triad 

ili-0 + J5i or Ci--B|^ + Gi 

Now if we lay it down as a rule that as every inferior figure, 1, 2, 3, &a, depresses 
its tone by the 1, 2, 3, &o., comma^ every superior figure, 1, 2, 3, &c., shall raise its 
tone by the same 1, 2^ 3, &a, commas, we may write the major triad as 

c + e^-g or c^ + e-g^ 
and the minor triad as 

or even 

c^ - «^b - fl^^ or c, - e^ b - 5^2- * ' 

The three series of Tones directly related to are consequently to be written 
thus: 

C- -^1 -iP-G-ili - -c 

and the intercalary tones are — 

Between the tonic and Third, D, D^ or D^}}, 
Between the Sixth and Octave, B^ and B\^ or B^^. 

Consequently the melodic tonal modes of the ancient Greeks and old Christian 
Church are,f 



*In the let [German] edition of this 
book, as in Hanptznann's, the smaU letters 
were supposed to oe a oomma lower than the 
capital fettexB, and a stroke above or below the 
letters was only occasionally used for raising 
or depressing the pitch by two commas. Hence 
a major triad was written C-e-O ot e-E 
-y; a minor triad a-C^Bf or A-e-E, 
&c. The notation used here [in the" Sid and 
4th German and the 1st English editions] 
and also in the French translation is due to 
Herr A. v. Oettingen, and is much more readily 
comprehended . [Herr v. Oettingen's notation 
of lines above and below, which was at Prof. 
Helmholt£*s request retained in the 1st Eng- 
lish edition of this translation, was found 
extremely inconvenient for the printer, and 
actually delayed the work three months in 
passing through the press. I have now for 
some ^ears employed the very easy substitute 
here mtroduced. By referring to the table 
called the Duodenarium, in App. XX. sect. E. 
art. 18, where this new notation is systemati- 
cally carried out for 117 notes, the whole bear- 
ing of it will be better appreciated. Another 
notation which I had used formerly, and into 
which I translated Heir v. Oettingen's in the 
footnotes to the Ist edition of this translation, 
and employed in Table IV., there correspond- 
ing to my present Duodenarium, is conse- 
quently abandoned, and is now only mentioned 
to account for the difference in notation be- 
tween the two editions of this translation. 
The spirit of Herr v. Oettingen*8 notation is 
therefore retained, while its use has been 
rendered typographically convenient. — Trans- 
laUfr.] 

tiThis variation of the intercalary tones 
really amounts to a change of mode, so that 



the names used in the text become ambiguous. IT 
This difficulty is overcome by the trichordal 
notation proposed in App. XX. sect. E. art. 9. 

1) The major mode of C with D, has the 8 
major chords F-\-Ai-C, C + Jg?i-G, G + Bj- 
D, and is 1 C ma.ma.ma. But with -i^i in 
place of D, it has the 8 minor chords IX - F+ 
A^y A^-C+Ei^Ei-G+Bi (of which the two 
last belong also to the first form), and is there- 
fore 8 Aj mi.mi.mi. This is a related, but very 
different, mode. 

2) The mode of the Fourth, as it stands in 
the first line, is not trichordal, but by using 
D and B^\f it has the 8 chords F+Ai-C, 
C-|-^,-Gf, G-B^^+D, and is hence 1 C 
ma.ma.mi. If we take Dj and B\f it has the 
8 chords B^+D^-F, JP'+ilj-C, C+^,- 
O, and is hence 5 F ma.ma.ina. With both 
Dj and B^j^ it is again not trichordal. 

8) The mode of the minor Seventh. If we IT 
take the upper line as it standi, this is also not 
trichordal. But if we use D and B^ |^, it has the 
8 chords F+A^-C, C-E^^+0,0-B^^ + D, 
'and is hence 1 O ma.mi.mi. If we take D| 
and B\f, the 8 chords are B\f + Di-Ft F-^-A. 
-C, C-E^h + 0, and the scale is 5 / 
ma.ma.mi. With D^ and B^ |y the scale is again 
not trichordal. 

4) Mode of the minor Third. The first 
line as it stands is not trichordal. Taking 
D stod B^^ the 8 chords are F-A^\^-{-C, C- 
E^\f+Ot G-B^^+D, and the scale is 1 C 
mi.mi.mL Takins Dj and B\^ the 8 chords are 
B|^-»-D,- JF*, F-A}^+C, C-^|>-hG, and the 
scale is 6 2^ ma.mi.mi. With Dj and B^j^ 
again the scale is not trichordal. 

5) Mode of the minor Sixth. The first 
line as it stands gives the 8 chords B\f - D^\f + 
F, F-A^\f+Ct C-E^^-^G, and the scale is 



278 INTRODUCTION OF MORE PRECISE NOTATION. pabt m. 

1) Majob mode, 

A 

2) Mode of the Foubth^ 

3) Mode of the minor Seventh, 

A B'b 

4) Mode of the minob Thibd, 

f 5) Mode of the minob 8ixth, 

5'b 

By this notation, then, the intonation is always exactly expressed, and the kind 
of consonance which each tone makes with the tonic, or the tones related to it is 
clearly shewn. 

In the ancient Greek Pythagorean intonation these scales would have to be 
written: 

Major mode — C..,D,.,E...F...G,..A...B'"C 

and the others in a similar manner, all with letters of the same kind, belonging 
to the same series of Fifths.^ 

In the formulae here given for the diatonic tonal modes, the intonation of the 
Second and Seventh is partly undetermined. In these cases I have given D the 
f preference over 2)^ and B\^ the preference over B% because the relationship of 
the Fifth is closer than that of the Third ; but B\^ and D stand in the relation of 
the Fifth respectively to Fy G, the tones nearest related to the tonic, while D^ and 
JB^b are only in the relation of the minor Third to F and G. But this reason is 
certainly not sufficient entirely to exclude the two last tones in homophonic vocal 
music. For if in a melodic phrase, the Second of the tonic came into close con- 
nection with tones related to F — ^for instance, if it fell between F and A^, or 
followed them — an accurate singer would certainly find it more natural to use the 
Dp which is directly related to F and A^, than the D which is related to them 
only in the third degree. The slightly closer relationship of the latter to the 
tonic could scarcely give the decision in its favour in such a case. 

This ambiguity in the intercalary tones cannot, I think, be considered as a 
fault in the tonal system, since in our modem minor mode, the Sixth and Seventh 
of the tonic are often altered, not merely by a comma, but by a whole Semitone, 
f according to the direction of the melodic progression. We shall find, however, 
more decisive reasons for the use of D in place of D^ in the next chapter, when we 
pass from homophonic music to the influence of harmonic music on the scales. 

The account here given of the rational construction of scales and the corre- 
sponding intonation of intervals, deviates essentially from that given to the Greeks 
by Pythagoras, which has thence descended to the latest musical theories, and 
even now serves as the basis of our system of musical notation. Pythagoreis 
constructed the whole diatonic scale from the following series of Fifths : — 

F±C±G±D±A±E±B, 

5 F mi.mi.mi. If we use B^)^ in plaoe of distincl:, though purposely confused in the 

Bk the 8 chords are D^\f + F-A}\ftA^\f-{-C- nomenclature of the text, apparently as an 

E% E^]y + 0-B^\ft and the scale is 8 A^\f accommodation to the usual tempered nota- 

mi.mi.mi. tion. — TVanslcUor,] 

The modes formed by taking one inter- *[In this case the intonation becomes 

calary tone or the other are therefore quite altogether different,— TVafuZa/or.] 



CHAP.* XIV. 



INTRODUCTION OP MORE PRECISE NOTATION. 



279 



and oaloulated the intervals from it as they have been given above. In his diatonio 
scale there are but two kinds of small intervals, the whole Tone |^, [ = 204 cents] 
and the Liimna ^ff' [^90 oents].^ 

In this series if C be taken as the tonic, A would be related to the tonic in the 
Third degree, E in the Fourth, and B in the Fifth. Such a relationship would be 
absolutely insensible to any ear that has no guide but direct sensation. 

A series of Fifths may certainly be tuned on any instrument, and continued 
as far as we please ; but neither singer nor hearer could possibly discover in passing 
from ctoe that the latter is the fourth from the former in the series of Fifths. Even 
in a relation of the second degree through Fifths, as of c to d, it is doubtful whether 
a hearer can discover the relation of the tones. But in this case when we pass from 
one tone to the other we can imagine the insertion of ' a silent ^, ' so to speak, form- 
ing the Fourth below c, and the Fifth below d, and thus establish a connection, for 
the mind's ear at least, if not for the body's. This is probably the meaning to bei" 
attached to Bameau's and d'Alembert's explanation that a singer efifects the passage 
from cU) d by means of the fundamental bass G. If the singer does not hear the 
bass note G at the same time as d, he cannot possibly bring his d into consonance 
with that G ; but the melodic progression may certainly be facilitated by conceiving 
the existence of such a tone. This is a well-known means for striking the more 
difficult intervals, and is often applied with advantage. But of course it completely 
fails when the transition has to be made between tones widely separated in the series 
of Fifths.+ 



*[The fact that 'the Greek scale was 
derived from the tetrachord, or divisions of 
the Fourth, and not the Fifth, leads me to 
suppose that the tuning was founded on the 
Fourth and not the Fifth. On proceeding tw- 
wards from C hy Fourths, we get C F b1^ E^ 
A\, D\f Q\f CW F\, Bbk J?b[^ A\,\, Dbb. and on 
proceeding ooumwards we set C & D A E. 
Now these notes after 0\f in the first series, are 
precisely those of Abdulqadir, written as ^B^^Ej 
^Ai 'Dx O] 'C, on p. 2826, according to the no- 
tation explained on p. 281&, note *. Of course 
the Arahic lute, tuned in Fourths, naturaUy led 
to this. It is most convenient for modem habits 
of thought to consider the series as one of 
Fifths. But I wish to draw attention to the 
fact that in all nrobability it was historically 
a series of Fourths. — T^anslakfrJ] 

t [One of the practical results of the Tonic 
Sol-fa system of teadiing to sing the diatonic 
major scale as marked on p. 274o, No.l, in just 
intonation (see App. XVIII.), has been the 
discovery that it is not so easy to learn to 
strike the proper tone by a knowledge of the 
interval between two adjacent tones in a 
melodic passage, as by a knowledge of the 
mantai effect produced by each tone of the 
scale in relation to the tonic These mental 
effects are perhaps not very clearly character- 
ised by the mere names given to them in the 
Tonic Sol-fa books, but the teacher soon makes 
his class understand them, and then finds 
them the most valuable instrument which he 
possesses for inspiring a feeling for just intona- 
tion. On these characters of each tone in the 
(just) diatonic scale, a system of manual signs 
has been formed, by which classes are con- 
stantly led. Particulars are given in * The 
Standard Course of Leseons and Exercises in 
the Tonic Sol-fa Method of Teaching MtLstc, 
with additional exercises, by John Gurweo, 
new edition, re-written, a.d. 1872'. But it 
may be convenient to mention in this place 
the characters and manual signs there given 
{ib. p. iv.). 



I. First step. 

Do, Tonic, * the stbono or firm tone,* fist 
closed, horisontal, thumb down. 

So, Fifth, * the oband or bright tone,* the 
fingers extended and horisontal, hand with 
little finger below and thumb above, so that 
the palm of the hand is vertical. f 

Mi, Major Third, * the btbadt oreoZnt tone,' 
fingers extended and horizontal, palm of hand 
horizontal and undermost. 

II. Second step. 

Re, Second, * the Bonsmo or hopeful tone,' 
fingers extended, hand forming half a right 
angle with ground pointing upwards, palm 
downwards. 

Ti, Seventh, 'the pixbgino or sensitive 
tone,' only the forefinger extended and point- 
ing up, the other fingers and thumb closed, 
hand forming half a right angle with ground, 
back of hand downwardis. 

III. Third step. 

Fa, Fourth,* the dbsolatb or awe-inspiring 
tone,' only the forefinger extended and point- 
ing down, at half a right angle with the ground, 
the back of hand upwards. 

La, major Sixth, * the sad or weeping tone,' IT 
fingers fully extended, whole hand pointing 
down with a weak fall, back of hand upwards. 

It is thus seen that the order of teaching 
takes the tonic chord first, then the dominant, 
and lastly the subdominant The doubtful 
Second thus comes early on. *The teacher 
first sings the exercise to [the names of] con- 
secutive figures, telling his pupils that he is 
about to introduce a new tone (that is one' not 
DO, HI, or bo), and asking them to tell him on 
which figure it falls. When they have distin- 
guished the new tone, he sings the exercise 
again — ^laa-ing it [this is calling each note la] 
—and asks them to tell him how that tone 
** makes them feel ". Those who can describe 
the feeling hold up their hands, and the 
teacher asks one for a description. But others, 
who are not satisfied with words, may also 
perceive and feel. The teacher can tell by 



280 



ARABIC AND PERSIAN MUSICAL SYSTEM. 



PABT m. 



Finally there is no peroeptible reason in the series of Fifths why they should 
not be carried further, after the gaps in the diatonic scale have been supplied. 
Why do we not go on till we reach the chromatic scale of Semitones ? To what 
purpose do we conclude our diatonic « scale with the following singularly unequal 
arrangement of intervals — 

1, l,i, 1, 1, l,i? 

The new tones introduced by continuing the series of Fifths would lead to no closer 
intervals than those which already exist. The old scale of five tones appears to have 
avoided Semitones as being too dosa But when two such intervals already appear 
in the scale, why not introduce more ? 

The Arabic and Persian musical system^ so far as its nature is shewn in the 

writings of the older theorists, also knew no method of tuning but by Fifths. But 

IT this system, which seems to have developed its peculiarities in the Persian dynasty 

of the Sassanides (a.d. 226-651) before the Arabian conquest, shews an essential 

advance on the Pythagorean system of Fifths. 

In order to judge of this system of music, which has been hitherto completely 
misunderstood, the following relation has to be known. By tuning four Fifths 
upwards from C 

C ±G ±D ±A ±E 

we come to a tone, E, which is f ^ or a conmia higher than the natural major Third 
of C, which we write Ey The former E forms the major Third in the Pythagorean 
scale. But if we tune eight Fifths downwards from C, thus — 

C±F±B\f±E\^±A\,±D\^±G\^±Cb±F]f 

we come to a tone, i^, which is almost exactly the same as the natural J^^. The 
f interval of to i^^ is expressed by 

fi*f - 'I X fli*l> or nearly J x |f«4 [ - 384 cents]. 



their eyes whether they have done so. He 
multiplies examples until dU the class have 
their attention fully awakened to the effect of 
the new tone. This done he tells his pupils 
the Sol-fa name and the manual sign for the 
new tone, and guides them hy the signs to 
Sol-fa the exercise and themselves produce the 
proper effect. The signs are better in this 
case than the notation, because with them 
the teacher can best command the attention 
of every eye and ear and voice, and at 
the first introduction of a tone, attention 
should be acute * {ibid, p. 15). This passage, 
the result of practice with hundreds of thou- 
sands of children, shews that a totally new 
1^ principle of understanding the relation of the 
tones in a scale to the tonic has not only been 
Introduced, but worked out on a large scale 
practically, and, as I myself know, successfully. 
See Prof. Helmholtz's own impression of the 
success, as long ago as 1864, in App. XVIII. 
Since that time great experience has been 
gained and many methods improved. But the 
object of introducing this notice here is to 
shew that proper training (such as the ancient 
Greeks certainly bad) could produce the corre- 
sponding feeling for the effect of any tone in 
any scale anyhow divided, independently of the 
relationof consonances,andthat thisconsidera- 
tionmay help to explain the persistence of many 
scales which are harmonically inexplicable. 
No doubt Pythagorean singers hit the degrees 
of their scale quite correctly, and no doubt the 
* mental effects ' of their A, E^ B, were very 
different from those of the harmonisable Aj, 



£7i, ^. We can partially judge of them by 
the effects of equal temperament, which melo- 
dically cannot differ much, although they 
certainly differ sensibly, from those of Pytha- 
gorean intonation. And it must be remem- 
bered that singers actually learn to sing in 
equal temperament, in which all major Thirds 
are 14 cents too sharp, and then find just 
major Thirds intolerably flat I To this I would 
add the following anecdote quoted from F^tis 
{Hist OSnireUe de la Musique, vol. ii. p. 27) by 
Prof. Land {Oamme Aritoe, p. 19 footnote), 
containing * a fact,* as he says, * which could 
not be believed, if it were not attested by the 
person whom it concerns. The celebrated 
organist M. Lemmens, who was bom in a 
viUage of Gampine [or Eem^nland, a district 
in the Belgian province of Limbourg, 51°16'N. 
lat 5*^ 20' E. long.], studied music in early 
vouth upon a clavecin (harpsichord), which 
had been long dreadfully out of tune, because 
no tuner existed in the district. Fortunately, 
an organ-builder was summoned to repair the 
organ at the abbey of Everbode near that 
village. By chance he called upon the young 
musician's father, and heard the boy play on 
his miserable instrument. Shocked at the 
multitude of false notes which struck his ear, 
he immediately determined to tune the clave- 
cin. When he had done so, M. Lemmens ex- 
perienced the most disagreeable sensation8,and 
it was some time before he could habituate 
his ear to the correct intervals, having been 
so long misled by different relations.' Hence, 
f alseintervals may seem natural. — Translator.] 



CHAP. XIV. 



ARABIC AND PERSIAN MUSICAL SYSTEM. 



281 



Henoe the tone F\} is lower than the natural major Third -^^ [ » 386 cents] hy 
the extremely small interval ||^ [ » 2 cents], v^hich is about the eleventh part of a 
comma [ = 22 cents]. This interval between F\^ and E^ is practically scarcely per- 
ceptible, or at most only perceptible by the extremely slow beats produced by the 
chord C...B!\}...G [ — 384 F\^ 318 G] upon an instrument most exactly tuned. 
Practically, then, we may without hesitation assume that the two tones F\^ and E^ 
are identical, and of course that their Fifths are also identical, or 

F\^ « E,, Cb = B,, Gb - F,% &c.» 

Now in the Arabic and Persian scale the Octave is divided into 16 intervals, but 
in our equal temperament it is divided into 6 whole Tones. Modem [European] 
interpreters of the Arabic and Persian system of music have hence been misled 
into the conclusion that each of the 17 degrees of the scale corresponded to about 
the third of a Tone in our music. In that case the intonation of the degrees in f 
the Arabic and Persian scale would not be executable on our instruments. But 
in Eaesewetter's work on the music of the Arabs,f which was written with the 



* [On this substitution, which amounts to 
a temperament with perfect Fifths, and major 
Thirds too flat by a skhisma, or nearly the 
eleventh of a comma, and which I therefore 
call skhismic temperament, see Appendix XX. 
section A. art. 17. It is convenient to use a grave 
accent prefixed thus ^E^ to shew flattening by 
a skhisma, and to read it as skhismic, thus, 
' skhismic E one *. The above equations can 
therefore be made precise by writing F^^'jE^i, 
Cb ='-Bi, Ob -^4* <k«— 2VafMZa«ar.] 

t B. G. iCiesewetter, Die Musik d&r Ardher 
nach Originalquellen dargestellt, mit einem 
VorworU von dem Freihirm von Hammer- 
Pvrgstall Leiipzig, 1842, pp. 82, 88. The 
directions given m an anonymous manuscript 
of the 666th year of the Hegira, a.d. 1267, in 
the possession of Prof. Salisbury [of Yale Coll.], 
are essentially the same. See Journal of the 
American Oriental Society, vol. i. p. 174. [Since 
the publication of the ith German edition 
of this work in 1877, the whole history of the 
Arabic scale has been reinvestigated from the 
orinnal Arabic sources by Herr J. P. N. Land, 
D.D., Professor of Mental Philosophy at 
Leyden, an Oriental scholar and a musician, 
and the results were published first in Dutch 
as a paper in the Transactions of the butch 
Academy of Sdences, division Literature, 2nd 
series, vol. ix., and separately under the title 
of Over de Toonladders der Arabische Mussiek 
(on the Scales of Arabic Music) in 1880, and 
secondly in French as a paper communicated 
to the International Congress of Orientalists at 
Leyden in 1882, and published in vol. ii. of their 
' Transactions,* and also separately in 1884 as 
Recherehes sur Vhistoire de la Oamme Arahe. 
This paper supersedes in many respects the 
workofKlesewetterandvonHammer-Purgstall, 
of whom the first was a musician but not an 
Orientalist, and the second an Orientalist but 
not a musician. Alfarabi*s scale was produced 
by a succession of Fifths [or rather Fourths, see 
p. 42, note], but a century and a half previously 
Zalzal had introduced a new interval 22 : 27== 
865 cents, which Prof. Land terms a neutral 
Third. It is actually i| x | or 151 + 204 cents, 
that is, three quarters of a Tone sharper than 
a major tone, whereas the major Third is 182 
cents or a minor Tone sharper, and the minor 
Third was only a diatonic Semitone 112 cents 
sharper. The interval 12 : 11 = 151 cents is the 



well-known trumpet interval between the shar- 
pened Fourth andFif th, the 11th and 12th har- 
monics, as may be heard in the Fifth Octave of 
the Harmonical ^Y" -9'"' "^^^ <>& ^^^ Arabic 
lute was necessarily accompanied by a similar 
interval on the next string, 498 + 855 = 858 
cents. These two notes eventually superseded 
the old Pythagorean minor Third of 294 cents 
and the Fourth above it of 792 cents; and 
seem entirely out of the reach of a succession 
of Fifths or Fourths. But it was the object of 
Abdulqadir and others to form a succession of 
Fifths (or rather Fourths) which would include 
these two intervals, at least approximately. % 
This they accomplished within less than 80 cents 
by their 884 and 882 cents. It does not appear 
to have been Abdulqadir^s object to approxi- 
mate to the just major Third 886, and just 
major Sixth 884, but to get by means of Fifths 
or Fourths certain tones which would pass as 
Zalzal's. The list in the text (p. 2826) gives 
the seventeen tones thus produced with the in- 
tervals that they form with each other,and Prof. 
Helmholtz*s names of the notes, completed by 
a ffrave accent. Here I re-arrange them in 
order of Fifths down or Fourths up, the ap- 
proximate Thirds being added immediately to 
the right, and the numbers shewing the interval 
in cents from C : 



E 
A 
D 
G 
C 
F 



408 
906, 
204, 
702, 

0, 
499, 

£>294, 
Aif 792, 









90 
588 

1086 
884 
882 
180 
678 

1176 



1 



Observe that the real major Third was the 
Pythagorean 408 cents, as the minor Third 
was the Pythagorean 294 cents. Also that 
180 cents was within two cents of the minor 
tone 182 cents. But these approximations 
were probably not contemplated. 

An English concertina, which has fourteen 
notes to the Octave, was tuned with thirteen 
consecutive Fifths from G\f to 0^ so that I 
was able to try the chords A D[^JS7, DO\^, 
that is, il'C]|£7, D'FJiA, where the major 
Thirds are two cents too flat, and compare 
them with the Pythagorean chords AC^, 



282 



ARABIC AND PERSIAN MUSICAL SYSTEM 



FABX m. 



assistance of the celebrated Orientalist von Hammer-Poigstall, there is given a 
translation of the directions for the division of the monochord laid down by Abdul 
Eadir, a celebrated Persian theorist of the fourteenth century of our era, that lived 
at the courts of Timur and Bajazet. These directions enable us to calculate the 
intonation of the Oriental scale with perfect certainty. These directions also agree 
in essentials both with those of the much older Farabi,* (who died in a.d. 950), and 
of his own contemporary, Mahmud Shirazi,f (who died in 1315), for dividing the 
fingerboard of lutes. According to the directions of Abdul Kadir all the tonal 
degrees of the Arabic scale are obtained by a series of 16 Fifths, and if we call the 
lowest degree C, and arrange them in order of pitch within the compass of an 
Octave, they will be the following, as expressed in our notation [with the addition 
of the grave accent explained in p. 2816, note *]. 

1) 0- 2) Db- 3) 'D^^ 4) D- 6) J&b- 6) 'E^;^ 
ir 7) E- S) F •- 9) Gb - 10) ^G^wll) G -12) ^b- 

13) ^il^wU) A -15) J5b - 16) ^J5i - 17) ^<?i —18) c 

where the line - between two tones indicates the interval of a Pythagorean Limma 
It? (which is nearly y^ [» 90 cents]), and the sign -^^ a Pythagorean conuna 
[= 531441 : 524288 » 24 cents]. The Limma is about ^ and the Pythagorean 
comma a little more than ^ and less than f of the natural Semitone yf [= 112 
cents]. 

Abdul Kadir assigns the following intonation to the three first of the 12 prin- 
cipal tonal modes or Makamat : — 

Arabic Ancient Greek 

1. Uschak C..,D .,.E ..,F,„G ...A ...Bb.-.c Hypophrygian or Ionic. 

2. Newa C.D ..,E\}...F...G ...A\^...B\^,..c Hypodorian or Eolic. 

f 3. Buselik C.Db—^b-—^— Q^b—-^b"^b"C Mixolydian [all on p. 269a]. 

These three are therefore completely identical with the ancient Greek scales in 
Pythagorean intonation. | Since the Arabic theoreticians divide these scales into 
the Fourth C.i^ and the Fifth F + c, and since C, F and ^b ^^ considered to be 
invariable tones, and the others to be variable, it is probable that F must be 
regarded as the tonic. In this case 

1. Uschak would be = -P major. 

2. Newa would be = the mode of the minor Seventh of jP.§ 

3. Buselik would be » the mode of the minor Sixth of F. 

all three in Pythagorean intonation. The Persian school also considers the scales 
to be related. 



DFJiA. The latter were offensive, the former 
f indistinguishable from just. It seems re- 
markable, therefore, how with such a collection 
of notes the Arabs escaped harmonic music. 
But it will be seen on examining the scales 
formed from them (see especially p. 284<i, note), 
that they were perfectly unadapted for har- 
mony, which would have occasioned a perfect 
revolution in their musical systems. 

There was certainly no attempt to divide 
the scale as Villoteau supposed into seventeen 
equal parts each of about 70*6 cents. For 
the possible origin of Villoteau 's error see infra, 
p. 5206 to 520d'. 

This system of Abdulqadir prevailed from 
the thirteenth to the fifteenth century. The 
modem division into twenty-four Quartertones 
is noticed on p. 264& and note **. 

The Arabs, however, had also entirely 
different scales for other instruments than 
their classical lute, to which alone the above 



refers. — Translator:] 

* J. G. L. Kosegarten, AlU lapahanensia 
Liber Cantilenarum, pp. 76-86. 

t Kiesewetter, Die Musik der Artiber nach 
Originalquellen darg,, p. 38. 

t [Not therefore according to the forms on 
p. 2QQd't note, but on the more recent Pytha- 
gorean imitation of those forms. They are 
respectively the representatives of scales 2, 4, 
and 6 of that note. — TranslatorJ] 

§ [In the German text, Quarlengeschlecht, 
or the mode of the Fourth of F. The tones 
in the mode of the Fourth of F are those in 
the Pythagorean scale of B|^, or, in order of 
Fifths, E^±B\f±F±C±0±D±A, and the 
tones of the mode of the minor Seventh of F 
are those in the Pythagorean scale of E\f, or, in 
order of Fifths, A^±E\f±B\f±F±C±0±D. 
The correction is therefore evident. — Trans- 
lator,] 



CHAP. XIV. ARABIC AND PERSIAN MUSICAL SYSTEM. 283 

The next group consists of five tonal modes having just or natural intonation, 
namely : 

4. Bast 0...'I>i...'Si... -P... G ...'A^...B\}...c 



5. Husseini 

6. EQdschaf 

7. Bahewi . 

8. Sengule . 



G ... X/| ... ja\^ ••• Jb •.. Cx-i •.• A.Q ... Ij\} ••• C 

O ••• X/| ••■ Miff •>• jl* •*■ vT-t •.• ii.| ••• J^ff ••■ C 

O ••. X/-| ••• ^1 •.. x' ••• C7| ••• A}^ ••• J^ff ••■ c 

C/ ••■ X/ •*■ Mj-t ..• x' ••■ Cri •■• A-t •»• -^ff ••• C 



l^a«£ may be regarded as the mode of the Fourth of C ; JSidschaf as the mode 
of the Fourth of F; Husseird as the mode of the Fourth of £b ; as such they 
would have perfectly natural intonation. In Bahewi, if we refer it to the tonic F, 
the minor Third A\} ia in Pythagorean, not natural, intonation. It might be re- 
garded as the mode of the minor Seventh of J^ in which the major Seventh E^ is IT 
used as the leading note in place of the minor Seventh, as in our own minor mode. 
The natural intonation of such a tonal mode cannot, indeed, be properly repre- 
sented by the existing 17 tonal degrees. It becomes necessary to take either 
Pythagorean minor Thirds and natural major Thirds or conversely. Husseini may 
be regarded as the same tonal mode with Bahewi^ having the same false minor 
Third, but a minor Seventh. Finally Sengule may be regarded as F major with a 
Pythagorean Sixth. Bast may be conceived in the same way ; they are merely dis- 
tinguished by the dififerent values of the Seconds G or ^Gy 

The four last Makamat have each 8 tones, new intercalary tones being em- 
ployed. Two of them resemble the modes Bast and Sengtde, and between B\} 
and C there is an intercalary tone \ introduced ; named 

«7. xraK . . . o ... jl/| •*• ■*-i't ... x' ... (jT ... iij ••• •^17 ••• C-I *•» c 

10. Iszfahan . . G ... D ... "E^ ... F ... "G^ ... "Aj^ ... B\^ ... \ ... c T 

The last transposed a Fourth gives 

11. Biisiirg . . C ... D ..."E^ ... F ..."G^ ... G ... A ...'B^...c 

The last tonal mode is 

12. Zirefkend . . C ... 'Di ... E\} ... F ... "G^ ... A\f ... ^Ay ... ^B^ ... c 

which certainly, if rightly reported, is a very singular creation. It might be 
looked upon as a minor scale with a major Seventh, and both a major and minor 
Sixth, but then the Fifth ^G^ is wrong. On the other hand, if i^ is taken as the 
tonic, it has no Fourth, for which certainly there is some analogy in the Mixo- 
lydian and Hypolydian scales. The instructions for scales of eight notes are very 
contradictory, to judge by the different authorities cited by Kiesewetter. 

The following four are distinguished as the principal modes of the Makamat : — f 

1. Uschak = Pythagorean F major. 

2. Bast == Natural mode of the Fourth of G, or natural F major with acute 

Sixth. 

3. Husseini = Natural mode of the minor Seventh of F, 

4. Hidschaf - Natural mode of the Fourth of F, 

We find, then, a decided predominance of scales with a perfectly correct natural in- 
tonation, which has been attained by a skilful use of a continued series of Fifths. 
This makes the Arabic and Persian tonal system very noteworthy in the history of 
the development of music. Moreover, in some of these scales we find ascending 
leading notes, which are perfectly foreign to the Greek scales. Thus in Bahewi, 
E^ is the leading note to F, although the minor Third A^ stands above F, while no 
Greek scale could have allowed this without at the same time changing E^ into E^, 



284 



ARABIC AND PERSIAN MUSICAL SYSTEM. 



PART JII. 



Similarly in Zirefkend the Bi is used as a leading note to C, although the minor 
Third E}) is used above G* 



* [Prof. Land {Gamme Arabe, p. 88, note 8) 
says * some of the descriptions of Prof. Helm- 
holtz, borrowed from Eiesewetter, do not quite 
correspond with the ori^al data *. It wul be 
interesting therefore to give these scales as Prof. 
Land describes them with his (more exact) 
French orthography of the Arabic names and 
in his order. The notation is the Translator's, 
^Ai being 24 cents flatter than A. 

1. ^Ochaq. Our F major commencing (as 
shewn by [) with the dominant, FOAB\f 
[CDEF, 'This commencement is the inevitable 
consequence of the progression by conjunct 
tetrachords which belongs to the lute. 'Ochaq 

IT is as it were the type of cJl these maqSmat, the 
others of which difier at one time like the 
tropes or modes of the Greeks and of the 
middle ages, by the displacement of both the 
Semitones at once, and at other times like the 
Greek genera, by exchanges of intervals with- 
out disturbing the scheme of two conjunct 
tetrachords followed by a tone, with the ex- 
ception of Nos. 7 and 8, which are moro distinct 
from the model maqama.* 

2. Nawa. * We may say that the scale is 
that of E\% major, beginning with the Sixth.* 
E\fFOAB\f{CDE\f. 

8. Bou8%llk or Ahou-Biltk. * The scale of 
D\f major beginning at the Seventh, D\fE\f 
F O^ A\fB^ [C D|^.* The Fythagoroan into- 
nation of the three first scales ronders them 
non-harmonic. 
IT 4. BdsL * The same as 'Ochaq except that 
the Third A and the Seventh E are depressed 
by a Pyth. comma, FO^A^Bb[CD'E^F, which 
makes them just rather than Pythagoroan.' 
The eubdominant B]^F is non-harmonic. 

5. *Irdq. * Like Rast, but with the second 
and the sixth above diminished by a Pyth. 
comma, which makes the second nearly the 
minor Second 10 : 9, and with grave supple- 
mentary Fifth.' F'Oi'AiB\fCJCrDj'E^F. 
This has the proper subdominant ^[^'DjF, but 
the double Fifth is quite non-harmonic. 

6. I^ahdn, * Bast enriched with a grave 
supplementary Fifth.' F'0'AiB\fCilCD'E.F. 
Here both the subdominant B\^F and double 
Fifth ronder the scale non-harmonic. 

7. Zirafkend. C'D^E\fF'OiAyAi'BiC. 
* An artificial scale composed of fragments of 
those of E\f (e\^f'gia\fc'die\^. Third and 

^Seventh almost just) and of C (c^<2|/'a/6iC, 
Second minor and Sixth nearly just) varied 
also with Pythagoroan ^ or D and 'jB^.' Of 
course entirely non-harmonic. 

8. BouMOurk. * C major with the Second, 
Third, and Seventh diminished by a Pyth. 
comma, and with agravesupplementary Fifth.' 
CD^E^FO^OA^B^C. Both subdominant and 
dominant are non-harmonic. 

9. Zenkouleh. * Difiers from Rast only in 
having the Second minor.' FGi'A^B^ [G 
D'E^F, Subdominant non-harmonic. 

10. Bdhawi, * F minor commencing with 
the Fifth, but with the Sixth and Seventh 
each increased by a Limma= 90 cents, and the 
Second diminished by a Pythagorean comma, 
veiy nearly our just ascending scale of F 
minor.' FOiA\fB^[CD;E^F. The Pyth. 
scale of F minor is F O A^^B^CD^ E^F. 
Here D^=90 cents; 90-1-90=180=204-24 



cents B^D], 34 cents being the Pyth. comma. 
Similarly E}f^2H cents; 294 -i- 90 » 884 =406 
-24 cents »^^i. Entiroly non-harmonic 

11. Hhosaini. *Like Nawa, but with the 
Third and Seventh diminished by a Pyth. 
comma.' E}^F'GiAB^[C'DiE^, Entirely 
non-harmomc. 

12. Hhu^dgi. ' B[^ major, be^nning with 
the Second and with the Third, Sixth, and 
Seventh diminished and therofore nearly just.' 
B\^ [CDiE^F'GiAiB\f. This is the only one 
of these scales which is practically harmonic 

If we restore the proper namefli of the notes 
in the seriesof Fifths or Fourths (as inp.281(2'), 
calculate the cents between each pair of notes 
and from the first to each note, and begin with 
the note indicated, we shall have a better idea 
of the real naturo of these scales, thus : 

1. *Ochaq. (7 204 2>204J&90Fa04G204 

SM 408 406 708 

il 90 B|^ 204 C 

006 000 ISOO 

2. Nawa. C204D90^b904F204G904 

a04 SM 486 701 

il 90 B|^ 204 C 

006 OOe 19Q0 

8. BauaUlk. 90 D^ 20i E^ 90i F 90 

00 S04 406 

Gt^ 204 il|y 204 B|^ 204 C 

688 702 006 1900 

4. Boat C 204 i) 180 ^1^ 114 jP 204 O 180 

904 684 406 70S 

B}^ \f 114 B|^ 204 C 

882 006 1900 

5. *Iraq. 190 E^^ 20i F\f lU F 180 

180 S84 406 

A\^\fQOi Bk}f 114 B^ 180 D|^ [^ 24 d 

678 £02 006 1176 1900 

This double initial D^ |^, may be compared to 
our double second in just major scales, and pos- 
sibly has to be explained in the same way as a 
real modulation. 

6. Igfahan. C 180 E|> ^ 204 FK 114 JP* 204 

180 384 408 

G 180 B|^ 1^ 114 B\f 180 D\f^2i C 

70S fl82 006 1176 1900 

7. Zirafkend, C 180 JS7|^ ^ 114 E\f 204 F 180 

180 804 408 

A\f \f llA A\f 90 B\f \^ 204 C^ 114 C 

678 70S 882 1066 1200 

8. BouBOurk, C 180 £|^ ^ 204 i^ 114 F 180 

180 384 406 

A^\^2A G20^ AIQO 0\f 114 C 

678 70S 006 1086 1900 

9. Zenkouleh. C 204 JD 180 F^ 114 JF* 180 

904 384 406 

ii[> b 204 Bb 1^ 114 B^204t C 

678 882 006 1900 

10. Bdhawi. C 180 ^|y [^ 204 F|^ 114 F 180 

180 384 406 

A\f \^ 114 i4|y 204 B|^ 204 C 

678 702 006 1900 

11. Hhosa;ini. CIQO E\f\f 114 ^|> 204 F 180 

180 904 408 

^[^ 1^ 228 ^ 90 B^ 204 C 

678 000 006 1900 

12. Hhidjdai. 01^ E\f\^ 114 ^|^ 204 F 180 

180 2U4 408 

i4|> 1^ 204 B|^ |> 114 B|^ 204 C 

678 882 006 1900 

Of these I hava been able to play 1, 2, 8 direct, 
and 4, 5, 10, 12 by transposition upon my Pytha- 
gorean concertina (p. 281(2'). When 12 begins 
with B]y^ or is played by transposition a h d'^ 
d' e' g'\fa'\f a', it is indistinguishable from the 



OHAP. XIV. 



MEANING OP THE LEADING NOTE. 



285 



At a little later period a new musieal system was developed in Persia with 
12 Semitones to the Octave, analogous to the modem European system. Eiese- 
wetter here hazards the very unlikely hypothesis that this scale was introduced 
into Persia by Christian missionaries. But it is clear that the system of 17 tonal 
degrees which had been previously in popular use, merely required the feeling for the 
finer distinctions to grow dull so that intervals which differed only by a [Pythagorean] 
comma should be confused, in order to generate the system of 12 Semitones.* No 
foreign influence was necessary here. Moreover, the Greek system of music had 
long been taught to the Arabs and Persians by Alfarabl. Again, the European 
theory of music had not made any essential advance in the fourteenth and fifteenth 
centuries, if we except the study of harmony, which never found favour with the 
Orientals. Hence the Europeans of those days could teach the Orientals nothing 
that they did not already know better themselves, except some imperfect rudiments 
of harmony which they did .not want There is much more reason, I think, forf 
asking whether the imperfect fragments of the natural system which we find 
among the Alexandrine Greeks, do not depend on Persian traditions, and also, 
whether the Europeans in the time of the Crusades did not learn much music from 
the Orientals. It is very probable that they brought the lute-shaped instruments 
with fingerboards and the bowed instruments from the East. In the construction 
of tonal modes we might especially instance the use of the leading note, which 
we have here found existing in the East, and which at that time also began to figure 
in the Western musia 

The use of the major Seventh of the scale as a leading note to the tonic marks 
a new conception, which admitted of being used for the further development of 
the tonal degrees of a scale, even within the domain of purely homophonic music. 
The tone Bi in the major scale of C has the most distant relationship of all the 
tones to the tonic (7, because as the major Third of the dominant G, it has a less 
close connection with it than its Fifth 2>. We may perhaps assume this to be the f 
reason why, when a sixth tone was introduced into some Gaelic airs, the Seventh 
was usually omitted. But, on the other hand, the major Seventh B^ developed a 
peculiar relation to the tonic, which in modem music is indicated by calling it 
the leading note. The major Seventh J?i differs from the Octave c of the tonic by 
the smallest interval in the scale, namely a Semitone, and this proximity to the 
tonic allows the Seventh to be struck easily and pretty surely, even when starting 
from tones in the scale which are not at all related to B^. The leap F.„B^ 
[» 45 : 32 a 590 cents], for example, is difficult, because there is no relationship at 
all between the tones. But when a singer has to perform the passage F,..Bi...c, 
he conceives the interval F,..c, which he can easily execute, but does not force his 
voice up sufficiently high to reach c at first» and thus strikes B^ on the way. Thus 
B^ assumes the appearance of a preparation for c, and this view alone justifies it 
to the ears of a listener, by whom the transition into c is, therefore, expected. 
Hence it has been said that By^ leads to c ; or that Bi is the leading note to c. In f 



juBt scale a b c^'jt d' e' // tt^/tt a'. The thiee 
chords d' g'\f a'.ad'^ e';e'g'^ h are perfectly 
good, and the passage d'\^ e* a', d* g'^ a', e' a* 
d"\}, e' a'}f h\ d*}} e' a' perfectly good, much 
better than on the piano. Yet it never occur- 
red to Arabs to play in harmony. 

*In face of these historical scales,* observes 
Prof. Land {ibid. p. 88), * it is difficult to con- 
ceive how Kiesewetter could say that the 17 
degrees of the complete scale were not treated 
like sharps and flats, but that each one had 
the same importance. On the contrary, the 
17 degrees were like our 12 Semitones to the 
Octave, or, still better, like the 17 intervals of 
the so-called enharmonic scale, which dis- 
tinguishes sharps and flats, without dividing 
the Semitones E to F, and B to C. To com- 



pose their melodies the Orientals, as we do, 
selected from them several series of 7 [occa- 
sionally 8] tones, very slightly different from 
our diatonic scales.' But so materially dif- 
ferent that any attempt to play harmonies 
upon them would result in frightful dissonance. 
— Translator.'] 

* [If we suppose the pairs of notes in ( ) 
to have been confused into one by neglecting 
the Pythagorean comma, then the series m 
notes on p. 2826 becomes C D\^ (D^ D) E'^ CE, 
E) F O^ fGiG) A^ fA^A) B\f *A (c^c), 
whence the equally tempered scale C D^ D 
Ek E F Q\f O A^ A B^ B e immediately 
follows. In Meshaqah's scale of 24 Quarter- 
tones, p. 264c, that of 12 Semitones is also 
implicitly contained. — Translator.'] 



286 



MEANING OF THE LEADING NOTE. 



PART HI. 



this sense it also becomes easy to sharpen B^^ somewhat, making it B, for example, 
to bring it near to c, and mark its reference to that tone more distinctly. 

According to my own feeling, the leading effect of the tone B^^ is mnch more 
marked in such passages as F,„B^,.,c or F+ A^..,B^...Cy in which B^ is not related 
to the preceding tones, than in such a passage as G + B^...c where it is. But as I 
have found nothing on this point in musical writings, I do not know whether 
musicians are likely to agree with me in this opinion. For the other Semitone of 
the scale E^.,.Ff the E^ does not seem to lead to J^, if the tonality of the melody 
is well preserved, because in this case Ej^ has its own independent relation to the 
tonic, and hence is musicsdly quite determinate. The hearer, then, has no 
occasion to regard ^^ as a mere preparation for F, Similarly for the interval 
G...A^]} [» 112 cents] in the minor mode. The G is more nearly related to the 
tonic G than il^|> is. On the other hand, Hauptmann is probably right in 
H considering the interval 2>...£7^b [=■ 112 cents] in the minor mode, as one in which 
I) leads to E^}}, because D has only a relationship of the second degree to the tonic 
O, although its relationship is certainly doser than that of B^ to C. 

But the relation of 2>^b ^^ descending passages of the mode of the minor 
Sixth of C (the old Greek Doric) is perfectly similar to the effect of B^ in the 
ascending scale of C major. It really forms a kind of descending leading note, 
and since in the best period of Greek music descending passages were felt as 
nobler and more harmonious than ascending ones,* this peculiarity of the Dorio 
mode may have been of special importance and have been a reason for the 
preference given to this scale. The cadence with the chord of the extreme sharp 
Sixth [ratio 128 : 225, cents 976]— 

D'b + F ...G+Bj^ 
C —E^\,+ G ...c 

51 is almost the only remnant of the ancient tonal modes. It is quite isolated and 
misunderstood. This is a (Greek) Doric cadence, in which 2>^|> and B^ are both 
used at the same time as leading notes to O.f 

The relation of the second or parhypate of the Greek Doric scale, to the lowest 
tone or hypate, seems also to have been perfectly well felt by the Greeks them- 
selves, to judge by Aristotle's remarks in the 3rd and 4th of his problems on 
harmony. I cannot abstain from adducing them here because they admirably and 
delicately characterise the relation. Aristotle inquires why the singer feels his 
voice more taxed in taking the parhypate than in taking the hypate, although they 
are separated by so small an interval. The hypate is sung, he says, with a remission 
of effort. And then he adds that in order to reach an aim easily it is necessary that 
in addition to the motive which determines the will, the kind of volitional effort 
should be quite familiar and easy to the mind.:!: The effort felt in singing the lead- 



♦ Aristotle, Problmns xix. 33. [The pas- 
m sage has ahready been cited at full, p. 241d', 
note t— Translator.^ 

t [This cadence is a union of the ancient 
Doric, beginning with c, rendered harmonisable 
as the mode of the minor Sixth (c...<P|>...e'|> 
.../...g...a»k..&>..c', p. 278d, note), with the 
modem mmor, beginning with c(c...d... «*[>.../ 
.,.g...a%..hi...c'), and wiU be more particu- 
larly considered in the next chapter, pp. BO&d- 
806c. The intervals expressed in cents are 
D^\f 886 F 20^0 386 Brando 316 E^}^ 386 G 
498 c— Translator,^ 

X This periphrasis seems to me to render 
correctly the last clause in the following cita- 
tion: Aik rl r^y wapvwdrny fioyrts fid/s.io'ra 
ioFofHyyvyrai, ohx irroy 1l r^y y^rrny icai ri ftvw, 
fitrii Zk Siturrdtrtus vAcloros ; *H Uri xaA.«m6Tara 
ra6my ^Souci, Kid aSrri ^ ipx'hf rh «i x^^^^'^*"* 
8i^ Hv hrircuny [irol »ff tf'ii'] rTJs ^tfyijs ; iy 



ro^rois ih ir6yos * iroyovyra Bi fjM?i\oy iuupB^iptrai * 
Ai^ rl 5i ToAniy xoAcirctfS', r^y 9^ tvdrriy ^<fSU§s - 
Kttlrot BUtris iKOfrifMs; *H tri fitr* &Wo'c«s i^ 
iwdmfi, Koi Sifia /icr^ r^y a^irrwrty iKot^pby rb 
&y« jScUAccf; Ai^ raifrh Si fouc§ rpihs fday fS€<r- 
Bat rk wphs rabniy ^ wafmrfirriy ^fitya • 8ci yiip 
fi€rii <rvyyolas ical Koraffrdo'^ws oiKtutrdmis r^ 
liBti irphs T^y fio^Xriffiy. Arist. Probl, xix. 8, 4. 
[The whole passage may perhaps be translated 
thus : * Why do those who sing the parh^Mte 
break down not less than those who sing the 
nets and higher tones, though with a greater 
disagreement (Bidtrroffis) ? Is it because tihey 
sing this with the greatest difficulty, even when 
this is the beginning? Does not difficulty 
arise from straining [and forcing] the voice ? 
This occasions effort, and things done with 
effort are most apt to fail. But why do they 
sing the parhypate with difficulty, and yet 
take the hypcUe easily, although there is only 



OHAP. XIV. 



MEANING OF THE LEADING NOTE. 



287 



ing note does not lie in the larynx, but in the difficulty we feel in fixing the voice 
upon it by mere volition while another tone is already in our mind, to which we 
desire to pass, and which by its proximity conducted us to the leading note. It is 
not till we reach the final tone that we feel ourselves at home and at rest, and this 
final tone is sung without any strain on the will 

Proximity in the scale then gives a new point of connection between two tones, 
which is not merely active in the case of the leading note, just considered, but also, 
as already mentioned, in interpolating tones between two others in the chromatic 
and enharmonic modes. Intervals of pitch are in this respect analogous to mea- 
surements of distance. When we have the means of determining one point (the 
tonic) with great exactness and certainty, we are able by its means to determine 
other points with certainty, when they are at a known small distance from it (the 
interval of a Semitone), although perhaps we could not have determined them with 
so much certainty independently. Thus the astronomer employs his fundamental IT 
fixed stars, of which the positions have been determined with the greatest possible 
accuracy, for accurately determining the positions of other stars in their neigh- 
bourhood. 

We may also remark that the interval of a Semitone plays a peculiar part as the 
introduction {appoggiatura) to another note. As an appoggiatura in a melody any 
tone can be used, even when not in its scale, provided it makes the interval of a 
Semitone with a note in the scale which it introduces ; but a foreign tone which 
makes the interval of a whole Tone with that note in the scale, cannot be so used. 
The only justification of this use of the Semitone is certainly its existence as a well- 
known interval in the diatonic scale, which the voice can sing correctly and the ear 
can readily appreciate, even when the relations on which its magnitude depends are 
not clearly sensible in the passage where it is used. Hence also no arbitrarily 
chosen small interval can be thus employed. Although slight changes in the in- 
terval of the leading note may be introduced by practical musicians to give af 
stronger expression to its tendency towards the tonic, they must never go so far as 
to make those changes clearly felt.*^ 

Hence the major Seventh in its character of leading note to the tonic acquires 
a new and closer relationship to it, unattainable by the minor Seventh. And in 
this way the note which is most distantly related to the tonic becomes peculiarly 
valuable in the scale. This circumstance has continually grown in importance in 
modem music, which aims at referring every tone to the tonic in the clearest pos- 
sible manner ; and hence, in ascending passages going to the tonic, a preference 
has been given to the major Seventh in all modem keys, even in those to which it 
did not properly belong. This transformation appears to have begun in Europe 
during the period of polyphonic music, but not in part songs only, for we find it also 
in the homophonic Gcmtv^ firm/us of the Boman Catholic Church. It was blamed in 
an edict of Pope John XXII., in 1322, and in consequence the sharpening of the 
leading note was omitted in writing, but was supplied by the singers, a practice f 
which Winterfeld believes to have been followed by Protestant musical composers 
even down to the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, because it had once come 
into use. And this makes it impossible to determine exactly what were the steps 
by which this change in the old tonal modes was effected, f 

Even to the present day, according to A. v. Oettingen's report, | the Esthonians 



a dAesU (Semitone or Quaitertone) between 
them ? Is it because the hypati is sung with 
a remission of effort, and at the same time it 
is easy to go upwards after getting oneself 
together for the effort {awrrwrii) ? For the 
same reason it is easy to sing what leads up 
to any note, or the paranite. For the will 
requires not only conscious thought (a^rroM) 
but an inclination {Kard^raats) which is per- 
fectly familiar to the habit of mind [fBos),* 
She passage is very difficult, and there was 



clearly a connection in the writer's mind be- 
tween iuLarraffis, a^reuriSf and KarAtrraffiSf 
which influenced his reasoning, but evaporates 
in translation. — TranalatorJ] 

*[See App. XX. sect. G. art. 6.— 2Van«- 
lator.] 

iber evangelische Kirchengesang. Leip- 
zig, 1848, Tol. i. introduction. 

tDas HarmonieaystBtn in dualer Ent- 
wickelung, Dorpat und Leipzig, 1866, p. 113. 



288 MEANING OF THE LEADING NOTE. part m. 

struggle against singing the leading note in minor scales, although it may be clearly 
struck on the organ. 

Among the ancient tonal modes, the Greek Lydian (major mode) and the un- 
melodic Hypolydian (mode of the Fifth, p. 269a, No. 7) had the major Seventh as 
the leading note to the tonic, and hence the first was developed into the principal 
tonal mode of modern music, the major mode. The Greek Ionic (mode of the 
Fourth) dififered from it only in having a minor Seventh. On simply altering this 
into a major Seventh, this mode also became major. On giving a major Seventh to 
each of the other three, they gradually converged to our present minor mode during 
the seventeenth century. From the Greek Phrygian (mode of the minor Seventh) 
by changing B\f into Bj^ we obtain 

THB ASOENDINQ MINOB SGALB. 

as we had already found from a simple consideration of the relationship of tones 
[p. 2745, No. 2]. The Greek Hypodoric or Eolic (mode of the minor Third), which 
answers to our descending minor scale, gives on changing B^\} into B^, 

THE INSTRUMENTAL MINOR SCALE. 
...Z/...J& {^...x^*.. CT...il [^...^j...C 

which is difficult for singers to execute, on account of the interval ^^|>...^^ 
[b ratio 64 : 75, cents 274], but frequently occurs in modem music both ascending 
and descending. 

The Greek Doric (mode of the minor Sixth) with a major instead of a minor 
Seventh, is still discoverable in the final cadence mentioned on p. 2866. 

The general introduction of the leading tone represents, therefore, a continually 
increasing consistency in the development of a feeling for the predominance of the 
IT tonic in a scale. By this change, not only is the variety of character in the ancient 
tonal modes seriously injured, and the wealth of previous means of expression 
essentially diminished, but even the links of the chain of tones in the scale were 
disrupted or disturbed. We have seen that the most ancient theory made tonal 
system consist of series of Fifths, and that each system had at first four and after- 
wards six intervals of a Fifth. The predominance of a tonic as the single focus of 
the system was not yet indicated, at least externally ; it became apparent at most 
by a limitation of the number of Fifths to contain those tones only which occurred 
in the natural scale. All Greek tonal modes may be formed from the tones in the 
series of Fifths — 

F±G±G±D±A±E±B. 

Directly we proceed to the natural intonation of Thirds, the series of Fifths is inter- 
rupted by an imperfect Fifth, as in 

f F±G ±G ± D...A^ ± El +,^1 

where the Fifth D„.A^ [==680 cents] is imperfect. And when finally the sharp 
leading note is introduced, as by the use of Gjt for G in A^ minor, the series is 
entirely interrupted [C : Gjj^^^l^ : 25 = 772 cents]. 

In the gradual development of the diatonic system, therefore, the various links 
of the chain which bound the tones together were sacrificed successively to the 
desire of connecting all the tones in a scale with one central tone, the tonic. And 
in exact proportion to the degree with which this was carried out, the conception 
of tonality consciously developed itself in the minds of musicians. 

' The further development of the European tonal system is due to the cultivation 
of harmony, which will occupy us in the next chapter. 

But before leaving our present subject, some doubtful points have still to be 
considered. In the preceding chapter I have shewn that the melodic relationship 
of tones can be made to depend upon their upper partials, precisely in the same 



CHAP. XIV. MELODY IN SIMPLE TONES. 289 

way as their consonance was shewn to be determined in Chapter X. Now this 
method of explanation may in a certain sense be considered to agree with the 
favourite assertion that * melody is resolved hofrmonyy* on which musicians do 
not hesitate to form musical systems without staying to inquire how harmonies 
could have been resolved into melodies at times and places where harmonies had 
either never been heard, or were, after hearing, repudiated. According to our 
explanation, at least, the same physical peculiarities in the composition of musical 
tones, which determined consonances for tones struck simultaneously, would also 
determine melodic relations for tones struck in sticcession. The former then would 
not be the reason for the latter, as the above phrase suggests, but both would have 
a common cause in the natural formation of musical tones. 

Again, in consonance we found other peculiar relations, due to combinational 
tones, which become effective even when simple tones, or tones with few and faint 
upper partials, are struck simultaneously.. I have already shewn that combina- ^ 
tional tones very imperfectly replace the effect of upper partial tones in a con- 
sonance, and that consequently a chord formed of simple tones is wanting in 
brightness and character, the distinctions between consonance and dissonance 
being only very imperfectly developed. 

In melodic passages, however, combinational tones do not occur, and hence the 
question arises as to how far a melodic effect could be produced by a succession of 
simple tones. There is no doubt that we can recognise melodies which we have 
already heard, when they are executed on the stopped pipes of an organ, or are 
whistled with the mouth, or merely struck on a glass or wood or steel harmonicon, 
as a musical box, or are played on bells. But there is also no doubt that all these 
instruments, which generate simple tones, either alone or accompanied by weak 
and remote inharmonic secondary tones, are incapable of producing any effective 
melodic impression without an accompaniment of musical instruments proper. 
They may be often extremely effective for performing single parts when accom- % 
panied by the organ, or the orchestra, or a pianoforte, but by themselves they produce 
very poor music indeed, which degenerates into absolute unpleasantness when the 
inharmonic secondary tones are somewhat too loud. 

We are bound, however, to give some reason why any impression of melody at 
all can be produced by such instruments. 

Now we must first remember that, as shewn at the end of Chapter VIL, the 
actual construction of the ear favours the generation of weak harmonic upper par- 
tials within the ear itself, when powerful but objectively simple tones are sounded. 
Hence it is at most very weak objectively simple tones which can be regarded as 
also subjectively simple. 

Next, there is an effect of memory to be brought into account. Supposing 
that I have been used to hear Fifths taken at aU possible pitches, and have recog- 
nised them by aural sensation as having a very close melodic relationship, I should 
know the magnitude of this interval by experience for every tone in the scale, ^ 
and should retain the knowledge thus acquired by the action of a man's memory 
of sensations, even of those for which he has no verbal expression. 

When, then, I hear such an interval executed on tuning-forks, I am able to 
recognise it as an interval I have often heard, although its tones have either none, 
or only some faint remnants of those upper partials which formerly gave it a right 
to be considered as a favourite interval of close melodic relationship. And just in 
the same way I shall be able to recognise, as previously known, other melodic pas- 
sages or whole melodies which are executed in simple tones, and even if I hear a 
melody for the first time in this way, whistled with the mouth or chimed by a clock, 
or struck on a glass harmonicon, I should be able to complete it by imagining how 
it would sound if executed on a real musical instrument, as the voice or a violin. 

A practised musician is able to form a conception of a melody by merely reading 
the notes. If we give the prime tones of these notes on a glass harmonicon, we give 
a firmer basis to the conception by really exciting a large portion of the impression 



290 MELODY IN SIMPLE TONES. part m. 

on the senses which the melody would have produced if sung. Simple tones, how- 
ever, merely exhibit an outline of the melody. All that gives the melody its charm 
is absent. We know, indeed, the individual intervals which it contains, but we have 
no immediate impression on our senses which serves to distinguish those which are 
distantly from those which are closely related, or the related from the totally un- 
related. Observe the great difference between merely whistling a melody or play- 
ing it on a violin ; between striking it on a glass harmonicon or on the piano ! The 
difference is somewhat of the same kind as that between viewing a single photograph 
of a landscape, and seeing two corresponding photographs of it through a stereo- 
scope. The first enables me, by means of my memory, to form a conception of the 
relative distances of its parts, and this conception may be often very satisfactory. 
But the stereoscopic fusion of the two figures gives me the real impression on the 
senses which the relative distances of the parts of the landscape would have them- 
T selves produced, and which I am obliged in the case of a single image to supply by 
experience and memory. Hence the stereoscopic picture is more lively than the 
simple perspective view, exactly in the same way as immediate impressions on our 
senses are more lively than our recollections. 

The case seems to be the same for melodies executed in simple tones. We 
recognise the melodies when we have heard them otherwise performed ; we can 
even, if we have sufficient musical imagination, picture to ourselves how they 
would sound if executed by other instruments, but they are decidedly without the 
immediate impression on the senses which gives music its charm. 



CHAPTER XV. 

THE CX)NSONANT CHOBDS OF THE TONAL MODES. 

T Polyphony was the form in which music for several voices first attained a certain 
degree of artistic perfection. The peculiar characteristic of this style of music 
was that several voices were singing each its own independent melody at the same 
time, which might be a repetition of the melodies already sung by the other voices, 
or else quite a different one. Under these circumstances each voice had to obey 
the general law of tonality common to the construction of all melodies, and, more- 
over, every tone of a polyphonic passage had to be referred to the same tonic. 
Hence each voice had to commence separately on the tonic or some tone closely 
related to it, and to close in the same way. In practice each part of a polyphonic 
piece was made to begin with the tonic or its Octave. This fulfilled the law of 
tonality, but necessitated the closing of a polyphonic piece with a unison. 

The reason why higher Octaves might accompany the tonic at the close, lies, as 
we saw in the last chapter, in the fact that higher Octaves are merely repetitions of 
portions of the fundamental tone. Hence by adding its Octave to the tonic at the 
^ close, we merely reinforce part of its compound tone ; no new compound or simple 
tone is added, and the union of all the tones contains only the constituents of the 
tonic itself. 

The same is true for all the other partial tones which are contained in the tonic. 
The next step in the development of the final chord was to add the Twelfth of the 
tonic. Now the chord c...& ±g' contains no element which is not also a con- 
stituent of the compound tone c when sounded alone, and consequently, being a 
mere representative of the single musical tone c, it is suitable for the termination 
of a piece of music having the tonic c. 

Nay even the chord c' ±g' ^.^d' might be so used, for when it is struck we hear 
weakly indeed, but still sensibly, the combinational tone c, so that the whole mass 
of tone again contains nothing more than the constituents of the tone c. It must 
be owned, however, that this combination would answer to a rather unusual quality 
of tone, with a proportionably weak prime partial. 

On the other band, it was not possible to use the chords c...c'.../* or c'.../' + c" 



CHAP. XV. 



MEANING OF THE TONIC CHORD. 



29l 



to end a piece having the tonic c, although these chords are consonances as well as 
the preceding, because / is not an element of the compound tone c, and hence the 
closing chord would contain something which was not the tonic at all. It is here 
probably that we have to look for the reason why some medieval theoreticians 
wished to reckon the Fourth among the dissonances. But perfect consonance was 
not sufficient to make an interval available for the final chord. There was a second 
condition which the theoreticians did not clearly understand. The tones of the 
final chord had to be constituents of the compound tone of the tonic. This was 
the only case in which those tones could be employed. 

The Sixth of the tonic is as ill suited as the Fourth for use in the final chord. 
But the major Third can be used, because it occurs as the fifth partial tone of the 
tonic. Since the qualities of tone which are fit for music generally allow the fifth 
and sixth partial tone to be audible, but make the higher partials either entirely 
inaudible or at least very faint, and since, moreover, the seventh partial is dissonant IT 
with the fifth, sixth, and eighth, and is not used in the scale, the series of tones 
available for the closing chord terminates with the Third. Thus we actually find 
down to the beginning of the eighteenth century, that the final chord has either 
no Third, or only a major Third, even in tonal modes which contain only the minor 
and not the major Third of the tonic. To attain fulness, it was preferred to do 
violence to the scale by using the major Third in the closing chord. The minor 
Third of the tonic can never stand for a constituent of its compound tone. Hence 
it was originally as much forbidden as the Fourth and Sixth of the tonic. Be- 
fore a minor chord could be used to close a piece of music the feeling for harmony 
had to be cultivated in a new direction. 

The ear is the more satisfied with a closing major chord, the more closely the 
order of the tones used imitates the arrangement of the partial tones in a compound. 
Since in modem music the upper voice is most conspicuous, and hence has the 
principal melody, this voice must usuaUy finish with the tonic. Bearing this in f\ 
mind, we can use any of the following chords for the close (combinational tones 
are added as crotchets) : — 

12 3 4 5 




T T T 

In the chords 1 and 2 all the notes coincide with partials of C, and they 
therefore most closely resemble the compound tone G itself. And then closer 
positions of the chord can be substituted, provided they resemble the first byf 
having C for the fundamental tone as in 3, 4, 5. They still retain sufficient resem- 
blance to the compound tone of the low C to be used in its place. Moreover, the 
combinational tones, written as crotchets in 3, 4 and 5, assist in the effect of 
making the deeper partials of the compound C, at least faintly, audible. But the 
first two positions always give the most satisfactory close. The tendency towards 
a deep final tone in harmonic music is very characteristic, and I believe that the 
above is its proper explanation. There is nothing of the kind in the construction 
of homophonic melodies. It is peculiar to the bass of part music. 

Precisely in the same way that the tonic, when used as the bass of its major 
chord at the close, gives it a resemblance to its own compound tone, and is hence 
felt as the essential tone of the chord, all major chords sound best when the 
lowest tone of their closest triad position (No. 4. p. 219c) is made the bass. The 
other major chords in the scale are those in its Fourth and Fifth, and hence for 
the scale of C major, Are F + A^ - C and G + B^ - D. Hence if we make the 

u2 



292 REPLACEMENT OF COMPOUND TONES BY CHORDS. pabt ra. 

harmony of a piece of music to consist of these major chords only, each having 
its fundamental tone in the bass, the eififeot is almost that of a compound tonic in 
different qualities of tone passing into its two nearest related compound tones, the 
Fourth and Fifth. This makes the harmonisation transparent and definite, but it 
would be too uniform for long pieces. Modem popular tunes, songs and dances, 
are however, as is well known, constructed in this manner. The people, and 
generally persons of small musical cultivation, can be pleased only by extremely 
simple and intelligible musical relations. Now the relations of the tones are 
generally much easier to feel with distinctness in harmonised than in homophonic 
music. In the latter the feeling of relationship of tone depends solely on the 
sameness of pitch of two partials in two consecutive musical tones. But when we 
hear the second compound tone we can at most remember the first, and hence we 
are driven to complete the comparison by an act of memory. The consonance, on 
IT the other hand, gives the relation by an immediate act of sensation ; we are no 
longer driven to have recourse to memory ; we hear beats, or there is a roughness 
in the combined sound, when the proper relations are not preserved. Again, when 
two chords having a common note occur in succession, our recognition of their 
relationship does not depend upon weak upper partials, but upon the comparison of 
two independent notes, having the same force as the other notes of the corre- 
sponding chord. 

When, for example, I ascend from C to its Sixth A^, 1 recognise their mutual 
relationship in an unaccompanied melody, by the fact that e\, the fifth partial of 
0, which is already very weak, is identical with the third partial of A^. But if I 
accompany the A^ with the chord F + A^ - c,l hear the former c sound on power- 
fully in the chord, and know by immediate sensation that Ai and C are consonant, 
and that both of them are constituents of the compound tone F, 

When I pass melodically from to i^^ or D, I am obliged to imagine a kind of 
f mute G between them, in order to recognise their relationship, which is of the 
second degree. But if I audibly sustain the note G while the others are sounded, 
their common relationship becomes really sensible to my ear. 

Habituation to the tonal relations so evidently displayed in harmonic music, 
has had an indisputable influence on modern musical taste. Unaccompanied 
songs no longer please us ; they seem poor and incomplete. But if merely the 
twanging of a guitar adds the fundamental chords of the key, and indicates the 
harmonic relations of the tones, we are satisfied. Again, we cannot fail to see 
that the clearer perception of tonal relationship in harmonic music has greatly 
increased the practicable variety in the relations of tones, by allowing those which 
are less marked to be freely used, and has also rendered possible the construction 
of long musical pieces which require powerful links to connect their parts into one 
whole. 

The closest and simplest relation of the tones is reached in the major mode, 

^ when all the tones of a melody are treated as constituents of the compound tone 

of the tonic, or of the Fifth above or the Fifth below it. By this means all the 

relations of tones are reduced to the simplest and closest relation existing in 

any musical system — that of the Fifth. 

The relation of the chord of the dominant G to that of the tonic C, is some- 
what different from that of the chord of the subdominant F to the tonic chord. 
When we pass from G + E^- GtoG + B^- dvfe use a compound tone, G, which 
is already contained in the first chord, and is consequently properly prepared, while 
at the same time such a step leads us to those degrees of the scale which are most 
distant from the tonic, and have only an indirect relationship with it. Hence this 
passage forms a distinct progression in the harmony, which is at once well assured 
and properly based. It is quite different with the passage from C + E^- G to 
F -{• A^ - c. The compound tone F is not prepared in the first chord, and it has 
therefore to be discovered and struck. Hence the justification of this passage as 
correct and closely related, is not Qomplete until the step is actually made and it is 



■■ 



CHAP. XV. 



HARMONY OF THE MAJOR MODE. 



293 



felt that the chord of F contains no tones which are not directly related to the tonic 
C. In the passage from the chord of C to that of F^ therefore, we miss that distinct 
and well-assured progression which marked the passage from the chord of to that 
of G, But as a compensation, the progression from the chord of to that of F 
has a softer and calmer kind of beauty, due, perhaps, to its keeping within tones 
directly related to the tonic C. Popular music, however, favours the other passage 
from the tonic to the Fifth above (hence called the dominant of the key), and many 
of the simpler popular songs and dances consist merely of an interchange of tonic 
and dominant chords. Hence also the common harmonicon (accordion, German 
concertina), which is arranged for them, gives the tonic chord on opening the 
bellows, and the dominant chord on closing them. The Fifth below the tonic is 
called the «z^&dominant of the key. Its chord is seldom introduced at all into usual 
popular melodies, except, perhaps, once near the close, to restore the equilibrium 
of the harmony, which had chiefly inclined towards the dominant. 1? 

When a section of a piece of music terminates with the passage of the dominant 
into the tonic chord, musicians call the close a complete cadence. We thus return from 
the tones most distantly related to the tonic, to the tonic itself, and, as befits a close, 
make a distinct passage from the remotest parts of the scale to the centre of the 
system itself. If, on the other hand, we close by passing from the subdominant to 
the tonic chord, the result is called an imperfect or plagal cadence. The tones of 
the subdominant triad are all directly related to the tonic, so that we are already 
close upon the tonic before we pass over to it. Hence the imperfect cadence 
corresponds to a much quieter return of the music to the tonic chord, and the 
progression is much less distinct than before. 

In the complete cadence the chord of the tonic follows that of the dominant, 
but to preserve the equilibrium of the system in relation to the subdominant, its 
chord is made to precede that of the dominant as in 1 or 2. 

1 2 U 

I I I 

- Eg=if1--gz -.IZQ-J 




J-r 






lE^E 



-«- 



■&- 






-t&- 



■^ 



f 



g [I 

5E3 



-p 
I 

This succession really forms the complete close, by bringing all the tones of the 
whole scale together again, and thus in conclusion collecting and fixing every part 
of the key. 

The major mode, as we have seen, permits the requisitions of tonality to be 

most easily and completely united with harmonic completeness. Every tone of its 

scale can be employed as a constituent of the musical tone of the tonic, the domi- IT 

nant, or the subdominant, because these fundamental tones of the mode are also 

fundamental tones of major chords. This is not equally the case in the other 

ancient tonal modes. 

major 



1. Majob mode^ 



r ^\ 

f + a^ - c + e^ - g + bi - d 



major 



major 



major 



2. Mode of the 

FOUBTH * 



f + a^ - c -{- e^ - g - b^\^ + d 



major 



mmor 



* [Of course when the modes are thus are all altered, and become those in footnote 
reduced to harmonic combinations, the tones to p. 274c. See also App. XX. sect. E. arts. 9 
of the old modes, as given in footnote to p. 268c, and 10. — Translator.] 



294 AMBIGUITY OF THE MINOR CHORD. part iil 

f minor 

MINOR Seventh* l f + a, - c ^ e^\^ + g - h^\^ •^• d 



4. Mode of the 



f 



major mmor 

minor 



MINOR Third * ' f ^ ai]^ + c - e^\^ + g - h^\) -k- d 

{minor mode) I ^ 



minor minor 

minor 



5. Mode of the 



MINOR Sixth* \ ^> - ^'b + / - a^\> ^ c - e^\> + g 



~v~ 



mmor minor 

In the minor chords, the Third does not belong to the compound tone of its funda- 
H mental note, and hence cannot appear as a constituent of its quality ; so that the 
relation of all the parts of a minor chord to the fundamental note is not so im- 
mediate as that for the major chord, and this is a source of difficulty in the final 
chord. For this reason we find almost all popular dance and song music written 
in the major mode f ; indeed, the minor mode forms a rare exception. The people 
must have the clearest and simplest intelligibility in their music, and this can only 
be furnished by the major mode. But there was nothing like this predominance of 
the major key in homophonic music. For the same reason the harmonic accom- 
paniment of chorales in major keys was developed with tolerable completeness as 
early as the sixteenth century, so that many of them correspond with the cultivated 
musical taste of the present day ; but the harmonic treatment of the minor and 
the other ecclesiastical modes was still in a very unsettled condition, and strikes 
modem ears as very strange. 

In a major chord o + ^i - ^, we may regard both g and e^ as constituents of the 
^ compound tone of c, but neither c nor g as constituents of the compound tone of e^ 
and neither c nor e^ as constituents of the compound tone of g,\ Hence the major 
chord c + «! - gf is completely unambiguous, and can be compared only with the 
compound tone of c, and consequently c is the predominant tone in the chord, its 
root J or, in Rameau's language, its fundamental bass ; and neither of the other two 
tones in the chord has the slightest claim to be so considered. 

In the minor chord c - 6^(7 + ^, the ^ is a constituent of the compound tones of 
both c and e^|>. Neither e^|> nor c occurs in either of the other two compound 
tones 0, g. Hence it is clear that g at least is a dependent tone. But, on the other 
hand, this minor chord can be regarded either as a compound tone of c with an 
added e^\} or as a compound tone of e^\} with an added c. Both views are enter- 
tained at different times, but the first usually prevails. If we regard the chord as 
the compound tone of c, we find g for its third partial, while the foreign tone e^\f 
only occupies the place of the weak fifth partial e^. But if we regarded the chord 
«r as a compound tone of e^j^, although the weak fifth partial g would be properly repre- 
sented, the stronger third partial, which ought be h^\p, is replaced by the foreign 
tone c. Hence in modern music we usually find the minor chord c - 6^[> + ^ treated 
as if its root or fundamental bass were c, so that the chord appears as a some- 
what altered and obscured compound tone of 0. But the chord also occurs in the 
'position e^b + gr...c (or better still as e^|> +(/... c^) even in the key of jB^b major, as a 
substitute for the chord of the subdominant e^^, Eameau then calls it the chord of 
the great Sixth [in English * added Sixth '], and, more correctly than most modem 
theoreticians, regards e^^ as its fundamental bass.g 

* [See p. 293, note.] t [This remark does not apply to old English music. — Translator. '^ 
J [Taking, only six partials, we have for — §[The scale of B^^ major has the chords 



Compoand Tones 
C 



Simple Partial Tonas c^i> + gf-6'(^ + d-/» + a-c»; hence, regarding 

12 3 4 5 6 the chord as made up of the notes of this 

C c g c* e\ g' scale, it would be c^ \e^^ + g, which is not a 

£, e, 6j e\ g'jib\ minor chord at all, like c-e^^ + g, because it 

O g d' g' b\ d" has a Pythagorean in place of a just minor 

^ib^^b b^b ^^'bO' *^'b- Third. It was only tempered intonation which 

— Translator.'] confused the two cases. Attention will be 



CHAP. XV. AMBIGUITY OF THE MINOR CHORD. 295 

When it is important to guide the ear in selecting one or other of these two 
meanings of the minor chord, the root intended may be emphasised by giving it a 
low position or by throwing several voices upon it. The low position of the root 
allows such other tones as could be fitted into its compound tone, to be considered 
directly as its partials, whereas the low compound tone itself cannot be considered 
as the partial of another much higher tone. In the first half of last century, when 
the minor chord was first used as a dose, composers endeavoured to give prominence 
to the tonic by increasing the loudness of the tonic note in comparison with its 
minor Third. Thus in Handel's oratorios, when he concludes with a minor chord, 
most of the conspicuous vocal and instrumental parts are concentrated on the tonic, 
while the minor Third is either touched by one voice alone, or merely by the ac- 
companying pianoforte or organ. The cases are much rarer where in minor keys he 
gives only two voices to the tonic in the closing chord, and one to its Fifth and 
another to its Third, which is his rule in major modes. ^ 

When the minor chord appears in its second subordinate signification, as 
e^\}+g..,c with the root e^|^, this fact is shewn partly by the position of 6^|> in the 
bass, and partly by its close relationship to the tonic b^\^. Modern music even 
makes this interpretation of the chord still clearer by adding b^\^ as the Fifth of e^b, 
so that the chord becomes dissonant in the form e^\^ -^g + b^\^,..c\* 

The disinclination of older composers to close with a minor chord, may be 
explained partly by the obscuration of its consonance from false combinational tones, 
and partly because, as already mentioned, it does not give a mere quality of the 
tonic tone, but mixes foreign constituents with it. But in addition to the minor 
Third, which does not fit into the compound tone of the tonic, the combinational 
tones of a minor chord are equally foreign to it. As long as the feeling of tonality 
required a definite single compound tone for the connecting centre of the key, it 
was impossible to form a satisfactory close except by a reproduction of the pure 
compound tone of the tonic with no foreign admixture. It was not till a further H 
development of musical feeling had given the chords of the mode an independent 
significance, that the minor chord, notvdthstanding its possession of constituents 
foreign to the compound tone of the tonic, could be justified in its use as a close. 

Hauptmann f gives a different reason for avoiding the minor chord at the close. 
He asserts that before the chord of the dominant Seventh came into use, there was 
no voice-part suitable for falling into the minor Third of the tonic. Thus if the final 
cadence consisted of the chords G + B^-D, C-E^\}-\-G, the 2> of the first chord 
was the only one which could pass melodiously in E^\}y but this would have ap- 
peared like the passage of the leading note D in the key of E'^\f major into its tonic 
E^\}, and hence have called up the ifeeling of E^\^ major in lieu of C minor. We 
may admit that this relation of the leading note would have drawn the hearer's 
special attention to the two tones in question, and to a certain extent disturbed his 
recognition of the key, but yet it is clear that even without the help of this chord 
of the dominant Seventh, there were several ways for the voices to pass through ^ 
dissonances into the minor Third of the closing chord, if composers had felt any 
wish to do so. Thus in the plagal cadence 

c - e^\} + g ... c' 
F,„f -a^^^ + c' 

C - e^b + 9 '" ^' 
which is so often used on other occasions, the Fourth / could be made to descend 
to the minor Third e^\} without any inconvenience. Indeed, we find that when 

hereafter drawn to this important distinction, Observe that it is c^ which is now introduced 

see p. 299a. — Translator.] in the text, in place of c. If c is retained, 

* [Transposing the c^ the chord becomes thus c-e^\f + g~o% the chord is one of those 

c^ I ^*b+d^~^'b> ^ that we have a major chord chords of the Seventh considered in Chapter 

with the Sixth of its root added, that is, the XVI.— Translator.] 

subdominant of the key of /?•[> rendered dis- t Harmonik und Metrik, Leipzig, 1853, 

sonant by introducing c^ the Second of the p. 216. 
key, or the Sixth above the subdominant e^^. 



296 DEGREES OF RELATIONSHIP OF CHORDS. part hi. 

the chord of the dominant Seventh had actually come into use, and the Seventh F 
of the chord G+B^-D \ F ought by every right to have descended into the minor 
Third j^^l^ of the closing chord, musical pieces of the fifteenth century * avoid this 
progression, and make this Seventh F either ascend to the Fifth G^ or descend to 
the major Third E^ of the final chord, instead of to -B^b» its minor Third. This 
custom prevailed down to Bach's time. 

In Chapter XIII. (p. 249a) we characterised modem harmonic music, as con- 
trasted with medieval polyphony, by its development of a feeling for the independent 
significance of chords. In Palestrina, Gabrieli, and still more in Monteverde and the 
first composers of operas, we find the various degrees of harmoniousness in chords 
carefully used for the purposes of expression. But these masters are almost entirely 
without any feeling for the mutual relation of consecutive chords. These chords 
often follow one another by entirely unconnected leaps, and the only bond of union 
^is the scale, to which all their notes belong. 

The transformation which took place from the sixteenth to the beginning of the 
eighteenth century, may, I think, be characterised by the development of a feeling 
for the independent relationship of chords one to the other, and by the establish- 
ment of a central core, the tonic chord, round which wer6 grouped the whole of 
the consonant chords that could be formed out of the notes of the scale. For these 
chords there was a repetition of the same efifort which was formerly shewn in the 
construction of the scale, where interrelations of the tones were first grounded on 
a chain of intervals, and afterwards on a reference of each note to a central com- 
pound tone, the tonic. 

Two chords which have one or more tones in common will here be termed 
directly related. 

Chords which are directly related to the same chord will be here said to be 
related to each other in the second degree, 
H Thus c-^ei^g and g + bi-d are directly related, and so are c + Ci-g and a^ 
- c + «! ; but g + b^-d and a^-c + e^ are related only in the second degree. 

When two chords have two tones in common they are more closely related than 
when they have only one tone in common. Thus c + e^-g and a^-c + e^ are 
more closely related than c + e^-g and g+b^-d. 

The tonic chord of any tonal mode can of course only be one which more or 
less perfectly represents the compound tone of the tonic, that is, that major or 
minor chord of which the tonic is the root. The tonic note, as the connecting core 
of all the tones in a regularly constructed melody, must be heard on the first ac- 
cented part of a bar, and also at the close, so that the melody starts from it and 
returns to it ; the same is true for the tonic chord in a succession of chords. In 
both of these positions in the scale we require to hear the tonic note, accompanied 
not by any arbitrary chord, but only by the tonic chord, having the tonic note itself 
as its root. This was not the case even as late as the sixteenth century, as is seen 
f by the example on p. 247c taken from Palestrina. 

When the tonic chord is major, the domination of all the tones by the tonic 
note is readily reconciled with the domination of all the chords by the tonic chord, 
for as the piece begins and ends with the tonic chord, it also begins and ends at the 
same time with the pure unmixed compound tone of the tonic note. But when 
the tonic chord is minor, all these conditions cannot be so perfectly satisfied. We 
are obliged to sacrifice somewhat of the strictness of the tonality in order to admit 
the minor Third into the tonic chord at the beginning and end. At the com- 
mencement of the eighteenth century we find Sebastian Bach using minor chords 
at the end of his preludes, because these were merely introductory pieces, but not 
at the end of fugues and chorales, and at other complete closes. In Handel and even 
in the ecclesiastical pieces of Mozart, the close in a minor chord is used alternately 

* See an example in Anton Brumel, in will be found, ibid. p. 550, where the voices 
Forkel's Oeschichte der Musik^ vol. ii. p. 647. might have easily been led to the minor 
Another, with a plagal cadence by Joaquin, Third. 



CHAP. XV. MINOR CHORD IN THE CLOSE. 297 

with the close in a chord without any Third, or with the major Third. And the 
last composer cannot he accused of external imitation of old habits, for we find 
that in these usages they always observe the expression of the piece. When at the 
close of a composition in the minor mode, a major chord is introduced, it has the 
effect of a sudden and unexpected brightening up of the sadness of the minor key, 
producing a cheering, enlightening, and reconciling effect after the sorrow, grief, 
or restlessness of the minor. Thus a close in the major suits the prayer for the 
peace of the departed in the words, ' et lux perpetua luceat eis,' or the conclusion 
of the Confutatis maledictis, which runs thus : — 

Oro Bupplex et acclinis, 
Cor contritum quasi cinis ; 
Qere curam mei finis. 

But such a closing major chord is certainly somewhat startling for our present H 
musical feeling, even though its introduction may, at one time, add wondrous 
beauty and solemnity, or, at another, dart like a beam of hope into the gloom 
of deepest despair. If the restlessness remains to the last, as in the Dieis irae of 
Mozart's Bequieniy the minor chord, in which an unresolved disturbance exists, 
forms a fitting close. Mozart was wont to terminate ecclesiastical pieces of a less 
decided character with a chord that had no Third. There are many similar 
examples in Handel. Hence although both masters stood on the very same plat- 
form as modem musical feeling, and themselves gave, as it were, the finishing 
touch to the construction of the modern tonal system, they were not altogether 
strangers to the feeling which had prevented older musicians from using the minor 
Third of the tonic in the final chord. They followed no strict rule, however, but 
acted according to the expression and character of the piece and the sense of the 
words with which they had to close. 

Those tonal modes which furnish the greatest number of consonant chords^ 
related to one another or to the common chord, are best adapted for artistically 
connected harmonies. Since all consonant chords, when reduced to their closest 
position and simplest form, are triads consisting of a major and a minor Third, all 
the consonant chords of any key can be found by simply arranging them in order 
of Thirds, as in the following tables. The braces above and below connect the 
chords together. The ordinary round braces, which are placed above, point out 
minor chords ; the square braces below indicate major chords. The tonic chord 
is printed in capitals. 

1) Majob mode 



~^ <-^"^^^-^^^ r- 



di-f+a^-C + E^-G + b^-d 



2) Modb op the Fourth -r 




3) Mode of the minor Seventh 



"N /^ 



b\f + d,- f + a.- C - E^\f + G - b^'^ + d 
J I I ^1 I ^1 

4) Mode of the minor Third 



^ *- >/^ 



b\, + d^-f - a^\, + C - E*\, + G - b^\, + d 



5) Mode of the minob Sixth 



~N r > /^ 



*l> - <i'l> + / - a'b + C - J5?i[> + G - 6'i, 



298 



INTONATION OP THE INTERCALARY TONES. 



PART III. 



In this arrangement I have introduced the different intonations of the Second 
and Seventh of the key, which we found in the construction of the scales for 
homophonic music* But we observe that the chords directly related to the tonic 
chord contain every tone in the scale, excepting in the mode of the minor Sixth. 
The Second and Seventh of the tonic occxu: first in the chord of G, which is directly 
related to the tonic chord, and next in chords containing F, which are, however, not 
directly connected with the tonic chord. The supplementary tones of the scale 
which are related to the dominant thus acquire in harmonic music an important 
preponderance over those related to the subdominant. We must necessarily prefer 
direct to indirect relations for determining scalar degrees. Hence by confining 
ourselves to the chords which are directly related to the tonic chord, we obtain the 
following arrangement of the tonal modes : — f 



11 



1) Major modb 




-d 



2) Modb op the Fourth 



f+a^^C + E^-G-h^\^ + d 



3) Modb of the minor Seventh 



/ + a^ - C - j&^b + Q^ - *^ 



7 + d 



4) Mode of the minor Third 



/ - a^b -f C - ^^b + ^ - ^^ 



7 + d 



II 



5) Mode of the minor Sixth 



<i»b+/-«'l7 + <^--E?'b + ^- n 



A glance at this table shews that the major mode and mode of the minor Third 
{minor mode) possess the most complete and connected series of chords, so that 
these two are decidedly superior to the rest for harmonic purposes. This is also 
the reason which led to the preference given to them in modern music. 

And in this way we obtain a final settlement of the proper intonation of the 
supplementary tones of the scale, at least for the first four modes. Hauptmann, 
with whom I agree, considers the tone D alone to be the essential constituent of 
both the major and minor modes of C. This D forms an imperfect (Pythagorean) 
5[ minor Third with F, so that the chord D \ F+A^ must be considered as dissonant. J 
This chord thus intoned is in reality most decidedly dissonant to the ear. On the 
other hand, Hauptmann admits a major mode which reaches over to the sub- 
dominant, and uses D^ in place of D. I consider this conception to be a very 



* [These scales differ from those tran- 
scribed in pp. 29Sd and 294a, only in the addi- 
tion of the secondaiy forms of intercalary tones, 
d|, h\f, or b^\f, i^hich, in fact, imply modu- 
lations into adjacent modes, or else give 
a double and ambiguous character to each 
mode, as shewn on p. 277, footnote f, and by 
referring to the Duodenarium, App. XX. sect. 
E. art. 18, it will be seen that there is a real 
change of duodene, which always must happen 
when changes of a comma occur. — Trans- 
lator.] 

t [The first four are the same as in pp. 293d 
and 294d. The settlement in the text avoids 



the double modality alluded to in the last 
note, and fixes the modes in the meanings 
of App. XX. sect. E. art. 9, as 

(1) 1 C ma.ma.ma. 

(2) 1 C ma.ma.mi. 
(8) 1 C ma.mi.mi. 

(4) 1 C mi.mi.mi. 

(5) 8 A^\f ma.ma.ma. 

In the last scale it is more usual, however, to 
take bU in the place of &'|^, which makes the 
scale 6j,-d'|,4-/-a'|,-i-C-JS«l, + = 6 F 
mi.mi.mi. But temperament obscures all 
these differences. — JVanslator.] 

X [See p. 295d, note *,— Translator.] 



CHAP. XV. HARMONIC DIFFERENCE BETWEEN MAJOR AND MINOR. 299 

happy expression of the real state of things. When the consonant chord 
D^-F+A^ occurs in any composition it is impossible to return immediately, 
without any transitional tone, to the tonic chord C + E^- G. The result would 
be felt as an harmonic leap without adequate notice. Hence it is a correct 
expression of the state of affairs to look upon the use of this chord as the 
beginning of a modulation beyond the boundaries of the key of G major, that is, 
beyond the limits of direct relationship to its tonic chord. In the minor mode 
this would correspond to a modulation into the chord of D^\} + F-^ A^\}. Of course 
in the modem tempered intonation the consonant chord D^-F-k-Ay^ is not dis- 
tinguished from the dissonant D \ F+A^^ and hence the feeling of musicians has 
not been sufficiently cultivated to make them appreciate this difference on which 
Hauptmann insists.* 

As regards the other supplementary tone b^\^ which may occur in the chords 
B^\}+g- b^\} and g-b^\} + d'fl have already shewn in the last chapter that even in f 
homophonic music it is almost always replaced by b^. Harmonic considerations 
likewise favour the use of b^, independently of melodic progression. It has been 
already shewn that when the two tones of the scale which are but distantly 
related to the tonic, make their appearance as constituents of the dominant, they 
enter into close relatioki to the tonic. Now this can only be the case with the 
compound tones of the major chord g + bi-d, and not with those of the minor 
chord gf - fe^b + ^« Considered independently, the tones b^\^ and d are quite as 
closely related to c as the tones b^ and d. But by regarding the two latter as 
constituents of the compound tone g, we connect them with c by the same 
closeness of relationship that g is itself connected with c. Hence, in all modern 
music, wherever 6^|> might occur as a constituent of the dominant chord of the key 
of c minor, or of some dissonant chord replacing the dominant chord, it is usual 
to change it into b^, and otherwise to use either b^\} or 6^, according to the melodic 
progression, but more frequently the latter, as I have already remarked when H 
treating of the construction of minor scales. It is this systematic use of the major 
Seventh i^ in place of the minor Seventh b^\} of the key which now distinguishes 
the modem minor mode from the ancient Hypodoric.f or the mode of the minor 
Third. Here s^in some part of the consistency of the scale is sacrificed in 
order to bind the harmony closer together. 

The chain of consonant chords in the mode of the minor Third is certainly 
impaired when that mode is transformed into our minor by the introduction of b^. 
In place of the chain 



~N/ S/- 



I I • 



our minor furnishes only 



"^ /^ 



f - a^\, + C - E^}, + G + b.- d H 

I I I 



which has one triad less. But the composer is at liberty to alternate the two 

tones &^b ^^^ ^r 

The introduction of the leading note bi into the key of c minor generated a new 
difficulty in the complete closing cadence of this key. When the chord g + bi-dis 
followed by the chord c - e^l^ + ^, the first being a perfectly harmonious major chord, 
and the latter an obscurely harmonious minor chord, the defect in the harmonious- 



* [This was referred to in p. 294<2, note §. be tra.ced on the Duodenarium. — Translator J] 
See App. XX. sect. E. art. 26, example of the f [Hypodorio, also called Eolic, p.268d,foot- 

use of duodenals. It is a real, though tern- note No. 6, but here the harmonic alteration 

porary modulation into a new duodene, one of that mode is meant as in p. 274« footnote 

Fifth lower. But for D j F+Ai we might use No. 3. This confusion is here regular and in- 

D-F^ + Ay which is agam a modulation into tentional. — Trafislator,] 
a new duodene, one Fifth higher. This should 



300 HARMONIC DIFFERENCE BETWEEN MAJOR AND MINOR, part in. 

ness of the latter is made much more evident by the contrast. But it is precisely 
in the final chord that perfect consonance is essential to satisfy the feeling of the 
hearer. Hence this close could not become satisfactory until the chord of the 
dominant Seventh had been invented, which changed the dominant consonance 
into a dissonance. 

The preceding explanation shews that when we try to institute a close con- 
nection among all the chords peculiar to a mode similar to the close connection 
among the tones of the scale (that is, when we require all the consonant triads 
in the harmonic tissue to be related to one of their number, the tonic triad, in a 
manner analogous to that in which the notes of the scale are related to one of 
their number, the tonic tone), there are onl;^ two tonal modes, the major and 
minor, which properly satisfy such conditions of related tones and related chords. 

The major mode fulfils the two conditions of chordal relationship and tonal 
relationship in the most perfect manner. It has four triads which are immediately 
^ related to the tonic chord 



f+a^^C + E^-G + b^-d 



Its harmonisation can be so conducted (indeed, in popular pieces which must be 
readily intelligible, it is so conducted), that all tones appear as constituents of the 
three major chords of the system, those of the tonic, dominant, and subdominant. 
These major chords, when their roots lie low, appear to the ear as reinforcements 
of the compound tones of the tonic, dominant, and subdominant, which tones are 
themselves connected by the closest possible relationship of Fifths. Hence in 
this mode everything can be reduced to the closest musical relationship in existence. 
And since the tonic chord in this case represents the compound tone of the tonic 
^ immediately and completely, the two conditions — predominance of the tonic tone 
and of the tonic chord — go hand in hand, without the possibility of any contra- 
diction, or the necessity of making any changes in the scale. 

The major mode has, therefore, the character of possessing the most complete 
melodic and harmonic consistency, combined with the greatest simplicity and 
clearness in all its relations. Moreover, its predominant chords being major, are 
distinguished by full unobscured harmoniousness, when such positions are selected 
for them as do not introduce inappropriate combinational tones. 

The major scale is purely diatonic, and possesses the ascending leading note of 
the major Seventh, whence it results that the tone most distantly related to the 
tonic is brought into closest melodic connection with it. 

The three predominant major chords furnish tones sufficient to produce two 
minor chords, which are closely related to them, and can be employed to diversify 
the succession of major chords. 
^ The miliar mode is in many respects inferior to the major. The chain of chords 
for its modern form is — 



/-a> 



~N/- 



[, + C - B'l, + G + 6. - d 
III 



Minor chords do not represent the compound tone of their root as well as the 
major chords ; their Third, indeed, does not form any part of this compound tone. 
The dominant chord alone * is major, and it contains the two supplementary tones 
of the scale. Hence when these appear as constituents of the dominant triad, and 
therefore of the compound tone of the dominant, they are connected with the tonic 
by the close relationship of Fifths. On the other hand, the tonic and subdominant 
triads do not simply represent the compound tones of the tonic and subdominant 
notes, but ar^ accompanied by Thirds which cannot be reduced to the close relation- 

* [That is, among the characteristic chords. text, contain the tones of one major chord, 
The two minor chords, as is shewn in the a^^ + c-e^\^. — Translator,] 



CHAP. XV. HARMONIC DIFFERENCE BETWEEN MAJOR AND MINOR. 301 

ship of Fifths. The tones of the minor scale can therefore not be harmonised in 
such a way as to link them with the tonic note by so close a relationship as in the 
major mode. 

The conditions of tonality cannot be so simply reconciled with the predominance 
of the tonic chord as in the major mode. When a piece concludes with a minor 
chord, we hear, in addition to the compound tone of the tonic note, a second 
compound tone which is not a constituent of the first. This accounts for the long 
hesitation of musical composers respecting the admissibility of a minor chord in 
the close. 

The predominant minor chords have not the clearness and unobscured har- 
moniousness of the major chords, because they are accompanied by combinational 
tones which do not fit into the chord. 

The minor scale contains an interval a^[>...6|, which exceeds a whole Tone in 
the diatonic scale,* and answers to the numerical ratio 75 : 64 [= 274 cents]. To If 
make the minor scale melodic it must have a dififerent form in descending from what 
it has in ascending, as mentioned in the last chapter. 

The minor mode, therefore, has no such simple, clear, intelligible consistency as 
the major mode ; it has arisen, as it were, from a compromise between the different 
conditions of the laws of tonality and the interlinking of harmonies. Hence it is also 
much more variable, much more inclined to modulations into other modes. 

This assertion tbat the minor system is much less consistent than the major, 
will be combated by many modern musicians, just as they have contested the 
assertion already made by me, and by other physicists before me, that minor triads 
are generally inferior in harmoniousness to major triads. There are many eager 
assurances of the contrary in recent books on the theory of harmony.f But the 
history of music, the extremely slow and careful development of the minor system 
in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, the guarded use of the minor close by 
Handel, the partial avoidance of a minor close even by Mozart, — all these seem to ^ 
leave no doubt that the artistic feeling of the great composers agreed with our 
conclusions.^ To this must be added the varied use of the major and minor 
Seventh, and the major and minor Sixth of the scale, the modulations rapidly 
introduced and rapidly changing, and finally, but very decisively, popular custom. 
Popular melodies can contain none but clear transparent relations. Look through 
collections of songs now preferred by those classes among the Western nations which 
have often an opportunity of hearing harmonic music, as students, soldiers, 
artisans. There are scarcely one or two per cent, in minor keys, and those are 
mostly old popular songs which have descended from the times of homophonic 
music. It is also characteristic that, as I have been assured by an experienced 



* [The interval is so strange, when unacoom- 
panied, that if it had to be taken merely as an 
interval, a^\f 2746,, a singer would probably fail. 
But the a'[^ is taken as the minor Thira of/ 
with ease, and the b^ is taken as the leading 
note to c', with equal ease, so that the per- 
fectly unmelodic and inharmonic interval a^^ 
274^1 never comes into consideration at all. 
To get rid of it, the subdominant is often taken 
major, producing the chords of 1 C ma. mi. ma., 
App. XX. sect. E. art. 10, III., which makes the 
scale c204 dll2 e>[^l82/204</182 a,204 5.112 c', 
and this differs from the major only by having 
e^^ in place of ^j. In many pianoforte in- 
struction books this is given as the only form 
of the ascending minor. Mr. Gurwen (Standard 
Course, p. 86) says that this major Sixth 
* ascending is very difficult to sing,' and 'has 
a hard and by no means pleasant effect,* and 
points out that it leads singers to forget the 
key, and in such a phrase as g % 6| c' d' e'^\^, the 
pupils will sing e'l instead ote'^^y ; and even in 
singing such a passage asy Oj &j c' g, instead of 



falling upon the same note with which they 
began, will take e\, the major Third of c'. 
Hence the difficulty is not avoided but in- 
creased by introducing the ambiguity of the 
major key, into which this is a real modulation ^ 
from g onwards. — TrattsUUor.] 

t [Can this be due to temperament ? The 
sharp equally tempered major Third of 400 
cents is worse of its kind than the flat equally 
tempered minor Third of 800 cents, which 
approaches close to 16 : 19 = 298 cents, an 
interval which many like, and which may be 
tried as c'" : ^^e"''\y on theUarmonical. — TranS' 
laior,] 

t [These composers played in mean tone 
temperament (App. XX. sect. A. art. 16), in 
which the minor Third of 810 cents was much 
rougher than the equally tempered one of 800 
cents, having much slower beats. Possibly 
this difference in the modes of tempering the 
minor Third, may have led to the difference of 
opinion mentioned in the text. — Translator,] 



302 



HARMONISATION OF THE TONAL MODES. 



PART lU. 



teacher of singing, pupils of only moderate musical talent have much more difficulty 
in hitting the minor than the major Third. 

But I am by no means of opinion that this character depreciates the minor 
system. The major mode is well suited for all frames of mind which are completely 
formed and clearly understood, for strong resolve, and for soft and gentle or even- 
for sorrowing feelings, when the sorrow has passed into the condition of dreamy 
and yielding regret. But it is quite unsuited for indistinct, obscure, unformed 
frames of mind, or for the expression of the dismal, the dreary, the enigmatic, the 
mysterious, the rude, and whatever ofifends against artistic beauty ; — and it is pre- . 
cisely for these that we require the minor mode, with its veiled harmoniousness, 
its changeable scale, its ready modulation, and less intelligible basis of construc- 
tion. The major mode would be an unsuitable form for such purposes, and 
hence the minor mode has its own proper artistic justification as a separate 
11 system. 

The harmonic peculiarities of the modem keys are best seen by comparing them 
with the harmonisation of the other ancient tonal modes. 

Majob Mode. 

Among the melodic tonal modes the Lydian of the Greeks (the ecclesiastical 
Ionic [p. 274, note No. 1]), in agreement with our major, is the only one which has 
an ascending leading note in the form of a major Seventh. * The four others had 
originally and naturally only minor Sevenths, which even in the later periods of the 
middle ages began to give place to major Sevenths, in order that the Seventh of the 
scale, which was in itself so loosely connected with the tonic, might be more closely 
united to it by becoming the leading note to the tonic at the close. 

Mode op the Fourth. 

IT The mode of the Fourth (the Greek Ionic, and ecclesiastical Mixolydian) is 
principally distinguished from the major mode by its minor Seventh. By merely 
changing this into the major we obliterate the difference between them. Taking 
G as the tonic the chain of chords in the unaltered nKhle are as on p. 298^, No. 2, 



/-hai-C + ^i-G-dib + ^ 



If we attempt to form a complete cadence in this mode, as in the following 
examples 1 and 2, they will sound dull from want of the leading note, even when 
the dominant chord is extended to a chord of the Seventh ^ ~ &^|; + ^ | /, as in 2. 



1[0]* 



2[C] 



3[C] 




The second example, in which the leading note h^^ lies uppermost, is even duller 
than the first example, in which that note 6^|> is more concealed. The b^\f in these 
examples has a very uncertain sound. It is not closely enough related to the 
tonic, it is not part of the compound tone of the dominant note g, it is not suffi- 
ciently close in pitch to serve as a leading note to the tonic, and it has no tendency 



y * [The [C] is the duodenal of App. XX. posed to admit of their being played on the 
sect. E. art. 26, shewing the exact pitch of all Harmonical.— 2VaYM^<or.] 
the notes. These examples have been trans- 



CHAP. XV. HARMONISATION OF THE TONAL MODES. 303 

to push on to the tonic. Hence when the older composers wished to distinguish 
pieces written in the mode of the Fourth from those in the major mode, hy their 
close, they employed the imperfect or plagaJ cadence, as in example 3. And as 
such a cadence wants the decisive progression required for a close, the sluggishness 
previously caused hy the absence of a leading tone ceases to be striking.* 

In the course of a piece written in this tonal mode, the leading note b^ may of 
course be used in ascending passages, provided the minor Seventh b^\} is employed 
often enough in descending passages. But the effect of the mode is destroyed 
when an essential tone of the scale is changed at the close. Hence pieces in the 
mode of the Fourth sound like pieces in a major mode which have a decided incli- 
nation to modulate into the major mode oif the subdominantf For reasons 
already given, transition to the subdominant appears to be less active than trans!-' 
tion to the dominant. This tonal mode has also no decided progression at the 
close, whereas major chords, of which the tonic is one, predominate in it owing to f 
their greater harmoniousness. The mode of the Fourth is consequently as soft 
and harmonious as the major mode, but it wants the powerful forward impetus of 
major movement. This agrees with the character assigned to it by Winterfeld.J 
He describes the ecclesiastical Ionic (major) mode, as a scale which ' strictly self- 
contained and founded on the clear and bright major triad — a naturally harmonious 
and satisfactory fusion of different tones, — also bears the stamp of bright and 
cheerful satisfaction '. On the other hand, the ecclesiastical Mixolydian (mode of 
the Fourth) is a scale ' in which every part by sound and movement hastens to the 
.source of its fundamental tone ' (that is, to the major mode of its subdominant), 
' and this gives it a yearning character in addition to the former cheerful satisfaction, 
not unlike to the Christian yearning for spiritual regeneration and redemption, and 
return of primitive innocency, though softened by the bliss of love and faith'. 

Mode of the minob Seventh. 

The mode of the minor Seventh (Greek Phrygian [p. 274, note. No. 4] eccle- 
siastical Doric) has a minor chord on c as the tonic, and originally another on g 
as the dominant, while it has a major chord on its subdominant /, and this last 
chord distinguishes the mode from the mode of the minor Third (Eolic [p. 294e2, 
note, No. 3]) ; thus 



I I I 



Both of these modes of the minor Seventh and minor Third may, without 
destroying their character, change the minor Seventh 6'|> into a leading note h^, 
and our minor mode is a fusion of both. The ascending minor scale belongs 
to the mode of the minor Seventh, in which the leading note is used, and the IT 
descending to the mode of the minor Third. But when the mode of the minor 
Seventh admits the leading note, its chain of chords reduces to the three essential 
chords of the scale 

f-\-a^-C-E^^7G'\-h^-d 
III 



This tonal mode has all the character of a minor, but the transition to the chord 
of the subdominant has a brighter effect than in the normal minor, where the sub- 



* [These can be played on the Harmonical. with its subdominant f g a^ 6[^ c' d\ e\ I'. — 

— Translator.'] Translator,"] 

t [This inclination seems to arise from the X Johawies Qdbrieli %ind sein Zeitalter, 

tempered confusion of b^]^ d with b\f d^ so that vol. i. p. 87. 
the scale cdcif g a^ h^^ g' becomes confused 



304 



HARMONISATION OF THE TONAL MODES. 



PART m. 



dominant chord . is also minor. On forming the complete cadence both dominant 
and subdominant chords are major, while the tonic remains minor. This has of 
course an unpleasant effect in* the close, because it makes the final chord obscurer 
than either of the other two principal chords. Hence it is necessary to introduce 
strong dissonances into these two chords, to restore the balance. But if we follow 
the old composers and make the final chord major, we give the closing cadence of 
this mode an unmistakably major character. As in ecclesiastical modes it is 
always allowed to change A^ into A^\f, which would change the subdominant 
chord of the mode of the minor Seventh into a minor chord ."^ we can protect the 
mode of the minor Seventh from confusion with the major mode in its final 
cadence, but then again it will entirely coincide with the old minor cadence. 

Sebastian Bach introduces the major Sixth of the tonic, which is peculiar to 
this tonal mode, into other chords for the closing cadence, and thus avoids the 
^1 major triad on the subdominant. He very usually employs the major Sixth as the 
Fifth of the chord of the Seventh on the Second of the scale,f as in the following 
examples. No. 1 is the conclusion of the chorale : Was mein Gott will, das 
gescheh'allzeitj in the St. Matthew Passion-Music. No. 2 is the conclusion of the 
hymn Veni redemptor gentium, at the end of the cantata : Schwingt freudig Euch 
empor zu den erhabeiien Sternen, In both the tonic is h^, the major Sixth g^X 



Ex. 1. [B^.] 



[E,:\ [B,,] 



V^M [By] 




* [In the original the scale was g + b^-D 
-F^ + ^ + CjJ-c in order that it might run 
from D to d; and hence the statement was 
that it is allowable to change B into B^'^, 
But in order to keep to the same notes as 
were used previously, and to allow of the 
scale being played on the Harmonica!, I have 
transposed it, and hence have had to make 
the same change here. The result is precisely 
the same, merely meaning that the Seventh 
might be taken minor. — Translator.'] 

t [In the scale f+a^-c-e^\)-\-g + h.-d, 

Oj is the major Sixth of the tonic c and a the 

Second. The chord of the Seventh on the 

(T Second ot the scale is therefore ^+/i$- a | c, 



hence if S. Bach makes this Fifth a agree with 
the major Sixth of the scale o^, he is thinking 
in tempered music. When just intonation is 
restored, this occasions a restless modulation 
as shewn by the duodenals which I have in- 
troduced over the following examples. — Trans- 
lator,'] 

% [The notes in the staff notation are the 
usual tempered scale, but the inserted duode- 
nals convert them into just notes, on the prin- 
ciple of App. XX. sect. E. art. 26. The tonic is 
taken as B^ in order to be within the duodene 
of C, and hence the subdominant is E^ and the 
dominant F^^, giving the three duodenes: 
In Ex. 1 the \B{\ indicates that the first two 



Subdominant E^ 

C El G.S 
F A, C4 



Tonic B, 

A 04 £4 
D ^l^^ 

C E, 0.4 



Dominant FM 

E G|B4 
A Cjj^ eI 

D f4a4 

O B, D4 



chords are in the duodene of B^. Then [Ej] 
shews that the next two chords are in the 
duodene of E^, The difference relates 10 the 
chords with A in the first case and A^ in the 
second. But the next pair of chords return to 
the duodene of B^, which remains till the last 
bar, when the notes are in the duodene of i*\J. 
This is rendered necessary by the chord of the 
Seventh on C,jf the second of tlie scale, the 
Fifth of which is G'jfi and not GJf^f which is the 
Sixth of the scale of B^. That is, it is CjJ ■+ i^J.Jf 



- Oj^ I Bj. This is, however, only a temporary 
modulation, and the piece ends in the duodene 
of By. In Ex. 2 the modulations are only i^i, 
FJI^ and B^, that into F^t being necessitated by 
th e same chord as before. If these modu laiions 
were not taken, but the duodene of B^ were 
persisted in throughout, frightful dissonances 
(much worse than the old * wolves *\ would 
ensue from the imperfect Fifths E^A and CA 
0.jL — Translator.] 



CHAP. XV. 



HARMONISATION OF THE TONAL MODES. 



305 



2. [B,.] [F,jj^] 




There are many similar examples. He evidently evades a regular close. 

Minor- Major Mode. 

Modern composers, when they wish to insert a tonal mode which lies between f 
Major and Minor, to be used for a few phrases or cadences, have generally preferred 
giving the minor chord of the mode to the subdominant and not to the tonic. 
Hauptmann calls this the minor-major mode {MolUDurtoncvrt)* Its chain of 
chords is — 



/-aib + C+Bi-G + fei-d 



This gives a leading note in the dominant chord, and a complete final cadence in 
the DQiajor chord of the tonic, while the minor relation of the subdominant chord 
remains undisturbed. This minor-major mode is at all events much more suitable 
for harmonisation than the old mode of the minor Seventh. But it is unsuitable 
for homophonic singing, unless in the ascending scale a^|> is- changed into a^ 
because the voice would otherwise have to make the complicated step a^ [7 . . . Z^^ [ = 274 
cents, see p. 301 a, d\ The old modes were derived from homophonic singing, for f 
which the mode of the minor Seventh is perfectly well fitted, as we know from its 
being still used as our ascending minor scale.f 

Mode of the Minor Sixth. 

While the mode of the minor Seventh oscillates indeterminately between major 
and minor without admitting of any consistent treatment, the mode of the minor 
Sixth (Greek Doric [p. 274e2', note No. 7], ecclesiastical Phrygian), with its minor 
Second, has a much more peculiar character, which distinguishes it altogether from 
all other modes. This minor Second stands in the same melodic connection to the 
tonic as a leading note would do, but it requires a descending progression. Hence 
for descending passages this mode possesses the same melodic advantages as the 
major mode does for ascending passages. The minor Second has the more distant 
relationship with the tonic, due entirely to the subdominant. The mode cannot 7 
form a dominant chord without exceeding its limits. If we keep c as the tonic, 
the chain of chords is 



b\} - d'b +/- a^b + C - E'\^^G- fe^b X 

I 



In this case the chords b\^ - d^\^ +/ and d^\^ +/- a^^ are not directly related to the 
tonic. The tone d^\} cannot enter into any consonant chord which is directly 
related to the tonic. But since d^\} is the characteristic minor Second of the mode^ 
such chords cannot well be avoided, not even in the cadence. Although, then, 



* [It is 1 C mi.ma.ma. of App. XX. sect. £. 
art. 9. — Translator,] 

t [After the introduotion of the leading note 
to form a majordominant chord. — Translator.'] 

^[The notes have been transposed in 
order to keep the same tonio chord C-E^]y\-G. 



Observe that both Sevenths 6k and b^\f are in- 
troduced. If &*|^ be omitted, the system of 
chords is that of 5 ^ mi.mi.mi. On the Har- 
monical, on account of the absence of 6k, it is 
necessary to use the system of chords o^ -/+ 
Oi - c + JSi - G + Bj - d.— Translator.] 

X 



306 



REMNANTS OF OLD TONAL MODES. 



PART m. 



there is a close relationship between the consecutive links of the chain of chords^ 
some of its indispensable terms are only distantly related to the tonic. Moreover, 
in the course of a piece in this mode, it will always be necessary to form the 
dominant chord g + b^-d* although it contains two tones foreign to the original 
mode, as otherwise we could not prevent the prevalence of the impression that / 
is the tonic and/-a^|7 + c the tonic chord. It follows, therefore, that the rtiode of 
the minor Sixth must be still less consistent in its harmonisation and still more 
loosely connected than the minor mode, although it admits of very consistent 
melodic treatment. It contains three essential minor chords, namely the tonic 
c-e^\} + gf the subdominant / - a^|^ + c, and the chord which contains the two tones 
slightly related to the tonic 6[> - (2^|> +/. It is exactly the reverse of the major 
mode, for whereas that mode proceeds towards the dominant, this mode proceeds 
towards the subdominant. 



■ Major: ^+a, -C + -EJ, -G + b.-d 

Mode of I I I 

minor Sixth : 6b - d^b +/ - a^b + - E^b + G^ 

For harmonisation the difference of the two cases is, first, that the related tones 
introduced into the scale by the subdominant /, namely b\^ and d^b, are not 
partials of the compound tone of the subdominant, whereas tones b^ and d, which 
are introduced by the dominant, are some of the partials of the tonic; and, 
secondly, that the tonic chord always lies on the dominant side of the tonic tone. 
Hence in the harmonic connection, the tones b^ and d^\f cannot be so closely united 
with either the tonic tone or the tonic chord, as is the case with the supplementary 
tones introduced by the dominant. This gives a kind of exaggerated minor char- 
acter to the mode of the minor Sixth, when harmonised. Its tones and chords are 
certainly connected, but much less clearly and intelligibly than those of the minor 

IT system. The chords which can be brought together in this key, without obscuring 
reference to c as the tonic, are b\} minor and d^\} major on the one hand and g 
major on the other, chords which in the major system could not be brought together 
without extraordinary modulational appliances, f The esthetical character of the 
mode of the minor Sixth corresponds with this fact. It is well suited for the 
expression of dark mystery, or of deepest depression, and an utter lapse into 
melancholy, in which it is impossible to collect one's thoughts. On the other 
hand, as its descending leading note gives it a certain amount of energy in descent, 
it is able to express earnest and majestic solemnity, to which the concurrence of 
those major chords which are so strangely connected gives a kind of peculiar 
magnificence and wondrous richness. 

Notwithstanding that the mode of the minor Sixth has been rejected from 
modern musical theory, much more distinct traces of its existence have been left 
in musical practice than of any other ancient mode ; for the mode of the Fourth 

T has been fused into the major, and the mode of the minor Seventh into the minor. 
Certainly a mode like that we have described is not suitable for frequent use ; it is 
not closely enough connected for long pieces, but its peculiar power of expression 
cannot be replaced by that of any other mode. Its occurrence is generally marked 
by its peculiar final cadence which starts from the minor Second in the root. In 
Handel the natural cadence of this system is used with great effect Thus in the 



*[The introduction of this chord shews 
that the composer is writing in the key of c, hut 
has a prevailing tendency to modulate into the 
subdominant, from which &|^, d'|^ are chosen. 
When h^\f is used for h]^, or 6| for 6*|^, the 
modulation into the subdominant does not 
take place. The major chord e'l> + (7-6*b i^ 
entirely adventitious. If it is used in ascend- 
ing, thus, c 112 d^\f 204 e^\f 182 f 2(A g 112 
a^^ 204 6*|> 182 c\ the result is the scale of 



S A^\f ma.ma.ma. of App. XX. sect. E. art. 9.— 
Translator,] 

t [This, in fact, lengthens the original chain 
of chords into 6|>-d'|^+/-a^|>+c-6^|>+g+ 
&i - d, and leads to the treatment of the mode 
as merely C minor, with a tendency to modu- 
late into F minor. The C minor is, however, 
the modern minor C mi.mi.ma., and the F 
minor is F mi.mi.mi., which is much more 
gloomy. — Translator.] 



rs 



CHAP. XV. 



REMNANTS OF OLD TONAL MODES. 



307 



Messiah, the magnificent fugue And with his stripes we are healed, which has the 
signature of F minor, but by its frequent use of the harmony of the dominant 
Seventh on G, shews that G is the real tonic, introduces the pure [ecclesiastical 
Phrygian] Doric cadence as follows : * 




[F.] 



^fc 



:p3=- 




BI-ST^ 



J- 



jzhl 



s 



I 



-^- 



:s:iz 



I 



Similarly in Samson,\ the chorus, Rear^ Jacob's God, which, written in the IT 
Doric mode of E, finely characterises the earnest prayer of the anxious Israelites 
as contrasted with the noisy sacrificial songs of the Philistines in G major, which 
immediately follow. The cadence here also is purely Doric.J 




[123456 6 7 7 8] 

Ee-deem, re-deem, re-deem, O Lord, thy people. 
The chorus of Israelites which introduces the third part : In Thunder come, God, IT 
from heaven ! and is chiefly in A minor, has likely an intermediate Doric section. 

Sebastian Bach also, in the chorales which he has harmonised, has left them 
in the mode of the minor Sixth, to which they melodically belonged, whenever the 
text requires a deeply sorrowful expression, as in the De Profundis or the Aus 
tiefer Noth schrei^ ich zu dir, and again in Paul Gerhardt's song, Wenn ich einmal 
soil scheiden, so scheide nicht von mir. But he has harmonised the same melody 
arranged for other texts, as Befiehl Du deine Wege, and Haupt von Blut und 
Wunden, &c., as major or minor, in which case the melody ends on the Third or 
Fifth of the key, instead of on the Doric tonic. 

Fortlage § had already observed that Mozart had applied the Doric mode in 



*[The cadence is produced by passing 
from the minor subdominant B)^-D^)^-\-F to 
the major dominant, C + Ei-G, in the key of 
F minor. This is the concluding cadence of 
the whole fugue, and for this reason appa- 
rently, the signature in Novello^s edition is 
that of C minor, not of F minor, and the d})j 
is marked as an accidental throughout. That 
is, Novello takes the key to be C minor with a 
constant tendency to modulate into the key of 
the subdominant, from which it borrows the 
chord B^ - D^^ -{■ F. But the fugue begins 
with F...f in the bass, and the opening sub- 
ject, in the treble, is c", a^% di"[>, e/, f, g', a^% 
b% c", which is clearly in the scale of F minor, 
with the chordal system b]y - d^\^ +/-o*|^+c 
•^^1-9^ of which it contains every note. In 
the text the [F.] is the duodenal and refers to 
the duodene otF, which contains all the tones 
in the passage. The whole fugue oscillates 
between the duodenes C and F. — Translator.] 

t [Mr. H. Keatley Moore informs me that 



this chorus was taken by Handel from 
Plorate filiae Israel in Carissimi's JephthaK 
— Translator J] 

X [The duodene is that of A^. The succes- ^ 
sion of chords, each reduced to the simplest 
form, a? referred to by the bracketed figures 
below the notes, is 1. «i - gr + ^i, 2. a^ - c+Cj, 
8. «Ji-g+6i, 4. f-\'a^-c, 6. d^-f+a,, 6. tf^ + 
gj^-h, 7. a^-c+ei, 8. e^ + gJlf-\. Hence, 
assuming the scale to have the chordal system 
di-/+Oi-c+ei-^ + 6ji, with e,-^+6iasthe 
tonic chord, taken major as ^x + g^-hi in the 
close, we have the * Doric cadence * between 
chords 5 and 6, which is then lengthened by 
introducing the remaining tones of the key 
in 7, the whole closing as in 8. It would be 
most probably received as in ^^ minor, closing 
in the dominant. — Translator,] 

§ Examples from instrumental music are 
mentioned by Ekert in his Habilitatiansschrift 
Die Principien der Modulation und mtisikal- 
ischen Idee. Heidelberg, 1860, p. 12. 

x2 



308 



REMNANTS OP OLD TONAL MODES. 



PABTm. 



Pamina's air in the second act of II Flauto Mckgico [No. 19]. One of the finest 
examples for the contrast between this and the major mode occurs in the same 
composer's Don Giovanni^ in the Sestette of the second act [No. 21], where Ottavio 
and Donna Anna enter. Ottavio sings the comforting words — 

Tergi il ciglio, o vita mia, 
E dii calma al tuo doloro 

in D major, which, however, is peculiarly coloured by a preponderating, although 
not uninterrupted, inclination to the subdominant, as in the mode of the Fourth. 
Then Anna, who is plunged in grief, begins in perfectly similar melodical phrases, 
and with a similar accompaniment, and after a short modulation through D minor, 
establishes herself in the mode of the minor Sixth for C, with the words — 

Sol la morte, o mio tesoro, 
T II mio pianto pu6 finir. 

The contrast between gentle emotion and crushing grief is here represented with 
a most wonderfully beautiful effect, principally by the change of mode. The dying 
Commandant also, in the introduction to Don Giovanni, ends with a Doric cadence.'*' 
Similarly the Agnus Dei of Mozart's Bequiem — although, of course, we are not 
quite certain how much of this was written by himself. 

Among Beethoven's compositions we may notice the first movement of the 
Sonata, No. 90, in E minor, for the pianoforte, as an example of peculiar de- 
pression caused by repeated Doric cadences, whence the second (major) movement 
acquires a still softer expression. 

Modern composers form a cadence which belongs to the mode of the minor 
Sixth, by means of the mi not* Second and the major Seventh, the so-called chord 
of the extreme sharp Sixth,f /^ + a...djjf, where both /^ and d^ji have to move 
T half a tone to reach the tonic e [p. 2866]. This chord cannot be deduced from the 
major and minor modes, and hence appears very enigmatical and inexplicable to 
many modem theoreticians. But it is easily explained as a remnant of the old 
mode of the minor Sixth, in which the major Seventh djL which belongs to the 
dominant chord fe + d,|f-/j^ is combined with the tones f^ + a, which are taken 
from the subdominant side.^ 

These examples may suffice to shew that there are still remnants of the mode 
of the minor Sixth in modem music. It would be easy to adduce more examples 
if they were looked for. The harmonic connection of the chords in this mode is 
not sufficiently firm and intelligible for the construction of long pieces. But in 
short pieces, chorales, or intermediate sections, and melodic phrases in larger 
musical works, it is so effective in its expression, that it should not be forgotten, 
especially as Handel, Bach, and Mozart have used it in such conspicuous places 
in their works. § 



f * [No. 1. of the opera. Representing major 
chords by capitals and minor by small letters, 
the final chords of the vocal music are /, D'J^, 
Gi[>, /, C, /, so that all the tones will lie m 
the scheme g^ + Vj-d^^-\-f-a^)^ + c-\-ey^-g, 
or c - e ' 1^ + g. The tonic is F. — TramliiUyrJ] 

f [Callcott (M%L$ical Orammar, 1809, art. 
441) calls it < the chord of the extreme sharp 
Sixths* and says that 'this harmony when 
accompanied simply by the Third, has been 
termed the Italian Sixth \ Of course he has 
no theory for it ; the tone is ' accidentally 
sharpened \— Trotw/ator.] 

:J:[That is the chords of the scale are 
taken as d^p + a-c^+e^g^ + b + di-fjjf, of 
which the two notes last are modem additions. 
See p. 286d, note f- — Translator.] 

§ Herr A. von Oettingen, in his Harmonie- 
system in dualer Entwickelung (Dorpat and 



Leipzig, 1866), has carried out, in a most in- 
teresting manner, the complete analogy be- 
tween the mode of the minor Sixth and the. 
major mode, of which it is the direct conver- 
sion ; and has shewn how this conversion leads 
to a peculiarly characteristic harmonisation of 
the mode of the minor Sixth. In this respect 
I wish emphatically to recommend this book 
to the attention of musicians. On the other 
hand, it seems to me that it is necessary to 
shew by musical practice, that the new prin- 
ciple, which is made the basis of that writer's 
theory of the mode of the minor Sixth, con- 
sidered by him as the theoretically normal 
minor mode, really suffices for the construction 
of great musical pieces. The author, namely, 
considers the minor triad c-e^\f-{-g as repre- 
senting the tone g" which is common to the 
three compound tones of which it is composed 



CHAP. XV. 



TRICHORDAL TONAL MODES. 



309 



Similar relations exist for the mode of the Fourth and of the minor Seventh, 
although these are less specifically different from the major and minor modes re- 
spectively. They are, however, capahle of giving a peculiar expression to certain 
musical periods, although difficulties would arise in consistently carrying out these 
peculiarities through long pieces of music. The harmonic phrases which belong to 
these two last-named modes can of course also be executed within the usual major 
and minor systems. But perhaps it would facilitate the theoretical comprehen- 
sion of certain modulations, if the conception of these modes and of their system 
of harmonisation were definitely laid down. 

The only point, then, as historical development and physiological theory alike 
testify, for which modern music is superior to the ancient, is harmonisation. The 
development of modern music has been evoked by its theoretical principle, that the 
tonic chord should predominate among the series of chords by the same laws of 
relationship as the tonic note predominates among the notes of the scale. This IT 
principle did not become practically effective till the commencement of last century, 
when it was felt necessary to preserve the minor chord in the final cadence. 

The physiological phenomenon which this esthetical principle brought into 
action, is the compound character of musical tones which are of themselves chords 
composed of partials, and consequently, conversely, the possibility under certain 
circumstances of replacing compound tones by chords. Hence in every chord the 
principal tone is that of which the whole chord may be considered to express its 
compound form. Practically this principle was acknowledged from the time that 
pieces of music were allowed to end in chords of several parts. Then it was im- 
mediately felt that the concluding tone of the bass might be accompanied by a 
higher Octave, Fifth, and, finally, major Third, but not by a Fourth, or minor 
Sixth, and for a long time also the minor Third was rejected ; and we know that 
the first three intervals (the Octave, Fifth, and major Third) occur among the 
partials of the compound tone which lies in the bass, and that the others do not. f 

The various values of the tones of a chord were first theoretically recognised 
by Bameau in his theory of the fundamental bass, although Bameau was not ac- 
quainted with the cause here assigned for these different values. That compound 
tone which represents a chord according to our view, constitutes its Fundamental 
Ba88y Radical Tone or Boot, as distinguished from its bass, that is, the tone which 
belongs to the lowest part. The major triad has the same root whatever be its 
inversion or position. In the chords c + e^-g, or gr...c + ei, *^® ^^^* ^^ ^*^^^ ^' T^® 
minor chord d-f^ + a has also as a rule only d as its root in all its inversions, but 
in the chord of the great [or added] Sixth /^ -ha... <i^ we may also consider/* as the 
root, and it is in this sense that it occurs in the cadence of c* major. Bameau's 
successors have partly given up this last distinction ; but it is one in which Bameau's 
fine artistic feeling fully corresponded with the facts in nature. The minor chord 
really admits of this double interpretation, as we have already shewn (p. 294td), 

The essential difference between the old and new tonal modes is this : the old IT 
have their minor chords on the dominant, the new on the subdominant side. 

The reasons for the following construction have been already investigated.* 



In the 


The chord of the 

. , A 


Subdominant 
ia 


Tonic 

is 


> 
Dominant 
is 


f Mode of the minor Third . 
Old- Mode of the minor Seventh 

( Mode of the Fourth . 
Major Mode .... 
*j^„/ Minor-Major Mode 
^®^^ Minor Mode .... 


Minor 
Major 
Major 
Major 
Minor 
Minor 


Minor 
Minor 
Major 
Major 
Major 
Minor 


Minor 
Minor 
Minor 
Major 
Major 
Major 



(being a higher Octave of g, of the Fifth of c, 
and of the major Third of «^[^), and hence 
calls it * the phonic g tone,' wherein h^ con- 



siders c {-e^-g in the same way as we do, as 
the * tonic c tone '. 

*[It will be seen th»t this arrangement 



310 DIFFERENT CHARACTERS OF KEYS. pabt m. 

CHAPTER XVI. 

THE SYSTEM OF KEYS. 

There is nothing in the nature of music itself to determine the pitch of the tonic 
of any composition. If different melodies and musical pieces have to be executed 
by musical instruments or singing voices of definite compass, the tonic must be 
chosen of a suitable pitch, differing when the melody rises far above the tonic and 
when it sinks much below it. In short, the pitch of the tonic must be chosen so 
as to bring the compass of the tones of the piece within the compass of the execu- 
tants, vocal or instrumental. This inevitable practical necessity entails the con- 
dition of being able to give any required pitch to the tonic. 

IT Moreover, in the longer pieces of music, it is necessary to be able to make a 
temporary change of tonic, that is, to modulate^ in order to avoid uniformity and 
to utilise the musical effects resulting from changing and then returning to the 
original key. Just as consonances are made more prqminent and effective by means 
of dissonances, the feeling for the predominant tonality and the satisfaction which 
arises from it, is heightened by previous deviations into adjacent keys. The variety 
in musical turns produced by modulational connection has become all the more 
necessary for modern music, because we have been obliged entirely to renounce, 
or at any rate materially to circumscribe, the old principle of altering expression 
by means of the various tonal modes. The Greeks had a free choice among seven 
different tonal modes, the middle ages among five or six, but we can choose between 
two only, major and minor. Those old tonal modes presented a series of different 
degrees of tonal character, out of which two only remain suitable for harmonic 
music. But the clearer and firmer construction of an harmonic piece gives modem 

„ composers greater freedom in modulational deviations from the original key, and 
places at their command new sources of musical wealth, which were scarcely 
accessible to the ancients. 

Finally I must just touch on the question, so much discussed, whether each 
different key has a peculiar character of its own. 

It is quite clear that, within the course of a single piece of music, modulational 
deviations into the more or less distantly related keys on the dominant or sub- 
dominant side produce very different effects. This, however, arises simply from 
the contrast they offer to the original principal key, and would be merely a rela- 
tive character. But the question here mooted is, whether individual keys have an 
absolute character of their own, independently of their relation to any other key. 

This is often asserted, but it is difficult to determine how much truth the 
assertion contains, or even what it precisely means, because probably a variety of 
different things are included under the term character^ and perhaps the amount of 
effect due to the particular instrument employed has not been allowed for. If an 

V instrument of fixed tones is completely and uniformly tuned according to the equal 
temperament, so that all Semitones throughout the scale have precisely the same 
magnitude, and if also the musical quality of all the tones is precisely the same, 
there seems to be no ground for understanding how each different key should have 
a different character. Musicians fully capable of forming a judgment have also 
admitted to me, that no difference in the character of the keys can be observed on 
the organ, for example. And Hauptmann,* I think, is right when he makes the 
same assertion for singing voices with or without an organ accompaniment. A 
great change in the pitch of the tonic can at most cause all the higher notes to be 
strained or all the lower ones obscured. 

On the other hand, there is a decidedly different character in different keys on 

does not include the mode of the minor Sixth. E. art. 9, and thence to the general theory of 
It was this tabulation which led me to the duodenes in that section. — Tran»lator.] 
trlchordal theory developed in App. XX. sect. * Harmonik und Metrik, p. 188. 



CHAP. XVI. DIFFERENT CHARACTERS OF KEYS. 311 

pianofortes and bowed instruments. G major and the adjacent D\^~mB,]or have 
different effects. That this difference is not caused by difference of absolute pitch, 
can be readily determined by comparing two different instruments tuned to differ- 
ent pitches. The D|> of the one instrument may be as high as the C of the other, 
and yet on both the C major retains its brighter and stronger character, and the 
D\f its soft and veiled harmonious effect. It is scarcely possible to think of any 
other reason than that the method of striking the short narrow black digitals of 
the piano must produce a somewhat different quality of tone, and that difference of 
character arises from the different distribution of the stronger and gentler quality 
of tone among the different degrees of the scale.*^ The difference made in the 
tuning of those Fifths which the tuner keeps to the last, and on which are crowded 
the whole of the errors in tuning the other Fifths in the circle of Fifths, may 
possibly be regular, and may contribute to this effect, but of this I have no personal 
experience. [See App. XX. sect. G. art. 17.] H 

In bowed instruments the more powerful quality of tone in the open strings is 
conspicuous, and there are also probably differences in the quality of tone of strings 
which are stopped at short and long lengths, and these may alter the character of 
the key according to the degree of the scale on which they fall. This assumption 
is confirmed by the inquiries I have made of musicians respecting the mode in 
which they recognise keys under certain conditions. The inequality of intonation 
will add to this effect. The Fifths of the open strings are perfect Fifths. But it 
is impossible that all the other Fifths should be perfect if in playing in different 
keys each note has the same sound throughout, as appears at least to be the inten- 
tion of elementary instruction on the violin. In this way the scales of the various 
keys will differ in intonation, and this will necessarily have a much more important 
influence on the character of the melody. [See App. XX. sect. G. arts. 6 and 7.] 

The differences in quality of tone of different notes on wind instruments are 
still more striking. f 

If this view is correct, the character of the keys would be very different on differ- 
ent instruments, and I believe this to be the case. But it is a matter to be decided 
by a musician with delicate ears, who directs his attention to the points here raised. 

It is, however, not impossible that by a peculiarity of the human ear, already 
touched upon in p. 116a, certain common features may enter into the character of 
keys, independent of the difference of musical instruments, and dependent solely 
on the absolute pitch of the tonic. Since g"" is a proper tone of the human ear, 
it sounds peculiarly shrill under ordinary circumstances, and somewhat of this 
shrillness is common to /""tt and a""[>. To a somewhat less extent those musical 
tones of which g"" is an upper partial, as g"\ c"\ and g'\ have a brighter and more 
piercing tone than their neighbours. It is possible, then, that it is not indifferent 
for pieces in C major to have its high Fifth g" and high tonic c'" thus distinguished 
in brightness from other tones, but these differences must in all cases be very slight, 
and for the present I must leave it undecided whether they have any weight at all. V 

All or some of these reasons, then, made it necessary for musicians to have free 
command over the pitch of the tonic, and hence even the later Greeks transposed 
their scales on to all degrees of the chromatic scale. For singers these trans- 
positions offer no difficulties. They can begin with any required pitch, and find 
in their vocal instrument all such of the corresponding degrees as lie within the 
extreme limits of their voice. But the matter becomes much more difficult for 
musical instruments, especially for such as only possess tones of certain definite 
degrees of pitch. The difficulty is not entirely removed even on bowed instruments. 
It is true that these can produce every required degree of pitch ; but players are 
unable to hit the pitch, as correctly as the ear desires, without acquiring a certain 

*[Mr. H. Kcatloy Moore, Mus. B., thinks they gain this by a quicker motion, each arm 

the difference is due to the different leverage of the lever being shorter, and short keys 

of the black digitals. Although in well con- differing altogether from long ones in the feel- 

structed digitals the black have as much ing produced in the hand. See also App. XX. 

action at the further end as the white ones, sect, N. No, 6. — Tran8lator,'[ 



312 



TEMPERED INTONATION. 



PAATm. 



mechanical use of their fingers, which can only result from an immense amount 
of practice. 

The Greek system was not accompanied with great difficulties, even for instru- 
ments, BO long as no deviations into remote keys were permitted, and hence but 
few marks of sharps and flats had to be used. Up to the beginning of the seven- 
teenth century musicians were content with two signs of depression for the notes 
B\} and E\}, and with the sign j| for Fjj^ C^ G^ in order to have the leading 
tones for the tonics G, jD, and A. They took care to avoid the enharmonicallv 
equivalent tones AJj^ for B\}y D^ for i?l>, G\^ for Fjj^ D\} for C!|, and A\^ for O^ 
By help of B\f for B * every tonal mode could be transposed to the key of its sub- 
dominant, and no other transposition was made. 

In the Pythagorean system, which maintained its predominance over theory 
to the time of Zarlino in the sixteenth century, tuning proceeded by ascending 
V Fifths, thus— 

CGDAEBJ^CJj^QjJiDJI^Ajj^EJj^BJj^ 

Now if we tune two Fifths upwards and an Octave downwards, we make a step 
having the ratio | x § x i = Ji which is a major Second. This gives for the pitch of 
every second tone in the last list — 

C D E F^ Gji Ajj^ B$ 

1 t i^)' i^y (D* (S)^ {^r 

Now if we proceed downwards by Fifths from C we obtain the series — 
C F B\, E\, A\, D\, G\, C\, F\, B\,\, £bb ^bb r>bb 
If we descend two Fifths and rise an Octave, we may pbtain the tones — 

C B\, A\, G\, n E\,\, D\,\, 



1 % «)' («' (^)* (f)* (5)' 
Now the interval (J)»-|««|J|-i x f|||JJ 

or approximately, (t)*= i ^ tt 



(^)' 



2 X yij. 



Hence the tone J3jl is higher than the Octave of C by the small interval 
X* [ = 24 cents], and tne tone D\^\} is lower than the Octave below C by the same 
interval. If we ascend by perfect Fifths from C and Z>|>[>, we shall find the same 
constant diflference between 

C G D A B5MC#G#i)Jfi4#E| 5#and 

i)bb ^bb l^bb ^bb ^ ^b ^b ^b ^b ^b ^b ^' C. 

The tones in the upper line are all higher than those in the lower by the small 
interval ^M « 24 cents]. Our staff notation had its principles settled before the 
development of the modem musical system, and has consequently preserved these 
differences of pitch. But for practice on instruments with fixed tones the distino- 
^ tion between degrees of tone which lie so near to each other, was inconvenient, and 
attempts were made to fuse them together. This led to many imperfect attempts, 
in which individual intervals were more or less altered in order to keep the rest 



*[In the oldest printed book on music, 
{FranchiniOafori Laudensis Muaiciprofessoris 
theoricum opus annonice discipline, Neapolia 
M.CCCC.LXXX., for a sight of which I am 
indebted to Mr. Quaritoh, who bought it at 
the sale of the Sysion Library) b]y is in the 
printed text represented by a small Boman 
b, and 6b by a capital Roman B. But in a 
plate attached are given eight varieties of the 
written form of 6b, by which it would seem 
to have been intended for b with a square 
instead of a round bottom, like b> which is 
almost indistinguishable from a mutilated 
Koman h. As it was clearly made in two 
parts L 1, the second was often long, and then 
the resemblance to ^ was great, and this was 



almost the cursive written form ^ of h in 
Germany. On the other hand it was often 
made with two strokes 1| afterwards crossed, 
like D, and then it degenerated into jj, which 
is apparently the precursor of our j(. In this 
case both h and % and also h would have 
arisen from the same square-bottomed b, the 
French hicarre, and Prsetorius ^ qu4idralum, 
which, however, he identified with h, H in 
subsequent writing. The Italian names for 
6, 6[> are si minore^ si maggiore. Whether these 
refer to the musical intervals a 6)^, a 6|2|, which 
Gafori printed a b, a B, or to these printed 
forms, it is difficult to say with certainty. 
The Germans accepted the forms b |)t && b n, 
calling the latter ha. The meaning that 



GHAF. X.VI. 



TEMPERED INTONATION. 



313 



true, producing the so-called unequal temperaments, and finally to the system 
of equ^l temperament, in which the Octave was divided into 12 precisely equal 
degrees of tone.* We have seen that we can ascend from C hy 12 perfect Fifths to 
J9jt which differs from c by about ^ of a Semitone, namely by the interval \^. In 
the same way we can descend by 12 perfect Fifths to -Dbl^, which is as much lower 
than (7, as -^^is higher. If, then, we put C » £tt » 2)|>[>, and distribute this little 
deviation of |4 equally among all the 12 Fifths of the circle, each Fifth will be 
erroneous by about ^ of a Semitone [or ^^ of a comma or 2 cents], which is 
certainly a very small interval. By this means all varieties of tonal degrees within 
an Octave are reduced to 12, as on our modem keyed instruments. 

The Fifth in the system of equal temperament, is, when expressed approximately 
in the smallest possible numbers, » f x |||^. It is very seldom that any difficulty 
could result from its use in place of the perfect FiftL The root struck with its 
tempered Fifth makes one beat in the time that the Fifth makes 442^ complete S 
vibrations. Now since a' makes 440 vibrations in a second, it follows that the 
tempered Fifth d' ± a* will produce exactly one beat in a second. In long-sustained 
tones this would, indeed, be perceptible, but by no means disturbing, and for 
quick passages it would have no time to occur. The beats are still less disturb- 
ing in lower positions, where they decrease in rapidity with the pitch numbers of 
the tones. In higher positions they certainly become more striking ; d!" ± a'" 
gives four, and a'" ± e '" six beats in a second ; but chords very seldom occur with 
such high notes in slow passages. The Fourths of the equal temperament are 
* X I^^J [ = 498 + 2 cents]. There is one beat for. every 221 J vibrations of the lower 
tone of the FourtL Hence the Fourth a . d' makes one beat in a second, the 
same as the Fifth d' ±'a\ The pure consonances retained in the Pythagorean 
system are therefore not injured to any extent worth notice by equal temperament. 
In melodic progression of tones the interval |f ^ borders on the very limits of dis- 
tinguishable differences of pitch, according to Preyer's experiments (see p. 1476). % 
In the doubly accented Octave it would be easily distinguished. In the unac- 
cented or lower Octaves it would not be felt at all. 

The Thirds and Sixths of the equal temperament are nearer the perfect 
intervals than are the Pythagorean, f 



Intervals 


Perfect 


Equally Tempered 
ratios cents 

ixm ^ 


Pythagorean 


Major Third . 


ratios cents 
f 886 


ratios cents 
1 X li 408 


Minor Sixth . 


1 814 


fxllJ 800 


fxf? 792 


Minor Third . 


f 316 


fxm 300 


I X i; 294 


Major Sixth . 


1 884 


fxV« 900 


|x|J 906 


Semitone 


i« 182 


IforifxJH 100 


Ufor^fxIJ- 90 



The dissonances occasioned by the upper partial tones are consequently some- IT 
what milder than those due to Pythagorean intervals, but the combinational tones 



Gafori attached to b B (which in one plate he 
also gives in the same sense in black letter), 
is shewn by the following quotation which he 
makes from Guidons hexachord, and this also 
shews that he used Pythagorean intonation, 

meaning in our notation : 

/ 



Ffaut 

tonus 
G sol re ut 

tonus 
a la mi re 

semitonium 
bfa 

apothome 
B mi Trittonus 

semitonium 
c sol fa ut 



204 cents = Tone 

204 cents = Tone 
a 

90 centB= Semitone 

114 cents =Apotome 
h Tritone 612 cents 

90 cents = Semitone 
c' Fifth 702 cents 



The Germans generally speak of h and ^ 
as Be, Kreuz (croas). I do not remember ever 
having heard the |j{ named, but I find in Flii- 
gel's Dictionary Bequadratum (square b) and 
Wiederherstellungsxeichen (sign of restitution, 
for which |] was not used till the seventeenth 
century). Germans never have occasion to use 
the word, because, instead of *d flat, d natural, 
d sharp,' they say * des, de, dis,' while 6)^, b^ 
are termed * be, ha '. On older organ pipes [^3 
are constantly used for b\f &|S|, and some organ- 
builders still use them. — Tratislator,] 

* [The general relations on which the 
schemes of temperament depend will be found 
in App. XX. sect. A. — Translator,'] 

i [The cents in the Table were of course 
inserted by me. — Translator,] 



314 



TEMPERED INTONATION. 



PART m. 



are much more disagreeable. For the PythagpreaQ Thirds c' + e' and t' — g the 
combinational tones are nearly Cji and B^, both differing by a Semitone from the 
combinational tone C, which would result from the perfect intervals in both cases. 
For the Pythagorean minor chord e' - ^ + h' the combinational tones are B and 
very nearly G^ The first, B^ is very suitable, better even than the ocxnbina- 
tional tone C which results from perfect intonation. But the second, G^ belongs 
to the major and not to the minor chord of E. However, as in perfect mtonation 
one of the two combinational tones C and G is false, the Pythagorean minor chord 
can hardly be considered inferior in this respect But the combinational tones of 
the equally tempered Thirds lie between those of the perfect and Pythagorean 
Thirds, and are less than a Semitone different from those of just intonation. Hence 
they correspond to no possible modulation, no tone of the chromatic scale, no dis- 
sonance that could possibly be introduced by the progression of the melody ; they 

V simply sound out of tune and wrong.* 

These bad combinational tones have always been to me the most annoying 
part of equally tempered harmonies. When moderately slow passages in Thirds 
at rather a high pitch are played, they form a horrible bass to them, which is all 
the more disagreeeable for coming tolerably near to the correct bass, and hence 
sounding as if they were played on some other instrument which was dreadfully 
out of tune. They are heard most distinctly on the harmonium and violin. Here 
every professional and even every amateur musician observes them immediately, 
when their attention is properly directed. And when the ear has once become 
accustomed to note them, it can even discover them on the piano. In the 
P3rthagorean intonation the combinational tones sound rather as if some one were 
intentionally playing dissonances. Which of these two evils is the worse, I will 
not venture to decide. In lower positions where the very low combinational tones 
can be scarcely, if at all, heard, the equally tempered Thirds have the advantage 

IT over the Greek, because they are not so rough, and produce fewer beats. In 
higher positions the latter advantage is perhaps destroyed by their combinational 
tones. However, the equally tempered system is capable of effecting everything 
that can be done by the Pythagorean, and with less expenditure of means. 

G. E. Naumann,f who has lately defended the Pythagorean as opposed to the 
equally tempered system, grounds his reasons chiefly on the fact that the Semi- 
tones which separate the ascending leading tone from the tonic, and the descend- 
ing minor Seventh from the Third of the chord on which it has to be resolved, are 
smaller in the Pythagorean (where they are about |J ; as appears in the Table on 
p. 313c) than in the equally tempered, where they are about |? ; while they are 
greatest of all in just intonation, viz. |^. Now in the equally tempered scale there 
is only one tone between / and ^, which is accepted at one time as /u to be a 
leading note to g^ and at another as g\^ to act as a Seventh resolving upon / ; but 
in the Pythagorean there are two tones, /J( and g^^ of which the latter is the flatter. 



f * [This may be seen more clearly by calculating the pitch numbers, assuming c' to be 
264 as on p. 17. Then— 



NoteK 
c' 


Jiwt, Difference 


Pythagorean, Difference 


Tempered, Difference 


264 


264 


264 




66=C 


70-12 


68-61 


e' 


330 


334-12 


332-61 




66=C 


61 -88 = 5, 


62-94 


g 


396 


396 


395-55 




99 = G 


10619 


102-81 


b' 


495 


501-19 


498-36 



The 'differences* give the pitch numbers, of 
the combinational tones. Now we have by 
p. 17rt. = 06, G =99, B, -6188, but the others 
correspond to no precise tones. The nearest 
equally tempered intervals are B 62-3, G^ 



= 09-93, and G^ = 104-76.~7VatMiator.] 

t Ueber die verschiedsnen Bestitntnungen 
der Tonverh/iltnisse. [On the various deter- 
minations of the ratios of tones.] Leipzig, 

1868. 



CHAP. XVI. 



TEMPERED INTONATION. 



316 



Hence the Semitone always approaches the tone on to which it would fall in regular 
resolution, and the height of the pitch determines the direction of resolution. But 
although the leading tone plays an important part in modulations, it is perfectly 
clear that we are not justified in changing its pitch at will in order to hring it 
nearer to the note on which it has to he resolved. There would otherwise be no 
limit to our making it come nearer and nearer to that tone, as in the ancient Greek 
enharmonic mode.'"' Suppose we replace the Pythagorean Semitone, which is 
about ^ of the natural Semitone, by another still smaller, about | of the natural 
one, say y^ x ^^ x ^^ ; the result would be perfectly unnatural as a leading note.f 
We have already seen that the character of the leading note essentially depends 
upon its being that tone in the scale which is most distantly related to the tonic, 
and hence most uncertain and alterable [melodically]. Hence we are perfectly 
unjustified in deducing from such a tone the principle of construction for the whole 
scale. IT 

The principal fault of our present tempered intonation, therefore, does not lie 
in the Fifths; for their imperfection is really not worth speaking of, and is 
scarcely perceptible in chords. The fault rather lies in the Thirds, and this error 
is not due to forming the Thirds by means of a series of imperfect Fifths, but it is 
the old Pythagorean error of forming the Thirds by means of an ascending series of 
four Fifths. Perfect Fifths in this case give even a worse result than flat Fifths. 
The natural relation of the major Third to the tonic, both melodically and har- 
monically, depends on the ratio | of the pitch numbers. Any other Third is only 
a more or less unsatisfactory substitute for the natural major Third. The only 
correct system of tones is that in which, as Hauptmann proposed, the system of 
tones generated by Fifths should be separated from those generated by major 
Thirds. Now as it is important for the solution of many theoretical questions to 
be able to make experiments on tones which really form with each other the 
natural intervals required by theory, to prevent the ear from being deceived byT 
the imperfections of the equal temperament, I have endeavoured to have an in- 
strument constructed by which I could modulate by perfect intervals into all keys. 

If we were really obliged to produce in all its completeness the system of tones 
distinguished by Hauptmann, in order to obtain perfect intervals in all keys, it 
would certainly be scarcely possible to overcome the difficulties of the problem. 
Fortunately it is possible to introduce a great and essential simplification by means 
of the artifice originally invented by the Arabic and Persian musicians, and pre- 
viously mentioned on p. 281a. 

We have already seen that the tones of Hauptmann's system which are generated 
by Fifths, and are marked by letters without any subscribed or superscribed lines, as 
c ±g ±d ±a ±y &c., are one comma or ^^ [ =i 22 cents] higher than the notes which 
bear the same names, when generated by major Thirds, and which are here dis- 
tinguished by an inferior figure b,s c^±g^±d^±ai±y *^- ^® hQ,ye further seen that 
if we descend from bhy ek series of 12 Fifths down to c|>, the last tone, reduced toT 
the proper Octave, is lower than b by about |j^ [ = 24 cents]. Hence we have — 

b :&i = 81 :80 
b :cb = 74 :73 

Now these two intervals are very nearly alike ; b^ is rather higher than c|>, but 
only in the proportion — 

cb : ^1= 32768 : 32805 [=2 cents] 



* [However jastiiiablo such alterations may 
be in unaccompanied melody, they are de- 
structive of harmony, and hence do not belong 
to harmonic music proper. Of all the older 
temperaments, the meantonc is moBt har- 
monious, but this makes the leading tones 
still further from the tone on which tlicy are 
resolved, than even in just intonation (117 in 



place of 112 cents). No diminution of the 
]ust Semitone can be made without injury to 
the major Thirds. — Trajislaior.] 

t [This would have 112 - 2 x 22 = 68 cents, 
which approaches very closely to the small 
Semitone*25 : 24 = 70 cents, so that the effect 
can be judged from playing 6^|^...&i on the 
Harmonic^l. — Translator.] 



316 



HARMONIUM IN JUST INTONATION. 



PAST in. 



or, using the approximation obtained by continued fractions — 

cb : 6i = 885 : 886. 

The interral between c\} and b^ is consequently about the same as that between 
a perfect and an equally tempered Fifth. ^ 

Now b^ is the true major Third of g, and if we descend 8 Fifths from g we 
arrive at c\} thus : 

9 ± c ±/ ± ^\> ± ^b ± ^b ± d\) ± g\} ± c\^ 

Now, as c\f is flatter than b^y if we diminished f all the Fifths by \ of the small 
interval haJ ^^ should arrive at 6j instead of c\f. 

Now, since the interval ^^g is itself on the limits of sensible difference of pitch, 
the eighth part of this interval cannot be taken into account at all, and we may 
IT consequently identify the following tones of Hauptmann's system, by proceeding in 
a series of Fifths from c|> » b^, that is, the upper line with the lower, or — 

h ± c\> ±9\> ± ^\> ± <^\> ± ^b ± h 

= «! ± ^1 ±/4 ± ^4 ± ^it ± ^4 ± ^4 

Among musical instruments, the harmonium, on account of its uniformly sus- 
tained sound, the piercing character of its quality of tone, and its tolerably distinct 
combinational tones, is particularly sensitive to inaccuracies of intonation. And as 
its vibrators also admit of a delicate and durable tuning, it appeared to me pecu- 
liarly suitable for experiments on a more perfect system of tones. I therefore 
selected an harmonium of the larger kind,| with two manuals, and a set of vibrators 
for each, and had it so tuned that by using the tones of the two manuals I could 
play all the major chords from F^ major to Fjt major. The tones are thus dis- 
f tributed : 



? 



-N/- 



+ ail^ - c|j + <Jib - 17b + ^ib - ^b +/i--«b + <a - ^b + 17i - ^b + <*i - / + «i- 



I! 



On Lower Manual 



~\r~ 



"Nr* 



On Upper Manual 



«i - 



-c + ei-g + bi'-d+fJi-a + cj- 



On Lower Manual 



■>/^ 



■^(^ 



.-^— 



I I 



«i 



1 1 



On Upper Manual 



This instrument therefore furnishes 15 major chords and as many minor 
chords, with perfectly pure Thirds, but with Fifths too flat by J of the interval by 
which an equally tempered Fifth is too flat. § On the Lower Manual we have the 



* [On account of the approximate character 
of the calculation, the extreme closeness of 
result is not well shewn. Taking the accurate 
ff numbers, the ratio 

6, -f cb = ISf 81, giving cents 1-96872L 

Perfect Fifth -h tempered Fifth =f -5-'^/, 
giving cents 701 -965001 - 700 = 1-966001. Dif - 
ference -001280 cents. Human ears, however 
much assisted by human contrivances, could 
never hear the difiference. — Tratulatar.] 

t[ Accidentally misprinted 'increased/ that 
is, * zu gross,' and * too sharp,' that is, * zu 
hoch,' instead of * zu klein,' and * zu tief * in 
all the four German editions. This error 
evidently arose merely from forgetting for the 
moment that the Fifths were taken down and 
not up. Now 8 perfect Fifths down = - 8 x 702 
cents = - 5616 cents, which on adding 5 octavos 
= 6000 cents, gives 384 cents, and this is less 
than the major Thirds of 386 cents by 2 cents. 
Hence if we diminish each Fifth by J cent, 
8 diminished Fifths down = - 8 x 701 J = - 5614 
cents, which, on adding 6 octaves or 600Q cents 



gives 386 cents, and this is the oorrect major 
Third. But to tune Fifths of this kind, if pos- 
sible, would be a work of immense labour even 
with tuning-forks, the most permanent of exist- 
ing conveyors of pitch, and the most perfect 
apparatu s known. Thus such a Fifth reckoned 
from c' 264 vib. gives g' 395*944 vib., while the 
perfect g' is 396*000 vib.. difference -OSe vib., 
which it is hopeless to tune exactly. Hence 
these Fifths can only be regarded as products 
of calculation which could not be realised. In 
App. XX. Sect. A. art. 18 I term the result- 
ing temperament Helmholtzian, although, as 
will be seen in the following note §, Prof. 
Helmholtz himself did not attempt to realise 
it. — Translator.] 

tMado by Messrs. J. & P. Schiedmayer, 
in Stuttgart. 

§ The tuning of this instrument was easily 
managed. Herr Schicdmayer succeeded at the 
first attempt by the following direction. Start- 
ing from a on the lower manual, tune the 
Fiftns d + atg±dfC±g perfectly just, and thus 



CHAP. XVI. 



HARMONIUM IN JUST INTONATION. 



317 



complete scales of C\^ major and G major and in the upper the complete scales of 
E\} major and B major inclusive complete. All the major scales exist from C\} 
major to B major, and they can all be played with perfect exactness in the natural 
intonation. But to modulate beyond B major on the one side and C\} major on the 
other, it is necessary to make a really enharmonic interchange between Bi and C[y, ' 
which perceptibly alters the pitch (by a comma IJ)** ^^^ minor modes on the 
lower manual are B^ minor or C[> minor complete, on the upper manual Djt minor 
or E\^ minor. 

For the minor keys this series of tones is not quite so satisfactory as for the 
major keys. The dominant of a minor key is the Fifth of a minor triad and the 
root of a major triad. But as the minor chord has to be written as a^ - c + e^ 
and the major chord as/|> + a^\^ - c|>, the corresponding dominant must be written 
in the first chord with an inferior number, and in the second with a letter without 
any number attached ; that is, they must be tones of the kind which we have T 
identified by means of the assumptions here made, as in the present case where e^ 

obtain c, g, d. Then tune the major chords 
c+ei-g,g-k-b^-d,d +fji - a, giving the three 
tones eibjfjj^ and finally the Fifth, fJi±cjL 
to obtain cA. Then putting «i=/b, Oi=cW, 
/i|=(7bt ^if'^^b* tane the major chords 
f\f + aM-cj^, c^^ei\fg^, j^|^ + ft^j, - d|, with 
pure Thirds giving no beats, thus obtaining 



Oib, «ib, fcibi and finally the Fifth ftj^ +/,, giving 
/j. This completes the tuning of the notes on 
the lower manual. For the upper manual first 
tune as the perfect Fifth of the a in the 
lower manual, and then the three major chords 

^'■♦-^i^-^ *+^i|-4' •'t+"4~^» ^^ *^® 
Fifth aij|+0i|, giving 6, fij^, c|, and then gjL 

^1% a,| and also ejj^ Then put (^jj|— a|>, 
djjf=e\f, a^=6|^, «i|=/. and tune the Thirds 
in the major chords a[^+Cj-0|^, 0k + gi~5b, 
^b + ^i-ff and the Fifth d^tUi. This gives 
Ci, ^1, dj, and O], and completes the whole 
tuning, which is much easier than for a series 
of equally tempered tones. 

[The theoretical flattening of all the Fifths 
by ^ of a skhisma is here neglected, as it 
would be impossible by ear only, and in all 
probability many other errors in tuning were 
committed, which could not be detected. The 
result is that the two manuals were tuned to 
the following tones, using capital letters to 



represent the large or white digitals, and the 
small letters the small or black digitals. The 
Roman letters below shew the secondary mean- 
ing attached to the letters above them for the 
tuning of the notes marked with a* above 
them. 

Upper Manual. 

eb * a|> ^b 

Lower Manual. 
C cj D e*];, E, F, f^ O a^b A h"^ B, 

db^ Pb gb^ Cb 

To make it more clear how the 24 notes of T 
this instrument represent 48 by neglecting the 
skhisma, I have below arranged the scale on 
the duodenary system (major Thirds in lines, 
Fifths in columns, App. XX. sect. E. art. 18), 
and given the proper number of cents for eacn 
note, using capitals for the notes actually 
tuned, and small letters for those obtained by 
substitution. The notes above the horizontal 
lines were in the upper manual, those below it 
on the lower. 

It is thus seen 1) that the notes in cols. I., II. , 



f. 


II. 


III 


[. 


IV. 


V. 


vr. 


Cjt 114 


Eji 600 


"M 


886 


d»b 


112 


/ 498 


^1 884 


F\: 612 


A^ 998 


Cg , , 


184 


9'b 


610 


b\f 996 


D^ 182 


B 1110 


A| 296 


/*f 


682 


o'b 


1108 


e\f 294 


Gi 680 


E 408 


Gi|794 


b4 


1180 


/'b 


406 


a\^ 792 


Ci 1178 


A 906 


Cj 92 


^ 


1 
1 


478 


«>*bb 


904 


d\, 90 


Fj 476 


D 204 


FJf^ 590 


<H 




976 


<^*bb 


202 


^b 588 


^ib 974 


G 702 


^1 1088 


<k 




274 


«'bb 


700 


c\f 1086 


J??ib 272 


C 


Ey 386 


94 




772 


d^bb 


1198 


/b a84 


^ib 770 



T 



III. are exactly 2 cents sharper than those in 
cols. IV., v., VI. 2) that only cols. I., II., VI. 
were tuned, and that IV., V., and III. without 
being tuned were assumed to be identical with 
them respectively. 8) That cols. I. II., III. form 
a series of Fifths down or Fourths up, of which 
only two, namely C to EJitkud Ei to gjt jL 
are defective, being both TOO cents down or 
500 up, in place of 702 and 498 as all the 
others. 4) That the simplest way of tuning 
would be to take A to pitch, and then A + C^ 
and CJi^+eJi as perfect major Thirds, and then 



from A, 



tune the rest of the notes 



in their columns b^ perfect Fifths and Fourths, 
naming the notes in col. III. for convenience as 
those in col . VI. Afterwards the identity of the 
first three with the last three columns would 
be assumed. All the properties and defects 
of this system of tuning can be immediately 
deduced from the above diagram. — Transla- 
tor.] 

• [For instead of the keys of Fji and F[>, 
the absence of OJL and 6^k, dj^ bbliges us 
to use the keys of Fjj^ and F^\f, which are 
respectively a comma lower and higher.— 
Translator.] 



ra 



318 



HARMONIUM IN JUST INTONATION. 



PART in. 



is identified with/ [7. Hence the instrument furnishes the following eight perfectly 
just minor scales [where the letters in brackets indicate those which are not written 
in the account of the manuals in the text of p. 316o] : — 



1) flj or b\f\} minor * d^ -f +a^ -c 



2) ^1 oxf^ minor: a^ -c +61 -g 

-d 



3) 61 or c|> minor : e^ 

4) /i^ or g\) minor : by 
6) cA or d^ minor : f^ 

6) gA or a[> minor : c^ 

7) d^ or e^ minor : gA 

8) a^^ or h\^ minor : d^ 



-d +/| 
-a +c4 



-a 



-c 



-6 



/b 

ab 

«b 

4 +«it 



+ [i74 

+ <»ib 
+ «ib 
+ W 

+ l^M 

+ d, 

+ l"M 

+ ai 



cb 

ab 

«b 

6b 
c 



Of these, the six last tonics from C\^ to B\f are also provided with major scales. 
Hence there are complete minor scales on all degrees of the scales of By major and 
El major ; and complete minor and major scales on all degrees of the scale of B^ 
major, with the exception of E^. 

After previous experiments on another harmonium, where I had at command 
only the two sets of tones of one octave common to two stops with one manual, I 

IT had expected that it would be scarcely observed if either the other minor keys had 
a somewhat too sharp Pythagorean Seventh, or if minor chords which are them- 
selves rather obscurely harmonious, were executed in Pythagorean intonation. 
When isolated minor chords are struck the difference is, indeed, not much observed. 
But when long series of justly-intoned chords have been employed, and the ear has 
grown accustomed to their effect, it becomes so sensitive to any intermixture of 
chords in imperfect intonation, that the disturbance is very appreciable.* 

The least disturbance is caused by taking the Pythagorean Seventh, because 
this leading tone is in modern compositions scarcely ever used but in the chord of 
the dominant Seventh, or other dissonances. In a pure major triad its effect is 
certainly very harsh. But in a discord it has a less disturbing effect, because by 
its sharpness it brings out the character of the leading note more distinctly. On 
the other hand, I have found minor chords with Pythagorean Thirds absolutely 
intolerable when coming between justly-intoned major and minor chords.* By 

T allowing, then, a Pythagorean Seventh in the scale, or a Pythagorean major Third 
in the chord of the dominant Seventh, we may form the following minor scales : f — 



9) dj minor : g^ - 

10) ^1 minor : c^ - 

11) Cy minor : /^ - 

12) /i minor : 6^^ - 

13) bi\f minor : e^^ - 

14) e^b minor : a^^ - 



b\} + dj 


-/ + «i 


...Cilf 


«b + 01 


- ^b + ^1 


•••/l+f 


a\} + Ci 


- eb + <7i 


...6j 


d\} +/i 


- ab + c^ 


• • . C| 


gb + ^ib 


- ^b + /i 


... di 


cb + Cjb 


- gb + ^ib 


...^2 



I di 

I?! 

"A 



* [My own experience is that the minor 
chorda even more than the major shew the 
vast superiority of the just intonation over the 
equal temperament ; and that the occasional 
introduction of Pythagorean among justly- 
intoned chords, major or minor, is comparable 
only to the ' wolves * on the * bad keys,' as E\f 
or E, of the old oxgan tuning. My instru- 



ments enable me to compare these effects 
readily, and both arise from similar, though 
not the same causes. — Translator,] 

■f-[In which (...) represents the Pythago- 
rean major Third of 408 cents and ( | ) the 
Pythagorean minor Third of 294 cents. — 
Translator.] 



CHAP. XVI. HARMONIUM IN JUST INTONATION. 319 

In the former series, Nos. 8 and 7, we had already b\) minor and e\} minor, 
which are a comma sharper than Nos. 13 and 14. Hence the series of minor keys 
is also completed by the fusion of their extremities through enharmonic inter- 
change. 

In most cases it is possible to transpose the music to be play6d on such instru- 
ments, so as to avoid the necessity of making these enharmonic interchanges, pro- 
vided the modulations do not extend too far into different keys. But if it is not 
possible to avoid enharmonic interchanges, they mu^ be introduced where two 
unrelated * chords follow each other. This is best done between dissonant chords. 
Naturally this enharmonic change is always necessary when a piece of music 
modulates through the whole circle of Fifths — from C major to ^ major, for 
example. But Hauptmann is certainly right when he characterises such circular 
modulation as unnatural artificiality, which could only be rendered possible by the 
imperfections of our modem system of temperament. Such a process must cer- % 
tainly destroy the hearer's feeling for the unity of the tonic. For although Bjt 
has very nearly the same pitch as C, or can be even improperly identified with it, 
the hearer can only restore .his feeling for the former tonic by going back on the 
same path that he advanced. He cannot possibly retain his recollection of the 
absolute pitch of the first tonic C after his long modulations up to BjL with such 
a degree of exactness as to be able to recognise that they are identical. For any 
fine artistic feeling Bjt must remain a tonic far removed from C on the dominant 
side ; or, more probably, after such distant modulations, the hearer's whole feeling 
for tonality will have become confused, and it will then be perfectly indifferent to 
him in what key the piece ends. Generally speaking, an immoderate use of strik- 
ing modulations is a suitable and easy instrument in the hands of modern com- 
posers, to make their pieces piquant and highly coloured. But a man cannot live 
upon spice, and the consequence of restless modulation is almost always the 
obliteration of artistic connection. It must not be forgotten that modulations f 
should be only a means of giving prominence to the tonic by contrasting it with 
another and then returning into it, or of attaining isolated and peculiar effects of 
expression. 

Since harmoniums with two manuals have usually two sets of vibrators for 
each manual of which the above system of tuning only uses one, I have had the 
two others (an 8-foot and a 16-foot stop) tuned in the usual equal temperament, 
which renders it very easy to compare the effect of this tuning with just intonation, 
as I have merely to pull out or push in a stop to make the difference. -j* 

As regards musical effect, the difference between the just and the equally 
tempered, or the just and the Pythagorean intonations, is very remarkable. The 
justly intoned chords, in favourable positions, notwithstanding the rather piercing 
quality of the tone of the vibrators, possess a full and as it were saturated har- 
moniousness ; they flow on, with a full stream, calm and smooth, without tremor 
or beat. Equally tempered or Pythagorean chords sound beside them rough, dull, f 
trembling, restless. The difference is so marked that every one, whether he is 
musically cultivated or not, observes it at once. Chords of the dominant Seventh 
in just intonation have nearly the same degree of roughness as a common major 
chord of the same pitch in tempered intonation. The difference between natural 
and tempered intonation is greatest and most unpleasant in the higher Octaves of 
the scale, because here the false combinational tones of the tempered intonation are 
more observable, and the number of beats for equal differences of pitch becomes 
larger, and hence the roughness greater. 

A second circumstance of essential importance is, that the differences of effect 
between major and minor chords, between different inversions and positions of 

* [That is, chords not having a common and at the same time greatly facilitating 

tone. — TranslatarJ] fingering by the use of a single manual, will 

-f Proposals for making the series of tones be found in Appendix XVII. 
in this system of intonation more complete 



320 



HARMONIUM IN JUST INTONATION. 



PART m. 



chords of the same kind, and between consonances and dissonances are much 
more decided and conspicuous, than in the equal temperament. Hence modu- 
lations become much more expressiva Many fine distinctions are sensible, which 
. otherwise almost disappear, as, for instance, those which depend on the different 
inversions and positions of chords, while, on the other hand, the intensity of the 
harsher dissonances is much increased by their contrast with perfect chords. The 
chord of the diminished Seventh, for example, which is so much used in modern 
music, borders upon the insupportable, when the other chords are tuned justly.* 
Modern musicians who, with rare exceptions, have never heard any music 
executed except in equal temperament, mostly make light of the inexactness of 
tempered intonation. The errors of the Fifths are very small. There is no doubt 
of that. And it is usual to say that the Thirds are much less perfect consonances 
than the Fifths, and consequently also less sensitive to errors of intonation. The 

f last assertion is also correct, so long as homophonic music is considered, in which 
the Thirds occur only as melodic intervals and not in harmonic combinations. In 
a consonant triad every tone is equally sensitive to false intonation, as theory and 
experience alike testify, and the bad effect of the tempered triad depends especially 
on the imperfect Thirds, f 

There can be no question that the simplicity of tempered intonation is ex- 
tremely advantageous for instrumental music, that any other intonation requires 
an extraordinarily greater complication in the mechanism of the instrument, and 
would materially increase the difficulties of manipulation, and that consequently 
the high development of modern instrumental music would not have been possible 
without tempered intonation. But it must not be imagined that the difference 
between tempered and just intonation is a mere mathematical subtil ty without any 
practical value. That this difference is really very striking even to unmusical ears, 
is shewn immediately by actual experiments with properly tuned instruments. 

f And that the early musicians, who were still accustomed to the perfect intervals of 
vocal music, which was then most carefully practised, felt the same, is immediately 
seen by a glance at the musical writings of the latter half of the seventeenth and 
the earlier part of the eighteenth centuries, at which time there was much dis- 
cussion about the introduction of different kinds of temperament, and one new 
method after another was invented and rejected for escaping the difficulties, and 
the most ingenious forms of instrument were designed for practically executing 
the enharmonic differences of the tones. Praetorius| mentions a universal 
cymbalum, which he saw at the house of the court-organist of the Emperor 
Eudolph II. in Prague, and which had 77 digitals in 4 octaves, or 19 to the 
octave, the black digitals being doubled, and others inserted between those for e 
and /, and between those for h and c. § In the older directions for tuning, several 
tones are usually tuned by Fifths which beat slightly, and then others as perfect 
major Thirds. The intervals on which the errors accumulated were called wolves. 



^ * [This should be tried on the Harmonical 
as&j-d |/-ai[^. Although it has two per- 
fect minor Thirds and only one Pythagorean, 
it is a mere piece of noise, of a much worse 
kind than the noise of the equally tempered 
imitation of the same chord in the same 
quality of tone. In just intonation the chord 
of the diminished Seventh can therefore be 
used only with mild qualities of tone. But 
the real intonation of this chord is 10 : 12 : 14 
: 17, which can also be played on the Har- 
monical as «i"316 ^"267 'i'> 336 "d"'b.— 
TroMlator,] 

t[A triad in which the major Third is 
perfect, but the Fifth and minor Third both 
too small by a quarter of a comma or 5^ cents 
(as in the meantone temperament, in which I 
have a concertina tuned), has a very much 
better effect than the equally tempered triad, 



where the Fifth is only one-eleventh of a 
comma or 2 cents too flat, and the major 
Third is seven-elevenths of a comma or 14 
cents too sharp, and hence the niinor Third is 
eight-elevenths of a comma or 16 cents too 
flat. The effect is much more strongly felt 
in playing passages than in playing isolated 
chords. — Translator, 1 

X Syntagma mxisicum, II., Chap. XL, p. 
63. 

§[This was to make the meantone scale 
more complete, the scale being C ckd]^ D d$ 
e\f E i^ F f^g)yQ g^a]f A o# h^ B bt C. 
where the capitals represent the white, and 
small letters the blsKsk digitals, all m mean- 
tone temperament, the effect of which would 
have been very good on the organ. For the 
intonation of these notes see App. XX. sect. A. 
art. l^,— Translator,] 



CHAP. XVI. 



DISADVANTAGES OF TEMPERED INTONATION, 



321 



FraBtorius says : ' It is best for the wolf to remain in the wood with its abominable 
howling, and not disturb our harmonicas concorda/ntias '. Bameau, too, who at a 
later period contributed greatly to the introduction of equal temperament, in 1726 * 
still defended a dififerent style of tuning, in which the Thirds of the more usual - 
keys were kept perfect at the expense of the Fifths and of the unusual keys. 
Thus he tuned up from C, in Fifths so much diminished, that the fourth Fifth, 
instead of being E, became the perfect Third of C, namely Ei = F^. Then again 
four Fifths more to A^\}, the perfect Third of 2^, instead of to A\}. But then the 
four Fifths between this A^\} and C had necessarily f to be made too large, because 
it is not Aj)d but A\^ which is four perfect Fifths distant from C. This plan of 
tuning gives the perfect major Thirds, C + E^.G + B^, D + F^jj^ E^ + Gg^ but 
when we proceed further from E on the dominant side, or from C on the sub- 
dominant side, we find Thirds which become worse and worse. The error in the 
Fifths is about three times that in the equal temperament. Even in 1762, this f 
system could be characterised by D'Alembert as that commonly used in France, in 
opposition to the equal temperament which Bameau subsequently proposed. Mar- 
purg X has collected a l6ng series of other systems of tuning. Since players found 
themselves compelled by the use of only 12 digitals to the octave, to put up with a 
series of false intervals, and to let their ears become accustomed to them, it was 
certainly better to make up their minds to give up their few perfect major Thirds 
still remaining in the scale, and to make all the major Thirds equally erroneous. It 
necessarily produces more disturbance to hear very falsely tuned Thirds amidst 
correct intervals, than to hear intervals which are all equally out of tune and are 
not contrasted vnth others in perfect intonation. Hence as long as it is necessary 
practically to limit the number of separate tones within the octave to 12, there can 
be no question at all as to the superiority of the equal temperament with its 12 equal 
Semitones, over all others, and, as a natural consequence, this has become the sole 
acknowledged method of tuning. It is only bowed instruments, vnth [including % 
the Tenor] their four perfect Fifths G±G±D±A±Et which still deviate from it. 

The equal temperament came into use in Germany before it was introduced into 
France. In the second volume of Matheson's Critica Musical which appeared in 
1752, he mentions Neidhard and Werckmeister as the inventors of this tempera- 
ment.§ Sebastian Bach had already used it for the clavichord (clavier), as we 
must conclude from Marpurg's report of Eimberger's assertion, that when he was 
a pupil of the elder Bach he had been made to tune all the major Thirds too sharp. 
Sebastian's son, Emanuel, who was a celebrated pianist, and published in 1753 a 



* Noiweau SysUme de Mtisique, Ghap. 
XXIV. 

t[That is, if only twelve digitals might 
be used, so that the temperament became 
unequal. But this style of tuning, whioh at 
first was the meantone temperament, where 
the Fifths are made a quarter of a comma too 
flat, should be carried out through twenty-six 
Fifths, requiring twenty- seven tones (namely, 

7 natural, 7 shaip, 7 flat, 8 double sharf), and 

8 double flat) to be really effective, and iif any 
fewer are employed no attempt should be made 
to modulate into keys not provided with proper 
tones. It is a temperament with which I am 
practically familiar. It is harmonically far 
superior to the equally tempered, and is even 
endurable on the concertina, which used to be 
always so tuned, but having fourteen digitals, 
extends from A)^to Djj^ The twelve digitals 
could play then only in Bk F, C, G, D, and 
A major, and in G, D, and A minor, which of 
course failed to satisfy the requirements of 
modulation. Hence players sought to identify 
DJ, iljj, Jljf, 2?| ft 5jf jf. 0» J with ^b, Bb, 
F, Of Z), A on the one hand, and D\^, O^, ^b* 
Fb. Bbb, E\, b. ^\> b with Ct^F^B, E,A, 



D, G on the other. Hence came the wolves. 
And a system of tuning was blamed for not 
doing what it never professed to do. As long 
as twelve digitals only are insisted on, the 
equal temperament, by dividing the Octave 
into twelve equal Semitones, is a necessity. 
But with Mr. Bosanquet's fingerboard (App. Q 
XX. sect. F. No. 8) there is no longer any need 
to limit organs to 12 notes to the Octave. 
When, however, he played on such an organ 
before the Musical Association, great objection 
was taken to the flatness of the leading note, 
which was 5^ cents flatter than just, as musi- 
cians are accustomed to one which is 12 cents 
too sharp. — Translator,] 

Z Versuch ilber die musikalische Tempera- 
tur, Breslau, 1776. 

§ Op. ciL p. 162. The following works of 
these two autnors are cited by Forkel : Neid- 
hard (Royal Prussian Band-conductor), Die 
beste und leichteste Temperatur des Mono- 
chordi (the best and easiest temperament of 
the monochord), Jena, 1706; Sectio canonis 
harmonici, K5nigsberg, 1724. Werckmeister 
(organist at Quedlinbuxg, born 1645), Musika- 
lische Temperatur^ Frankfurt and Leipzig, 1691. 



322 DISADVANTAGES OF TEMPERED INTONATION. part hi. 

work of great authority in its day ^ on the true art of playing the clavier,' requires 
this instrument to he always tuned in the equal temperament. ""^ 

The old attempts to introduce more than 12 degrees into the scale have led 
to nothing practical, because they did not start from any right principle. They 
always attached themselves to the Greek system of Pythagoras, and imagined only 
that it was necessary to make a difference between ctt and d\^, or between /tt and 
g\}, and so on. But that is not by any means sufficient, and is not even always 
correct. According to our S3rstem of notation we may identify cjj^ with d|y, but 
we must distinguish the c^ found from the relation of Fifths, irom the cjj^ found 
from the relation of Thirds, f Hence the attempts to construct instruments with 
complex arrangements of manuals and digitals, have led to no result, which was 
at all commensurate with the trouble bestowed upon them, and the increased 
difficulties of fingering which they occasioned. The only instrument of the kind 
T which is still used is the pedal harp h double mouvementy on which the intonation 
can be changed by the foot. 

Not only habitual use, and the absence of any power to compare its effects 
with those of just intonation, but some other circumstances are favourable to equal 
temperament. 

First, it should be observed that the disturbances due to beats in the tempered 
scale, are the less observable the swifter the motion and the shorter the duration 
of the single notes. When the note is so short that but very few beats can possibly 
occur while it lasts, the ear has no time to remark their presence. The beats pro- 
duced by a tempered triad are the following : 

1. Beats of the tempered Fifth. Suppose we take the niunber of vibrations of 
c' to be 264, the tempered Fifth c' ± g would produce 9 beats in 10 seconds, partly 
by the upper partials, and partly by the combinational tones. These beats are 
always quite audible. 
T 2. Beats of the two first combinational tones of c' + e' and e' ~ ^ in tempered 
intonation ; 5f in the second. These are plainly audible in all qualities of tones, 
if the tones themselves are not too weak. 

8. Beats of the major Third c' + e' alone, 10^ in the second, which, however, 
are not plainly audible unless the qualities of tone employed have high upper 
partials. 

4. Beats of the minor Third e' - g\ 18 in the second, mostly much weaker than 
those of the major Third, and also heard only in qualities of tone having high 
upper partials. 

All these beats occur twice as fast when the chord lies an Octave higher, and 
half as fast when it occurs an Octave lower. 

Of these beats, the first, arising from the tempered Fifths, have the least 
injurious influence on the harmoniousness of the chord. They are so slow that 
they can be heard only for very slow notes in the middle parts of the scale, and 
T then they produce a slow undulation of the chord which may occasionally have a 
good effect. Beats of the second kind are most striking for the softer quality of 
tone. In an Allegro, of four crotchets in a bar, two bars occupy about three 
seconds. If, then, the tempered chord c' + e' - g' is played on a crotchet in this 
bar, 2^ of these beats will be heard, so that if the tone begins soft, it will swell, 
decrease, swell again, decrease and then finish. It would be certainly worse if 
this chord were played an Octave or two higher, so that 4^ or 8| beats could be 
heard, because these could not fail to strike the ear as a marked roughness. 

For the same reason the beats of the third and fourth kinds, arising from the 
Thirds, which are clearly audible on harsher qualities of tone (as on the har- 
monium), are also decidedly disturbing in the middle positions, even in quick time, 

* [Equal temperament was not commer- Te^nperameni^ pp. 27*32. — Translator.'] 
cially established in England till 1841-1846. f [That is. cj found from c±g±d±a±e 

See App. XX. sect. N. No. 5. With regard to ±6±/tt±c4, from cA found from firat the 

both Sebastian and Emanuel Baoh*s relation major^hird c+e^ and then the Fifths 9i± 

to it, see Bosanquet's Musical IiUervaU and bi±fJff±cJl^ — TranskUor,] 



CHAP. XVI. DISAJDVANTAGES OF TEMPERED INTONATION. 323 

and essentially injure the calmness of the triad, because they are twice and thrice 
as fast as the others. It is only in soft qualities of tone that they are but little 
observed, or, when observed, are so covered by stronger unbroken tones as to be 
very slightly marked. 

Hence in rapid passages, with a soft quality and moderate intensity of tone, the 
evils of tempered intonation are but little apparent. Now, almost all instrumental 
music is designed for rapid movement, and this forms its essential advantage over 
vocal music. We might, indeed, raise the question whether instrumental music 
had not rather been forced into rapidity of movement by this very tempered into- 
nation, which did not allow us to feel the full harmoniousness of slow chords to the 
same extent as is possible from well-trained singers, and that instruments had 
consequently been forced to renounce this branch of music. 

Tempered intopation was first and especially developed on the pianoforte, and 
hence gradually transferred to other instruments. Now, on the pianoforte circum- T 
stances really favour the concealment of the imperfections due to the temperament. 
The tones of a pianoforte are very loud only at the moment of striking, and their 
loudness rapidly diminishes. This, as I have already had occasion to mention, 
causes their combinational tones to be audible at the first moment only, and hence 
makes them very difi&cult to hear. Beats drom that source must therefore be left 
out of consideration. The beats which depend on the upper partials have been 
eliminated in modem pianofortes (especially in the higher Octaves, where they 
would have done most harm), owing to the mode in which upper partials are 
greatly weakened and the quality of tone much softened by regulating the striking 
place, as I have explained in Chap. Y. (p. 77&). Hence on a pianoforte the defi- 
ciencies of the intonation are less marked than on any instrument vdth sustained 
tones, and yet are not quite absent. When I go from my justly-intoned har- 
monium to a grand pianoforte, every note of the latter sounds false and disturbing, 
especially when I strike isolated successions of chords. In rapid melodic figures f 
and passages, and in arpeggio chords, the effect is less disagreeable. Hence older 
musicians especially recommended the equal temperament for the pianoforte alone. 
Matheson, in doing so, acknowledges that for organs Silberman's unequal tempera- 
ment, in which the usual keys were kept pure,* is more advantageous. Emanuel 
Bach says that a correctly tuned pianoforte has the most perfect intonation of all 
instruments, which in the above sense is correct. The great diffusion and conve- 
nience of pianofortes made it subsequently the chief instrument for the study of 
music and its intonation the pattern for that of all other instruments. 

On the other hand, for the harsher stops on the organ, as the mixture and reed 
stops, the deficiencies of equal temperament are extoemely striking. It is con- 
sidered inevitable that when the mixture stops are played with full chords an awful 
din (hdllenUirm) must ensue, and organists have submitted to their fate. Now this 
is mainly due to equal temperament, because if the Fifths and Thirds in the pipes 
for each digital of the mixture stops were not tuned justly, every single note would IT 
produce beats by itself. But when the Fifths and Thirds between the notes 
belonging to the different digitals are tuned in equal temperament, every chord 
furnishes at once tempered and just Fifths and Thirds, and the result is a restless 
blurred confusion of sounds. And yet it is precisely on the organ it would be so 
easy by a few stops to regulate the action for each key so as to produce harmonious 
chords, f 

Whoever has heard the difference between justly-intoned and tempered chords, 
can feel no doubt that it would be the greatest possible gain for a large organ to 
omit half its stops, which are mostly mere toys, and double the number of tones 



* [Probably this was the meantone tern- 1850 there is a deBcription of an organ by 
perament explained on p. 821, note f. — Trana- Poole, whioh is tuned justly for all keys 
lator.] by means of stops. (See App. XYIII. second 

•{■From Zamminer's book (p. 140), I see that paragraph, and App. AX. sect. F. No. 7, where 
in Silliinan's American Journal of 8oieno$ for Poole*8 new keyboard without stops is figured.] 

y2 



324 



DISADVANTAGES OF TEMPERED INTONATION. 



PABT in. 



in the Octave, so as to be able, by means of suitable stops, to play correctly in all 
keys.* 

The case is the same for the harmonium as for these stops on the organ. Its 
powerful false combinational tones and its gritty trembling chords, both due to 
tempered intonation, are certainly the reason why many musicians pronounce this 
instrument to be out of tune, and dismiss it at once as too trying to the nerves. 

Orchestral instruments can generally alter their pitch slightly. Bowed instru- 
ments are perfectly unfettered as to intonation ; wind instruments can be made a 
little sharper or flatter by blowing with more or less force. They are, indeed, all 
adapted for equal temperament, but good players have the means of indulging the 
ear to some extent. Hence, passages in Thirds for wind instruments, when 
executed by indifferent players, often sound desperately false {verzweifelt falsch\ 
whereas good performers, with delicate ears, make them sound perfectly well. 

T The bowed instruments are peculiar. From the first they have retained their 
tuning in perfect Fifths. The violins themselves have the perfect Fifths, G ± D 
± A ± E. The tenor and violoncello give the Fifth C ± G in addition. Now, 
every scale has its awn peculiar fingering, and hence every pupil could be easily 
practised in playing each scale in its proper intonation, and then, of course, tones 
of the same name but in different keys could not be stopped in the same way, and 
even the major Third of the major scale of C, when the C of the tenor is taken 
as the tonic, must not be played on the E string of the violin, because this gives 
E and not Ey Nevertheless, the modem school of violin-playing since the time 
of Spohr, aims especially at producing equally-tempered intonation, although this 
cannot be completely attained, owing to the perfect Fifths of the open strings. At 
any rate, the acknowledged intention of present violin-players is to produce only 
12 degrees in the Octave. The sole exception which they allow is for double-stop 
passages, in which the notes have to be somewhat differently stopped from what 

iTthey are when played alone. But this exception is decisive. In double-stop 
passages the individual player feels himself responsible for the harmoniousness of 
the interval, and it lies completely within his power to make it good or bad. Any 
violin-player will easily be able to verify the following fact. Tune the strings of 
the violin in the perfect Fifths G ± D ± A ± E, and find where the finger must be 
pressed on the A string to produce the J?, which will give a perfect Fourth B , . . E. 
Now, let him, without moving his finger, strike this same B together with the 
open D string. The interval D...B would, according to the usual view, be a 
major Sixth, but it would be a Pythagorean one [of 906 cents]. In order to 
obtain the consonant Sixth D,..B^ [of 884 cents], the finger would have to be 
drawn back for about 1| Paris lines (nearly /^ inch), a distance quite appreciable 
in stoppings, and sufficient to alter the pitch and the beauty of the consonance 
most perceptibly. 

But it is clear that if individual players feel themselves obliged to distinguish 

% the different values of the notes in the different consonances, there is no reason 
why the bad Thirds of the Pythagorean series of Fifths should be retained in 
quartette playing. Chords of several parts, executed by several performers in 
a quartette, often sound very ill, even when each single one of these performers 
can perform solo pieces very well and pleasantly ; and, on the other hand, when 
quartettes are played by finely -cultivated artists, it is impossible to detect any false 
consonances. To my mind the only assignable reason for these results is that 
practised violinists with a delicate sense of harmony, know how to stop the tones 
they want to hear, and hence do not submit to the rules of an imperfect school. 



* [That is, Bs correctly as on the Author's 
justly-intoned harmonium, but that is far too 
deficient in power of modulation into minor 
keys, to make it worth while to construct it 
on a great organ. Nothing short of the 58 
division of the Octave (p. 828c) would suffice, 
and this would necessitate the omission of 



more than three-quarters instead of only one- 
half of the stops. And then masioians would 
have to learn how to use a practically jost 
scale, and how to adapt tempered mosio to it, 
both of which present considerable difficulties. 
It, is, therefore, safe to say that nothing of the 
kind will be done. — Translator,] 



CHAP. XVI. 



DISADVANTAGES OP TEMPERED INTONATION. 



325 



That performers of the highest rank do really play in just intonation, has been 
directly proved by the very interesting and exact results of Delezenne.^ This 
observer determined the individual notes of the major scale, as it was played by 
distinguished violinists and violoncellists, by means of an accurately gauged string, 
and found that these players produced correctly perfect Thirds and Sixths, and 
neither equally tempered nor Pythagorean Thirds or Sixths. I was fortunate 
enough to have an opportunity of making similar observations by means of my 
harmonium on Herr Joachim. He tuned his violin exactly with the g±d±a±e 
of my instrument. I then requested him to play the scale, and immediately he 
had played the Third or Sixth, I gave the corresponding note on the harmonium. 
By means of beats it was easy to determine that this distinguished musician used 
bi and not b as the major Third to g, and e^ not e as the Sixth, f But if the best 
players who are thoroughly acquainted with what they are playing are able 
to overcome the defects of their school and of the tempered system, it would T 
certainly wonderfully smooth the path of performers of the second order, in their 
attempts to attain a perfect ensemble, if they had been accustomed from the first 
to play the scales by natural intervals. The greater trouble attending the first 
attempts would be amply repaid by the result when the ear has once become 
accustomed to hear perfect consonance& It is really much easier to apprehend 
the differences between notes of the same name in just intonation than people 
usually imagine, when the ear has once become accustomed to the effect of just 
consonances. A confusion between a^ and a in a consonant chord on my har- 
monium strikes me with the same readiness and certainty as a confusion between 
A and J|^ on a pianoforte.^ 

I am, however, too little acquainted with the technicalities of violin-playing, 
to attempt making any proposals for a definite regulation of the tonal system of 
bowed instruments. This must be left to masters of this instrument who at the 
same time possess the powers of a composer. Such men will readily convince f 
themselves by the testimony of their ears, that the facts here adduced are correct, 
and perceive that, far from being useless mathematical speculations, they are 
practical questions of very great importance. 

The case is precisely similar for our present singers. For singing, intonation 
is perfectly free, whereas on bowed instruments, the five tones of the open strings 
at least have an unalterable pitch. In singing the pitch can be made most easily 
and perfectly to follow the wishes of a fine musical ear. Hence all music began 
with singing ; § and singing will always remain the true and natural school of all 
music. The only intervals which singers can strike with certainty and perfection, 
are such as they can comprehend with certainty and perfection, and what the 
singer easily and naturally sings the hearer will also easily and naturally under- 
stand.** 



* Reoueil des Travaux de la SocUU des 
SeUnceSf ds V Agriculture, et de* Arts de LiUe, 
1826 &t premier semestre 1827 ; Mimoire sur 
lee Valeura num&riqtie des Notes de la Qamme^ 
par M. Delezenne. [See especially pp. 66-6.] 
rot obaenrations on corresponding circum- 
stances in singing, see Appendix XYIII. 

t Messrs. Coma and Mercadier have in- 
deed published oontradictozy observations. 
(Comptee Rendus de VAcad, des Sc, de Paris, 8 
et 22 F^vrier, 1869.) They let a musician play 
the Third of a major chord first in melodic suc- 
cession, and then in harmonious consonance. 
In the latter case it was always 4: 6. But 
in melodic succession the performer selected 
a somewhat sharper Third. I am bound to 
reply, that in melodic succession the major 
Third is not a veiy characteristically deter- 
mined interval, and that all living musicians 
have been accustomed to sharp Thirds on the 
pianoforte. In the simple succession c+e-g, 



when isolated from the rest of the scale, I 
find it difficult to distinguish between the just IT 
and the Pythagorean major Third. But when 
I play on my harmonium the complete melody 
of some well-known air without harmonies the 
Pythagorean Third always feels to me strained, 
the perfect Third calm and soft. It is only in 
the leading note, perhaps, that the sharper 
Third is more expressive. [See App. XX. 
sect. G. arts. 6 and 7, for the results of later 
experiments by Messrs. Gornu and Mercadier. 
^Translator,] 

X [In a consonant chord the difference is 
striking, melodically not so. An eminent 
teacher of singing could only by great atten- 
tion tell the difference when I alternated a-^, a 
and dL, d in the major scale of C. — Translator,] 

§ [It must not be forgotten, however, that 
the voice was the only musical instrument at 
first known. — Translator,] 

** [That this must also apply to non-har- 



326 



DISADVANTAGES OP TEMPERED INTONATION. 



PABT ni. 



Down to the seventeenth century singers were practised by the monochord, for 
which Zarlino in the middle of the sixteenth century reintroduced the correct 
natural intonation. Singers were then practised with a degree of care of which 
we have at present no conception. We can even now see from the Italian music 
of the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries that they were calculated for most perfect 
intonation of the chords, and that their whole effect is destroyed as soon as this 
intonation is executed with insufficient precision. 

But it is impossible not to acknowledge that at the present day few even of our 
opera singers are able to execute a little piece for several voices, when either 
totally unaccompanied, or at most accompanied by occasional chords (as, for 
example, the trio for the three masks, Protegga U giusto cielo, from the finale to 
the first act of Mozart's Don GhiovcMm), in a manner suited to give the hearer a 
full enjoyment of its perfect harmony. The chords almost always sound a little 

f sharp or uncertain, so that they disturb a musical hearer. But where are our 
singers to learn just intonation and make their ears sensitive for perfect chords ? 
They are from the first taught to sing to the equally-tempered pianoforte. If a 
major chord is struck as an accompaniment, they may sing a perfect consonance 
with its root, its Fifth, or its Third. This gives them about the fifth part of a 
Semitone for their voices to choose from without decidedly singing out of harmony, 
and even if they sing a little sharper than consonance with the sharp Third 
requires, or a little flatter than consonance with the flat Fifth requires, the 
harmoniousness of the chord will not be reaUy much more damaged. The singer 
who practises to a tempered instrument has no principle at all for exactly and 
certainly determining the pitch of his voice. '^ 

On the other hand, we often hear four musical amateurs who have practised 
much together, singing quartettes in perfectly just intonation. Indeed, my own 
experience leads me almost to affirm that quartettes are more frequently heard 

f with just intonation when sung by young men who scarcely sing anything else, 
and often and regularly practise them, than when sung by instructed solo singers 
who are accustomed to the accompaniment of the pianoforte or the orchestra. But 
correct intonation in singing is so far above all others the first condition of beauty, 
that a song when sung in correct intonation even by a weak and unpractised voice, 
always sounds agreeable, whereas the richest and most practised voice offends the 
hearer when it sings false, or sharpens. 

The case is the same as for bowed instruments. The instruction of our present 
singers by means of tempered instruments is unsatisfactory, but those who possess 
good musical talents are ultimately able by their own practice to strike out the 
right path for themselves, and overcome the error of their original instruction. 
They even succeed the earlier, perhaps, the sooner they quit school, although, of 
course, I do not mean to deny that fluency in singing, and the disuse of all kinds 
of bad ways can only be acquired in school. 

f It is clearly not necessary to temper the instruments to which the singer 
practise& A single key suffices for these exercises, and that can be correctly 
tuned. We do not require to use the same piano for the teaching to sing and for 
playing sonatas. Of course it would be better to practise the singer to a justly- 
intoned organ or harmonium in which by means of two manuals all keys may be 
U8ed.f Sustained tones are preferable as an accompaniment because the singer 
himself can immediately hear the beats between the instrument and his voice 
when he alters the pitch slightly. Draw his attention to these beats, and he will 



monic scales is evident from the fact that 
music has existed for thoasands of years, but 
harmonic scales have been in use only a few 
centuries, and are far from being even yet 
universal. — TranalatorJ] 

• See Appendix XVni. 

t [Voices differ so much that the same 
pitch for the tonic, that is the same key, 



would not suit. Still the Harmonical, or, for 
modulating purposes, the just harmonium or 
just concertina, may prove of service. Other- 
wise special instruments must be used, as Mr. 
Colin Brown's Yoice-Harmonium. The Tonic 
Sol-faists teach without any accompaniment, 
not even that of the teacher's voice, but 
rapidly introduce part music. — Translator.] 



CHAP. XVI. DISADVANTAGES OF TEMPERED INTONATION. 327 

then have a means of checking his own voice in the most decisive manner. This 
is very easy on my justly-intoned harmonium, as I know by experience. It is 
only after the singer has learned to hear every slight deviation from correctness 
announced by a striking incident, that it becomes possible for him to regulate the 
motions of his larynx and the tension of his vocal chords with sufficient delicacy 
to produce the tone which his ear demands. When we require a delicate use of 
the muscles of any part of the human body, as, in this case, of the larynx, there 
must be some sure means of ascertaining whether success has been attained. Now 
the presence or absence of beats gives such a means of detecting success or failure 
when a voice is accompanied by sustained chords in just intonation. But tempered 
chords which produce beats of their own are necessarily quite unsuited for such a 
purpose. 

Finally, we cannot, I think, fail to recognise the influence of tempered intona- 
tion upon the style of composition. The first effect of this influence was favourable. 1" 
It allowed composers as well as players to move freely and easily into all keys, and 
thus opened up a new wealth of modulation. On the other hand, we likewise cannot 
fail to recognise that the alteration of intonation also compelled composers to have 
recourse to some such wealth of modulation. For when the intonation of consonant 
chords ceased to be perfect, and the differences between their various inversions 
and positions were, as a consequence, nearly obliterated, it was necessary to use 
more powerful means, to have recourse to a frequent employment of harsh disso- 
nances, and to endeavour by less usual modulations to replace the characteristic 
expression, which the harmonies proper to the key itself had ceased to possess. 
Hence in many modern compositions dissonant chords of the dominant Seventh 
form the majority, and consonant chords the minority, yet no one can doubt that 
this is the reverse of what ought to be the case ; and continual bold modulational 
leaps threaten entirely to destroy the feeling for tonality. These are unpleasant 
symptoms for the further development of art. The mechanism of instruments f 
and attention to their convenience, threaten to lord it over the natural require- 
ments of the ear, and to destroy once more the principle upon which modem 
musical art is founded, the steady predominance of the tonic tone and tonic chord. 
Among our great composers, Mozart and Beethoven were yet at the commence- 
ment of the reign of equal temperament. Mozart had still an opportunity of 
making extensive studies in the composition of song. He is master of the sweetest 
possible harmoniousness, where he desires it, but he is almost the last of such 
masters. Beethoven eagerly and boldly seized the wealth offered by instrumental 
music, and in his powerful hands it became the appropriate and ready tool for 
producing effects which none had hitherto attempted. But he used the human 
voice as a mere handmaid, and consequently she has also not lavished on him the 
highest magic of her beauty. 

And after all, I do not know that it was so necessary to sacrifice correctness of 
intonation to the convenience of musical instruments. As soon as violinists havef 
resolved to play every scale in just intonation, which can scarcely occasion any 
difficulty, the other orchestral instruments will have to suit themselves to the 
correcter intonation of the violins. Horns and trumpets have already naturally 

just intonation.* 

Moreover, we must observe that when just intonation is made the groundwork 
of modulations, even comparatively simple modulational excursions will occasion 
enharmonic confusions (amounting to a comma) which do not appear as such in 
the tempered system.f 

To me it seems necessary that the new tonic into which we modulate should 

* [Referring to this passage, Mr. Blaikley la praotioe *. See the whole of this paper, 

says {Proceedings of the Mtisical Association, and the discussion on it, and also see supra, 

vol. iv. p. 56) : ' This must be taken as being pp. 97<2, 996, notes. — Translator,] 
particularly and not generally true, that is, f [See p. 824d, note *, and p. 340c, note *. 

though the ideal instrument has such charac- — Translator.] 
teristics, this ideal is not necessarily attained 



828 



RULES OF MODULATION. 



PA.BT Ul. 



be related to the tonic in which we are playing ; the nearer the relationship, the 
more striking the transition. Again, it is not advisable to remain long in a key 
which is not related to the principal tonic of the piece. With these principles the 
rules for modulation usually given coincide. The easiest and most usual tran- 
sitions are into the key of the dominant or subdominant, these tones being, as is 
well known, the nearest relations of the first tonic. Hence if the original key is C, 
we can pass immediately into G major, and thus change the tones F and Aioi the 
scale of C major into Fjj^ and A, Or we can pass into F major by exchanging B, 
and D for B]^ and Dy After this step has been made, the music will often pass 
into a key with a tonic related to G in the second degree only, as from G to X) or 
from F to B\^. By proceeding in this way we should come to keys as A and E\}, 
of which the relation to the original tonic G would be very obscure and in which 
it would certainly not be advisable to remain long for fear of too much weakening 

f the feeling for the original tonic. 

Again, we may also modulate from the principal tonic C to its Thirds and 
Sixths, to Ej^ and A^^ or E^\f and A^\^. In tempered intonation these changes 
seem to be the same as from G and D to A and E, or from F and B\^ to E)^ and 
A\^. But they differ in the pitch, as shewn by the different marks A and A^j &c. 
In the tempered intonation it seems allowable to go by a Sixth from c to the key a, 
and then by Fifths back to d, g, and then c again. But in reality we thus reach 
a different c from that with which we began. By such a transition, which is 
certainly not quite natural, we should be obliged to make an enharmonic exchange 
[alteration of pitch by a comma], and this would be best done while in the key of d^ 
since both d and d^^ are related to c in the second degree. In the complicated 
modulations of modern composers such enharmonic changes will of course have 
to be often made. A cultivated taste will have to judge in each individual case 
how they are to be introduced, but it will be probably advisable to retain the rules 

f already mentioned, and to choose the intonation of the new tonics introduced by 
modulation in such a manner as will keep them as closely related to the principal 
tonic as possible. Enharmonic changes are least observed when they are made 
immediately before or after strongly dissonant chords, as those of the diminished 
Seventh. Such enharmonic changes of pitch are- already sometimes clearly and 
intentionally made by violinists, and where they are suitable even produce a very 
good effect.* 

-f If we desire to produce a scale in almost precisely just intonation, which vrill 
allow of an indefinite power of modulation without having recourse to enhar- 
monic changes, I we can effect our purpose by the division of the Octave into 53 
exactly equal parts, as was long ago proposed by Mercator [to represent Pytha- 
gorean intonation]. Mr. R H. M. Bosanquet § has recently provided this tem- 
perament as realised on an harmonium, with a symmetrically arranged finger- 
board. When the Octave is divided into 53 equal intervals or degrees, 31 such 

f degrees give an almost perfect Fifth, the error of which is only ^\ of the error 
of the Fifth of the usual equal temperament, and 17 of these degrees give a major 
Third, of which the error in defect is only | of the above-named error of the Fifth 
in equal temperament.** The error of the Fifth in this system must be considered 



* See examples in 0. E. Naumann*s BesHm- 
mungen der TonverJUUtnisse (Determinations 
of the Tonal Ratios), Leipzig, 1858, pp. 48, sqq. 

t[From here to the end of the chapter 
is an addition to the 4th German edition. — 
Translator.] 

X [This is unfortunately not the case when 
translating equally tempered music, as shewn 
by the last example. — l^anskUor.] 

%An Elementary Treatise on Mttsical In- 
tervals and Temperament, London, Macmillan, 
1875. The instrument described was ex- 
hibited in the Scientific Loan Exhibition at 
South Kensington [in May, 1876, and is still 



in Boom Q of the Scientific CJoUections at the 
South Kensington Museum]. 

** On converting the ratio of the extent of 
the interval of a Fifth to that of an Octave 
(that is log. 1*5 : log. 2) into a continued frac- 
tion, we get the following approximations : 



58 
81 



806 Fifths. 
179 Octaves. 



12- 
nearly=s 7 

And by a similar approximation 

8 28 59 major Thirds, 

nearly « 1 9 19 Octaves. 

[As these approximations give no ooncep- 



OHAP. XVI. 



THE CYCLE OF FIFTYTHREE. 



329 



as quite inappreoiable, that of the major Third is still more difficult to perceive than 
that of the equally tempered Fifth.* In these degrees the major scale will be 

C D E^ F G A^ B^ C 
degrees 9 17 22 31 39 48 53 
differences 9 8 5 9 8 9 5 

These differences of 9, 8, 5 correspond to the major, minor, and half Tone of 
the just scale. Each separate degree of the scale corresponds nearly with the 
interval 77 : 76 [ = 22*6 cents] and is therefore extremely little greater than the 
comma 81 : 80 [= 21*5 cents], which in the just scale gives the difference between 
a large or diatonic Semitone [16 : 15 » 112 cents] and a small Semitone or limma 
[256 : 243 » 90 cents]. The ear cannot distinguish this scale from the just,f and 
in its practical applications it admits of unlimited modulation in what is equal to 
exact intonation. The difference between our c^ and c, or our c and c^ would answer 
to sharpening by one degree. Mr. Bosanquet therefore employs the convenient T 
signs \ c for Cj and / c for c^, \ \ c for Cj, &c. These signs, \ and / , he also 
employs before notes on the staff, exactly as we employ jt and |>. The fingerboard is 
arranged in a very comprehensible and symmetrical way to make the fingering of 
all scales and all chords the same in all keys.| A diagram of the keyboard will 
be found in App. XIX. § 

Perhaps a justification is needed for our having in this whole theory of keys 
and modulations, identified the key of the Octave with that of its root, while 

tion of the extreme oloseness with which the mate to just intonation, I annex the following 
68 diviaion, if accurately tuned, would approxi- table : 



Note 


Just cents 


68 divirion 
cents. 


No. of 
degrees 


C 

E 
F 

a 
c' 




21-506 

182*404 

208-910 

815-641 

886-814 

470-781 

498-045 

701-955 

818-687 

884-859 

968-826 

996-091 

1017-597 

1068-269 

1200-000 

1804-955 




22-642 

181-182 

208-774 

816-981 

884-906 

475-472 

498-118 

701-887 

815-094 

888-019 

978-585 

996-226 

1018-868 

1066-792 

1200-000 

1818-208 



1 
8 
9 
14 
17 
21 
22 
81 
86 
89 
48 
44 
45 
48 
58 
58 



Hence for all tertian intervals the approxima- 
tion is within 2 cents, often within 1 cent. 
The septimal comma being greater than 1 
degree, the ^B^ is too sharp by 5 cents. 
Still the 58 div. chord C : E^ : O : ^B^ is a 
great improvement on the juste : E^: O : B^, 
The 17th harmonic is 8 cents too sharp, but 
the chord of the diminished Seventh in the 
58 div. E^ : G : "^Bjf : "£)(, is much superior 
to the just form E^ : G : B}^ : IP^, though 
from its just surroundings inferior in effect 
to the equally tempered S : G : B\f : i>|^. — 
Translator.] 

* [Both, however, give rise to beats which 
are of great importance to the tuner. See 
App. XX. sect. Q. art. 20. — Translator.] 

t [Melodically ; but harmonically, at least 
as the intervals were tuned on Mr. Bosanquet's 
instrument, there was a decidedly perceptible 
difference to an ear, accustomed as mine was, 
to listen to just intonation. — Translator.] 



X [Prof. Helmholtz adds, * after a plan in- 
vented by the American, Mr. H. W. Poole '. If 
have omitted l^is line because, although Mr. 
Poolers remarkable fingerboard (figured in 
App. XX. sect. F. No. 7) also allows of playing 
with the same fingering in all keys, it was 
not intended for the 58 division, and it bears 
no resemblance to that of Mr. Bosanquet, who 
has the exclusive merit of inventing and prac- 
tically carrying out his extraordinary * general- 
ised keyboard,* which is suitable for all cycles 
(except the ordinary one of 12) that resolve the 
tones used into a series of tempered Fifths. See 
App. XX. sect. A. art. 20 sqq. — Translator.] 

§[In App. XX. sect. F. No. 8, 1 have added 
a further account of this invention, and {ibid. 
No. 9) a notice of another keyboard for a reed 
instrument called the Harmon^ also using the 
53 division, invented and executed by Mr. James 
Paul White, a tuner, of Springfield, Massachu- 
setts, U.S. America. — Translator.] 



330 DISSONANT INTERVALS. part m. 

we have distdnguished the key of the Twelfth. In the usual school of musical 
theory, the meaning of the sound of the Octave is completely identified with that 
of its root, and is so treated. For us, on the other hand, the Octave is only the 
Tone most nearly and clearly related to the root, but its relationship is the same 
in kind as that of the Twelfth, or the next higher major Third (Seventeenth) to 
the root. 

Now we have shewn in p. 273a that in the particular relation of the forma- 
tion of scales, that is of the determination of the key, the higher Octave introduces 
the same series of directly related tones as does the lower, although in a somewhat 
different order of strength of relationship. Only throughout the formation of the 
lower Octave the tones of the major scale are favoured, and in the formation of 
the upper Octave those of the minor scale are preferred, but not to the exclusion 
of those of other scales. 

S When we proceed beyond the limits of the first Octave, the relationships of 
tone depending on the six first partials give only the Tenth and Twelfth. The 
other steps <^ the scales have then to be filled up with tones related in the second 
degree, and, among these, the relations of the Octave must have the preference, 
and next those of the Twelfth. Hence in the second Octave we have necessarily 
a repetition of the scale of the first. By this means, in the formation of scales an 
equivalence of Octaves is established, without any necessity for assuming a speci- 
fically different relation of similarity between them and the root, as we had to do 
for the other consonances. In the formation of consonant intervals, the usual 
theory of music also considers the Octaves as equivalent to the roots. This is 
within certain limits correct, because the intervals usually considered as consonant 
remain consonant when one of their tones is transposed by an Octave, or at least 
produce intervals which lie on the limits of consonance. But here the usual rule 
of the school really gave a very imperfect expression of the facts, since, as we 

T have shewn in Chapters X., XI., and XII., the degree and sequence of the con- 
sonance are really materially altered by these changes, and composers who have 
outgrown the rules of the school, have also very clearly had regard to these 
alterations. 



CHAPTER XVII. 

OF DISCORDS. 

When voices move forward melodically in part music, the general rule is that they 
must form consonances with each other. For it is only as long as they are con- 
sonant, that there is an uninterrupted fusion of the corresponding auditory sensa- 
tions. As soon as they are dissonant the individual parts mutually disturb each 
f other, and each is a hindrance to the free motion of the other. To this esthetic 
reason must be added the purely physical consideration, that consonances cause 
an agreeable kind of gentle and uniform excitement to the ear which is distin- 
guished by its greater variety from that produced by a single compound tone, 
whereas the sensation caused by intermittent dissonances is distressing and ex- 
hausting. 

However, the rule that the various parts should make consonances with each 
other, is not without exception. The esthetic reason for this rule is not opposed 
to an occasional and temporary dissonance among the various parts, provided the 
motion of the parts is so contrived as to make the directions of the different voices 
perfectly easy to follow by the ear. Hence, in addition to the general laws of scale 
and key, to which the direction of every part is subject, there are particular rules 
for the progression of voices through discords. Again, dissonances cannot be en- 
tirely excluded because consonances are physically more agreeable. That which 
is physically agreeable is an important adjunct and support to esthetic beauty, but 



CHAP. XVII. DISSONANT INTERVALS. 331 

it is certainly not identical with it. On the contrary, in all arts we frequently 
employ its opposite, that which is physically disagreeable, partly to bring the 
beauty of the first into relief, by contrast, and partly to gain a more powerful 
means for the expression of passion. Dissonances are used for similar purposes in 
music. They are partly means of contrast, to give prominence to the impression 
made by consonances, and partly means of expression, not merely for peculiar and 
isolated emotional disturbances, but generally to heighten the impression of musical 
progress and impetuosity, because when the ear has been distressed by dissonances 
it longs to return to the calm current of pure consonances. It is for this last 
reason that dissonances are prominently employed immediately before the conclu- 
sion of a piece, where they w^re regularly introduced even by the old masters of 
medieval polyphony. But to effect this object in using them, the motion of the 
parts must be so conducted that the hearer can feel throughout that the parts are 
pressing forward through the dissonance to a following consonance, and, although f 
this may be delayed or frustrated, the anticipation of its approach is the only motive 
which justifies the existence of the dissonances. 

Since any relation of pitch which cannot be expressed in small numbers is 
dissonant, and it is only the number of the consonances which is limited, the 
number of possible dissonances would be infinite were it not that the individual 
parts composing a discord in music must necessarily obey the laws of melodic 
motion, that is, must lie within the scale. Consonances have an independent right 
to exist. Our modem scales have been formed upon them. But dissonances are 
allowable only as transitions between consonancea They have no independent 
right of existence, and the parts composing them are consequently obliged to 
move within the degree of the scales, by the same laws that were established in 
favour of the consonances. 

On proceeding to a detailed consideration of the separate dissonant intervals, it 
should be remembered that in theoretical music the normal position of discords is f 
taken to be that which arranges their tones as a series of Thirds. This, for example, 
is the rule for the chord of the dominant Seventh, which consists of the root, its 
Third, Fifth, and Seventh. The Fifth forms a Third vnth the Third, and the 
Seventh forms a Third with the Fifth. Hence we can consider a Fifth to be com- 
posed of two, and a Seventh of three Thirds. By inverting Thirds we obtain 
Sixths, by inverting Fifths we obtain Fourths, and by inverting Sevenths we 
obtain Seconds. In this way all the intervals in the scale are reproduced. 

Using the present modification of Hauptmann's notation, it is easily seen how 
different intervals of the same name must differ from each other in magnitude. 
We have only to remember that o^ is a comma higher than c, and c^ two commas 
lower than c^ and one comma lower than c, and that the comma is about the fifth 
part of a Semitone. 

To obtain a general view of both the magnitude and roughness of the dissonant 
intervals, I have constructed fig. 61 (p. 333a), in which the curve of roughness is f 
copied from fig. 60 A (p. 1936). The base line X Y signifies the interval of an Octave, 
upon which the individual consonant and dissonant intervals are set off ivom X, 
according to their magnitude on this scale.* On the lower side of the base are 
marked the twelve equal Semitones of the equally-tempered scale [each distant 
from the other by 100 cents], and on the upper side the consonant and dissonant 
intervals which occur in justly-intoned scalea The magnitude of the interval is 
always to be measured on the base line from X to the corresponding vertical line. 
The vertical lines corresponding to the consonances have been produced to the 
upper margins of the diagram, and those for the dissonances have been made 
shorter. The length of the verticals intercepted between the base and the curve 
of roughness shews the comparative degree of roughness probably possessed by the 
interval when played in a violin quality of tone. 

*[That is, assuming X Y to represent the X of any line shewing the interval, gives the 
cents in an Octave or 1200, the distance from cents in that interval. — Translator,] 



332 



DISSONANT INTERVALS. 



Part in. 



* [Tabular Expression of thb Diaqrau, Fio. 61 Oppobits. 





Intervals 


No. 


HelmholtzS 

Notation, as in 

Diagram 


Ellis's NoUtion 

of Intervals 
reckoned from c 


Ratio 


Cents 

• 


Rough- 
ness 




Unison 


1 


c : c 


c : c 


1: 1 










Minor Seconds 


2 
8 


lie: 4 


c:di|> 


1 :>5/2 
15:16 


II 100 
112 


1176 
70 






4 


d : «! 


c : d^ 


9:10 


182 


38 




Major Seconds 


5 
6 


\\o:d 

C : d 


lie: (J 
c\d 


1:^4^4 
8:9 


II 200 
204 


II 25 
32 


IT 




7 




c : e«|,t 


225 :256 


224 
274 


80 






8 


«*b : 6i 


c:dj 


64:75 


24 




Minor Thirds 


9 
10 


d:f 

\\G:dt 


c : e^ 

\c'.dii 


27 :32 


294 
300 


26 

11 24 






11 


•c : tf»t 


•c : e^\f 


•5:6 


• 316 


• 20 






12 


*c : ei 


*c:«i 


•4:5 


• 886 


• 8 




Major Thirds 


18 


\\o:e 


\fi'.e 


1 : »yi6 


1 400 


II 18 







14 


b, : •^'b 


e:p\f 


25:82 


428 


25 




15 


•c:/ 


•c:f 


•3: 4 


• 498 


• 2 




Fourths 


16 


lie:/ 


lie:/ 


1 : '4^32 


II 500 


11 3 


f 




17 


ai'.d' 


c:/i 


20:27 


520 


27 






18 


6^b : «'i 


c:fJi 


18: 25 


568 


32 




Sharp Fourths 
or Flat Fifths 


19 
20 
21 






32:45 

l:>4/64 
45:64 


590 

11 600 

610 


20 

II 18 
28 






22 


•i:^ 


c:^'b 


25:86 


632 
680 


85 






28 


d : a^ 


CQi 


27:40 


44 




Fifths 


24 


\\c:g 


\c: g 


1 : iyi28 


11 700 


II 1 






25 


•c: g 


*c : g 


•2: 3 


• 702 


• 
39 






26 


e'h ' fti 


^'94 


16 :25 


772 




Minor Sixths 


27 


\^-ia 


lie: 4 


1: '^256 


11 800 


1122 


H 




28 


♦c : a»b 


•c : a'^ 


•5:8 


• 814 


• 20 






29 


•c : Oi 


•c : ttj 


•3:5 


• 884 


• 8 






30 


lie: a 


|e : a 


1 : iJ/612 


II 900 


11 22 




Major Sixths 


81 


f:d' 


c : a 


16 :27 


906 


24 






82 


b, : a^t 


c : 6«l>b 


75: 128 


926 


24 






83 


d'b : b, 


c : oj^ 


128 : 225 


976 
996 


15 






34 


d\d 


e : 6[^ 


9: 16 


28 




Minor Sevenths 


35 


lie : b), 


He : 61, 


1 : »yi024 


1 1000 


11 24 






36 


e^id' 


e:6»l> 


5:9 


1018 


25 

42 

II 48 




Major Sevenths 


37 

38 


c : bi 

\c:b 


e:& 

le: 6 


8:15 
1 : '4/2048 


1088 
1 1100 

• 1200 




Octave 


39 


*c: d 


""C'.d 


•i :2 


• 



K'iffWf: 














\ I '■ '• " 




^—{24) tempei«d Fifth tepruenting (36) 

'Z- JOBI Fifth, ID. 0, uid (28) gnve 

'S- Fifth, TO. 4*. 

S^(16) jnat Fourth. 

'£tr-(16) tempered Fonrth, TepreBenting _ 

'»• (16) jort Fourth, TO. 2, (uid (17) T 

■cute Fourth, ro. 27. 

1^— (39) just major Sixth. 

.K— (12) juBt major Thiid. 

:«— /33) extreme sharp Sixth. 

i?K— (18) tempet«d major Third, repreMnt- 

iS* lug (12) juit major Third, ro. 8, 

and (14) dimiuithad Fooiih.ro. 
36,~and also the P]rtbagorean 

.J. m»jorThird,if required, ro. 19. 

;$(^(S0) tempered sharp Fourth ot flat 

*» Fifth, repregenting (19) falie 

Fourth or Tritooe. ro. 30, (21) 
diminished Fifth, ro. 28, (18) 
EUperfluouB Fourth, ro, 82, ana 
(32) aoute diminished Fifth, 
ro. 86. 
■Pythagorean major Third e : e = l\ = 

40e cants. Seep. 334, note:;. 1 

-(38) just minor Sixth. 
•(11) juat minor Third. 
-(19) false Fourth or Tritone. 

;^^— (80) tempered major Sixth, represent- 

.^. in([ (29) iuBt major Sixth, to. 8, 

(81) Fytoagoron major Sixth, 
ro. 24, and (32) diminished 

.IS. Seventh, ro. 24. 

■Sb— (27) tempered minor Sixth, represent- 

•U' '°S {^) J"Bt minor Sixth, ro. 

20, and (26) grave saperfluons 

.ff. Fifth, ro. 89. 

,9A-'(S4) minor Seventh. 

:£[— (3C) tempered minor Seventh, repre- 

•S* eenting (88) the extreme sharp 

Sixth, ro. IS; (84) the minor 

Seventh, ro. 3S, and (86) the 

acute minor Seventh, ro. 26. 

[Continued on next page.l 



334 



THIRDS AND SIXTHS. 



PART m. 



The various Thirds, Fifths, and Sevenths of the scale are found by arr&nging 
it in Thirds thus : — 

A. Tones of thb Major Scale. 



n .'5 2 5 
5 "ST T 



6 5 5 « :1S 5 

T T J T S ^T i 



B. Tones of the Minor Scale. 
b^-d \f-a^\,-{-c-e^\^ + g + b^-d \f-a^\) 



n 3 2 



e 8 
S T 







T T 



»i! 6 

T ITT 7 



For the minor soale I have assumed the usual form with the major Seventh, 
IT because scales with the minor Seventh yield the same intervals as the major 
scale.* 

I. Thirds and Sixths. 

The above schemes shew that in the justly-intoned major and minor scales, 
three kinds of Thirds occur, and their inversions give three kinds of Sixths. These 
are: 

1) The jtistly-intoned major Third |, [12, cents 386, roughness 8],t and its 
inversion the minor Sixth ^, [28, cents 814, roughness 20], both consonant. 

2) The justly 'intoned minor Third ^, [11, cents 316, roughness 20], and its 
inversion the major Sixth ^, [29, cents 884, roughness 3], also both consonant. 

3) The Pythagorean minor Third H, [9, cents 294, roughness 26], between 
the extreme tones of the key, d and /. If we used d^ in place of d, this interval 
would occur between b^ and di- On comparing this dissonant minor Third d \ f 

IT with the consonant minor Third dj -/, we find that the former is a comma 
closer than the latter, since d is a, comma sharper than d^ The Pythagorean 
minor Third is somewhat less harmonious than the just minor Third, but the 
diJQEerence between them is not so great as that between the two corresponding 
major Thirds. | The difiEerence of the two cases consists, first, in the major Third 
being a much more perfect consonance than the minor Third, and consequently 
much more liable to injury from defects of intonation ; and secondly in the nature 



Boughneas. 

II 24 — (10) tempered minor Third, represent- 
ing (11) juBt minor Third, ro. 
20 ; (8) acute augmented Tone, 
ro. 24, and (9) Pythagorean 
minor Thirds, ro. 26. 
24 — (81) Pythagorean major Sixth. 
24 — Pythagorean minor Sixth c : a b= W- 

==792 cents. 
24 — (32) diminished Seventh, 
24 — (8) augmented Tone. 
25 — (5) tempered major Second or whole 
Tone, representing (7) diminished 
minor Third, ro. SO, (6) major 
Tone, ro. 82, and (4) minor Tone, 
ro. 38. 
25— (14) diminished Fourth. 
25 — (86) acute minor Seventh. 
26 — (9) Pythagorean minor Third. 
27— (17) acute Fourth. 
28— (21) diminished Fifth. 
29--grave major Seventh c : 6j=ff =1067. 
80 — (7) diminished minor Third. 
32— (6) major Tone. 
32— (18) superfluous Fourth. 
35— (22) acute diminished Fifth. 
88 — (4) minor Tone. 
39— (26) ^rave superfluous Fifth. 
42 — (37) ]ust major Seventh. 



II 



BoaghiM 

41— (28) grave Fifth. 

48 — (88) tempered major Seventh, repre- 
senting (87) just major Seventh, 
ro. 42. 
56— great Limma c : c2>|^=|{=184 cents. 
70 — (8) just minor Second, jusl or diatonic 

Semitone. 
76— (2) tempered Semitone, representing 
(8) just Semitone, xo. 70. — 
Translator.] 
*[The remainder of this chapter should 
be followed step by step on the Harmonical, 
wherever it is possible, as is most frequently 
the case. — Translaior,] 

t [For immediate comparison I have, after 
each interval as it arises, inserted in square 
brackets, the number of the interval, the 
number of cents it contains, and its degree of 
roughness as given in the Table on p. 882. 
— TranslatorJ] 

X [The roughness of the just major Third, 
c + 0, is only 8, while that of the Pythagorean = 
^l (which is not given in the Table on p. 382, 
because it does not occur in the scale) is 
necessarily close to that of the tempered major 
Third, 18, and may probably be taken as 19, 
as will be seen by the curve m flg. 61, p. S88a. 
— 7}ranslator.'\ 



CHAP. XVII. FIFTHS AND FOURTHS. 335 

of the two combinational tones. The just minor Third d^" -f" has h\) for its 
combinational tone, which completes it into the just major triad of 6|>. The 
. Pythagorean minor Third d!" \ f*' has a^ for its combinational tone, which com- 
pletes it into the chord d \ /+ a^, and this is not a perfectly correct minor chord. 
But as the incorrect Fifth a^ lies among the deep combinational tones and is very 
weak, the difference is scarcely perceptible. Moreover, it is practically almost im- 
possible to time the interval so precisely as to insure th^ combinational tone a^ in 
place of a. But for the Pythagorean major Third c" .„e^ the combinational tone 
is 0^ which is, of course, much more anno3ring than the rather imperfect Fifth a^ 
when added to the chord d \ f* 

The Pythagorean major Third does not occur in scales tuned according to the 
conditions of harmonic music. If we used the minor Seventh b\} in place of b^\} 
for the minor scale, b\^...d would be a Pythagorean major Third.f 

The inversion of the Third ^ | / is the Pythctgorecm major Sixth f...d\ |^, [31, IT 
cents 906, roughness 24], which is a comma wider than the just major Sixth, and 
is greatly inferior to it in harmoniousness, as is clearly seen in fig. 61 (p. 333a). 

II. Fifths and Fourths. 

The Fifth is simply composed of two Thirds, and the different varieties of 
Fifths depend upon the nature of those Thirds. 

4) The just Fifth, ^, [25, cents 702, roughness 0], consists of a just major and 
a just minor Third, or | = |^ x | [cents 702 « 386 + 316]. Its inversion is the 
just Fourth ^, [15, cents 498, roughness 2]. Both are consonant. Examples in 
the major scale, / + c\ a^ ± e(, c ± g, Bi ± b^, g ± d. 

5) The grave or imperfect Fifth d...a^ ^, [23, cents 680, roughness 44], a 
comma [of 22 cents] less than the just Fifth, consists of a Pythagorean minor and 
a just major Third, |^ » 32 ^ « [cents 680 » 294 + 386]. It sounds like a badly- f 
timed Fifth, and makes clearly sensible beats. In the Octave c'...c'\ the number 
of these beats in a second is 11. Its inversion, the acute or imperfect Fourth, 
a^,.,d\ f ^, [17, cents 520, roughness 27], is also decidedly dissonant. The Fourth 
A-^,„d makes as many beats in a second as the Fifth d-^.a^, the d being the same 
in each [see App. XX. sect. G. art. 16]. 

6) The false or diminished Fifth, b^,..f\ ^\, [21, cents 610, roughness 28], 
consists of a just and Pythagorean minor Third, f? » f >< ^» [cents 610 — 316 + 
294] and is, hence, as the composition shews, [92 cents or] about half a Tone closer 
than the just Fifth. It is a tolerably rough dissonance, nearly equal in roughness 
to a major Second [6, cents 204, roughness 32]. Its inversion is the/a^6 Fourth 
or Tritone, f.-b^, ^f, [19, cents 590, roughness 20], consisting of three whole 
Tones, major /...^, minor g.^.a^, and major a^.-.b^, f x ^ x | = ^f , [cents 590 = 
204 + 182 + 204] ; it has very nearly the same degree of roughness as the last [or 
false Fifth], and is [20 cents or] about a comma closer. For the false Fifth b^...f^ 
is nearly the same as cj^.../, and if we diminish this interval by a comma we obtain 
c\} - fit which is a false Fourth. Strictly speaking, as c\^ is not precisely the same 
as 6^, the difference between the intervals is not precisely a comma, ^, but about 
f I, [or |y of a comma = 20 cents]. On keyed instruments they coincide. 

7) The superfluous or extreme sharp Fifth of the minor scale, e^\^,„bi, f|^, [26, 
cents 772, roughness 39], consists of two major Thirds, e^\f + g, andpf + ^p fl ~ 
1^ X I [cents 772 = 386 + 386] . It is seen to be [42 cents or] nearly two commas 
[44 cents] closer than the minor Sixth, [cents 814] by putting for b^ the nearly 
identical c\^, so that 6^|^...6j is nearly the same as e^\^,..c\), whereas the consonant 
minor Sixth is ei\}..,c\^, where ei\} is two commas flatter than e^\f. The superfluous 
Fifth [26, cents 772, roughness 39] is markedly rougher than the minor Sixth [28, 

♦[In just intonation, however, the difference + [The Pythagorean major Third of 408 

between d^-f and d\f is very marked, as cents does not occur on the Harmonica). The 

may be readily observed on the Harmonioal. — nearest interval ''h\}..,di of 418 cents is supe- 

Translator.] rior in effect. — Translator.] 



336 SEVENTHS AND SECONDS. part m. 

cents 814, roughness 20], with which it coincides upon keyed instrumenta Its in- 
version, the diminished Fourth b^,..e^'\^, f|, [14, cents 428, roughness 25], is [42 
cents or] about two commas higher than the just major Third, [12, cents 386, 
roughness 8], and considerably rougher, although the two intervals coincide on 
keyed instruments, [13, cents 400, common roughness 18]. 

Two just or two Pythagorean minor Thirds cannot occur consecutively in the 
natural series of Thirds of the just major or minor scales. In the modes of the 
minor Seventh and of the Fourth, we may find the intervals a^.-.e^}} and e^.-.b^]} 
s 44) [^% cents 632, roughness 35], composed of two minor Thirds, -o ^^ = f )( | 
[cents 632 = 316 + 316] ; these are a comma wider than the usual false Fifths 
^i'"f' (or ai...c'[> in the key of b\^ major, and e^...b\^in the key of / major), and 
are decidedly rougher than these, [21, cents 610, roughness 28]. 

II 

III. Sevenths and Seoonds. 

Any three successive Thirds give a Seventh. Beginning with the smallest we 
obtain the following different magnitudes : 

8) The diminished Seventh of the minor scale bi..,a^'\} [32, cents 926, rough- 
ness 24], = {bi - d') + (d' +/') + (/' - <»^b)» or two just minor Thirds and one 
Pythagorean minor Third. Its numerical ratio is V/ " I ^ It >^ t> [cents 926 = 
316 + 294 + 316], which is [42 cents or] about two commas greater than the major 
Sixth [29, cents 884, roughness 3], as is seen by putting 6 ^...a^'ly = c|>...a*'|^ The 
interval c|7...a/|>, which is two commas flatter than the last, would be a just 
major Sixth. Its dissonance is harsh and rough, the same as that of the Pytha- 
gorean major Sixth c.a, [31, cents 906], which is [20 cents or] about a comma 
less. But its inversion, the superfluous Second a^\^...b^ [8, cents 274, having the 

Y same roughness 24], is not much rougher than the just minor Third [11, cents 316, 
roughness 20 ; the tempered minor Third 10, cents 300, has exactly the same 
roughness 24]. Its numerical ratio Jf^ [cents 274] is very nearly i [cents 267] 
(since JJ = ^ ^ 2|« [cents 274 - 267 + 7]). If this Second is extended to a Ninth, 
liy [having 1474 cents or] nearly J, [cents 1467] it becomes tolerably harmonious, 
as much so as the minor Tenth Y", [cents 1616] which, however, is a very imper- 
fect consonance, [see fig. 60 B, p. 193c].* 

9) The closer minor Seventh of the scale g'.../', ^^..-a/, or d - c\ V» [34, cents 
996, roughness 23], consists of a just major, a just minor, and a Pythagorean 
minor Third, g - f ^ {g + b,) + (b, - d') + {d'' - /'), [or Y = f x I x fr. 
cents 996 = 386 + 316 -♦- 294]. It is a comparatively mild dissonance, milder than 
the diminished Seventh [32, cents 926, roughness 24], and this is of importance 
for the effect of the chord of the dominant Seventh, in which the Seventh has 
this form. This closer minor Seventh is the interval of a Seventh in the scale 

T nearest to the natural Seventh or seventh harmonic, \,[^ ^ ^ ih ^^^^ ^^^ = ^^ 

- 27], although not so close as the extreme sharp Sixth [33, cents 976 « 996 - 20, 

roughness 15]. It has been already shewn that the natural Seventh belongs to 

harmonious combinations (pp. 196a, 217c). The inversion of this Seventh is the 

major Second, c,„d, a^...bi, f...g, |, [6, cents 204, roughness 32], a powerful 

dissonance. 

10) The acute or wider minor Seventh, ey.-d\ a^.../, f, [36, cents 1018, 
roughness 25], a comma greater than the last, is distinctly harsher than that interval, 
because it is nearer to the Octave ; its roughness [25] is nearly the same as that of 
the diminished Seventh [24]. It consists of a just major and two just minor 
Thirds : Cj-.d' = (c, - 5^) + (^ + *i) + (^i " ^0» [or | = 4 x f ^ t» cents 1018 
= 316 + 386 -H 316]. The last-mentioned cZo«er minor Scv6n//t has its root on the 

•[Compare on Harmonical a»'k...6i" with g'...h^"\f. The g'...'6"b ^^^ ^ found much 
^'...'d'^, and a^^.„h^ with g\,.'^h'% and with the most harmonious.— Trarwtetor.] 



CHAP. xvn. MAJOR SEVENTH AND EXTREME SHARP SIXTH. 



337 



dominant side of the scale, and its Seventh on the snbdominant side, because it 
contains the Pythagorean minor Third d | /. The wider minor Seventh, on the 
other hand, has its Seventh on the dominant side. Its inversion, the minor Tone, 
-/, d..,ej, (/...a^ [4, cents 182, roughness 38] is somewhat harsher than the major 
Tone [6, cents 204, roughness 32]. 

11) The major Seventh f...e\, c...6p y^, [37, cents 1088, roughness 42], con- 
sists of two just major and one just minor Third: c..,b^^{c + e^) + (^i-^) + 
(g + b{) [or Y=*T >< T^h <»^*8 1^>88 « 386 + 316 + 386], It is a harsh dis- 
sonance, about the same as the minor Tone [4, cents 182, roughness 38]. Its 
inversion, the minor Second or Semitone \..,c\ e^.../, |^, [3, cents 112, roughness 
70], is the harshest dissonance in the scale.* 

In the mode of the Fourth or minor Seventh, we find a somewhat closer 
major Seventh b^\}.,.a\, which is a comma closer than the usual major Seventh, IT 
and hence somewhat milder in effect.f 

Finally we have to mention an interval peculiar to the Doric mode of the 
minor Sixth, namely : 

12) The superfitums or extreme sharp Sixth d^\^...b^, which arises in this mode 
from connecting the peculiar minor Second of the mode d^\^ with the leading note 
bi [see p. 286^]. 

The numerical ratio is |^|, [33, cents 976, roughness 15], so that it is [20 cents or] 
about a comma less than the closer minor Seventh of the chord of the dominant 
Seventh [cents 996], as is seen by putting d^\}...b^^d^\^...&};f ; the interval d\^...&\f 
would be the closer minor Seventh, and d^\} is a comma higher than d\f. The 
superfluous Sixth may be conceived as composed of two just major Thirds and 
one just major Tone: {d b +/) + if "-9) + (fl' + fti) = dib— ^i> [or IH = f x | 
X 2, cents 976 =» 386 + 204 + 386]. Its harmoniousness is equal to that of the 
minor Sixth, because it is almost exactly the natural Seventh |, | since |||»1 x 
Iff [or 976 =- 969 + 7]. Taken alone it cannot be regarded as a dissonance, but f 
it makes no other consonant combinations, and hence is unfit for use in consonant 
chords. When it is inverted into the diminished Third ||^ [cents 224], or nearly 
y [cents 231], it is, as already observed, considerably damaged [7, cent^ 224, the 
roughness rises to 30], but it is improved by taking the upper tone b^ an Octave 
higher, in which case it is [cents 2176 or] nearly ^ [ » cents 2169]. Its near 
agreement with the natural Seventh and its comparative harmoniousness, seem to 
have preserved this remarkable interval in certain cadences, although it is quite 
foreign to our present tonal system. It is characteristic that musicians forbid its 
inversion into the diminished Third (which lessens its harmoniousness), but allow 
its extension into the corresponding Thirteenth (which improves its harmonious- 
ness). On keyed instruments this interval coincides with the minor Seventh [35, 
cents 1000, roughness 24]. 

Generally, a glance at fig. 61 (p. 333a) will shew to what an extraordinary extent 
different intervals are fused on keyed instruments. § On the lower side of the base f 
line X Y are marked the places of the tones of the equally tempered scale, and the 
small braces below the base line shew those different tonal degrees which are 



*[That is in the just major scale; the 
Semitone of the tempered scale, 2, reaches 76 
degrees of roughness. — TransltUor.] 

t[Its numerical ratio is |f =^x|(, cents 
1088 - 22 = 1066, so that it is the interval c. . .^jt 
which hy fig. 61 (p. 838a) should have a rough- 
ness of about 29, in place of 42, the roughness 
of C...6,. — Translator,} 

XLThe diagram, fig. 61 (p. 888a),' gives the 
roughness of the superfluous Sixth as 16, and 
that of the minor Sixth as 20 ; see p. 888c', d\ 
This would make the former more harmonious 
than the latter. This interval does not exist on 
the Harmonical. In meantone intonation, the 
extreme sharp Sixth has only 966 cents, and is 
therefore still closer to the subminor Seventh 



i»969 cents. As a matter of fact, on my 
meantone concertina I find / 966 S$ much 
smoother than / 1007 e}^. The chord intro- 
ducing this interval occurs in three forms. 
The * Italian * D^l^ 886 ^ 590 ^i, and the 
' German ' D^^ 886 F 816 A^\f 274 B,, are 
simply imitations of the true chord of the 
domhiant Seventh D^\f 886 F 816 A^\p 267 
"^ C^\f. The * French * form (the only one con- 
sidered in the text and on p. 2866,) D^^ 886 
i^ 204 G 886 J?i is the harshest of all. The G 
seems to be nearly an anticipation of the note 
of the chord C 816 E^^ 886 6f 498 c on which 
it resolves. — Translator.] 

§ [This is shewn in detail on pp. 882 — 4 note. 
— Translator.} 



1 



338 



DISSONANT TRIADS. 



usually expressed by the oorresponding tone of the tempered scale. The 
&|...a^[^ [oents 926] is identified on the pianoforte with the major Sixth cb-.-a^ 
[cents 884, or 42 cents closer], while the interval d^\}„.bi [cents 976, or 50 cents 
wider than the first] is made a (tempered) Semitone [cents 100] wider [being 
identified with 1000 cents], and yet the last is scarcely more different from the 
first, than the first from the major Sixth. The figure 61 shews also very clearly 
what an immense difference of harmoniousness ought to exist between the first 
and either of the two last of the following intervals c.ai, f-^^d\ and 6|...a^|^ 
[29, 31, 32, respective cents 884, 906, 926, respective roughness 3, 24, 24], 
which are all expressed by the sufficiently harsh sound of the tempered inter- 
val c.a [30, cents 900, roughness 22]. The justly-intoned harmonium with two 
rovTS of keys * allows all these intervals to be given accurately, by which the dififer- 
ence of their sound becomes extremely striking. In this evidently lies one of the 
f greatest imperfections of tempered intonation. 



Dissonant Triads. 

Dissonant triads with a single dissonant interval are obtained by taking two 
tones which are consonant to the root, but dissonant to each other. Thus : 

1) Fifth (md Fourth : c.:f...g, [or f±c ± g]. 

2) Third and Fourth : c + fl^.-./or c-e'^.../, [or/+ c + e^ and/+ c - gij^J. 

3) Fifth €Md Sixth : c ± g^^.a^ or c± g...a^\^, [or a - c±g and a^|^ + c + g], 

4) Digsimilar Thirds and Sixths : c - e^|^...aj or c + e^.-.a^^, [or a^ -c-e^b 
and a^b + c + e^],^ 

In all these c is consonant with each of the other two tones. The first chord 
alone plays a great part in the older polyphonic music as a chord of suspension. 
f The others we shall meet with again in the chords of the Seventh. 

The chords named in the fourth series above I admit of an inversion which 
makes them appear as triads with diminished or superfluous Fifths, namely : 

a^-c-e^l^ and a^j^+c + Ci. 

The first of these is composed of two just minor Thirds, [so that the Fifth 
ai...6^|>, No. 22, ratio 25 : 36, cents 632, roughness 35, is the acute diminished 
Fifth,] and the second of two just major Thirds, [so that the Fifth a^|^...6p No. 26, 
ratio 25 : 16, oents 772, roughness 39, is the grave superfluous Fifth]. Both are 
dissonant on account of the altered Fifth, although the dissonance of the second 
has to be played as the consonance g^...e [minor Sixth 814 cents] upon keyed 
instruments. The first of these two chords can only appear in the mode of the 
minor Third, and the above would be heard in that of i^.§ The second, on the 
other hand, belongs to F minor.** 
f If we suppose this series of tones to be continued as 



B 



6 
T 



32 
1S7 



6 



ft 

T 



* [And, with the exception of the extreme 
Bhftrp Sixth (2^k..&j, on the Harmonical also. 
The extreme sharp Sixth c.aJc may be suffi- 
oiently imitated as c.^^l^— 2Van<Zator.] 

t [These triads I propose to term oon-dis' 
sonant, and the two last especially I call the 
minor and major trine. See App. XX. sect. E. 
art. 6. — Translator.] 

X [From p. 8d8c, beginning with these words, 
to the paragraph ending * as in concords,' on 
p. 8396, is an insertion in the 4th Qerman edi- 
tion. — Translator.} 

§[It is evident that €^j-c-e^\f can only 
occur when the chain of chords contains Z+Oi 



- c - 6^1^ + Sf» that is in one of the forms 

6k+A-/+ai-c-ei|>+j^=l Fma.ma.mi. 
6^-<l»l^+/+ai-c-«»|>+y=l jPmi.ma.mi. 
/+ai-c-«*|^+(jf + 6,-<i=l Cma.mi.ma. 
/+ai-c-6*|>+(^-6*[^+ci— 1 Cma.mi.mi. 

But not one of these belongs to the mode of 
the minor Third, which for F is 1 Fmi.mi.mi., 
unless the second is taken to be such with 
a major tonic. The last, however, is the 
mode of the minor Seventh of C. — Trans' 
lator,] 

** [In the major dominant form b\}-d^\^+ 
/-o'|j+c+«i- g, — Translator J] 



CHAT. xvn. DISSONANT TRIADS. 339 

an interval glides in of f| « f • ^|| = t ' if approximatively [ cents 428 « 386 + 42], 
which is slightly (about two commas) greater than a just major Third. By small 
alterations of pitch other chords are formed which belong to other keys : 

^^b + c + ^i'-^^b "1 -P' minor 

5 fi 3 2 

^2# • • • c + ^1 + g^ in ill minor 

32 6 5 

air 4 T 
A^\)-{'C,„p\}-{-a}\} in D^b minor 

6 32 6 
T TTK 4 

Trhe roots of these three minor keys 

• 

form a similar chord, of which the roots arcia Semitone higher than those of the ^ 
preceding.* Since A^\^ va nearly the same as G^ and jP^|^ nearly the same as 
E^y these transformations alter the pitch of one of the tones in the chord by 
about two commas, or, at least in the resolution of the chord, this tone is treated 
as a leading note just as if it were thus altered. Hence we obtain modulations 
which with a single step lead us to comparatively distant keys, and we can as 
easily resolve into the minor as into the major keys of the three roots named. 
This means of modulation is often employed by modern composers (for example 
B. Wagner), in place of using the chord of the diminished Seventh, which is much 
rougher but was also applied for the same puipose. In just intonation these 
chords are not by any means so unpleasant as in the tempered intonation of the 
pianoforte. Generally it may be observed that when one is accustomed to play in 
just intonation, the ear becomes quite as sensitive to a pitch which is wrong by a 
comma in discords as in concords. 

For modem music trickds with two dissonances^ formed by including the ex- f 
tremes of the key, are more important. 

In the series of chords in any key, major and minor Thirds follow each other 
alternately, and any two adjacent Thirds produce a consonant triad. But the 
interval between the extreme tones d and / is a Pythagorean minor Third, and 
when these are connected as a chord VTith one of either of the two adjacent tones 
to make a new triad, it will be dissonant. 

Majob: c+ei -g-^h^-d \f-¥a^ -c + e^ -g 

B A6 6 82 6 66 6 

Minob: c-e^b + gf + ^i-d \f-a^\^-{-c-'e^\f + g 

0*66 6 32 6 66 6 

Y TTTTlfTT 4lJ T 

The major system gives two triads of this kind : 

6 32 32 5 ■ 

The minor scale also gives two : 

b^-dlf and d\f' a^b 

A 32 32 6 

In the two triads b^-d \f and d \f-a% which combine a Pythagorean 
vdth a just minor Third, there are also second dissonances, namely the false Fifths 
&i.../and d...a^\^y which make the chord more strongly dissonant than the Pythag- 
orean minor Third |^ alone could make them. They are hence called diminished 

*[Oiily in the form c+e^ + i/^ From apart, and could not possibly be confounded in 

what follows it is evident that the transforma- just intonation. Of course Wagner thought 

tion could only take place in tempered intona- only in equal temperament, in which the tones 

tion. The tones confounded are all 42 cents are absolutely identical. — Translator.] 

z2 



340 



DISSONANT TRIADS. 



triads. The ohord d \ f+a^, which in the usual musioal notation is not distin- 
guished from the minor triad d^ -f+ai, and may hence be called the false minor 
triady is, as Hauptmann has correctly shewn, dissonant, and on justly-intoned 
instruments it is very decidedly dissonant. It sounds almost as rough as the 
chord 61 - d I /. If in C major, without confounding d with dp we fonn the 
cadence 1 or 2 



[Sodded] 




the chords a^..,d** \ f and f + a^..,d'* \ f are quite^as dissonant in their effiscts 
as the following b^ - d" | /' and g' + 6/ - d" | /". "But on account of the in- 
correct intonation of our musical instruments we cannot produce the same effect 

fl- without combining an inverted chord of the Seventh with the subdominant in the 
cadence, as f-\-a^-c\,.d', Hauptmann doubts whether in practice the ^Jae 
minor chord of the key of C majorcan be distinguished from the minor chord of Z>. 
I find that this is most distinctly and undoubtedly effected on my justly-intoned 
harmonium, but allow that we cannot expect the correct intonation from singers. 
They vrill involuntarily pass into the minor chord, unless the progression of the 
parts which execute D, strongly emphasise its connection with the dominant G*. 

These chords, and among them most decisively and distinctly the chord 
6^-d I/, have for musical composition the especially important advantage of 
combining those limiting tones of the key, which separate it from the nearest 
related keys, and are consequently extremely well suited for marking the key in 
which the harmony is moving at any given time. If the harmony passed into O 
major or Q minor, / would have to be replaced by /^^jt If it passed into F major 
d would become d^ and if into F minor d would become d^\p and b^ would in tibe 

«r same chords become b^\^. Thus — 

1/ 



in G major : &j - d 
in C major : 6^ ~ d 
in F major : 6^ +d^ 
in G minor: &^|> + d 
in C minor : 6^ - d 



d 


+/4 


-a 


d 


1/ - 


K»i 


dx 


-/ ■ 


f«h 


d 


+/Jf 


-a 


d 


1/ ■ 


-alb 


d»b+/ • 


-o^b 



in F minor : b\^ - d^b +/ 

This shews that the chords in the nearest related keys are all distinctly different, 
with the exception of d IZ+a^ and di-/+a^» the distinction between which in 



* [The chord on the Second of the major 
scale is in fact the crux of the translation of 
tempered into jast intonation. It is easy to 
^ play Ex. 1 and 2, and Ex. 8, here added, as 

^, A" f f a/ d," f f Oj! d^" 
hi' d" f'ajidg' 6/ d" /" and ^' b^' d" 

C" C" ft" C' '" -" - " M 1>. t ^n 



«1 



/ h' d" 



& C 



and the effect is not had. In the first the di" 
might be held on to the second chord, as 6' d/' 
f ', without materially increasing the harshness 
of the dissonance, but in the second this would 
give g' 6j' d^" f, where the grave Fifth is veiy 
harsh. In the second case, then, there is 
least harshness in playing d" in both chords. 
And in both cases there is most smoothness 
in playing them as just written. The effect is 
one on which I have repeatedly experimented, 
but I find that the small interval d/' d" in the 
highest or lowest part,produces a strange effect, 
which in singing, and perhaps on the violin, 
seems to be overcome by a glide, if the other 



voices are strong enough to puU this voice out 
of its course, even though the words and parts 
are written so as to imply that this note is sus- 
tained. When the d" is in the principal part 
in the melody, as in the third example, I find 
it best on the whole not to play as written, d^" 
d", but to sustain d'\ In some cases an at- 
tempt to avoid the dissonance, which is really 
harsh, would lead to such melodic phrases as 
d d| d, which would be simply impossible for 
an unaccompanied voice. If in the third ex- 
ample d" were held throughout, and the ac- 
companying voices sang the minor chord, we 
should get the succession/^'a'd", g^h^ d'\f'bj* 
d", 0' c" c'\ which amounts to a modulation 
into the minor of the dominant, instead ol 
into the subdominant. Whether such is pos- 
sible depends on the preceding chords. As/^ 
does not occur on the Harmonical, I played 
Ex. 3 on my just concertina in A^ major as d' 

/I'l W. -i' 94 V.^' fct V. «.'# V «', and 
found that such chords produced the best effect* 
of all for this isolated phrase. — Translator,'] 



CHAP. xvn. OHORDS OF THE SEVENTH 341 

singing might be doubtM. The rest are mnch more clearly distingoished from the 
obords in the nearest adjacent keys. Nevertheless 



b^- d \ f and d I /- a^b 





are easily confused Tvith 

&i I dj - / and d -/i | a^b 

32 A A 32 

of which the former belongs to -ij minor, and the latter to E^^ major or minor, 
^here Aj^ minor is the minor key nearest related to G major, and E^b naajor is the 
major key nearest related to G minor. 

Finally when w;e remember that the Pj^hagorean minor Third 4| [cents 294] T 
is nearer the superfluous second ^ [cents 274] than to the normal minor Third 
[cents 316] (»« =. ^ x |f [cents 294 - 316 - 22] and f « « f» x f^ [cents 294 
« 274 + 20] or nearly = J^ x |^), it requires comparativdy slight changes in 
intonation to convert the chord bi- d \f into 

fcj - d... i^ and c^\}...di - / 

A 7A IB n 

S WT ITT T 

which belong to F^jj^ minor and E\} minor. Hence the diminished triad b^- d ]/, 
by slight changes of intonation,* never exceeding |^, can be referred to the keys 
of 

major, G minor, A^ minor, FjHj^ minor, and E]^ minor. 

Hence although the use of the diminished triad b^- d \f excludes the keys IT 
most nearly related to G, it allows of a confusion with more distant keys, and hence 
also the characterisation of the key by these triads will not be complete without a 
fourth note, converting the triad into a tetrad. This leads us to the chords of the 
Seventh proper. 

Chobds of thb Seventh. 

A. Formed of two Gonsonant Triads. 

Consonant tetrads, or chords in four parts, as shewn on p. 2226, cannot be 
constructed without using the Octave of one of the tones, but dissonant tetrads are 
easily constructed. The least dissonant of such chords are those in which only a 
single interval is dissonant, and the rest are consonant. These are 'most readily 
formed by uniting two consonant triads which have two tones in common. In this 
case the tones which are not in common to the two chords are dissonant to each IT 
other, and the rest are consonant, so that the dissonance is comparatively un- 
observed f amid the mass of consonances. Thus the triads 

c + e^- g 



on being fused give the tetrad 



c + «! - gf + 6i 



in which the major Seventh c...&| is a dissonant interval and the other intervals 
are consonant, as the annexed scheme shews : — 

* [Which are made spontaneously in the Duodenariunip App. XX. sect. E. art. 18. 

equally tempered intonation, where all three — Translator.'] 

chords are absolutely identical, but would t[To my sensation the dissonant toneR 

otherwise require an entire sacrifice of the utterly destroy the consonance. — Translator,] 
feeling of tonality. Follow these chords on 



342 CHORDS OF THB SEVENTH. part m. 

f [In cents : 

^' ' • c 702 g, e, 702 6^ 

' ' ^ ^ C 386 E. 316 G 386 J5, 

c + e,-g^b, cl0886\.] 



5 fl ft 

T T T 

^ , ' 

ift 



This position of the chord of the Seventh, deduced from the closest positions of 
the triads, is regarded as fundamental or primary. The intervals between the 
individual tones appear as Thirds, and when chords of the Seventh are formed 
from the consonant triads of the scale, these Thirds will be alternately major and 
minor, because consonant triads always unite a major with a minor Third. Haupt- 
mann calls these chords of the Seventh which occur spontaneously in the natural 
T series of Thirds of a key 

f -{- a^- c + e^- g + b^- d 

the chords of the direct system or simply direct chords. There are two kinds of 
these chords. In one a minor Third lies between two major Thirds, as in the 
tetrad c + gj - gr + ftj already cited, and similarly in / + aj - c' + «/ in major, 
and -4*17 + c - e^j^ + ^ in G minor. In the other a major Third lies between two 
minor Thirds, as in 

^ [In cents : 

1^ ' » a 702 e\, c 702 ^ 

ill 316 386 -E?i 316 G 



^O-^^'O^ a/l018 g'.] 



6 A 

IT T T 

^ * ' 

9 



f and similarly in 6^ - ^ + 6^ - d^ in C major and /- a^\} +c - e^\}UiC minor. In 
this second species the dissonance is a minor Seventh, § [roughness 25, p. 332, 
Table, No. 36, cents 1018], which is much milder than the major Seventh, ^ [ibid. 
No. 37, cents 1088, roughness 42]. 

B. Chords of the Seventh formed of Dissonant Triads, 

Other chords of the Seventh may be formed from the dissonant triads of the 
key, each united with one consonant triad, and also from the two dissonant triads 
themselves. By thus uniting the limiting tones of the series of chords in the key. 



f ^a}\f-¥c 



major : c ■{■ e^ - g -{' b^- d 

and minor : c - e'l^ + ^ + ftj - d 

we obtain the following Chords of the Seventh in the reverted system, or indirect 
f tetrads : 



[In cents : 

1) Jt 1) ^702(i',6i610/' 

•»' ' * G 386 ^1 316 D 294 F 

T 7 irr 

^ r ' 

1« 

2) I [2) ci 680 ai, / 702 c' 

^?' ' > D 294 i?' 386 i4 1 316 C 



d I / + a, - C 

» 2 6 n 

2T T S 

> , 

1 fl 



d 996 c'] 



CH^F. XYII. 



OHOBDS OF THE SEVENTH. 



343 



3) 




[3) 



d I / - a^b + c' 



d610a%f702& 

D 294 -P 316 il^b 386 C 

d 996 c'] 



38 






B 



V 



4) 




[4) 



6, - d I / + a. 



6i 610/. <i 680 ai 

B^ 316 D 294 JP 386 il^ 

b^ 996 a J 



T 



3 2 



ft 

T 



16 



5) 




[5) 



6, - i I / - all, 



&i 610/, d 610 ai|> 

£, 316 P 294 F 316 A^\, 

bi 926 a^b] 



IT 



SS 







188 



The Sevenths of these chords all come pretty near to the natural Seventh I 
[cents 969], and are all smaller than the Sevenths in the chords of the Seventh 
formed from two consonant triads [cents 1088 and 1018]. The principal disso- 
nances in these chords are the false and imperfect Fifths b^..-f, d.^.a^, and d..,a^\}t 
that is, the intervals ^ and |^ [p. 332, Table, Nos. 21 and 23, cents 610 and 680, 
roughnesses 28 and 44]. Hence the first three of these chords of the Seventh, 
g + b^-d I/, d IZ+^i-c, and d |/-a^b + c> ©^^^ of which contains only one 
of these imperfect Fifths, are less harshly dissonant than the two last, each of T 
which contains two of them. Such of these chords as contain a major triad, 
namely — 

g -^ b^ " d\f and d \f -{- a^ - o 



are about equal in dissonance to the milder chords of the Seventh in the direct 
system, which contains the larger and rougher kind of Sevenths, and, at the same 
time, only perfect Fifths, viz. : 



a^ - c + e^ - ^ and e^ - g + b^ - d 

The chord of the dominant Seventh g + bi - d' \ f can be even rendered 
much milder by lowering its /' to f^\ The interval g-.^fi corresponds to the 
ratio V//- [cents 974], which is very nearly equal to J [cents 969], being = ^ x T 
fr§7 [cei^ts 969 + 5], or approximately | x ^^. Hence the chord ^ + b^ - d \fi 
is on the verge of consonance.* 

But the chord of the Seventh which contains a false Fifth and a minor triad, 
namely No. 3 above, or 



d\f - a^\^ + c 

is about as rough as the tetrads of the direct system containing a major Seventh, 
namely — 



/ + a^ - c + e, and c + e, - o - 6,. 

^1 I I 



* [That is, allowing g h^d^f or c e^ g"^ b\f to be 
oonsonant. In the 58 division the player uses 
44 degrees » 996 cents for g...f^ and 48 degrees 
^974 oents for g...y, and the latter is found a 



satisfactory imitation — especially by ears un* 
accustomed to the true interval, because it is so 
much superior to the former of 44 degrees = 996 
cents. — Translator.] 



v44 



CHORDS OF THE SBVENTH. 



PABT m. 



It is oarious that the first of these three tetrads contains exactly the same intervals 
as the chord of the dominant Seventh itself, g + \ - d \f, only in inverse order, 
thus — 






6 



ft 



6 

T 






7T 



In the first the consonant portion is a minor triad, and this makes it decidedly 
harsher than the second where the consonant portion is a major triad. 

Here also the difference of harshness depends on the nature of the combina- 
tional tones, of which those generated by the closer intervals are most distinctly 
heard. These are 

for g' + 6/ - d"\f and for d" j/" - a^^b + c 

"3 



a ill 



ill ^b a^b 



Hence one combinational tone in the first chord, and two in the second, are \m- 
suitable to the chord. 

The harshest chords of the Seventh are those which each contain two false 
Fifths, namely. No. 4 or 6i - d | / + ai' and No. 6 or 6i - d' | / - a^% But the 
first of these can be made much milder by a slight change in its intonation. Thus 
&i~d.../i'...a' contains tones which all belong to the compound tone of G,, and 
these sound tolerably well together.* 

The chords of the reverted system play an important part in modulations, by 
serving to mark the key precisely. The most decisive in its action is the chord of 
the Seventh on the dominant of the key, that is the chord g-k-b^-d | / for the 
tonic G, We saw (p. 3416) that the diminished triad b^-d \f could be adapted 
by slight changes in its intonation to the keys of 

C major, G minor, A^ minor, F-Jf^ minor, and E^\^ minor. 

Of these only the two first contain the tone G, so that the chord g+b^-d \f 
can belong to no tonic but G, 

The imperfect minor triad [or chord of the added Sixth] d \ /+ Oj, which, 
when the intonation is correct, belongs only to the key of G major, admits of being 
confused [and is in equal temperament always identified] with di -/+ a^ which 



* [This is only to be taken as an appxozi- 
mative statement, gronnded on the assumption 
that the interval g tof^' is correctly {, in which 
case the primes of the tones b^, d,fi\ a' are 
the 6th, 6th, 7th, 9th partials of G. This 
chord in its true formation is used on Mr. 
Poole's double or dichordal scale F O A ''B}^ 
ed Biff the two chords being F : A^ : e= 4 : 5 : 
6, and C : ^^ : G : 'B^ : d = 4 : 6 : 6 : 7 : 9. 
T In the text it is, in point of fact, proposed to 
use Bjff in the chord C E^O B^\^ d, as an imi- 
tation of Mr. Poole's natural chord, which 
would be still closer than C E G Ajj^ d, with 
the extreme sharp Sixth in place of the 
natural Seventh. In fact, C : ^JB|^=:969 cents, 
C : Bi|>=974 cents, and C : AJf=^976 cents. 

To test the effect of septimal intonation I 
had an instrument tuned to give the chords — 

B\fdJ,FA,C,CEiG Ui\^d,GB^d,DF^A^ 

perfectly (of which the second, third, and 
fourth occur on the Harmonica! ). The effect 
of the third of these chords far surpasses my 
expectations, and it is beyond comparison 
better than the usual chord of the Ninth with 
B\f din place of ^B(^ d (for which on the Har- 
monica] fb^dfoi can be played). The chord 
of the subminor Seventh and its inversions 

EC G ^B\fy G E^ -^B), c, G -^B\, c e^, tB|,c «i g 



are all decidedly superior to the chord of the 
dominant Seventh, with B}f in place of ^B^, 
and its inversions (which on the Harmonical 
must be tried aa g h^ df and its inversions). 
The septimal minor triad G ^B|^ d is far supe- 
rior to the Pythagorean minor triad D r A 
(not on the Harmonical), or the false minor 
triad D F A^, and is not far inferior to the 
true minor triad Di F Ai or D F^ A (on the 
Harmonical compare^ ^6)^ d' wither 6^^ d). The 
septimal diminished triad Ei & ^B^ approaches 
consonance much more nearly than the usual 
diminished triad E-^ G B\^ (plfty h^df on the 
Harmonical). Though Poole's ascending scale 
makes too great a gap between ^B|^ and e, yet 
by using ^B[^ D as idtemative tones with B^ 
Dy ascending with the sharper and descending 
with the flatter forms, we obtain the perfectly 
melodious scales of 

F G A^ B\f c d e^ f and/r^ d, c 'B|, A^G F 

(of which the first, being the ordinary scale of 
F major, does not exist on the Harmonical, 
which has no B[^, but the second can be played 
upon it). These facts shew the acoustic poesi- 
biiity of a septimal theory of harmony^ which 
would include the tertian, or ordinary harmony 
of just intonation. — Translator,'] 



CHAP. xvn. 



CHORDS OF THE SEVENTH. 



346 



belongs to the keys of il^ minor, F major, and B\^ major. This oonfusion is not 
entirdy obviated by adding the tone c, and the consequence is the chord of the 
Seventh d | /+ a^ ~ c is nsually employed only in alternation with the chord of the 
dominant Seventti in the cadence, where it distinguishes C major from C minor.* 
But the addition of the tone 6^ to the triad d |/+aj [as b^-d |/+aj is 
characteristic, because this last can at most be confused with bi \ di-f+a^ 
which belongs to A^ minor. The chord b^-d |/+ap however, sounds com- 
paratively harsh in every position for which a^ is not the highest note, and hence 
its application is very limited. It is often united with the chord of the dominant 
Seventh as a chord of the Ninth, thus g + bj^-d* \f + c^it in which g and a/ 
must remain the extreme tones. More upon this hereafter. 

In the key of C minor, the triad d \f- a\\^ would, in just intonation, be 
characteristic, but yet it is easily confused with other chords. Thus 

d I / - a^b [ill <^^^ ^ ^94 / 316 a^b] belongs to C minor 

S2 6 

di - f \ ab [in cents d 316/294 a\}] to jErb major and E}^ minor 



6 

T 



.12 



d - /^..-s^il [in cents d 316 P 274 gr Jj to A minor 

6 75 

d^...eM- ^ [in cents d^ 274 ejj^ 316 ^ to i^ minor. 



75 
1ST 



6 



The addition of the tone C in the first chord of the Seventh above, thus 
d I /-a^b + c, would decisively exclude the key Fjt minor only, and the addition 
of the tone fr^ (which in tempered intonation is coniused with b or c^ b) would also 
readily be adapted to all the above keys. Thus altered it becomes the chord b^- % 
d I /- a^b> ^^^ i^ called the chord of the diminished Seventh, which on keyed 
instruments appears as a series of minor Thirds. In reality a Pythagorean minor 
Third or else an acute augmented Second separates the normal minor Thirds, thus : 

bi-d \ f-a^\^ b,^d \ f-a%..b. 



6 


82 


n 


75 


6 


82 


A 


75 


If 


27 


T 


TT 


T 


27 


ir 


6i 



[In cents : 316 294 316 274 316 294 316 274] 

Since the three intervals 4, f|, and ^f [cents 316, 294, 274] diflfer but very 
slightly [by 20, 22, 42 cents respectively], they are retkdily confused, f and we 
obtain the following, nearly identical, series of tones : 



^1 ".^ I / " ?M>-?i P° c©»*8 6i 316 d 294/316 a^b 274 b^] in C minor 



8 2 6 

ST y 



75 



d - f ,..gA - 6 [ in cents b 294 d 316/i 274 gjj^ 316 6] in A minor t 



3 2 6 7 6 6 



b - d\,.e^jj^ - flf^ I 6 [m cents b S16d^ 274 ej(^ 316 gjj^ 294 6] in 2?| minor 



c^b-^i - / 1 ab - c^b [in cents c^b 274 d^ 316/ 294 a\} 316 c^b] in JS^b minor. 



75 



fl 8 2 

s sr 






*[Thi8 arises entirely from temperament, 
which identifies the two chords d | /+ a^ - c, 
and d^ -/+ a, - c. Listen to the difference on 
the Harmonical. — Translator.] 

f [It is quite impossible to confuse them 
in the just intonation of any harmonic inter- 
vals, hot they are absolutely Identified in 
equally tempered intonation as 800 cents, and 



hence in all written mnsic they are treated as 
identical. The four following forms of the 
chord (of which only the first can be played on 
the Harmonical) are struck with absolutely the 
same digitals on a pianoforte. Trace them on 
the Duodenarium, App. XX. sect. E. art. 18. — 
Translator.] 



346 



CHORDS OP THE SEVENTH. 



PABT m. 



These chords of the diminished Seventh do not form so sharp a contrast ^th 
the consonances in the minor mode, as the corresponding chord does in the major 
mode, although if the intonation is just the dissonance is always extremely harsh 
and cutting.* When they are followed by the triad of the tonic, the two chords 
together contain all the tones of the key, and hence completely characterise it. 
The chief use of the chord of the diminished Seventh is due to its variability, 
which readily leads the harmony into new keys. By merely subjoining the minor 
chords of Fjf^ A, CorE\^ the new key will be completely established. It is readily 
seen that this series of keys itself forms a chord of the diminished Seventh, the 
tones of which lie a Semitone higher than those of the given chord. This gives a 
simple means of recollecting them.f 

The comprehension of the whole of a key by these chords is of special impor- 
tance in the cadence at the end of a composition or of one of its principal sections. 
IT For this purpose we have also to determine what fundamental primary tones can 
be represented by these chords of the Seventh. 

It is clear that a single musical tone can never be more than imperfectly 
represented by the tones of a dissonant chord. But as a general rule some of 
these tones can be accepted as the constituents of a musical tone. This gives rise 
to a practically important difference between the different tones of such a chord. 
Those tones which can be considered as the elements of a compound tone, form a 
compact, well-defined mass of tone. Any one or two other tones in the chord, which 
do not belong to this mass of tone, have the appearance of unconnected tones, acci- 
dentally intruding. The latter are called by musicians the dissonances or the dis- 
sonant notes of the chord. Considered independently, of course, either tone in a 
dissonant interval is equally dissonant in respect to the other, and if there were only 
two tones it would be absurd to call one of them only the dissonant tone. In 
the Seventh c...6j, c is dissonant in respect to 6^ and b^ in respect to c. In the 
f chord c + e^-g-^bi the notes c + ^i - d^ form a single mass of tone corresponding 
to the compound tone of o, and 6^ is an unconnected tone sounding at the same 
time. Hence the three tones c + ei-g have an independent steadiness and compact- 



* [As the ratioB 4 : 6 : 6 : 7 are the justifi- 
oation of the chord of the dominant Seventh 
4 : 6 : 6 : 7i, 80 the ratios 10 : 12 : 14 : 17 are 
the juBtifioation of the chord of the diminished 
Seventh 10 : 12 : 14^ : 11^ taking the ratios 
of No. 5, p. 8486, and commencing with 10. 
That is, •" 816 g" 267 T6'> 836 "d">, which 
can be played on the Harmonioal, is the just 
chord of the diminished Seventh, for which 
the form of ordinary just intonation is «''816 
^"294 b"^l6 d% which must be played as 
^316 fri'294 f '816 a^"\p on the Harmonical, 
an intensely harsh chord, for which is played 
in equal temperament ^800 6'800 f'900 a"}^. 
f Observe that the diminished Seventh 10 : 17 
has 919 cents, the diminished Seventh of 
ordinary just intonation 10 : 17iis has 926 
cents, 7 too sharp ; while in equally tempered 
intonation it is only 900 cents or 19 too flat. 
And the tempered major Sixth is repre- 
sented by the same interval of 900 cents, 
which is 16 cents too sharp. It is remarkable 
that any sense of interval or tonality survives 
these confusions. Of course the introduction 
of the 17th harmonic into the scale is a sheer 
impossibility. The chord 10 : 12 : 14f : 17 rV 
is simple noise. The chord 10 : 12 : 14 : 17 
which I have tried on Appunn*s tonometer in 
its inversions, is a comparatively smooth dis- 
cord superior to the tempered form. But the 
chord is really due to tempered intonation 
only. For further notes on this chord see 
.\pp. XX. sect. E. art. 23. and sect. F. to?rards 
end of No. 7. — Translator.] 

t [It is correctly stated in the text that the 



four keys into which a slight alteration of the 
pitches of the notes in the chord of the dimi- 
nished Seventh will make it fit. are F^ A, C, 
E\^. These notes, however, do not form a chord 
with the same intervals, but Fjj^ 294 A 294 C 
294£|^,thatisasucces8ion of Pythagorean minor 
Thirds, the result of which is simply hideous. 
It is only in equally tempered intonation in 
which the four forms above given of the chord 
of the diminished Seventh agree absolutely in 
sound, though they differ in writing, because 
signs originally intended for other tempera- 
ments (as the Pythagorean, mean tone, or other 
which distinguished Cjt and Z>|^, but did not 
distinguish the comma) have continued in uae, 
with confounded meanings. This is precisely 
the same as in ordinary English spelling, 
where combinations of letters originally repre- 
senting very different soonds, are now con- 
fused, as I have demonstrated historically in 
my Early English Pronunciation, In equally 
tempered intonation the roots /S 300 a 900 e 
300 e^ do a] so form a chord of the diminished 
Seventh. But this does not end the confusion, 
for the key of /j| may be taken as that of gfp, of 
a as that of &*^|y, c as that of bA, el^ as that of 
djj^ and these four roots, g\^ b^'^, % djJL being 
played with the same digitals represent the 
same chord, but the four keys are now totaUy 
unrelated. What then becomes of the feeling 
of t'>nality? and how are we to feel the rig^t 
amid this mass of wrong, as Sir Geoige Mac- 
farren says we can, and as I must therefore 
suppose he himself has succeeded in doing f — 
Translator.] 



CHAP. xvn. DISSONANT NOTES IN CHORDS OP THE SEVENTH. 



347 



ness of their own. Bat the unsupported solitary Seventh b^ has to stand against 
the preponderance of the other tones, and it could not do so either when executed 
by a singer, or heard by a listener, unless the melodic progression were kept very 
simple and readily intelligible. Consequently particular rules have to be observed 
for the progression of the part which produces this note, whereas the introduction 
of c, which is sufficiently justified by the chord itself, is perfectly free and unfettered. 
Musicians indicate this practical difference in the laws of progression of parts by 
terming b^ alone the dissonant note of this chord ; and although the expression 
is not a very happy one, we can have no hesitation in retaining it, after its real 
meaning has been thus explained. 

We now proceed to examine each of the previous chords of the Seventh with a 
view to determine what compound musical tone they represent, and which are their 
dissonant tones. 

1. The chord of the dominant Seventh g + ^i - d\f, contains three tones T 
belonging to the compound tone of G, namely g, b^y and d, and the Seventh / is the 
dissonant tone. But we must observe that the minor Seventh 9— /[or ^a^^ x ^, 
or cents 996 « 969 4- 27] approaches so near to the ratio ^ [cents 969] which would 
be almost exactly represented by g—fi [cents 974], that/ may in any case pass as 
the seventh partial tone of the compound G* Singers probably often exchange the 
/ of the chord of the dominant Seventh for/^, f partly because it usually passes into 
ei, partly because they thus diminish the hskrshness of the dissonance. This can be 
easily done when the pitch of/ is not determined in the preceding chord by some 
near relationship. Thus if the consonant chord g + b^-d had already been struck 
and then/ were added, it would readily fall into/^, [that is 7] because/ is to itself 
unrelated to ^, 6^, or d, X Hence, although the chord of the dominant Seventh 
is dissonant, its dissonant tone so nearly corresponds to the corresponding partial 
tone in the compound tone of the dominant, that the whole chord may be very well 
regarded as a representative of that compound. For this reason, doubtless, the T 
Seventh of this chord has been set free from many obligations in the progression 
of parts to which dissonant Sevenths are otherwise subjected. Thus it is allowed 
to be introduced freely without preparation, which is not the case for the other 
Sevenths. In modem compositions (as R Wagner's) the chord of the dominant 
Seventh not unfrequently occurs as the concluding chord of a subordinate section of 
a piece of music. 

The chord of the dominant Seventh consequently plays the second most impor- 
tant part in modern music, standing next to the tonic. It exactly defines the key, 
more exactly than the simple triad g+bi-d^or than the diminished triad bi-d | /. 
As a dissonant chord it urgently requires to be resolved on to the tonic chord, 
which the simple dominant triad does not. And finally its harmoniousness is so 
extremely little obscured, that it is the softest of all dissonant chords. § Hence we 
could scarcely do without it in modem music. This chord appears to have been 
discovered in the beginning of the seventeenth century by Monteverde. IT 

2. The chord of the Seventh upon the Second of a major scale, d \ /+ a^ - c, has 
three tones, /, a^, c, which belong to the compound tone of F, When the intona- 
tion is just, d is dissonant with each of the three tones of this chord, and hence must 



*[It has, however, a very different effect 
on the ear. — Translator.^ 

t [Here /.must be considered as the repre- 
sentative of 7* Singers would not naturally 
take such a strange artificial approximation as 
/j, unless led by an instrument. Unaccom- 




What is the custom in unaccompanied choirs, 
which have not been trained to give /, has, so 
far as I know, not been recorded. — Translator.] 
X [And ^/ is, but /, again is not. It will be 
seen by the Duodenarium (App. XX. sect. E. 
art. 18) ^ which should be constantly consult^ 



on such points) that/| is very remote indeed 
from g. — Translator.] 

% [As we hear it only in tempered music as a 
rule, with the harsh major Third which makes 
the major triad almost dissonant, the addition 
of the dominant Seventh increases the harsh- 
ness surprisingly little. But in just intonation 
g bid f is markedly harsher than gb^d y, as 
I have often had occasion to observe in Ap- 
punn*s tonometer, where g b^ d can be left 
sounding, and /suddenly tranuormed to y and 
conversely. On the Harmonical we must com - 
pare g b^ d f with c e^ g ''b\f, and that in all 
their inversions and positions. — Translator.] 



348 DISSONANT NOTES IN CHORDS OF THE SEVENTH. pabt m. 

be regarded as the dissanant note. This would make the fnndamental position of 
this chord to be that which Bamean assigned, making/ the root, thus : Z+a^ - c.i, 
which is a position of the Sixth and Fifth, and the cord is called by Bamean the 
chord of the great Sixth [grande Sixte^ in Bn^ish 'added Sixth *]. This is the 
position in which the chord nsuaUy appears in the final cadence of C major. Its 
meaning and its relation to the key is more certain than that of the false minor 
chord, d \ f-^-a^, mentioned on p. 340a, which as executed by a singer or heard by 
a listener is readily apt to be confused with d^-f+a^ in the key of A-^ minor. 
By changing d \ f+a^ into d^ -f+a^^, we obtain a minor chord, to which there 
will be a great attraction when the relation of d to ^ is not made very distinct. 
But if we were to change d into d^ in the chord d IZ+a^-c, thus producing 
{^j-Z+a^-c, although di would be consonant with / and a^ it would not be so 
with c; on the contrary, the dissonance ^|...c' [p. 832, No. 36, cents 1018, rough- 
fness 25] is much harsher than d...c' [ibid., No. 34, cents 996, roughness 23, 
much the same as the other], and, after all, it would be only the tone a^ which 
would enter into the compound tone of di, so that, notwithstanding this change, /, 
which contains three tones of the chord in its own compound tone, would predomi- 
nate over d^, which has only two. In accordance with this view, I find tiie chord 
/4-ai-c...(2 when used on the justly-intoned harmonium, as subdominant of C 
major, produces a better effect than/+aj-c...(2|. 

3. The oorreeponding chord of the Seventh on the Second of the miner scale, 
d I /- a^b + ^> ^^ o^^y <^^^ ^^^' ^1 which can be regarded as a constituent of the 
compound tone of either / or a^\}. But since c is the third partial of / and only 
the fifth partial of a^b, / as a rule predominates, and the chord must be regarded 
as a subdominant chord /-a^b + ^ with the addition of dissonant d. There is 
still less inducement to change d into d^ in this case than in the last. 

4. The chord of the Seventh on the Seventh of the major scale, bj^-d \ f+a^, 
f contains two tones, 5^ and d, belonging to the dominant g, and two others, / and 

ai, belonging to the subdominant /. Hence the chord splits into two equally im- 
portant halves. But we must observe that the two tones / and a^ approach very 
closely to the two next partial tones of the compound tone of G. The partials of 
this compound tone from the fourth onwards may be written — 

4 6 6 7* 8 9 

Hence the chord of the Ninth g + b^-d \ /+ a^ may represent the compound tone 
of the dominant $r, provided that the similarity be kept clear by the position of the 
tones, g being the lowest and a^ the highest ; it is also best not to let/ [standing 
for "/] fall too low. Since a is the ninth partial tone of the compound g, which is 
very weak in all usual qualities of tone, and is often inaudible, and since there is 
the interval of a comma between a and a^, and also between /^ and/ [but y and/ 
T differ by 27 cents], care must be taken to render the resemblance of the chord of 
the Ninth to the compound tone of g, as strong as possible, by adopting the device 
of keeping a^ uppermost, and then the use of /, a^, for /^ a [meaning y a will 
not be very striking. In this case / and a^ must be considered as the dissonant 
notes of the chord of the Ninth g + b^-d \ f-^a^, because although they are very 
nearly the same, they are not quite the same, as the partial tones of G. No pre- 
paration is necessary for the introduction of a^ into the chord, for the same reasons 
that / is allowed to be introduced into the chord of the dominant Seventh, 
gj^l^^-^ I f without preparation. Lastiy, some of the tones of the pentad chord 
of the Ninth may be omitted, to reduce it to four parts ; for example, its Fifth, as 
in <7-Hfti.../+rtp or its root, as in ftj- J | /+a|. If only the order of the tones is 
preserviHl i\s much as possible, and especially the a^ kept uppermost, the chord will 
fthviivs Ik» nH*ognist»d as a representative of the compound tone of G. 

* [Thai is, :»up(x-t$iug /j to be used for so thai the above chord represents y 6, if '/^ a. 
y, as alieady explaiued, see p. 347d, note f, — Translator.] 



CHAP. xvu. DISSONANT NOTBS IN CHORDS OF THE SEVENTH. 



:^9 



This seems to me the simple reason why musicians find it d^irable to make a^ 
the highest tone in the chord 6^ - ^ | / + ^i* Hauptmann, indeed, gives this as a 
rule without exception, and assigns rather an artificial reason for it. The ambiguity 
of the chord will thus be obviated as far as possible, and it receives a clearly in- 
telligible relation to the dominant of the key of C major, whereas in other positions 
of the same chord there would be too great a chance of confusing it with the sub- 
dominant of ilj minor.* When the intonation is just, the chord g-^b^- d...f^..,ay-f 
which consists (very nearly indeed) of the partial tones of the compound tone of ^, 
sounds very soft, and but slightly dissonant ; the chord of the Ninth in the key 
of C major, g +b^ -d' \f -ha^, and the chord of the Seventh in the position 
bi - d \f + a^', sound somewhat rougher, on account of the Pythagorean Third 
d' I /, and the imperfect Fifth d^^.a^', but they are not very harsh. If, however, 
a^ is taken in a lower position, they become very rough indeed. 

The chord of the Seventh b^^ - d \f + a^ and the following triad c-he^-gy asf 
already observed, contain all the tones in the key of C major, and hence this 
chordal succession is extremely well adapted for a brief and complete characterisa- 
tion of the key. 

5. The chord of the diminished Seventh^ ^i " ^ I / ~ ^^b> ^^^ ^^^ minor chord 
c - e^\} +gj have the last mentioned property for the minor key of C, and for this 
reason as well as for its great variability (p. S4c5d) it is largely, perhaps far too 
largely (p. 320d), employed in modern music, especially for modulations. It con- 
tains no note which belongs to the compound tone of any other note in the chord, 
but the three tones b^-d \f may be regarded as belonging to the compound tone 
of g, so that it also presente the appearance of a chord of the Ninth in the form 
g-^b^-d \f-a^. It therefore imperfectly represents the compound tone of the 
dominant, with an intruded tone a^b, and/ and a^\} may therefore be regarded as its 
dissonant tones. But the connection of the three tones b^-d \f with the compound 
tone of g is not so distinctly marked as to make it necessary to subordinate the pro- f 
gression of the tones/ and a^[> to that of b^ and d. At least the chord is allowed 
to commence without preparation, and it is resolved by the motion of all its tones 
to those tones of the scale which make the smallest intervals with them, for its 
elements are not sufficiently well connected with one another to allow of wide steps 
in its resolution. 

6. The chordS' of the major Seventh in the direct system of the key, as 
/+ai-c+«iand c+ej-g + b^ in G major, and a^|^-»-c-e^j> + ^ in C minor, as 
alreshdy remarked, mainly represent a major chord with the major Seventh as dis- 
sonant tone. The major Seventh forms rather a rough dissonance, and is decidedly 
opposed to the triad below it, into which it will not fit at all. 

7. The chords of the m4nor Seventh in the direct system of the key, as 
ai-c + ei-g and e^ - ^ + &i - d, give greatest prominence to the compound tone 
of their Thirds, to which their bass seems to be subjoined. Thus c + e^ - ^...a^ is 
the compound tone of c with an added a^ and g + b^-d.^e^ is the compound tone f 
of g with an added e^. But since c -(- 0i - ^ and g + bi-d, being the principal 
triads of the key, are constantly recurring, this addition of a^ and e^ respectively 
gives by contrast great prominence to these tones ; moreover, the a^ and 6^ in these 
chords of the Seventh are not so isolated as the <{ in d | /+ a^ - c, where d has no true 
Fifth in the chord. The a^ in a^ - c + ^i - ^ has the Fifth e^, and even the 
Seventh g I which belongs to its compound tone ; and in the same way the b^ and 



* [The rootless chord of the Ninth on the 
dominant of C major is d^ - <i I /+ «!, and the 
eubdominant of Ai minor is o | <ii - / + o^i 
which would not be confused with the former 
in just intonation, but in equal temperament 
is identical with it. — Translator,] 

t[Thi8 is the form in which the Author 
Was obliged to play it on his instrument, which 
had/i, see p. 817c, note, but not y. On the 
Harmonical play c+ei^g.,Jh]f...d and com- 



pare its effect with that of the next three 
chords as given in the text. — Translator.] 

t[The tone e^ of course represents the 
third partisJ of a^. Does the Author mean 
that the acute minor Seventh g represents the 
seventh partial Vi for which it is 49 cents, or 
about a quarter of a Tone too sharp ? The 
usual minor Seventh g^ has been allowed to do 
so, although 27 cents too sharp. Perhaps the 
expression ^even the Seventh * {allenfalls auch 



d60 PROGRESSION OF PARTS. part m. 

dolei-g-hbi-d may be considered to belong to the compound tone of e^ Hence 
the tone a^ in the first and e^ in the second are not necessarily subject to the laws 
of the resolution of dissonant notes. 

Writers on harmony are accustomed to consider the normal position of all these 
chords to be that of the chord of the Seventh, and to call the lowest tone its root. 
Perhaps it would be more natural to consider c + a^ ~ ^...a^ as the principal position 
of the chord ai-c+e^-g and c as its root. But such a chord is a compound 
tone of c with an inclination to a^ and in modulations this intrusion of the tone 
of a| is utilised for proceeding to those chords related to a^ which are not related 
to the chord c + e^-gy for example to d^ -/+ a^ In the same way we can proceed 
from g + bi-d...ei to a^-c + ^p which would be a jump from g-^-b^-d. For 
modulation, therefore, the a^ and e^ are essential parts of these chords respectively, 
and in this practical light they might be called the fundamental tones of their 
% respective chords. 

8. The chord of the Seventh on the tonic of the minor key, c - e^\f + g + b^, is 
seldom used, because b^ in the minor key bdongs essentially to ascending motion, 
and a resolved Seventh habitually descends. Hence it would be always better to 
form the chord c-e^]} + g- b% which is similar to the chords considered in No. 7. 



CHAPTER XVIII. 

LAWS OF THE PROGRESSION OF PARTS. 



Up to this point we have considered only the relations of the tones in a piece of 
f music with its tonic, and of its chords with its tonic chord. On these relations 
depends the connection of the parts of a mass of tone into one coherent whola 
But besides this the succession of the tones and chords must be regulated by natural 
relations. The mass of sound thus becomes more intimately bound up together, 
and, as a general rule, we must aim at producing such a connection, although, 
exceptionally, peculiar expression may necessitate the selection of a more violent 
and less obvious plan of progression. In the development of the scale we saw that 
the connection of all the notes by means of their relation to the tonic, if originally 
perceived at all, was at most but very dimly seen, and was apparentiy replaced by 
the chain of Fifths ; at any rate, the latter alone was sufficiently developed to be 
recognised in the Pythagorean construction of tonal systems. But by the side of 
our strongly developed feeling for the tonic in modern harmonic music, the necessity 
for a linked connection of individual tones and chords is still recognised, although 
the chain of Fifths, which originally connected the tones of the scale, as 

T /±c±^±d±a±e±6, 

has been interrupted by the introduction of perfect major Thirds, and now appears 
as 

/ ± c ± fl' ± ^ — ^1 ± ^1 ± *i ± ^1- 

The musical connection between two consecutive notes may be effected : 

1. By the relation of their compound tones. 

This is either : 

a.) direct, when the two consecutive tones form a perfectly consonant interval, 
in which case, as we have previously seen, one of the clearly perceptible partial 
tones of the first note is identical with one of the second. The pitch of the follow- 

die Septime) is intended to shew that this -j^, and the chord of a is |] a +<$-«- Sf. But 
view is lather too loose. In equal tempera- this is mere confusion. — Translator, '\ 
ment, indeed, the dissonant chord is i| a - e + « 



C7HAP. XVIII. 



MUSICAL CONNECTION OF TONES. 



351 



ing compound tone is then clearly determined for the ear. This is the best and 
surest kind of connection. The closest relationship of this kind exists when the 
voice jumps a whole Octave ; but this is not usual in melodies, except with the 
bass, as the alteration of pitch is felt to be too sudden for the upper part. Next 
to this comes the jump of a Fifth or Fourth, both of which are very definite 
and clear. After these follow the steps of a major Sixth or major Third, both of 
which can be readily taken, but some uncertainty begins to arise in the case of 
minor Sixths and minor Thirds. Esthetically it should be remarked, that of all 
the melodic steps just mentioned, the major Sixth and major Third have, I might 
almost say, the highest degree of thorough beauty. This possibly depends upon 
their position at the limit of clearly intelligible intervals. The steps of a Fifth or 
Fourth are too clear, and hence are, as it were, drily intelligible ; the steps of 
minor Thirds, and especially minor Sixths, begin to sound indeterminate. The 
major Thirds and major Sixths seem to hold the right balance between darkness f 
and light The major Sixth and major Third seem also to stand in the same 
relation to the other intervals harmonically. 

b.) indirect^ of the second degree only. This occurs in the regular progression 
of the scale, proceeding by Tones or Semitones. For example : 




d.,.ei 

*^ — ' 
G 






The whole major Tone c.d proceeds from the Fourth to the Fifth of the 
auxiliary tone G, which Eameau supposed to be subjoined as the fundamental bass 
of the above melodic progression. The minor Tone d...^^ proceeds from the Fifth 
to the major Sixth of the auxiliary tone G, and the Semitone e^,./ from the major 
Third to the Fourth of the auxiliary tone C. But in order that these auxiliary 
tones may readily occur to both singer and hearer, they must be among thef 
principal tones of the key. Thus the step ay..b^ in the major scale of C causes 
the singers a little trouble, although it is only the interval of a major Tone, and 
could be easily referred to the auxiliary tone E^, But the sound of e^ is not so firm 
and ready in the mind, as the sound of C and its Fifth G and Fourth F. Hence the 
Hexachord of Guido of Arezzo, which was the normal scale for singers throughout 
the middle ages, ended at the Sixth.* This Hexachord was sung with different 
pitches of the first note, but always formed the same melody : 





Ut 


Be 


Mi 


Fa 


Sol 


La 


either 


G 


A 


B 


C 


D 


E 


or 


C 


D 


E 


F 


G 


A 


or 


F 


a 


A 


Bb 


C 


D 



So that the interval Mi.,. Fa always marked the Semitone. f 

For the same reason Bameau preferred, in the minor scale, to refer the steps f 
d...e^b Ai^d e^b*-/ to G and G as auxihary tones, rather than to B\}f the Seventh of 



* For the same reason d'Alembert explains 
the limits of the old Greek heptachord, by 
means of two connected tetraohords — 

6...e...<i...6.../...^...a 



in which the step a... 6 is avoided. But this 
explanation would only suit a key in which c 
was the tonic, and this was probably not the 
case for the ancient Greek scale. 

t[Prof. Helmholtz leaves the intonation 
unmarked. Guido d* Arezzo, the presumed in- 
ventor of the Hexachord, is said to have intro- 
duced it about 1024 a.d., that is long before 
meantone temperament existed. Hence we 
must assume Pythagorean intonation (see p. 
81Sd). Yet in later times the Hexachord was 



certainly used for training singers in meantone 
temperament. It could not have been used for 
just intonation, because the melody cdefia 
assumed to be identical with gabcin the same 
scale, whereas in just intonation c 204 d 182 e^ 
112/and g 182 a^ 204 b^ 112 c' are difiEerent. For 
an excellent account of the Hexachord see 
Mr. Bockstro's article * Hexachord,' in Grove's 
DicUonary, To shew, however, how intona- 
tions are mixed up, it may be observed that he 
illustrates the use of the Hexachord in ' Beal 
Fugue ' by an example of Palestrina, who lived 
in the sixteenth century, and is often credited 
with just intonation, but who being junior to 
Salinas and Zarlino must have used meantona 
temperament. — Translator,] 



352 



MUSICAL CONNECTION OF TONES. 



the descending scale,* which had nd a snffidently dose relationship to the tonic, 
and hence was not well enoo^ impressed on the singer's mind for soch a porposa 
Taking g and c, the Octaves of G and C as the auxiliary tones, the motion in 
^...e^b is from the Fourth below g to the major Third below it, and in e^{^.../£rom 
the major Sixth below c to the Fifth below it On the other hand, it is impossible 
to reduce the step d^\^,..b^ [cents 274] in the minor scale to any relationship of the 
second degree. [See p. 301c, note*.] It is therefore also decidedly unmelodic 
and had to be entirely avoided in the old homophonic music, just as the steps 
of the false Fifths and Fourths, as ^j.../ [cents 610], or/...6xXcents 590]. Henoe 
the alterations in the ascending and descending min<M: scales already mentioned. 

In modem harmonic music many of these difficulties have disappeared, or 
become less sensible, because correct harmonisation can exhibit the connections 
which are absent in the melodic progression of an unaccompanied voice. Hence 
f also it is much easier to take a part at sight in a harmony, written in pianoforte 
score, which shews its relations, than to sing it from an unconnected part The 
former shews how the tone to be sung is connected with the whole harmony, the 
latter gives only its connection with the adjacent tones. f 

2. Tones may be connected by their approximation in pitch. 

This relation has been considered previously with reference to the leading note. 
The same holds good for the intercalated tones in chromatic passages. For 
example, if in major, we replace C.D by C...(7^...2>, this 0^ has no relation 
either of the first or second degree with the tonic C, and also no harmonic or 
modulational significance. It is nothing but a step intercalated between two 
tones, which has no relation to the scale, and only serves to render its discontinuous 
progression more like the gliding motion of natural speech, or weeping or howling. 
The Greeks carried this subdivision still further than we do at present, by splitting 
up a Semitone into two parts in their enharmonic system (p. 265a). Notwithstand- 
f ing the strangeness of the tone to be struck, chromatic progression in Semitones 
can be executed with sufficient certainty to allow it to be used in modulational 
transitions for the purpose of suddenly reaching very distant keys. 

Italian melodies are especially rich in such intercalated tones. Investigations 
of the laws under which they occur will be found in two essays of Sig. A. !^sevi.{ 
The rule is without exception that tones foreign to the scale can be introduced only 
when they dififer by a Semitone § from the note of the scale on to which they 
resolve, while any tones belonging to the scale itself can be freely introduced 
although out of harmony with the accompaniment, and even requiring the step of 
a whole Tone for their resolution. 



* [The Author writes B\f, and calls it * the 
Seventh of the descending scale * of minor» 
which, however, is B^^^ ftnd this answers for 
the first interval d...«>[^, owing to l^H-^-d, and 
T ^^b^^b » ^^^ ^^ ^^* ^^^ answer to the second 
interval a^b--*/ ^^ /--^'b ^^ dissonant, and it 
would not do to use &b> although 6b±/is con- 
sonant, because «^b- • '^b ^^ dissonant. But a^b 
would do, as we see from a'bi^^bi/~^^b* 
Hence it the text gives Bameau's notes, he 
must have been misled by temperament. — 

t [Henoe any means of shewing the relation 
of each tone to the tonic of the moment, as in 
the Tonic Sol-fa system, materially facilitates 
sight-singing, as perhaps the use of the duode- 
nal (App. XX. sect. E. art. 26)when thoroughly 
understood mi^ht also do. — Tranilator,'] 

XlntrodwstMn d un nouveau Systime 
d'Earmonie^ traduit par L. DeULtre ; Florence, 
1866. Studj 9ulV Amumia, Firense, 1866. 

§ [Of course those who laid down the rule 
thought only of a tempered Semitone. But in 
Pythagorean temperament there were two 



Semitones, the small 90 and the large 114 cents, 
and the rule was to make the Semitone closest 
to the note to which it led, thus e 114 cjf dOd^ 
d 114 db 90 d. And this notation was retained 
even in meantone temperament, where the re- 
lations were reversed, as c 76 ctf 117 d, d 76 d\f 
117 c ; but practically this made no diflference 
except to the singer, as the player had only one 
Semitone at command. This writing is still 
continued in equal temperament, although the 
two Semitones are now equalised as 100 cents, 
thus c IQO cf 100 d, and d 100 d^ 100 c. But 
in just intonation we have Semitones of various 
dimensions, c 114 e$ 90 d, c 112 d^b 92 d, c 92 
ej^ 112 d, c 90 (2b 114 d.clOoJi 184 d; which 
otthese is the player to play, or the singer to 
sing (a question of importance when each part 
is sustained by many unaocompanied voices) ? 
Practically the player will take the most hanay 
interval, and the singers must arrange in re- 
heoJTBal, but would possibly take e 92 cJL 112 d, 
d 92 d^b 11^ ^ ^ these are the intervals used 
in modulation from / to fjj^ to the dominant, 
and &i to &b to the subdominant. — Translatcr,] 



CHAP. xvm. RESOLUTION OF DISSONANCE. 353 

In the same way steps of a whole Tone may be made, provided the notes lie in 
the scale, when they serve merely to connect two other tones which belong to 
chords. These are the so-called passing or changing notes. Thus if while the 
triad of C major is sustained, a voice sings the passage c...(2...6^.../...^, the two 
notes d and / do not suit the chord, and have no relation to the harmony, but 
are simply justified by the melodic progression of the single voice. It is usual to 
place these passing notes on the unaccented parts of the bar, and to give them a 
short duration. Thus in the above example c, 6^, g would fall on accented parts 
of the bar. Then d is the passing note between c and e^ and / between 6^ and g. 
It is essential for their intelligibility that they should make steps of Semitones or 
whole Tones. They thus produce a simple melodic progression, which flows on 
freely, without giving any prominence to the dissonances produced. 

Even in the essentially dissonant chords the rule is, that dissonant tones which in- 
trude isolatedly on the mass of the other tones must proceed in a melodic progression, IT 
which can be easily understood and easily performed. And since the feeling for 
the natural relations of such an isolated tone is almost overpowered by the simul- 
taneous sound of the other tones which force themselves much more strongly on 
the attention, both singer and hearer are thrown upon the gradual diatonic pro- 
gression as the only means of clearly fixing the melodic relations of a dissonant 
note of this description. Hence it is generally necessary that a dissonant note 
should enter and leave the chord by degrees of the scale. 

Chords must be considered essentially dissonant, in which the dissonant notes 
do not enter as passing notes over a sustained chord, but are either accompanied 
by an especial chord, dififering from the preceding and following chords, or else are 
rendered so prominent by their duration or accentuation, that they cannot possibly 
escape the attention of the hearer. It has been already remarked that these chords 
are not used for their own sakes, but principally as a means of increasing the 
feeling of onward progression in the composition. Hence it follows for the motion IT 
of the dissonant note, that when it enters and leaves the chord, it will either ascend 
on each occasion or descend on each. If we allowed it to reverse its motion in the 
second half, and thus return to its original position, there would seem to have been 
no motive for the dissonance. It would in that case have been better to leave the 
note at rest in its consonant position. A motion which returns to its origin and 
creates a dissonance by the way, had better be avoided ; it has no object. 

Secondly it may be laid down as a rule, that the motion of the dissonant note 
should not be such as to make the chord consonant without any change in the 
other notes. For a dissonance which disappears of itself provided we wait for the 
next step, gives no impetus to the progress of the harmony. It sounds poor and 
unjustified. This is the principal reason why chords of the Seventh which have 
to be resolved by the motion of the Seventh, can only permit the Seventh to 
descend. For if the Seventh ascended in the scale, it would pass into the octave 
of the lowest tone, and the dissonance of the chord would disappear. When Bach, IF 
Mozart, and others use such progressions for chords of the dominant Seventh, the 
Seventh has the effect of a passing note, and must be so treated. In that case it 
has no effect on the progression of the harmony. 

The pitch of a single dissonant note in a chord of many parts is determined 
with greatest certainty, when it has been previously heard as a consonance in the 
preceding chord, and is merely sustained while the new chord is introduced. Thus 
if we take the following succession of chords : 

Q ••• d ••• g + bi 

c + e^" g + b^ 

the bi in the first chord is determined by its consonance with O. It simply remains 
while the tones c and e^ are introduced in place of G and d, and thus becomes a 
dissonance in the chord of the Seventh c + e^ ~ ^ -H 2^^. In this case the dissonance 
is said to be prepared. This was the only way in which dissonances might be 

A A 



354 RESOLUTION OF DISSONANCE. part in. 

introduced down to the end of the sixteenth century. Prepared dissonances produce 
a peculiarly powerful effect : a part of the preceding chord lingers on, and has to 
be forced from its position by the following chord. In this way, an effort to advance 
against opposing obstacles which only slowly yield, is very effectively expressed. 
And for the same reason the newly introduced chord {c-^e^-g in the last 
example) must enter on a strongly accented part of the bar ; as it would otherwise 
not sufficiently express exertion. The resolution of the prepared dissonance, on 
the contrary, naturally falls on an unaccented part of the bar. Nothing sounds 
worse than dissonances played or sung in a dragging or uncertain manner. In 
that case they appear to be simply out of tune. They are, as a rule, only justified 
by expressing energy and vigorous progress. 

Such prepared dissonances, termed suspensions, may occur in many other chords 
besides those of the Seventh. For example : 

" Preparation : G .,.c + e^ 

Suspension : G ...c ... d 
Resolution : G -^B^- d 

The tone c is the prepared dissonance ; in the second chord, which must fall on 
an accented part of the bar, d the Fifth of G is introduced and generates the dis- 
sonance c.d, and then c must give way, and according to our second rule, must 
go further from d, which results in the resolution G-^-B^-d. The chords might 
also be played in the inverse order, and then d would be a prepared dissonance which 
was forced away by c. But this is not so good, because descending motion is better 
suited than ascending motion to an extruded note. Heightened pitch always gives 
us involuntarily the impression of greater effort, because we have continually to 
exert our voice in order to reach high tones. The dissonant note on descending 
seems to yield suitably to superior force, but on ascending it as it were rises by its 
IT own exertion. But circumstances may render the latter course suitable, and its 
occurrence is not unfrequent. 

In the other case, especially frequent for chords of the Seventh, when the dis- 
sonant note is not prepared but is struck simultaneously with the chord to which it 
is dissonant, the significance of the dissonance is different. Since these unprepared 
Sevenths must usually enter by the descent of the preceding note, they may be 
always considered as descending from the Octave of the root of their chord, by 
supposing a consonant major or minor chord having the same root as the chord 
of the Seventh to be inserted between that and the preceding chord. In this case 
the entrance of the Seventh merely indicates that this consonant chord begins to 
break up immediately and that the melodic progression gives a new direction to the 
harmony. This new direction, leading to the chord of resolution, must be empha- 
sised, and hence the dissonance necessarily falls on the preceding unaccented part 
of a bar. 
^ The introduction of an isolated dissonant note into a chord of several parts 
cannot generally be used as the expression of exertion, but this character will 
attach to the introduction of a chord as against a single note, supposing that this 
single note is not too powerful. Hence it lies in the nature of things that the 
first kind of introduction takes place on unaccented and the last on accented parts 
of a bar. 

These rules for the introduction of dissonances may be often neglected for the 
chords of the Seventh in the reverted system, in which the Fourth and Second of 
the scale occur, and notes from the subdominant side are mixed up with notes from 
the dominant side. These chords may also be introduced to enhance the dynamical 
impression of the advancing harmony, for they have the effect of keeping the 
extent of the key perpetually before the feeling of the hearer, and this object 
justifies their existence. 

Of several voices which are leaving the chord of the tonic C, it is quite easy 
for some to pass on to notes of the dominant chord ^ + &i-(2, and for others to 



CHAP. xvui. CHORDAL SEQUENCES. 355 

proceed to the notes of the subdominant chords Z+a^-c or/- a^|j + c, as each 
voice will be able to strike the new note with perfect certainty, on account of the 
close relationship between the chords. When, however, the dissonant chord has been 
thus formed and sounded, the dissonant notes will have the feeling for their more 
distant relations obscured by the strangeness of the other parts of the chord, and 
must generally proceed according to the rule of resolution of dissonances. Thus 
the singer who sounds / in the chord g-^bi-d | /, would vainly endeavour to 
picture to himself the sound of the a^ which is related to/ with sufficient clearness 
to leap up or down to it with certainty ; but he is easily able to execute the small 
step of half a Tone, by which / descends to e^ in the chord c + Ci-g. But the 
note g itself, on the other hand, having its own compound tone approximatively 
indicated by the chord of the Seventh, has no difficulty in passing by a leap to its 
related notes, as c for example, or b^ to g. 

In the chords b^-d \ /+ a^ and b^-d \f-CL^\}, in which nei&er dominant nor T 
subdominant prevails, it would not be advisable to let any note proceed by a leap. 

And it would also not be advisable to pass by a leap into the chords of the 
reverted system from any other chord but the tonic, because that chord alone is 
related to both dominant and subdominant chords at the same time. 

It is not possible to pass to chords of the Seventh in the direct system, from 
another chord related to both extremities of the chord of the Seventh, and hence 
in this case the dissonance must be introduced in accordance with the strict rules. 

Musicians are divided in opinion as to the proper treatment of the subdominant 
chord with an added Sixth, f+ai-c.d in C major. The rule of Bameau is 
probably correct (p. 347t2), making d the dissonant note, to be resolved by rising 
to By This is also decidedly the most harmonious kind of resolution. Modem 
theorists, on the other hand, regard this chord as a chord of the Seventh on d^ and 
take c as the dissonant note to be resolved by descent ; whereas when c remains, d 
is quite free and may therefore even descend. f 

Chordal Sequences, 

Just as the older homophonic music required the notes of a melody to be linked 
together, modem music endeavours to link together the series of chords occurring 
in a tissue of harmony, and it thus obtains much greater freedom in the melodic 
succession of individual notes, because the natural relationship of the notes is 
much more decisively and emphatically marked in harmonic music than in homo- 
phonic melody. This desire for linking the chords together was but slightly 
developed in the sixteenth century. The great Italian masters of this period allow 
the chords of the key to succeed each other in leaps which are often surprising, 
and which we should at present admit only in exceptional cases. But during the 
seventeenth century the feeling for this peculiarity of harmony also was developed, 
so that we find Bameau laying down distinct rules on the subject in the beginning 
of the eighteenth century. In reference to his conception of fundamental bass, IT 
Bameau worded his rule thus : * The fundamental bass may, as a general rule, 
proceed only in perfect Fifths or Thirds, upwards or downwards. According to 
our view the fundamental bass of a chord is that compound tone which is either 
exclusively or principally represented by the notes of the chord. In this sense 
Bameau's rule coincides with that for the melodic progression of a single note to 
its nearest related notes. The compound tone of a chord, like the voice of a 
melody, may only proceed to its nearest related notes. It is much more difficult 
to assign a meaning to progression by relationship in the second degree for chords 
than for separate notes, and similarly for progression in small diatonic degrees 
without relationship. Hence Bameau's rule for the progression of the funda- 
mental bass is on the whole stricter than the rules for the melodic progression of 
a single voice. 

Thus if we take the chord c + e^- g, which belongs to the compound tone of C, 
we may pass by Fifths to g + b^-d, the compound tone of G, or to /-t- a^ - c, the 

A a2 



356 CHORDAL SEQUENCES. part ra. 

compound tone of F, Both of these chords are directly related to the first 
c-\-e^-g, because each has one note in common with it, g and c respectively. 

But we can also allow the compound tone to proceed in Thirds, and then we 
obtain minor chords, that is, provided we keep to the same scale. The transition 
from the compound tone of to that of E^ is expressed by the sequence of chords 
c + «! - ^ and e^-g + b^, which are related by having two notes, e^ g, in common. 
The sequence c-hBi-g and ai-c + Si from the compound tone of C^ to that oi A^ 
is of the same kind. The latter is even more natural than the former, because the 
chord Gi-c + ei represents imperfectly the compound tone of A^ into which that of 
C intrudes, so that the compound tone of C, which was clearly given in the pre- 
ceding chord, persists with two of its tones, o, e^, in the second chord, a relation 
which did not exist in the former case. 

But if we prefer to leave the key of G major, we can pass to perfect compound 
IT tones in Thirds, as from c + e^ - ^ to e^ + gA - b^ or ^i + c^ - e^, as is very usual in 
modulations. 

Eameau will not allow a simple diatonic progression of the fundamental bass of 
consonant triads, except where major and minor chords alternate, as from g + b^-d 
to a^ - c + e^, that is from the compound tone of G to that of A^, but calls this a 
* licence '. In reality this progression is readily explicable from our point of view, 
by considering ai - c + 6^ as a compound tone of C with an intrusive a^. The 
transition is then one of the usual close relationship, from the compound tone of 
G to that of C, and the a^ appears as a mere appendage to the latter. Every 
minor chord represents two compound tones in an imperfect manner. Rameau 
first formulated this ambiguity {double emploi) for the minor chord with added 
Seventh, which, in the form dj-Z+aj - c, may represent the compound tone of 
Dp and in the form/+ai - c.d that of F, or in Rameau's language its funda- 
mental bass might be D^ or F.* In this chord of the Seventh the ambiguity is 
f more marked because it contains the compound tone of F more completely ; but 
the ambiguity belongs in a less marked degree to the simple chord also. 

With the false cadence in the major key 

g + bj^-'d to a^ -c + e^ 

must be associated* the corresponding cadence in the minor key, 

g + b^-d to a^jj-c + e^tj 

where the chord a^jj + c - 6^ (^ replaces the normal resolution c^ e^\f\-g. But here 
there is only a single note of the compound tone of C remaining, and the false 
cadence therefore becomes much more striking. It will be rendered milder by 
adding the Seventh/ to the G chord, because/ is related to a% 

When two chords having only a relationship of the second degree, are placed in 
juxtaposition, we usually feel the transition to be very abrupt. But if the chord 
«. which connects them is one of the principal chords of the key, and has consequently 
been frequently heard, the effect is not so striking. Thus in the final cadence it is 
not unusual to see the succession f+c^i-c and g-^b^ - d, the two chords being re- 
lated through the tonic chord c + e^ - ^, thus : 



f -h a^- c g + b^- d 

Generally we must remember that all these rules of progression are subject 
to many exceptions, partly because expression may require exceptional abruptness 
of transition, and partly because the hearer's recollection of previous chords may 

* [Of course Rameau, writing in tempered and/+ai-c...ci were to him identicaL See 
notation, did not distinguish d^ and (2, so that pp. 340a, d46a, S4iSa.—Tran8lator.] 
the actual notes in the two chords (i^ -/+ a^ -> c 



CHAP, xviii. CHORDAL SEQUENCES. 357 

sufficiently strengthen a naturally weak relationship. It is clearly an entirely false 
position which teachers of harmony have assumed, in declaring this or that to he 
* forbidden ' in music. In point of fact nothing musical is absolutely forbidden, 
and all rules for the progression of parts are actually violated in the most effective 
pieces of the greatest composers. It would have been much better to proceed from 
the principle that certain transitions, which are disallowed, produce striking and 
unusual effects upon the hearer, and consequently are unsuitable except for the 
expression of what is unusual. Generally speaking, the object of the rules laid 
down by theorists is to keep up a well-connected flow of melody and harmony, and 
make its course readily intelligible. If that is what we aim at, we had best observe 
their restrictions. But it cannot be denied that a too anxious avoidance of what is 
unusual places us in danger of becoming trivial and dull, while, on the other hand, 
inconsiderate and frequent infringement of rules makes compositions eccentric and 
unconnected. T 

When disconnected triads would come together it is frequently advantageous to 
transform them into chords of the Seventh, and thus create a bond between them. 
In place of the preceding sequence of two triads 

f + a^- c to g + b^" d 

we can use a sequence of chords of the Seventh which represent the same com- 
pound tones 

f + a^- c.d to g + b^-d\f. 

In this case two of the four notes remain unchanged ; in the chord of F, the 
d belongs to the compound tone of the dominant, and in the chord of G the / to 
that of the subdominant. 

Hence chords of the Seventh come to play an important part in modem music 
for the purpose of effecting well-connected and yet rapid transitions from chord to T 
chord, and urging them forward by the action of dissonances. In this way par- 
ticularly, transitions to the compound tone of the subdominant are easily effected. 

Thus, for example, beginning with the triad g + b^ - d we can not merely 
pass to the chord of C, or c + e^ - ^, but, letting g remain as a Seventh, to the chord 
of the Seventh ai - c + e^ - g, which unites the two chords c + e^ - g and 
a^ - c + e^ and then immediately pass to d^ -- f + a^ which is related to the 
latter chord, so that two steps bring us to the other extremity of the system of C 
major. This transition also gives the best progression for the Seventh (g in the 
example), because it has b.een prepared in the previous chord, and is resolved by 
descent (to/) in the succeeding chord. If we tried the same transition backwards, 
we should have to obtain the Seventh g by progression from a^ in the chord of 
di - f -{- a^y and then be compelled to introduce the c of the chord of the Seventh 
abruptly, because we should have a prohibited succession of Fifths {di ± a^ and 
c ± g) if we tried to descend from di. We must rather obtain c by a leap from /, T 
because a^ in the first triad must furnish both the a^ and g of the chord of the 
Seventh. Thus the transition to the dominant is by no means easy, fluent, and 
natural ; it is much more embarrassed than the passage to the subdominant. Con- 
sequently the regular and usual progression of the chord of the Seventh is for 
its Seventh to descend to the triad whose Fifth is the root of the chord of the 
Seventh. Supposing we denote the root of the chord of the Seventh by I, its 
Third by III, <&c., a falling Seventh will lead us to either of these chords : 

I_III_V-VII and I-III-V-VII 

I \/ / I I \/ 

I _ IV - VI I - III - VI 

Of these two transitions, the first, which leads to a chord of which IV is the root, 
is the liveliest, because it introduces a chord with two new tones. The other. 



368 CHORDAL SEQUENCES. pabt ra. 

which leads to a triad having VI for its root, introduces only one new tone. Hence 
the first is regarded a»s the principal method of resolving chords of the Seventh. 
For example : 



g + bi~ d f 


«1 - 


- g + b^- d 


\/ / 




\/ / 


g ... c + Cj 


«1 


• •• Cb-\ ^ C 


c + e^- g + b^ 


*.- 


■ d f + a. 


\/ / 


i. 


\/ y 


C ... / + «! 


... e^ - g 



The descent of the tone YII introduces the tone YI. In the first case this is the 
Third of the new triad, and in the second its root.* But it may be its Fifth : 

f I-III-V-VII 

\ \/ / 
II-IV-VI 

This, however, could only occur naturally in the two chords : 

b^ - d I / + a and b^ - d | / - a^b 

\ \/ / \ \/ / 

c + e,- §f c - e^\}-b g 

because the two chords of the Seventh represent the compound tone of G, and the 
tonic chord establishes the bond of union between its two sections. In other cases 
our scheme gives so-called false cadences : 

g + b^- d I / and g -^ b^- d \ f 
1 «! - c + «! a^b+ c - e'b 

which are justified (the first as most natural) by the fact that either c + 6^ or c - c^b 
belongs to the chord of the normal resolution. Bameau therefore justly observes 
that this kind of resolution is only permissible when the lY of the second chord is 
the normal Fourth of the I on the chord of the Seventh. 

This exhausts the resolutions by the descent of the Seventh. Those in which 
it remains unchanged take place according to the schemes : 

I_III-V-YIIt and I-III-V-YIIt 

\ \/ I \/ I I 

II_IV - YII II- - Y-YII 

In the first the Seventh becomes the root, in the second the Third of the ne^ 
chord. If it were the Fifth, the new chord would coincide with part of the chord 
of the Seventh : 



I - III - Y - YII 

I I I I 

YII - III - V - YII.§ 



* [As examples of the second method have triad b^-d | /, itself a dissonance ; and in the 

been omitted in the text, take third the imperfect minor d \ f-\-a^. — Trans- 
lator,'] 

g+h.- d \ f ^1-9^ ^i- ^ :[Examples : 

I I \/ I I 9 + \- d \ f, c + e^- g + \ 

g + bi...ei e^^g...c \/ I I \/ I 

-Translator.] Y, d /, Y ... i + 6, 

t [Examples: —TraTisldtorA 

g + b^-d\f c + Bi-g + by^ e^-g + bj-d §[Examples: 

\ I \\/ I \\/ I g + b,-d\f c+e,-g + b, 

a^-c.../ d I / ... 6i /+ aj ... d I i I | 



Here in the first example we obtain the major / ... 6i - d | / bi...ej - g + b^ 

triad /+«i-c; in the second the diminished — Translator.] 



CHAP, xviii. CONSECUTIVE FIFTHS AND OCTAVES. 359 

In these connections the resolution is towards the dominant side. The transition is 
most decisive in the first, where the Seventh becomes the root. These resolutions 
are on the whole less usual, because we pass more easily and frequently from 
chords on the dominant side into chords of the Seventh of the direct system. In 
the chords of the reverted system these transitions occur more frequently, because 
their Sevenths may enter by ascent, and hence we avoid the sequences of Fifths, 
which greatly embarrass the transitions from a triad to a chord of the Seventh on 
its dominant side. 

As to the transitions from one chord of the Seventh to another, or to a dissonant 
triad of the direct system which may be regarded as a mutilated chord of the 
Seventh, all these matters are sufficiently developed in the ordinary manuals of 
Thorough Bass, and offer no difficulties that would justify us in dwelling upon 
them here. 

On the other hand, we have to say a few words on certain rules respecting the IT 
progression of the individual parts in polyphonic compositions. Originally, as we 
have already remarked, all these parts were of equal importance, and had usually 
to repeat the same melodic figures in succession. The harmony was a secondary 
consideration, the melodic progression of the individual voices was the principal 
matter. Hence it was necessary to take care that each voice should stand out 
clear and distinct from all the others. The relation between the importance of 
harmony and melody has certainly altered essentially in modem music ; the former 
has attained a much higher independent significance. But, after all, perfection of 
harmony must arise from the simultaneous performance of several voices, each of 
which has its own beautiful and clear melodic progression, and each of which 
therefore moves in a direction that the hearer has no difficulty in understanding. 

On this rests the prohibition of consecutive Fifths and Octaves. The meaning 
of this prohibition has given rise to much disputation. The meaning of pro- 
hibiting consecutive Octaves has been made clear by musical practice. In poly- IT 
phonic music two voices which lie one or two Octaves apart, are forbidden to 
move forward in such a way that after their next step they should be also one or 
two Octaves apart. But precisely in the same way, two voices in a polyphonic 
piece are forbidden to go on in unison for several notes, while for complete musical 
compositions it is not forbidden that two voices, or even all the voices, should 
proceed in Unisons or Octaves, for the purpose of strengthening the melodic pro- 
gression. It is clear that the reason of this rule must lie in the limiting the wealth 
of the progression of parts by Unisons and Octaves. This is allowable when it is 
intentionally introduced for a whole melodic phrase, but it is noti suited for a few 
notes in the course of a piece, where it can only give the impression of reducing 
the richness of the harmony by an unskilful accident. The accompaniment of a 
lower part by a voice singing an Octave higher, merely strengthens part of the 
compound tone of the lower voice, and hence where variety in the progression of 
parts is important, does not essentially differ from a Unison. T 

Now in this respect the nearest to an Octave are the Twelfth, and its lower 
octave, the Fifth. Hence, then, consecutive Twelfths and consecutive Fifths par- 
take of the same imperfection as consecutive Octaves. But the case is somewhat 
worse. It is possible to accompany a whole melody in Octaves when desirable, 
without committing any error, but this cannot be done for Fifths and Twelfths 
without changing the key. It is impossible to proceed by a single diatonic step 
from the tonic as root with an accompaniment of Fifths, without departing from 
the key. In C major, we ascend from the Fifth c ± g to the Fifth d ±a, but a 
does not belong to the scale, which requires the deeper ai ; we descend to b^ ±f^ 
and there is no f-^ in the scale at all. The other upward steps from d exclusive 
to a J can of course be accompanied by perfect Fifths in the scale, as e^±b^, 
f ±o\ g ±d\ a^±e^. It is therefore impossible to use the Twelfth consistently 
for increasing the richness of the tone. But again, when the intervals of a Twelfth 
or Fifth are continued for a few steps in melodic progression, they have simply the 



360 CONSECUTIVE FIFTHS AND OCTAVES. part ra. 

effect of strengthening the root. For the Twelfth this arises from its directly 
corresponding to one of the upper partial tones of the root. For the Fifth c ± g, 
the c and g are the two first upper partials of the comhinational tone C» which 
necessarily accompanies the Fifth. Hence an accompaniment in Fifths above* 
when it occurs isolatedly in the midst of a pdyphonic piece, is not only open to the 
charge of monotony, but cannot be consistently carried out. It should therefore 
be always avoided. 

But that consecutive Fifths merely infringe the laws of artistic composition » 
and are not disagreeable to the natural ear, is evident from the simple fact that all 
the tones of our voice, and those of most instruments, are accompanied by Twelfths, 
and that our whole tonal system reposes upon that fact. When the Fifths are 
introduced as merely mechanical constituents of the compound tone, they are 
therefore fully justified. So in the mixture stops of organs. In these stops the 

f pipes which give the prime tones of the compound, are always accompanied by 
others which give its harmonics, as the Octaves, Twelfths variously repeated, and 
even the higher major Thirds. By this means the performer is able to compose a 
tone of a much more penetrating, piercing quality, than it would be possible to 
produce by the simple organ pipes with their relatively weak upper partial tones. 
It is only by such means that an organ is able to dominate over the singing of a 
large congregation. Almost all musicians have blamed an accompaniment of 
Fifths, or even Thirds, but fortunately have not been able to effect anything 
against the practice of organ-builders. In fact the mixture stops of an oi^n 
merely reproduce the masses of tone which would have been created by bowed 
instruments, trombones, and trumpets, if they had executed the same music. It 
would be quite different if we collected independent parts, from each of which we 
should have to expect an independent melodic progression in the tones of the 
scale. Such independent parts cannot possibly move with the precision of a 

H machine ; they would soon betray their independence by slight mistakes, and we 
should be led to subject them to the laws of the scale, which, as we have seen, 
render a consistent accompaniment in Fifths impossible. 

The prohibition of Fifths and Octaves extends also, but with less strictness, to 
the next adjacent consonant intervals, when two of them are so placed as to form 
a connected group of upper partials in a compound tone. Thus transitions like 

d..»g + bi to c.-Z+ttj, 

are ruled by musical theorists to be inferior to transitions like 

bi-d'...g' to a^-c\..f. 

For d, gy b^ are the third, fourth, and fifth partial tones of the compound G^, but 
6p d't g' could only be regarded as its fifth, sixth, and eighth. Hence the first 
f position of the chord expresses a single compound tone much more decidedly than 
the second, which is often allowed to be continued through long passages, when of 
course the nature of the Thirds and Fourths varies. 

The prohibition of consecutive Fifths was perhaps historically a reaction against 
the first imperfect attempts at polyphonic music, which were confined to an ac- 
companiment in Fourths or Fifths, and then, like all reactions, it was carried 
too far, in a barren mechanical period, till absolute purity from consecutive Fifths, 
became one of the principal characteristics of good musical composition. Modem 
harmonists agree in allowing that other beauties in the progression of parts are 
not to be rejected because they introduce consecutive Fifths, although it is advisable 
to avoid them, when there is no need to make such a sacrifice. 

There is also another point in the prohibition of Fifths to which Hauptmann 
has drawn attention. We are not tempted to use consecutive Fifths when we pass 
from one consonant triad to another which is nearly related to it, because other 
progressions lie nearer at hand. Thus we pass from the triad of C major to the 



m^mm 



CHAP. xvin. CONSECUTIVE FIFTHS AND OCTAVES. 361 

four related triads in the following manner, the fundamental bass proceeding by 
Thirds or Fifths : 

c + Ci - g c + e^ - g c -{- e^ - g and c + Bi - g 
to c + fij ... Oj, to c .., f + ttj, to Bj^,.,e^ — g, to Bi ... d ... g. 

But when the fundamental bass proceeds in Seconds, and hence does not pass 
to a directly related chord, the nearest position of the new chord is certainly one 
which produces consecutive Fifths. For example : 

g + b^ - d' or g -^ b^ - d' 
to a - c' + Ci, to/ -h a^ - c 

In such cases, then, we must have recourse to other transitions by larger 
intervals, as : IT 

* ^ + ^1 - ^'. or g + b^ - d' 

to Ci ... a^ — c', to ttj — c ... / 

which avoid consecutive Fifths. 

Hence when the chords are. closely connected by near relationship and small 
distance in the scale, consecutive Fifths do not present themselves. When they 
occur, therefore, they are always signs of abrupt chordal transition, and it is then 
better to assimilate the progression of parts to that which spontaneously arises in 
the case of related chords. 

This consideration respecting consecutive Fifths, which was emphasised by 
Hauptmann, appears to give the law greater importance. That it is not the only 
motive for the prohibition of consecutive Fifths appears from the fact, that the 
forbidden sequence 

g + bi " d* to/+ ^1 - c' 
is allowed, when the chords are in the position 

6i - d' ... g to ttj - c' .../', 

although the step in the fundamental bass is the same. 

The prohibition of so-called hidden Fifths and Octaves has been added on to 
the prohibition of consecutive Fifths and Octaves, at least for the two e;Ktreme 
voices of a composition in several parts. This prohibition forbids the lowest and 
uppermost voice in a piece to proceed by direct motion [that is, both parts ascending 
or both parts descending] into the consonance of an Octave or Fifth (including 
Twelfth). They should rather come into such a consonance by contrary motion 
(one descending and the other ascending). In duets this would also hold for the 
unison. The meaning of this law must certainly be, that whenever the extreme 
voices unite to form the partial tones of a compound, they ought to have reached ^ 
a state of relative rest. It must be conceded that the equilibrium will be more 
perfect when the extreme parts of the whole mass of tone approach their junction 
from opposite sides, than when the centre of gravity, so to speak, of the sonorous 
mass is displaced by the parallel motion of the extreme voices, and these voices 
catch one another up with different velocities. But where the motion proceeds in 
the same direction, and no relative rest is intended, the hidden Fifths are also not 
avoided, as in the usual formulae : 

J -^r,-^, 1- 



ii^^ii^^i 



t=H-=t=p 



1 

in which the g ±i\'& reached by passages involving hidden Fifths. 

Another rule in the progression of parts, prohibiting /a2<e relations, must have 
had its origin in the requirements of the singer. But what the singer finds a 



362 RESULTS OF THE INVESTIGATION. pabt m. 

difficulty in hitting, must naturally also appear an unusual and forced skip to the 
hearer. By false relations is meant the case when two tones in consecutive 
chords, which belong to different voices, form false Octaves or false Fifths. For 
example, if one voice in the first chord sings h^ and another voice in the next 
chord sings h]), or the first has c and the second cJt, there are false Octave rela- 
tions. False Fifth relations are forbidden for the extreme voices only. Thus 
in the first chord the bass has 6j, in the second the soprano has /, or conversely, 
where 6^.../ is a false Fifth. The meaning of this rule is, probably, that the 
singer would find it difficult to hit the new tone which is not in the scale, if 
he had just heard the next nearest tone of the scale given by another singer. 
Similarly, when he has to take the false Fifth of a tone which is prominent in 
present harmony as lowest or highest. There is therefore a certain sense in the 
prohibition, but numerous exceptions have arisen, as the ear of modem musicians. 
IT singers and hearers, has become accustomed to bolder combinations and livelier 
progressions. All these rules were essentially intended for the old ecclesiastical 
music, where a quiet, gentle, well-contrived, and well-adjusted stream of sound 
was aimed at, without any intentional effort or disturbance of the smoothest 
equilibrium. Where music has to express effort and excitement, these rules 
become meaningless. Hidden Fifths and Octaves and even false relations of 
Fifths are found in abundance in the chorales of Sebastian Bach, who is other- 
wise so strict in his harmonies, but it must be admitted that the motion of his 
voices is much more powerfully expressed than in the old Italian ecclesiastical 
music. 



CHAPTER XIX. 

ESTHETICAL RELATIONS. 



Let us review the results of the preceding investigation. 

Compound tones of a certain class are preferred for all kinds of music, melodic 
or harmonic ; and are almost exclusively employed for the more delicate and 
artistic development of music : these are the compound tones which have har- 
monic upper partial tones, that is compound tones in which the higher partial tones 
have vibrational numbers which are integral multiples of the vibrational number of 
the lowest partial tone, or prime. For a good musical effect we require a certain 
moderate degree of force in the five or six lowest partial tones, and a low degree 
of force in the higher partial tones. 

This class of compound tones with harmonic upper partials is objectively dis- 
tinguished by including all sonorous motions which are generated by a mechanical 
T process that continues to act uniformly, and which consequently produce a uniform 
and sustained sensation. In the first rank among them stand the compound tones 
of the human voice, man's first musical instrument in time and value. The com- 
pound tones of all wind and bowed instruments belong to this class. 

Among the bodies which are made to emit tones by striking, some, as strings, 
have also harmonic upper partials, and these can be used for artistic music. 

The greater number of the rest, as membranes, rods, plates, &c., have inhar- 
monic upper partial tones, and only such of them as have not very strong secondary 
tones of this kind can be singly and occasionally employed in connection with 
musical instruments proper. 

Although sonorous bodies excited by blows may continue to sound for some 
time their tones do not proceed with uniform force, but diminish more or less 
slowly and die away. Constant power over the intensity of tone, therefore, which 
is indispensable for expressive performance, can only be attained on instruments 
of the first kind, which can be maintained in a state of excitement, and which 



CHAP. XIX. RESULTS OF THE INVESTIGATION. 363 

produce only harmonic upper partial tones. On the other hand, bodies excited by 
blows have a peculiar value for clearly defining the rhythm. 

A second reason for preferring compound tones with harmonic upper partials 
is subjective and conditioned by the construction of our ear. In the ear even every 
simple tone, if sufficiently intense, excites feeble sensations of harmonic upper 
partials, and each combination of several simple tones generates combinational tones, 
as I have explained at the end of Chap. YII. (p. 157£2-159c). A single compound 
tone with irrational partials, when sounded with sufficient force, thus produces the 
sensation of dissonance, and simple tones acquire in the ear itself something of the 
nature of composition out of harmonic upper partial tones. 

We are justified in assuming that historically all music was developed from 
song. Afterwards the power of producing similar melodic effects was attained by 
means of other instruments, which had a quality of tone compounded in a manner 
resembling that of the human voice. The reason why, even when constructive IT 
art was most advanced, the choice of musical instruments was necessarily limited 
to those which produced compound tones with harmonic upper partials, is clear 
from the above conditions. 

This invariable and peculiar selection of instruments makes us perfectly certain 
that harmonic upper partials have from all time played an essential part in musical 
constructions, not merely for harmony, as the second part of this book shews, but 
also for melody. 

Again, we can at any moment convince ourselves of the essential importance 
of upper partial tones to melody, by the absence of all expression in melodies 
executed with objectively simple tones, as, for example, those of wide-stopped 
organ pipes, for which the harmonic upper partials are formed only subjectively 
and weakly in the ear. 

A necessity was always felt for music of all kinds to proceed by certain definite 
degrees of pitch ; but the choice of these degrees was long unsettled. To distin- IT 
guish small differences of pitch and intonate them with certainty, requires a greater 
amount of technical musical power and cultivation of ear, than when the intervals 
are larger. Hence among almost all uncivilised people we find the Semitones 
neglected, and only the larger intervals retained. For some of the more cultivated 
nations, as the Chinese and Gaels, a scale of this kind has become established.'"' 

It might perhaps have seemed most simple to make all such degrees of pitch 
of equal amount, that is, equally well distinguishable by our sensations. Such a 
graduation is possible for all our sensations, as Fechner has shewn in his investi- 
gations on psychophysical laws. We find such graduations used for the divisions 
of musical rhythm, and the astronomers use them in reference to the intensity of 
light in determining stellar magnitudes. Even in the field of musical pitch, the 
modern equally tempered chromatic scale presents us with a similar graduation. 
But although in certain of the less usual Greek scales and in modem Oriental 
music, cases occur where some particular small intervals have been divided on the H 
principle of equal graduations, yet there seems at no time or place to have been a 
system of music in which melodies constantly moved in equal degrees of pitch, 
but smaller and larger intervals have always been mixed in the musical scales in 
a way that must appear entirely arbitrary and irregular until the relationship of 
compound tones is taken into consideration.'^ 

On the contrary, in all known musical systems the intervals of Octave and 
Fifth have been decisively emphasised. Their difference is the Fourth, and the 
difference between this and the Fifth, is the Pythagorean major Tone 8 : 9, by 
which (but not by the Fourth or Fifth) the Octave might be approximatively 
divided. 

The sole remnants that I can find in modern music of the endeavour some- 
times made in homophonic music to introduce degrees depending on equality of 
interval and not on relationship of tone, are the chromatic intercalated notes, and 

* [See, however, App. XX. sect. K.-^Translator.] 



364 RESULTS OF THE INVESTIGATION. pakt in. 

the leading note of the key when similarly used. But this is always a Semitone 
(p. 352c), an interval well known in the series of related tones, which, owing to 
its smallness, is easily measured hy the sensation of its difference, even in places 
where its tonal relationship is not immediately sensible. 

The decisive importance acquired by the Octave and Fifth in all musical scales 
from the earliest times shews, that the construction of scales must have been 
originally influenced by another principle, which finally became the sole regulator 
of every artistic form of a complete scale. This is the principle which we have 
termed tonal relationship. 

Relationship in the first degree between two compound tones consists in their 
each having a partial tone of the same pitch. 

In singing, the similarity of two musical tones which stand in the relation of 
Octave or Fifth to one another, must have been very soon observed. As already 
Y remarked, this gives also the Fourth, which has itself a sufficiently perceptible 
natural relationship to have been remarked independently. To discover the tonal 
similarity of the major Third and major Sixth, required a finer cultivation of the 
musical ear, and perhaps also peculiar beauty of voice. Even yet we are easily led 
by the familiar sharp major Thirds of equal temperament, to endure any major 
Thirds which are somewhat too sharp, provided they occur melodically and are 
not sounded together. On the other hand, we must not forget that the rules of 
Archytas and Abdul Eadir,* both of which were applicable to homophonic music 
only, gave a preference to the natural major Third, although its introduction 
obliged both musicians to renounce a musical system so theoretically consistent 
and invested with such high authority as that of Pythagoras. 

Hence the principle of tonal relationship did not at all times exclusively deter- 
mine the construction of the scale, and does not even yet determine it exclusively 
among all nations. This principle must, therefore, be regarded to some extent as 
IT a freely selected principle of styUy as I have endeavoured to shew in Chapter XIII. 
But, on the other hand, the art of music in Europe was historically developed 
from that principle, and on this fact depends the main proof that it was really as 
important as we have assumed it to be. The preference first given to the diatonic 
scale, and finally the exclusive use of that scale, introduced the principle of tonal 
relationship in all its integrity into the musical scale. Within the diatonic scale 
various methods of execution were possible, and these generated the ancient modes 
which had equal claims to attention in homophonic song, and hence stood on & 
level. 

But the principle of tonal relationship penetrated far deeper in its harmonio 
than it did in its melodic form. In melodic sequence the identity of two partial 
tones is a matter of memory, but when the notes are sounded together the im- 
mediate sensible ipapression of the beats, or else of the undisturbed flow of sound 
forces itself on the hearer's attention. The liveliness of melodic and harmonie 
IT impressions differs in the same way as a recollected image differs from the actual 
impression made by the original. As an immediate consequence arose that far 
superior sensibility for the correctness of the intervals which is seen in the har- 
monic union of tones, and which admitted of being developed into the finest 
physical methods of measurement. 

It must also be remembered that relationship in the second degree can in 
harmonic music be reduced to audible relationships of the first degree, by a proper 
selection of the fundamental bass, and that generally more distant relationships 
can easily be made clearly audible. By this means, notwithstanding the variety 
of progression, a much clearer connection of all parts with their origin, the tonic^ 
can be maintained and rendered objectively sensible to the hearer. It cannot be 
doubted that these are the essential foundations of the great breadth and wealth of 
expression which modem compositions can attain without losing their artistic unity. 

♦ [For Archytas of Tarentum, about B.C. 281, note f,— Translator.] 
400, see p. 262c, and for Abdulqadir, see p. 



CHAP. XIZ. 



RESULTS OF THE INVESTIGATION. 



365 



We then saw that the requirements of harmonic music reacted in a peculiar 
manner on the construction of scales ; that properly speaking only one of the old 
tonal modes (our major mode) could he retained unaltered,'^ and that the rest after 
undergoing peculiar modifications were fused into our minor mode, which, though 
most like the ancient mode of the minor Third, can at one time resemble the mode 
of the minor Sixth, and at another time that of the minor Seventh, but does not 
perfectly correspond with any one of these. 

This process of the development of the elements of our modern musical 
system lasted down to the middle of the last century. It was not until composers 
ventured to put a minor chord at the close of compositions written in the minor 
mode, that the musical feeling of European musicians and hearers can be admitted 
to have become perfectly and surely habituated to the new system. The minor 
chord was allowed to be a real, although obscured, chord of its tonic. 

Whether this admission of the minor chord expressed a feeling for another U 
mode of unifying its three tones, as A. von Oettingenf has assumed, — relying 
on the fact that the three tones c - e^\} + g have a common upper partial g", — 
must be left to future experience to decide, should it be found practicable to con- 
struct long and well-connected musical compositions in Oettingen^s phonic system 
(this is the name which he gives to the minor system which he has theoretically 
developed, and which is essentially different from the historical minor mode). At 
any rate, the minor mode has historically developed itself as a compromise 
between different kinds of claims. Thus it is only major triads which can per- 
fectly indicate the compound tone of the tonic ; minor chords contain in their 
Third an element which, although nearly related to the tonic and its Fifth, does 
not thoroughly fuse with them, and hence in their final cadence they do not so 
thoroughly agree with the principle of tonality which had ruled the previous 
development of music. I have endeavoured to make it probable that the peculiar 
esthetic expression of the minor mode proceeded partly from this cause and partly f 
from the heterogeneous combinational tones of the minor chord. 

In the last part of my book, I have endeavoured to shew that the construction 
of scales and of harmonic tissue is a product of artistic invention, and by no 
means furnished by the natural formation or natural function of our ear, as it has 
been hitherto most generally asserted. Of course the laws of the natural function 
of our ear play a great and influential part in this result ; these laws are, as it 
were, the building stones with which the edifice of our musical system has been 



* [But see supra, p. 274, note *, soale 1. — 
Trajislator.'] 

t The System of Harmony Dually Deve- 
loped^ Dorpat and Leipzig, 1866. Herr v. Oet- 
tingen, as already observed, p. 808, note §, 
regards the minor chord as representing the 
harmonic undertones of its Fifth, and hence as 
standing in place of a part of its compound tone. 
He calls it the * phonic * chord, as opposed to the 
* tonic ' major chord which stands in place of 
the upper partials of its root. He proceeds to 
deduce the formation of the minor system from 
the relations of the harmonic undertones in a 
manner precisely analogous to that by which 
I have deduced the major system from the 
relations of the upper partial tones. The 
tonal mode thus constructed is, however, in our 
language the mode of the minor Sixth (p. 274, 
note *, scale 7), and the usual minor, a mixed 
mode. Latterly Dr. Hugo Riemann has given 
in his adhesion to this view, and in his lately 
published Musical Syntaxis has attempted to 
examine and establish the consequences of 
this system by examples from acknowledged 
composers. The application of thia critical 
method appears to me very commendable, and 
to be the indispensable condition to advancing 



in the theory of composition. For the rest 
this author justifies (p. 54) the assertion I have 
made in the text by remarking : * I am sorry 
to say that I am unable to adduce a single 
example from the whole of our musical litera- 
ture, of the carrying out of (v. Oettingen's) pure 
minor mode harmony even in the simplest 
manner '. I have not been able to convince HJ 
myself of the correctness of the fact adduced 
on p. xiii. and p. 6, that the undertones of a 
tone strongly struck on the piano sound when 
the corresponding dampers are raised. Pertiaps 
the author has been deceived by the circum- 
stance that with very resonant instruments 
(especially older ones) any strong shake, and 
therefore probably a violent blow on the digitals, 
will cause some one or several of the deeper 
strings to sound its note. [The undertones 
have always each an upper partial tone of the 
pitch of the note struck ; the striking of this 
note must then sympathetically excite those 
upper partials of the undertones, and thus 
reinforce the prime of the note struck, just as 
striking the undertone sympathetically excites 
the higher tone itself. Can this have deceived 
Dr. Hiemann ? — Trantlaior.'] 



366 ESTHETIC ANALYSIS OF WORKS OF ART. part m. 

erected, and the necessity of accurately understanding the nature of these 
materials in order to understand the construction of the edifice itself, has heen 
clearly shewn by the course of our investigations upon this very subject. But 
just as people with differently directed tastes can erect extremely different kinds of 
buildings with the same stones, so also the history of music shews us that the 
same properties of the human ear could serve as the foundation of very different 
musical systems. Consequently it seems to me that we cannot doubt, that not 
merely the composition of perfect musical works of art, but even the construction 
of our system of scales, keys, chords, in short of all that is usually comprehended 
in a treatise on Thorough Bass, is the work of artistic invention, and hence must 
be subject to the laws of artistic beauty. In point of fact, mankind has been at 
work on the diatonic system for more than 2500 years since the days of Terpander 
and Pythagoras, and in many cases we are still able to determine that the pro- 

ITgressive changes made in the tonal system have been due to the most distin- 
guished composers themselves, partly through their own independent inventions, 
and partly through the sanction which they gave to the inventions of others, by 
employing them artistically. 

The esthetic analysis of complete musical works of art, and the comprehension 
of the reasons of their beauty, encounter apparently invincible obstacles at almost 
every point. But in the field of elementary musical art we have now gained so 
much insight into its internal connection that we are able to bring the results of 
our investigations to bear on the views which have been formed and in modem 
times nearly universally accepted respecting the cause and character of artistic 
beauty in general. It is, in fact, not difficult to discover a close connection and 
agreement between them ; nay, there are probably fewer examples more suitable 
than the theory of musical scales and harmony, to illustrate the darkest and most 
difficult points of general esthetics. Hence I feel that I should not be justified in 

IT passing over these considerations, more especially as they are closely connected 
with the theory of sensual perception, and hence with physiology in general. 

No doubt is now entertained that beauty is subject to laws and rules dependent 
on the nature of human intelligence. The difficulty consists in the fact that these 
laws and rules, on whose fulfilment beauty depends and by which it must be judged, 
are not consciously present to the mind, either of the artist who creates the work, 
or the observer who contemplates it. Art works with design, but the work of art 
ought to have the appearance of being undesigned, and must be judged on that 
ground. Art creates as imagination pictures, regularly without conscious law, 
designedly without conscious aim. A work, known and acknowledged as the pro- 
duct of mere intelligence, will never be accepted as a work of art, however perfect 
be its adaptation to its end. Whenever we see that conscious reflection has acted 
in the arrangement of the whole, we find it poor. 

_ Man fuhlt die Absicht, und man wird verstimmt. 

* (We feel the purpose, and it jars upon us.) 

And yet we require every work of art to be reasonable, and we shew this by 
subjecting it to a critical examination, and by seeking to enhance our enjoyment 
and our interest in it by tracing out the suitability, connection, and equilibrium of 
all its separate parts. The more we succeed in making the harmony and beauty of 
all its peculiarities clear and distinct, the richer we find it, and we even regard as 
the principal characteristic of a great work of art that deeper thought, reiterated 
observation, and continued reflection shew us more and more clearly the reason- 
ableness of all its individual parts. Our endeavour to comprehend the beauty of 
such a work by critical examination, in which we partly succeed, shews that we 
assume a certain adaptation to reason in works of art, which may possibly rise to 
a conscious understanding, although such understanding is neither necessary for the 
invention nor for the enjoyment of the beautiful. For what is esthetically beau- 
tiful is recognised by the immediate judgment of a cultivated taste, which declares 



CHAP. XIX. ESTHETIC ANALYSIS OF WORKS OF ART. 367 

it pleasing or displeasing, without any comparison whatever with law or concep- 
tion. 

But that we do not accept delight in the beautiful as something individual, but 
rather hold it to be in regular accordance with the nature of mind in general, 
appears by our expecting and requiring from every other healthy human intellect 
the same homage that we ourselves pay to what we call beautiful. At most we 
allow that national or individual peculiarities of taste incline to this or that artistic 
ideal, and are most easily moved by it, precisely in the same way that a certain 
amount of education and practice in the contemplation of fine works of art is 
undeniably necessary for penetration into their deeper meaning. 

The principal difficulty in pursuing this object, is to understand how regularity 
can be apprehended by intuition without being consciously felt to exist. And this 
unconsciousness of regularity is not a mere accident in the effect of the beautiful 
on our mind, which may indifferently exist or not ; it is, on the contrary, most IT 
clearly, prominently, and essentially important. For through apprehending every- 
where traces of regularity, connection, and order, without being able to grasp the 
law and plan of the whole, there arises in our mind a feeling that the work of art 
which we are contemplating is the product of a design which far exceeds anything 
we can conceive at the moment, and which hence partakes of the character of the 
illimitable. Remembering the poet's words : 

Du gleiohst dem Geist, den da begreifst, 
(Thou*rt like the spirit thou conceivest,) 

we feel that those intellectual powers which were at work in the artist, are far above 
our conscious mental action, and that were it even possible at all, infinite time, 
meditation, and labour would have been necessary to attain by conscious thought 
that degree of order, connection, and equilibrium of all parts and all internal 
relations, which the artist has accomplished under the sole guidance of tact and 1 
taste, and which we have in turn to appreciate and comprehend by our own tact and 
taste, long before we begin a critical analysis of the work. 

It is clear that all high appreciation of the artist and his work reposes essen- 
tiaUy on this feeling. In the first we honour a genius, a spark of divine creative 
fire, which far transcends the limits of our intelligent and conscious forecast. And 
yet the artist is a man as we are, in whom work the same mental powers as in our- 
selves, only in their own peculiar direction, purer, brighter, steadier ; and by the 
greater or less readiness and completeness with which we grasp the artist's language 
we measure our own share of those powers which produced the wonder. 

Herein is manifestly the cause of that moral elevation and feeling of ecstatic 
satisfaction which is called forth by thorough absorption in genuine and lofty works 
of art. We learn from them to feel that even in the obscure depths of a healthy 
and harmoniously developed human mind, which are at least for the present 
inaccessible to analysis by conscious thought, there slumbers a germ of order that ^ 
is capable of rich intellectual cultivation, and we learn to recognise and admire in 
the work of art, though draughted in unimportant material, the picture of a similar 
arrangement of the universe, governed by law and reason in all its parts. The 
contemplation of a real work of art awakens our confidence in the originally healthy 
nature of the human mind, when uncribbed, unharassed, unobscured, and un- 
falsified. 

But for all this it is an essential condition that the whole extent of the regularity 
and design of a work of art should not be apprehended consciously. It is precisely 
from that part of its regular subjection to reason, which escapes our conscious 
apprehension, that a work of art exalts and delights us, and that the chief effects 
of the artistically beautiful proceed, not from the part which we are able fully to 
analyse. 

If we now apply these considerations to the system of musical tones and har- 
mony, we see of course that these are objects belonging to an entirely subordinate 



368 APPLICATION TO MUSIC. pabt m. 

and elementary domain, but nevertheless they, too, are slowly matured inventions 
of the artistic taste of musicians, and consequently they, too, must be governed by 
the general rules of artistic beauty. Precisely because we are here still treading 
the lower walks of art, and are not dealing with the expression of deep psycho- 
logical problems, we are able to discover a comparatively simple and transparent 
solution of that fundamental enigma of esthetics. 

The whole of the last part of this book has explained how musicians gradually 
discovered the relationships between tones and chords, and how the invention of 
harmonic music rendered these relationships closer, and clearer, and richer. We 
have been able to deduce the whole system of rules which constitute Thorough 
Bass, from an endeavour to introduce a clearly sensible connection into the series 
of tones which form a piece of music. 

A feeling for the melodic relationship of consecutive tones, was first developed, 

11 commencing with Octave and Fifth and advancing to the Third. We have taken 
pains to prove that this feeling of relationship was founded on the perception of 
identical partial tones in the corresponding compound tones. Now these partial 
tones are of course present in the sensations excited in our auditory apparatus, and 
yet they are not generally the subject of conscious perception as independent sensa- 
tions. The conscious perception of everyday life is limited to the apprehension of 
the tone compounded of these partials, as a whole, just as we apprehend the taste 
of a very compound dish as a whole, without clearly feeling how much of it is due 
to the salt, or the pepper, or other spices and condiments. A critical examination 
of our auditory sensations as such was required before we could discover the exist- 
ence of upper partial tones. Hence the real reason of the melodic relationship of 
two tones (with the exception of a few more or less clearly expressed conjectures, 
as, for example, by Rameau and d'Alembert) remained so long undiscovered, or at 
least was not in any respect clearly and definitely formulated. I believe that I have 

H been able to furnish the required explanation, and hence clearly to exhibit the 
whole connection of the phenomena. The esthetic problem is thus referred to the 
common property of all sensual perceptions, namely, the apprehension of compound 
aggregates of sensations as sensible symbols of simple external objects, without 
analysing them. In our usual observations on external nature our attention is so 
thoroughly engaged by external objects that we are entirely unpractised in taking 
for the subjects of conscious observation, any properties of our sensations them- 
selves, which we do not already know as the sensible expression of some individual 
external object or event. 

After musicians had long been content with the melodic relationship of tones, 
they began in the middle ages to make use of harmonic relationship as shewn in 
consonance. The effects of various combinations of tones also depend partly on 
the identity or difference of two of their different partial tones, but they likewise 
partly depend on their combinational tones. Whereas, however, in melodic 

*T relationship the equality of the upper partial tones can only be perceived by 
rem&nibering the preceding compound tone, in harmonic relationship it is deter- 
mined by immediate sensation^ by the presence or absence of beats. Hence in 
harmonic combinations of tone, tonal relationship is felt with that greater liveh- 
ness due to a present sensation as compared with the recollection of a past sensa- 
tion. The wealth of clearly perceptible relations grows with the number of tones 
combined. Beats are easy to recognise as such when they occur slowly ; but those 
which characterise dissonances are, almost without exception, very rapid, and are 
partly covered by sustained tones which do not beat, so that a careful comparison 
of slower and quicker beats is necessary to gain the conviction that the essence of 
dissonance consists precisely in rapid beats. Slow beats do not create the feeling 
of dissonance, which does not arise till the rapidity of the beats confuses the ear 
and makes it unable to distinguish them. In this case also the ear feels the dif- 
ference between the undisturbed combination of sound in the case of two consonant 
tones, and the disturbed rough combination resulting from a dissonance. But, as 



CHAP. XDC. UNCONSCIOUS SENSE OF RESEMBLANCE. 389 

a general rule, the hearer is then perfectly unconscious of the cause to which the 
disturbance and roughness are due. 

The development of harmony gave rise to a much richer opening out of musical 
art than was previously possible, because the far clearer characterisation of related 
combinations of tones by means of chords and chordal sequences, allowed o^ the 
use of much more distant relationships than were previously available, by modu- 
lating into different keys. In this way the means of expression greatly increased 
as well as the rapidity of the melodic and harmonic transitions which could now 
be introduced without destroying the musical connection. 

As the independent significance of chords came to be appreciated in the fifteenth 
and sixteenth centuries, a feeling arose for the relationship of chords to one another 
and to the tonic chord, in accordance with the same law which had long ago 
unconsciously regulated the relationship of compound tones. The relationship of 
compound tones depended on the identity of two or more partial tones, that of ^ 
chords on the identity of two or more notes. For the musician, of course, the law 
of the relationship of chords and keys is much more intelligible than that of com- 
pound tones. He readily hears the identical tones, or sees them in the notes before 
him. But the unprejudiced and uninstructed hearer is as little conscious of the 
reason of the connection of a clear and agreeable series of fluent chords, as he is 
of the reason of a well-connected melody. He is startled by a false cadence and 
feels its unexpectedness, but is not at all necessarily conscious of the reason of its 
unexpectedness. 

Then, again, we have seen that the reason why a chord in music appears to be 
the chord of a determinate root, depends as before upon the analysis of a com- 
pound tone into its partial tones, that is, as before upon those elements of a 
sensation which cannot readily become subjects of conscious perception. This rela- 
tion between chords is of great importance, both in the relation of the tonic chord 
to the tonic tone, and in the sequence of chords. If 

The recognition of these resemblances between compound tones and between 
chords, reminds us of other exactly analogous circumstances which we must have 
often experienced. We recognise the resemblance between the fa.ces of two near 
relations, without being at all able to say in what the resemblance consists, 
especially when age and sex are different, and the coarser outlines of the features 
consequently present striking differences. And yet notwithstanding these differ- 
ences — notwithstanding that we are unable to fix upon a single point in the 
two countenances which is absolutely alike — the resemblance is often so extra- 
ordinarily striking and convincing, that we have not a moment's doubt about 
it. Precisely the same thing occurs in recognising the relationship between two 
compound tones. 

Again, we are often able to assert with perfect certainty, that a passage not 
previously heard is due to a particular author or composer whose other works we 
know. Occasionally, but by no means always, individual mannerisms in verbal or T 
musical phrases determine our judgment, but as a rule we are mostly unable to fix 
upon the exact points of resemblance between the new piece and the known works 
of the author or composer. 

The analogy of these different cases may be even carried farther. When a 
father and daughter are strikingly alike in some well-marked feature, as the nose 
or forehead, we observe it at once, and think no more about it. But if the resem- 
blance is so enigmatically concealed that we cannot detect it, we are fascinated, and 
cannot help continuing to compare their countenances. And if a painter drew two 
such heads having, say, a somewhat different expression of character combined 
with a predominant and striking, though indefinable, resemblance, we should 
undoubtedly value it as one of the principal beauties of his painting. Our ad- 
miration would certainly not be due merely to his technical skill ; we should 
rather look upon his painting as evidencing an unusually delicate feeling for the 

BB 



370 UNCONSCIOUS SENSE OF TONAL RELATIONSHIP. part iu. 

significance of the human countenance, and find in this the artistic justification of 
his work. 

Now the case is similar for musical intervals. The resemblance of an Octaye to 
its root is so great and striking that the dullest ear perceives it ; the Octave seems 
to be almost a pure repetition of the root, as it, in fact, merely repeats a part of the 
compound tone of its root, without adding anything new. Hence the esthetical 
effect of an Octave is that of a perfectly simple, but little attractive interval. The 
most attractive of the intervals, melodically and harmonically, are clearly the 
Thirds and Sixths, — the intervals which lie at the very boundary of those that the 
ear can grasp. The major Third and the major Sixth cannot be properly appre- 
ciated unless the first five partial tones are audible. These are present in good 
musical qualities of tone. The minor Third and the minor Sixth are for the most 
part justifiable only as inversions of the former intervals. The more complicated 

f intervals in the scale cease to have any direct or easily intelligible relationship. 
They have no longer the charm of the Thirds. 

Moreover, it is by no means a merely external indifiCerent regularity which the 
employment of diatonic scales, founded on the relationship of compound tones, has 
introduced into the tonal material of music, as, for instance, rhythm introduced 
some such external arrangement iuto the words of poetry. I have shewn, on the 
contrary, in Chapter XI Y., that this construction of the scale furnished a means of 
measuring the intervals of their tones, so that the equality of two intervals lying 
in different sections of the scale would be recognised by immediate sensation. 
Thus the melodic step of a Fifth is always characterised by having the second 
partial tone of the second note identical with the third of the first. This produces 
a definiteness and certainty in the measurement of intervals for our sensation, 
such as might be looked for in vain in the system of colours, otherwise so 
similar, or in the estimation of mere differences of intensity in our various sensual 

IT perceptions. 

Upon this reposes also the characteristic resemblance between the relations of 
the musical scale and of space, a resemblance which appears to me of vital impor- 
tance for the peculiar effects of musia It is an essential character of space that 
at every position within it like bodies can be placed, and li^e motions can occur. 
Everything that is possible to happen in one part of space is equally possible in 
every other part of space and is perceived by us in precisely the same way. This 
is the case also with the musical scala Every melodic phrase, every chord, which 
can be executed at any pitch, can be also executed at any other pitch in such a way 
that we immediately perceive the characteristic marks of their similarity. On the 
other hand, also, different voices executing the same or different melodic phrases, 
can move at the same time within the compass of the scale, like two bodies in 
space, and, provided they are consonant in the accented parts of bars, without 
creating any musical disturbances. Such a dose analogy consequently exists in 

T all essential relations between the musical scale and space, that even alteration of 
pitch has a readily recognised and unmistakable resemblance to motion in space, 
and is often metaphorically termed the ascending or descending motion or progres- 
sion of a part. Hence, again, it becomes possible for motion in music to imitate 
the peculiar characteristics of motive forces in space, that is, to form an image of 
the various impulses and forces which lie at the root of motion. And on this, as I 
believe, essentially depends the power of music to picture emotion. 

It is not my intention to deny that music in its initial state and simplest forms 
may have been originally an artistic imitation of the instinctive modulations of the 
voice that correspond to various conditions of the feelings. But I cannot think that 
this is opposed to the above explanation ; for a great part of the natural means of 
vocal expression may be reduced to such facts as the following : its rhythm and 
accentuation are an immediate expression of the rapidity or force of the corre- 
sponding psychical motives — all effort drives the voice up — a desire to make a plea- 
sant impression on another mind leads to selecting a softer, pleasanter quality of 



CHAP. XIX. EXPRESSION OF MOTION IN MUSIC. 371 

tone — and so forth. An endeavour to imitate the involuntary modulations of the 
voice and make its recitation richer and more expressive, may therefore very pos- 
sibly have led our ancestors to the discovery of the first means of musical expres- 
sion, just as the imitation of weeping, shouting, or sobbing, and other musical 
delineations may play a part in even cultivated music (as in operas), although 
such modifications of the voice are not confined to the action of free mental 
motives, but embrace really mechanical and even involuntary muscular contrac- 
tions. But it is quite clear that every completely developed melody goes far beyond 
an imitation of nature, even if we include the cases of the most varied alteration 
of voice under the influence of passion. Nay, the very fa*ct that music introduces 
progression by fixed degrees both in rhythm and in the scale, renders even an 
approximatively correct representation of nature simply impossible, for most of H 
the passionate affections of the voice are characterised by a gliding transition in 
pitch. The imitation of nature is thus rendered as imperfect as the imitation of 
a picture by embroidery on a canvas with separate little squares for each shade of 
colour. Music, too, departed still further from nature when it introduced the 
greater compass, the mobility, and the strange qualities of tone belonging to musical 
instruments, by which the field of attainable musical effects has become so much 
wider than it was or could be when the human voice alone was employed. 

Hence though it is probably correct to say that mankind, in historical develop- 
ment, first learned the means of musical expression from the human voice, it can 
hardly be denied that these same means of expressing melodic progression act, 
in artistically developed music, without the slightest reference to the application 
made of them in the modulations of the human voice, and have a more general 
significance than any that can be attributed to innate instinctive cries. That this 
is the case appears above all in the modem development of instrumental music, 
which possesses an effective power and artistic justification that need not be gain- 
said, although we may not yet be able to explain it in all its details. f 



Here I close my work. It appears to me that I have carried it as far as the 
physiological properties of the sensation of hearing exercise a direct influence on 
the construction of a musical system, that is, as far as the work especially belongs 
to natural philosophy. For even if I could not avoid mixing up esthetic problems 
with physical, the former were comparatively simple, and the latter much more 
complicated. This relation would necessarily become inverted if I attempted to 
proceed further into the esthetics of music, and to enter on the theory of rhythm, 
forms of composition, and means of musical expression. In all these fields the 
properties of sensual perception would of course have an influence at times, but only 
in a very subordinate degree. The real difficulty would lie in the development of 
the psychical motives which here assert themselves. Certainly this is the point IF 
where the more interesting part of musical esthetics begins, the aim being to ex- 
plain the wonders of great works of art, and to learn the utterances and actions of 
the various affections of the mind. But, however alluring such an aim may be, I 
prefer leaving others to carry out such investigations, in which I should feel myself 
too much of an amateur, while I myself remain on the safe ground of natural 
philosophy, in which I am at home. 



B B 2 



APPENDICES. 

U APPENDIX I. 

ON AN ELECTBO-MAONETIC DRIVING MACHINE FOB THE BIBEN. 

(See p. 13a.) 

I HAVE lately had a small electro-magnetic machine constructed with a constant 
velocity of rotation, and it has proved of great service in driving the siren. A 
rotating electro -magnet, in which the direction of current is changed every semi- 
rotation, moves between two fixed magnetic poles. The current in this electro- 
magnet is interrupted, as soon as the velocity begins to exceed the desired amount, 
by the centrifugal force of a mass of metal fastened to its axis of rotation. Two 
spiral springs whose elasticity is opposed to the centrifugal force might be tightened 
or loosened, and thus made stronger or weaker at pleasure. By this means the 
velocity can be maintained at any required rate. A figure and description of this 
machine were given by Herr S. Exner, in the * Proceedings ' {Sitzungsherickte) 
of the Vienna Academy : * Math. Naturw. CL' vol. Iviii. part 2, 8 Oct. 1868. 

The machine was improved in 1875 by separating from it the centrifugal 
IT regulator, and letting it only open and close the weak current for a relay. It 
is the relay which makes or breaks the strong current that drives the electro- 
magnetic machme. 

The siren is connected with the machine by a thin driving band, and then 
it does not require to be blown. Instead of blowing, I placed on the disc a 
small turbine constructed of stifif paper, which drove the air through the open- 
ings whenever they coincided with those in the chest. This arrangement gave 
me extremely constant tones on the siren, rivalling those on the best constructed 
organ pipes. Latterly I have given the siren straight holes, so that the strength 
of the wind has no longer any influence on its speed, and then I blow through the 
box. [See App. XX. sect. B. No. 2.] 



APPENDIX 11. . 

ON THE SIZE AND C0N8TBUCTI0N OF BESONATOBS. 

(See pp. 446 and 166^, note *.) 

Sphebical Besonatobs with a short funnel-shaped neck for insertion into the 
ear as shewn in fig. 16 a (p. 436), are most efficient. Their advantage consists 
partly in their other proper tones being very distant indeed from their prime tones, 
and hence being very slightly reinforced, and partly in the spherical form giving 
the most powerful resonance. But the walls of the sphere must be firm and 
smooth, to oppose the necessary resistance to the powerful vibrations of air which 
take place within them, and to impede the motion of the air as little as possible 
by friction. At first I employed any spherical glass vessels that came to hand, 
as the receivers of retorts, and inserted into one of their openings a glass tube 
which had been adapted to my ear. Afterwards Herr R Koenig, maker of acous* 
tioal instruments, Paris [now of 27 Quai d'Anjou], constructed a series of these 



*ftlM'^8{g3|^J§3gte' RESONATORS. 




them made of braes in the form 
appropriate form for reeonators. 
their pitch can be determined by 




-Si W^^'t W iMf ^ f^SaTmfit the circular openiDg, and S the 

** IHIOiSfefSliltree, 

iffff^^fl^h'Brtliffipj^yi^i^ntigrade. the above formula gives 

'''''•"'ifi#) 




had discovered the same formula 
fical coeflBcient, which agrees with 
;ninga are not very small. When 
one tenth of the diameter of the 
well with Wertheim'a experimenta 
: opening between a fourth and a 
irimentally determined the coefB- 
isonator may be re^rded as closed 
' the cavity is spherical with radius 
rmula becomes 

my glass resonators. ^ 




2SS 
214 
162 
71 


[H-341] 
[13-06]' 
[9'831 
[4-52] 


49 


[2-99J 


87 


[2-26] 



Neck cylindricftl 



a-v 



;^Corder to tune the resonators, Herr 
— rS3'°^^'^S' °^ which one runs into the 
• 3k(^&al end. One opening serves for a 
i»ilSj»S|e, the other is free.f The measure- 
rs^tft&Sr the manufacture of such tubes, as 
^K^^C^e it is firmly inserted into the ear. 
^■t^Bufacture and hence proportionately 
"ij^ieboard, the vertices of which have 
■ -■ ~-ire sharply pointed so that its end 

Herr G. Appunn J of Hanau manu- 









374 



MOTION OF PLUCKED STRINGS. 



APP. n. in. 



factures,^ are easily made, and are useful for most purposes. But they reinforce 
all the partials of their fundamental tone at the same time. Their length is about 
the same as that of open organ pipes of the same pitch. 

Resonators with a very narrow opening generally produce a much more con- 
siderable reinforcement of the tone, but then there must be a much more precise 
agreement between the pitch of the tone to be heard, and the proper tone of the 
resonator. It is just as in microscopes ; the greater the magnifying power, the 
smaller the field of view. Reducing the size of the orifice also deepens the pitch 
of the resonator, and this gives an easy means of tuning it to any required pitch. 
But, for the above reason, the opening must not be reduced too much. 

I should also mention Herr Koenig's plan of transferring vibrations of air to 
gas flames, and thus making them visible. Flames of this sort act well when 
connected with resonators, which are then best made of a spherical form, and 
should have two equal openings. To one of the openings the small gas-chamber 
is fixed. This chamber is a small flat box, about big enough to contain two 

U shilling pieces laid flat on one another. It is cut out of a plate of wood, and 
closed on the side next the resonator with a very thin membrane of india-rubber, 
which, while it completely separates the air of the resonator from the gas in the 
chamber, allows the vibrations of the air to be freely communicated to the gas. 
Through the plate of wood two narrow pipes enter the chamber, one introducing 
the inflammable gas and the other conducting it away. This last ends in a very 
fine point at which the gas is lighted. The vibrations of the air in the re- 
sonator being communicated to the gas cause the flame to leap up and down. 
These oscillations of the flame are so rapid and regular that, when viewed directly, 
the flame appears to be quite steady. Its altered condition, however, betrays itself 
by an alteied form and colour. Thus to recognise the beats of two tones rein- 
forced by the resonator, it is enough to look at the flame and observe how it alter- 
nates between its forms of rest and of oscillation. But to see the separate 
oscillations the flames should be viewed in a rotating glass, in which the flame at 
rest appears to be drawn out into a long uniform ribbon, while the oscillating flame 

IT appears as a series of separate images of flames. It is thus possible to allow a 
large number of persons at once to determine whether or not a given tone is 
reinforced by the resonator, f 

An extremely sensitive means of making the vibrations of the air in a resonator 
visible, is a flat film of glyoerined soap and water which is placed over its opening. 
[Mr. Bosanquet finding that for observations on beats all these resonators im- 
perfectly plug one ear and leave the other open, has invented another kind, for 
which see App. XX. sect. L. art. 4, b.] 



APPENDIX III. 



U 



ON THB MOTION OF PLUCEBD 8TBINQS. 



(See p. 526.) 

Lbt X be the distance of a point in the string from one of its extremities, and I 
the length of the string, so that for one extremity x ^ 0, and for the other x — L 
It is sufficient to investigate the case for which the motion takes place in one 
plane passing through the position of rest. Let y be the distance of the point x 
from its position of rest at the time t. And let /i be the weight of the unit 



* [There is a set in the Science Collections 
at South Kensington Museum. — Translator,] 

t[All these instruments and appliances 
can be obtained of Herr Koenig, by whom 
they were exhibited in London at the Inter- 
national Exhibition of 1872. Large drawings 
of the appearances of the flames just described, 
as viewed in the rotating mirror while two 



octaves were sung to the French vowels, were 
also exhibited. See Koenig^s paper on the 
subject, with plates, in Philosophical Maga- 
gine, 1873, vol. xlv. pp. 1-18, 105-U.— On 
the principles of the use of revolving mirrors, 
first experimentally used by Sir 0. Wheat- 
stone, see Donkin's Acoustics^ 1870, p. 142. — 
Translator.] 



APP. HI. MOTION OF PLUCKED STRINGS. 375 

of length, and T the tension of the string. The differential equation of motion is 
then 

^''M^^'d^ W 

Then, since the extremities of the string are assumed to be at rest, we must have 

^ * when x ^0, and also when x = 1 (la) 

The most general integral of the equation (1) which fulfils the conditions (la) 
and corresponds to a periodic motion of the string, is 

y = ilj . 8in-=- . cos 2imi + A^ . sin -=— . cos iimf 



ZirX 

1 



+ ilj . sin — r- . cos 6 imt + &c. 



+ Bj . sin ^ . sin ^imt + S^ . sin -^. sin 4iimt 

V If 



SnX 
1 



+ Bjj . sin — r- . sin 6imt + &c. 



(lb) 



T 
where n* » -— ^ and A^, A^ ilg, &o., and B^, B^, B^, (be., are any constant co- 

efficients, which can be determined when the form and velocity of the st^g are 
known for any determinate time t. 

For ^ » 0, the form of the string will be 

y « -4i . sm -^ + iij . — - — + A^ . sm -^ + &c (Ic) 

If Li 

and the velocity of the string will be 

^ = 27m (b^ . sin ^ + 2B^ . sin ?p + SB, . sin ?p + (fccV.. (Id) 

Now suppose the string to have been drawn aside by a sharp point, and that 
the point was withdrawn at the time ^ = 0, so that the vibration commenced at 

that moment, then f or ^ = there was no velocity, that is -^ was = for all 

dt 

values of x. This can only be the case when in equation (Id), » B| » B, » Bg = &c. 

The coefficients A^, A^, A^, &c., depend on the shape of the string at the time 

^ s 0. At the moment the sharp point quitted it the string must luive assumed 

the position of fig. 18 A (p. 54a), that is, it must have formed two straight lines 

proceeding from the sharp point to the fixed extremities of the string. Supposing 

the position of the sharp point at that moment to be determined by a; = a and 

y ^hy then for the time ^ » 0, the value of y^ was 

y = ^ifa>ic>0 (2) 

a 

I " X 

and y == 6. -, if l>x> a (2a) ^ 

and the values of y in (Ic) and (2), or else (2a) respectively, must be identical. 
To find the coefficient A^, the well-known method is to multiply both sides of 

the equation (Ic) by sin — y- . dx^ and to integrate between the limits a; = and 
X = L In this case equation (Ic) reduces to 

y . sin —J- .dx=^A^. sin' — j- . dx (2b) 

in which y must be replaced by its values in (2) and (2a). Performing the inte- 
grations indicated in (2b) we find 

. 2W2 . mrra ,^. 

^« = —UTTi x • s^° -7- (3) 



376 MOTION OP PLUCKED STRINGS. app. m. 

Hence ^^^ will - 0, and oonsequently the mth tone of the string will disappear 

nifra I 21 SI 

when sin — ?— = 0, that is, when a = — or = — , or = — , &c. Hence we sup- 
L mm m 

pose the string to be divided into m equal parts, and to be plucked in one of these 

divisions, the mth tone disappears, and this is the tone whose nodes fail upon 

these points. 

Every node for an mth tone is also a node for the 2mth, Smth, 4mth, &c., tone» 

and hence all these tones also disappear. 

The integral of equation (1) may also, as is well known, be exhibited in the 
following form : — 

y a <ii(x - at) + il/{x + at) (4) 

T 
where a^ = -, and <^, j/r are arbitrary functions. The function <t>{x - at) denotes 

f' 
any form of the string which advances in the direction of positive x with the 

IT velocity a, but without any other change ; and the function \l/{x + at) denotes a 

similar form proceeding with the same velocity in the direction of negative x. 

For any given value of the time t we must suppose both functions to be given 

from a;«-Qotox-«+cx), and then the motion of the string is determined. 

The determination of the motion of a plucked string will result in this second 

form of solution, from determining the functions <^ and ifr, so that 

1) for the values x =» and x == I, the value of y for any value of t will be 
constantly » 0. This will be the case, if for any value of t, 

kI,{ ^ at)''- if/ i+at) (4a) 

and <t>{l - aO« - ^{l -^ at) (4b) 

If in the first equation we put at = - i;, and in the second 1+ at ^ - v, we 
obtain 

^(v) = - l/r( - v) 
Tand <^(2Z + t?) = - iA( - v) 
so that <^(2Z + v)^fl>(v) (5) 

Hence the function <^ is periodic, for its value becomes the same when its 
argument is increased by 21. The same results for j/r. 

dy 

2) For t = 0, we must have-^^ = between the limits a; = and x^L Hence 

writing il/'{v) for ^ , and putting -n = in equation (4), we obtain 

<l>'(x) ^\l;\x) 

And integrating this with respect to x, we have 

<l>{x) = ilf{x) +\G 

dy 
IT Now since neither y nor 37 are altered by adding the same constant to </» and 

subtracting it from if/, the constant C is perfectly arbitrary, and we may conse- 
quently assume it to be » 0, and hence write 

<l>{x) = il^ix) (5a) 

3) Since finally at the time ^ » 0, and within the limits x = 0, x = I, the 
magnitude 

y, which is = <f>{x) -^ ^(a;) = 2<f>{x)y 

must have the value shewn in fig. 18 A (p. 54a), the ordinates of this figure imme- 
diately give the value of 2<l>{x) and of 2(/r(ic), by means of equation (5) : — 

between x ^ and a; « Z 
„ X = 21 „ x = 31 
,, a: = 4Z „ a; = 5Z 
and so forth. 



APP. ni. IV. 



SIMPLE TONES FROM RESONANCE. 



377 



Btit since from (4a, 4b, 5) it follows that <f>{ - v) ^ - <f>{v), and <^(Z - v) = 
- <I>{1 + v), the value of 2<l>{x) is given by the triangle in fig. 18 G. (pi 546), 

between x = - I and a; = 



It 



X = 



- 3Z „ a; = -21 
I ,, X ^ 21 
31 „ a; « 4Z 



and in the same v^ay between x » 

and so forth. 

By this means the functions tf> and i/r are completely determined, and on sup- 
posing that the two wave-lines proceed in opposite directions with the velocity a, 
we obtain the forms of the string given in fig. 18, p. 54a, b, which represent the 
changes of the string for every twelfth part of the periodic time of its vibration. 

[See Donkin's Acoustics, Chaps. Y. and YI.] 



f 



APPENDIX lY. 



ON THB PRODUCTION OF SIMPLE TONES BT RESONANCE. 



(See pp. 55a and 69c.) 

I HAVE given the theory of tubes and hollow spaces filled with air, so far as it can 
be at present mathematically expressed, in my paper, entitled ' The Theory of 
Aerial Yibrations in Tubes with open Ends.' {Theorie der Luftschivingungen in 
Bohr en mit offenen Enden), in Crelle's Journal fiir Mathematih, vol. Ivii. A com- 
parison of the upper partial tones of tuning-forks and the corresponding resonance 
tubes, will be found in my paper, * On Combinational Tones ' {Ueber Combinations' 
tone), in Poggendorffs Annalen, vol. xoix. pp. 609 and 510.* 

I add here the dimensions of the resonance tubes mentioned on p. 54a, which 
were made for me by Herr Fessel, in Cologne, in connection with the tuning-forks IT 
kept in motion by electricity as described in Appendix YIII. These were cylindrical 
tubes of pasteboard, with terminal surfaces of zinc plate, one entirely closed, the 
other provided with a circular opening. These tubes therefore had only one 
opening, not two like the resonators which were intended for insertion in the ear. 
A resonance tube of this kind can have its tone flattened by diminishing its opening. 
To sharpen the tone, when necessary, I threw in a little wax, and placed the closed 
end of the tube on a warm stove or hob, until the wax was melted, and uniformly 
distributed over the surface. It was then allowed to cool in the same position. 
To try whether the tone of a tube is a little sharper or flatter than that of the 
fork, cover its opening slightly while the excited fork is held before it. If the 
covering strengthens the resonance the tube was too sharp. But if the resonance 
begins to decrease decidedly as soon as any part of the opening is covered, the 
tube was too flat. The dimensions in millimetres [and inches] are as follows : — 



IT 



No. 
1 


Pitch 


Length of Tabe 


Diameter of Tube 


Diameter of Opeuing i 


^b 


426 [16-73] 


138 [6-43] 


31-5 [1-24] 


2 


h 

r 


210 [8-27" 


82 [3-23] 


23-5 [-93] 


8 


117 [4-61 


66 [2-56] 


16 [-63] 


4 


6> 


88 [3-46] 


56 [2-17] 


14-3 [-56] 


5 


d" 


68 [2-28 


66 [217] 


14 [-65] 


6 


r 


68 [2-09 


44 [1-73] 


12-5 [-49] 


7 


a"y 


60 [1-97 


39 [1-54] 


11-2 [-44] 


8 


h"y 


40 [1-57] 


39 [1-54] 


11-5 [■45] 


9 


d" 


85 [1-88 


30-6 [1-20] 


10-3 [-41] 


10 


r 


26 [1-02] 


26 [1-02] 


8-6 [-34] 



The theory of the sympathetic resonance of strings is best developed by means 



* The harmonio upper partial s of the air 
vibrating in the neighbourhood of a tuning- 
fork, there mentioned, have also been observed 
with an interference apparatus by Herr Stefan 



(Proceedings of the Vienna Academy, vol. Ixi. 
part 2, pp. 491-8) and by Herr Quincke 
(Poggendorff's Annals, vol. xxviii.). 



378 SIMPLE TONES FROM RESONANCE. app. nr. 

of the experiments mentioned on p. 65c. Retain the notations of Appendix III. 
and assume that the end of the string for which 2 » 0, is connected wi& the stem 
of the taning-fork, and must moye in the same way, and that its motion is given 
by the equation 

y = A . sinmt, tor x = (6) 

Suppose the other end of the string to rest on the bridge which stands on the 
sounding board. The following forces act upon the bridge : — 

1) The pressure of the string, which will increase or diminish according to the 
angle under which the extremity of the string is directed against the bridge. The 
tangent of this angle between the variable direction of the string and its position 

dy dy 

of rest is ^, and hence we can put the variable pressure of the string === ~ ^ • ;j^> 

for X ^ If supposing the bridge to lie on the side of negative y, 

2) The elastic force of the sounding board, which acts to bring the bridge back 
IT into its position of rest, may be put «= - f^y. 

3) The sounding board, which moves with the bridge, is resisted by the air, to 
which it imparts some of its motion. The resistance of the air may be considered 
to be approximatively proportional to the velocity of its motion, and hence be 

Then putting M for the mass of the bridge, we obtain the following equation 
for the motion of the bridge, and hence for that of the extremity of the string 
which rests upon it : 

^'%- -T.%-fy-f.%t0TX = l (6a) 

For the motion of the other points in the string, we have, as in Appendix IIL, 
the condition 
IT d^y Ohf 

Since part of every motion of the string must be constantly given off to the 
air in the resonance chamber, the motion would gradually die away if it were not 
kept up by some continuous cause. Hence we may neglect the variable initial 
conditions of the motion, and proceed at once to determine the periodic motion, 
which finally remains constant under the influence of the periodic agitation of 
the tuning-fork. It is manifest that the period of the motion of the string must 
be the same as the period of the motion of the fork. Hence the required integral 
of (1) must be of the form 

y = D . cos px . sin mt + E . co&px , cos mil 
+ F.smpx,sinmt+ O . smpx , cosmtf ^ ' 

And to satisfy equation (1) we must then have 

IT fim^ = Tp^ (7a) 

From the equation (7) we have, when re =■ 0, 

y =^ D , Bin mt + £ . cos mt, 
and on comparing this with equation (6) we find 

i> = il, and^ = (8) 

The two other coefficients of the equation (7), namely F and G, must be deter- 
mined by means of equation (6a). On substituting in (6a) the values of y from 
(7), the equation (6a) splits into two, as we must put the sum of the terms mul- 
tiplied by sin mt separately = 0, and also the sum of those multiplied by cos mt 
sepcurately = 0. These two equations are : 

F . [(/2-Mm2) . Bin pi + pT . ooQpl]-Gmg^ . sin^Z ' 

= - il . [(/2 - Mm^) . cos pi 'pT. sin pt] .... (Sa) 

Fmg^ . sin pl+G . [(/^ - Mm^) . sm pl+pT .oospr 
= - Aghn . cos pi 



APP. IV. SIMPLE TONES FROM RESONANCE. 379 

Assume for abbreviation 



( /^ -Mm)^ == ^^ ^ !- (8b) 



Then the values of F and G will be as follows : 



p ^ _ ^ C^ .sin 2 (pl + k) + ghn^ . sin 2pV 
2 • (T* . sin2 (pl + k) ^ghn^ . sin*^ «Z 



(pl + k) + gr^m^ . sin*^ pi 

^ Cmg^ . sin k 

^^ ' ^(^ . sin2 (pi + Aj) + ^7»« . sin^ pli 



w • ■• V^ I 



(8o) 



Putting the amplitude of the vibration of the extremity of the string which 
rests upon the bridge « F, equation (7) becomes 

7« = [F . sm 2)Z + il . cos ^qs + G2 . sm« pi, f 

and on putting in this equation the values of F and O from (8c) we find 

AG , sin k 
^ ^ V [C2 . sin« {pUk) + ghn^ . sm ^pl] (^) 

The numerator in this expression is independent of the length of the string. 
Any alteration of its length therefore affects the denominator only. Under the 
radical sign is the sum of two squares, which can never = 0, because m, g, p, T, 
and hence k, can never nO. The coefficient of the resistance of air, g^ must cer- 
tainly be considered as infinitesimaL Hence the denominator is a maximum, and 
F is a minimum, when sin (pi + fc) = 0, or when 

pl-^w-k (9a) 

where v is any whole number. The maximum value of F is ^ 

AG 



F^ = 



(/«W 



Hence, other circumstances being the same, this maximum value increases as 
g^ the coefficient of the resistance of the air, decreases, and as G increases. To 
ascertain the circumstances on which the magnitude of C depends, put for p"^ in 
the second of the equations (8b), which defines the meaning of G, its value from 

(7a), and also put n^ * v" ' ^^ ^^^^ 

C« - m. (n2 - nfif + 2>m2. 

Now n is the number of vibrations which the bridge would perform in 2 ir 
seconds, under the influence of the elastic sounding board alone, without the 
string and the resistance of the air ; and m is the same number of vibrations for 
the tuning-fork. Hence the maximum value of F can now be written 



V..UW.ll-'^}*T,-\ 



f 



in which everything is reduced to the weights M, 7, -q and the magnitude of the 

interval 1 - — . 

m 

If m>n, which is usually the case, it is advantageous to make the weight of 
the bridge M, rather large. Hence I have had it constructed of a plate of copper. 
If if is very large, k will be very small in consequence of (8b), and then the equa- 
tion (9a) shews that the various tones of greatest resonance approach all the more 
nearly to those which correspond with the series of simple whole numbers. The 
heavier the bridge the sharper the boundaries of the tones of the string. 

Observe that the rules here given for the influence of t}ie bridge hold only 
for the assumption that the string is excited by a tuning-fork, and not, so far as 
this investigation extends, for other cases. 



380 VIBRATION OF PIANOFORTE STRINGS. app. v. 

APPENDIX V. 

ON THE VIBBATIONAIi FORMS OF PIANOFOBTB STRINGS. 

(See pp. 74c to 806.) 

When a stretched string is struck by a perfectly hard and narrow metal pointy 
which is immediately withdrawn, the blow conveys a certain velocity to the point 
struck, while the rest of the string receives no motion. Let the moment of im- 
pact correspond to ^ = ; the motion of the string can then be determined on the 
condition that at that moment the string as a whole was in its position of equilibrium, 
and that it was only the point struck that had any velocity. Hence in equations 

(Ic) and (Id) of Appendix III. (p. 3766) put both y = and-j^ = for t = 0, at all 

points except that which is struck, for which suppose the co-ordinate to be a. 
Hence it follows that in those equations 

= -4i = -^2 = ^^3 = &c. , 

and the values of B are determined by an integration similar to that in (2b), 
p. 375d, giving 



L\ si] 



2vnmB„, I sin^ — j- . dx = 



^ dy . rmrx 



and irnmLB^ = c . sin 



'm 



I 



where c is the product of the velocity imparted to the struck portion of the string 
and of its infinitesimal length. Consequently 

y = — 7 • I sm— 7- . sm— 7- . sm 2imi 

1 . 2ira , ttx , 1 . Sira . SirX . ^ . , \ 

+ 2 . 81^ "7" • ^^^ T" • ^^^ ^""^^ + Q . sm — 7- . sm -7— . sm ovnt + &c. j 

*°^ ^- = ,;iz;ji • «>° -r (lo) 

The mth partial tone of the string, therefore, disappears in this case also when 
it is struck in a node of this string. Also the upper partial tones are stronger in 
comparison with the prime tone, than when the string is plucked, because the 
value of Am in equation (3), p. 375(2, has m^ as a divisor, whereas the value of B^, in 
(10) has only m as a divisor. This is immediately confirmed by experiment, on 
striking the strings with the sharp edge of a metal ruler. 

For a pianoforte, the discontinuity in the motion of the string is diminished by 
covering the hammer with an elastic pad. This sensibly diminishes the force of 
^ the higher upper partials, because the motion is no longer conveyed to a single 
point, but is imparted to a sensible length of string, and this too, not in an indivi- 
sible moment of time, as would be the case for a blow with a perfectly hard body. 
On the contrary, the elastic pad yields to the blow at first, and then recovers itself, 
so that while the hammer is in contact with the string, the motion is capable 
of extending over a considerable length. An exact analysis of the motion of a 
string excited by the hammer of a pianoforte would be rather complicated. But 
observing that the string moves but very slightly from its position of rest, and 
that the elastic pad of the hammer is very yielding and admits of much com- 
pression, we may simplify the mathematical theory, by assuming the pressure 
exerted by the hammer during the blow which it gives to the string to be as great 
as it would be if the string were a perfectly fixed and perfectly unyielding body. 
We are then able to assume the pressure of the hammer to be 

P=sA sin mt, 
for such moments of time that < ^ <— . This last magnitude ~ is the length of 



APP. V. VIBRATION OF PIANOFORTE STRINGS. 381 

time during whioh the hammer is in contact with the string. The magnitude of 
m increases therefore as the elastic power of the hammer increases and its weight 
decreases. 

We have first to determine the motion of the string during the interval of time 

that the hammer is in contact with it, that is, from ^ » to f » — During this 

time, the hammer divides the string into two sections, and the motion of each 
section has to be separately determined. At the place of impact let x be written 
Xq. When oi^Xq, distinguish the values of y by writing them y^, and when x >iCo, 
by writing them y^. At the point struck the pressure of the string against the 
hammer must be equal to the pressure P, which the hammer exerts against the 
string. The pressure of the string is to be calculated as in Appendix lY., equation 
(6a) (p. 3786), and we consequently obtain the equation 

P^A.su.mt = T.(^^-%) (11) T 

» 

Waves proceed towards both ends of the string from the place struck. Hence 
y^ must have the form 

yi-^ 4>{x - Xq + at) 

for values of t, for which 0<CK[^, and x^y^x'^XQ-at, and y^ must have the 

m 

form 

y^ = * K - ^ + ^0 

for the same values of t, and for values of x for which Xq<^x<!jXq + at. Using ^' 
for the differential coefficient of the function <^, equation (11) gives 

P-il .sin w«=« 2T. <t>' {at) (11a) 

Integrating with respect to ^ we find f 

C - - . COS mi = =r . <^ {at), 
m a 

and then, determining the constant C, so that yi= when x = Xq+ at, and y^^O 
when X'^Xq" at, we have 



yi = 



y'^ — 



J 1 - cos -{Xq - a;) + wm I. 



This determines the motion of the string for the time t, when 0<C ^ < — i cti^d 

on the supposition that the two waves proceeding from the place of impact have 
not reached one of the ends of the string. If the latter had been the case, they f 
would have been reflected there. 



IT 



When at has become greater than - , the pressure P will be » 0, and hence it 

m 

follows from equation (11a) that from thenceforward 

d>' (at) » 0, and hence <h « constant, when ai>^. 

m 

aA 
Hence both yi and y^ remain = — -^ for all those parts of the string over which 

the waves have already advanced, until portions of the waves reflected from 
the extremities reach those parts of the string on their return. 

To introduce the influence of the extremities of the string properly into calcu- 
lation, suppose the string to be infinitely long, and that at all points distant from 
Xq by multiples of 21, simOar blows are given to it, so that from all these places 



382 VIBRATION OF PIANOFORTE STRINGS. app. v. 

waves proceed similar to those which proceed from Xq, Moreover suppose that in 

all those places for which x ^ - ^o ± ^^^* ^ blow be applied equal to that given to 

Xq and at the same time, but in the opposite direction, so that from all these latter 

points waves will proceed of an identical form, but with a negative height. Those 

points of the infinite string which correspond with the extremities of the finite 

string will then be agitated by positive and negative waves of equal magnitude at 

the same time, and will hence be completely at rest, and consequently all the 

conditions of the real finite string will be fulfilled by the state of this section of 

the infinite string. 

From the moment that the hammer quits the string, the motion of the string^ 

may be regarded as two systems of waves, one advancing (or in the direction of 

positive x), and the other retreating (or in the direction of negative x). Of these 

systems of waves we have as yet found only certain isolated portions, namely 

those which correspond to the sections of the string lying nearest the point 

struck. We have now to complete these waves properly and obtain a connected 

IT advancing and retreating system. 

Advancing in the direction of the positive x on the string, we have ^ » until 

Aa 
we come to a positive retreating wave, and then it rises to — ^, which is its value 

in the positive striking points. If we proceed beyond the striking point, and over 

the wave thence proceeding, we again find values of y which bO, and sink to 

aA 

= as soon as the first negative retreating wave has been passed over. This 

ml 

is the value of y in the first negative striking point. To connect the positive and 

negative retreating waves properly with each other, we must suppose the values of 

^2 to be increas^ between every positive striking point and the next following 

nA 
negative striking point, by the magnitude + — =^ so that the height of the wave 

retains this value, which it had at Xq, until the corresponding negative wave begins. 

ilA 
IT Here then the height of the wave becomes -— ^ - y^ and sinks to zero. Similarly^ 

aA 
suppose that =^ is added to the height of the wave in advancing waves between 

mT 
any negative striking point and the next following positive striking point. The 
retreating waves will thus be everywhere positive, and the advancing waves every- 
where negative, and the waves at the same time are so constituted that their con- 
tinued motion will generate that kind of motion which we have found to exist in 
the string after the hammer quits it. 

We have now to express this system of waves as the sum of simple waves. 
The length of the wave is 21, because the points of simultaneous impact lie at 

intervals of 21, Let us take the positive retreating waves at the time t = 



m. 



then 



1) y^ = 0, from x==Otox^XQ--- 



^ ox aA 



from X = Xq - Ja^to X ^ Xq 

m 

3) yi= ^ from a = a:, to « = 2Z - «, - ^ 

*)^^=^- {i-cob[^(2Z-.o-x)]} 

from iT « 2Z - oJa - — to x = 2Z - a?o 

m 

5) y^ mm 0, from x — 21 - x^ixy x ^ 21. 



APP. V. 



VIBRATION OF PIANOFORTE STRINGS. 



383 



Hence if we assume 

IT 



y^^ Aq+A^. cos ^ (a? + c) + ilj . cos -j-{x -^ c) + A^. cos — (a? + c) + &c. 

+ 5i.sm^(a;+ c) + S^- si^y (« + c) + ^3- si^y (^ + o) + &o. (12) 



we shall have 






yj . cos -J- (a; + c) . Ar = il J, 
yi . sin ^{x + c),dx ^ BJ. 

^ 



aTT 



If we put c = Q— , every B becomes = 0, because y^ has the same values for 



2m 



air 



Oir 



^^ Tnir . (nVa2 - m^^) 



o— + ^ and K~ ^ it and the limits of the integration may be selected at pleasure f 
provided only that their difiference is 21, But on the other hand 

.sm(^-^.a:oj.cos(^-._j (12a) 

This equation gives the amplitude A^ of the several partial tones of the com- 
pound tone of the string which has been struck. When the point of impact is a 

node of the nth partial, the factor sin f ^ . Xq\ will — 0, and hence all those par- 
tial tones disappear which have a node at the point of impact. The table on 
p. 79c was calculated from this equation.* 

To determine the complete motion of the string we must further substitute 
X -^ at for X in the equation (12) for y^ The corresponding expression for y^ then 
becomes 

V 2ir 

yi = - ^Iq - ill . cos y (a? + a^ - c) - Jj . COS -y- (x - a* - c) - &c. T 

and finally 

TT TT 2t 2ir 

y = ^1 + y^ "= 2ili.cos^a?.cos j-(ai + c) + 2^2-^^ -p as. cos— {at + c) •\- &c. 

which completely solves the problem. 

If m be infinite, that is, if the hammer be perfectly hard, the expression for 
A^ in (12a) becomes identical with that of B^ in equation (10), p. 380e. It must be 
remembered that m in (10) is identical with n in (12a) (and that a in (10) is then 
identical with Xq in (12a), while a in (12a) has a different meaning). 

If m is not infinite, as n increases the coefficients A^ decrease as -3, but if m 

be infinite they decrease as - ; for plucked strings they decrease as -g. This cor- 
responds to the theorems proved by Stokes {Cambridge Transactions^ vol. viii. 
pp. 533 to 584) concerning the effect of the discontinuity of a function, when 
developed in Fourier's series, upon the magnitude of the terms with high ordinal, f 
numbers. Thus, if y is the function to be developed in a series 

y « -4o + -^1 • ^^^ C^'*^ + ^1) + -^2 . sin (2ma; + Cg) -h &c. 
the coefficient of A^ when n is very great, 

1) is of the order - when y itself suddenly alters ; 



* [It is shewn in the notes on p. 76c2' and 
p. 77c, that when the blow is made with an 
ordinary pianoforte hammer, the partial tone, 
corresponding to the Dode struck, does not 
whoUy vanish. The subject is resumed in 
App. XX. sect. N. No. 2, where the result of 
later experiments is given. In the meantime 
it most be borne in mind that though the 



force of the corresponding partial is materially 
weakened, it is not absolutely extinguished. 
It may therefore be necessary to re-open the 
mathematical investigation without having 
recourse to the facilitation due to the funda- 
mental (but certainly only approximative) 
assumption on p. 880a, giving FmmA sin mi, 
— TrandaXor,] 



384 MOTION OF VIOLIN STRINGS. app. v. vi. 

2) is of the order -g when the first differential coefficient ~v- suddenly alters ; 

1 cPy 

3) is of the order -3 when the second differential coefficient ^s suddenly 

alters ; 

4) is at most of the order 6-" when the function itself and all its differential 
coefficients are continuous. [See note, p. 35d,] 

Hence follow the laws of musical tones so often mentioned in the text, that 
their upper partial tones generally increase in power, with the greater discontinuity 
of the corrresponding motion of the resonant body. 

[See Donkin's Acoustics, pp. 119-126, where, on p. 124, equation (14) corre- 
II spends to equation (12a) above.] 



APPENDIX VI. 

ANALYSIS OF THB MOTION OF VIOLIN STRINGS. 

(See p. 83a.) 

Assume the lens of the vibration microscope to make horizontal vibrations, then 
vibrational curves will be observed like those represented in fig. 23, p. 826, c. Gall 
the vertical ordinate y and the horizontal x ; then y is directly proportional to the 
displacement of the vibrating point, and x to that of the vibrating lens. The 
latter performs a simple pendular vibration. If the number of its vibrations be n 
H and the time ty we have generally 

X — A , sin {2vnt + c) 

where A and c are constant. 

Now if y also makes n vibrations, x and y are both periodic and have the 
same periodic time. Hence, at the end of each period, x and y have the same 
values as before, and the observed point is at exactly the same place as at the 
beginning of the period. This holds for every point in the curve and for every 
fresh repetition of the vibratory motion, so that the curve appears stationary. 

Suppose a vibrational form of the kind depicted in figs. 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, pp. 20 
and 21, in which the horizontal abscissa is directly proportional to the time, to 
be wrapped round a cylinder, of which the circumference is equal to a single 
period of those curves, so that the time t is now to be measured along the cir- 
cumference of the cylinder. Call x the distance of a point from a plane drawn 
through the axis of the cylinder. Then in this case also 

H a? « il . sin (2imt + c), 

where il . sin c is the value of j; for ^ » 0, and A is the radius of the cylinder. 
Hence, if the curve drawn upon the cylinder be viewed by an eye at an infinite 
distance in the line re » 0, ^ — 0, the curve has exactly the same appearance as in 
the vibration microscope. 

If X and y have not exactly the same period ; if, for example, y makes n vibra- 
tions while X makes n-\-An, where A n is a very small number, the expression for 
X may be written 

ic -• -4 . sin [2vnt + {c + 2irt A n)]. 

In this case, then, c which was formerly constant, increases slowly. But c re- 
presents the angle between the plane x^O and the point in the drawing for which 
^ = 0. In this case, then, the imaginary cylinder round which the drawing is 
supposed to be wrapped, revolves slowly. 

Since a magnitude which is periodic after the period ir, may be also considered 



AFP. VI. MOTION OF VIOLIN STRINGS. 386 

as periodio after the periods 2^, or 3^, or v^, where v is any whole number, these 
remarks apply also for the case when the period of y is an aliquot part of the 
period of X, or conversely, or both are aliquot parts of the same third period, that 
is, for the case when the tones of the tuning-fork and of the observed body stand in 
any consonant ratio ; the only limitation is that the common period of vibration 
must not exceed the time required for a luminous impression to become extinct 
in the eye. [See Donkin's AcottsticSf pp. 36-44.] 

From the observed curves, fig. 23 B, G, p. S2b, and fig. 24 A, B, p. 836, it 
follows that all points of the string ascend and descend alternately, that the ascent 
is made with a constant velocity, and also the descent with a constant velocity, 
which is however different from the velocity of ascent. When the bow is drawn 
across a node of one of the upper partials of the string, the motion takes place in 
all nodes of the same tone precisely in the manner described. For other points 
of the string, little crumples are perceptible in the vibrational figure, but they do 
not prevent us from clearly recognising the principal motion. 11 




If in fig. 62 we reckon the time from the abscissa of the point a, so that for 
a, < s= 0, and further for the point put ^ = t, and for the point y put * = T, so 
that the last represents the length of a whole period ; then 

y a^ft + h, from ^ = Otot = T; \ .-v 

y ^g{T - t) + h,fTomt = TU>t = TJ ^^^ 

whence for ^ » r, it results that 

/r-flf(r-T). f 

Now suppose ^ to be developed in one of Fourier's series : 

y = ill . sm -jp + A^.sm-^- + A^.sm— &c. 

+ B,,oos^ + B, . cos^^ + ^3. cos ^p&o. 
then it results from integration that 

A^ . sm2 -^ ,dt= \ y,sm -^ . dt 

B^.\ cos«-^.dt=| y,oos~^,dt, ^ 

and this gives the following values for A„ and B„ : 

J (g + f).T . 2nirt 

5,.= - (^-^/)'^ . jl-cosgy| 
and y may then be written in the form 

y-'^^^KZ? {i-'°?-'^T('-3)} <^> 

In equation (2), y denotes merely the distance of any determinate point of the 
string from its position of rest. If x denotes the distance of this point from thg 

00 



388 THEORY OF PIPES. apf. vn. 

APPENDIX VII 

ON THE THBOBT OF PIPBB. 

A. Iiifiuence of Resonance in Seed Pipes. 

(See p. 1026.) 

The laws of resonance for cylindrical tubes have been developed mathematically 
in my paper on the ' Theory of Aerial Vibrations in Tabes with Open Ends ' 
{Theorie der Luftschwingungen in Bohrefh mit offenen Enden, 'Journal fiir reine 
und angewandte Mathematik/ vol. Ivii.). The example treated in § 7 of that paper 
is applicable to reed pipes, where the motion at the bottom of the pipe is assumed 
IT to be given. Let Vdt be the volume of air which enters the reed pipe in the in- 
finitesimal time dt, then as this magnitude is periodical we can express Fin one of 
Fourier's series, thus : — 

7 - Co + Ci . cos {2imt + T^) + Cg . cos {^rmt + T^) + &a (1) 

The resonance must be determined separately for each term, because the vibra- 
tions corresponding to each partial tone are superposed without modification. 
If we assume Z to be the length of the tube, S its section, I + a the reduced 
length of the tube (where in cylindrical tubes the difference a is equal to the 

IT 2ir 

radius multiplied by - [but see p. 91d, note f ]), k the magnitude — (where X is the 

4 A 

length of the wave), and put the potential of the wave in free space, for the tone 
having the vibrational number vn, 

€r = — . COS (vkr - 2vrrvt + (j), 

where r is the distance from the middle of the opening ; then the equations (15) 
and (12b) of the paper referred to, give 

M = _ - _ ^^ _ 

" ^"(4ir2 cos2 rk (r+ a) + y^k^S^ sin^' vkl)' 

Since the magnitude k^S must always be considered as very small to make our 
theory applicable, this equation, for cases in which { + a is not an uneven mul- 
tiple of the length of a quarter of a wave, becomes approximatively 

2ir . cos vk{l + a) 

Hence the resonance is weakest when the reduced length of the tube is an 
even multiple of the length of a quarter of a wave, and becomes stronger as it 
f approaches an uneven multiple of that length. When it absolutely reaches such 
a multiple the complete formula gives 

njr Ov 
Mv = 



2A;25' 

Hence the maximum of resonance increases as the length of the wave of the 
tone in question increases and the transverse section decreases. The smaller the 
transverse section, the more sharply defined is the limit of the pitch of the tone 
which is strongly reinforced by resonance ; while when the transverse section is 
large, the reinforcement of resonance extends over a much greater length of the 
scale. 

For hollow bodies of other shapes, with narrow mouths, similar equations may 
be obtained by means of the propositions given in § 10 of the paper cited. 

Since the condition of powerful resonance is that cos vk (i + a) = 0, cylin- 
drical tubes (clarinet) reinforce only the prime and other unevenly numbered partial 
tones [but see note p. 99c]. 



APP. vii. THEORY OF PIPES. 389 

In the interior of oonioal tubes we may assume the potential of the motion of 
the air for the tube n to be 

F =s _ . sin (kr + c) cos 2Tmt, 

r 

where r is the distance from the vertex of the cone. If a vibrator is introduced at 
a distance a from the vertex, and I be the length of the tube, so that for the open 
end r a 2 + a, we may assume as an approximatively correct limiting condition for 
the free end, that the pressure there vanishes. This is the case when 

— - = - 2im . — — . sin \k(l + a) + c] . sin 2imi = 0, and hence 
dt I ■{- a ^ ^ -' 

sin [k{l + a) + c] « 0. 

Hence we may assume 

c = - k(l + a) f 

and F = ~ . sin A;(r - Z - a) . cos 2irnt 

r 

The most powerful resonance, then, in this case, as well as in cylindrical tubes, 
belongs to those tones which have a minimum velocity at the place where the 
vibrator is placed. For as during the development of velocity in the mouthpiece in 
equation (1) the coefficients Cy have a determinate value which depends only on 
the motion of the vibrator and the pulses of air which it occasions, the coefficient 
A of the last equation must increase, as the velocity produced by the correspond- 
ing train of waves in the mouthpiece of the tube decreases. The velocity in the 
other parts of the tube will then increase. Now the velocity of a particle of air is 

-7- = — 3 . COS 2imt . \kr . cos k(r - I - a) - sin k(r - I - a)], 
dr r^ *■ 

Hence for maximum resonance we have the condition that for r =» a ^ 

either kr = tan k{r-l- a) 

or ka^ - tan kl. 

If, then, the magnitude a, that is, the distance of the vibrator from the vertex 
of the cone, be very small, ka and also tan kl will be very small, and kl-w must 
also be very small, if v is any whole number. Hence we may develop the tangents 
according to powers of their arc, and retaining only the first term of this develop- 
ment we have 

A;a = vjT - kl, and k{a + i) == ►w 

2ir 

or, putting k = - , we have 

A 

a + i = F.-. T 

• 
This shews that conical tubes reinforce all those tones for which the whole length 
of the cone, reckoned up to its imaginary vertex, is a multiple of half the length 
of the wave, on the assumption that the distance of the vibrator from this ima- 
ginary vertex is infinitesimal in comparison with the length of the wave. Hence 
if the prime of the compound tone is reinforced by the tube, all the partial tones, 
both the evenly and unevenly numbered, will be reinforced up to a pitch where 
the wave-lengths of the higher partial tones cease to be very large in comparison 
with the distance a* 

CcBteris paribus, the number and magnitude of the terms of the series (1), 
which represents the exciting aerial motion will be the greater, the more perfectly 
the entering stream of air is interrupted. Free reeds must therefore fit their 

* [The remamder of this Appendix VII. to principally from the Ist English edition. — 
p. 8966, is aji addition to the 4th German Translator.] 
edition. The additions on pp. 896-7 are 



390 . THEORY OF PIPES. app. vn. 

frames very exactly, in order to produce a powerful tone. Striking reeds, which 
effect a more perfect stoppage, are superior in this respect. According to the 
information obtained by Mr. A. J. Ellis [see p. 95d\ note f], organ -builders hare 
really been more inclined in recent times to use striking reeds. But the vibrating 
laminsB are very slightly curved, so that they do not strike the frame all at once, 
but roll themselves gradually out upon it. 

B. Theory of the Bloiving of Pipes. 

When longitudinal waves have once been excited in the mass of air in a tube, 
they may be reflected backwards and forwards many times between the ends of 
the tube, and form constant, periodically returning vibrations, before they die 
away. At the closed end of a stopped pipe, the reflexion of every train of waves 
is tolerably complete, but at the open ends a perceptible fraction of the wave 
always passes into the open air, and hence the reflected wave has not the same 
f intensity as the incident wave possessed. Indeed the intensity of the waves re- 
flected backwards and forwards in the tube continually diminishes, and finally 
dies off, if the lost work is not replaced at every backwards and forwards reflexion 
by some other kind of action. What has to be replaced, however, is usually only 
a small part of the whole vis viva of the undulatory motion, that is, just as much 
as is lost by reflexion at the open ends. If the inner radius at the open end of a 
cylindrical tube be B, the fraction of the amplitude which is lost at the open end 
for a tone having the wave-length X, is, according to theory, 

where B is small in comparison with X. In the pipes examined by Zamminer, 
the wave-length X varied between SiB and 15 '62^. In the first case the loss 
would be 2 ^^^) fti^d ^^ ^^6 latter about ^th of the amplitude. 

Now, this loss of vis viva can be replaced in various ways. Supposing that 

If the small volume dV, which was under the pressure Pq, were forced over into a 
space filled with air under the pressure p, the required work would be {p-p^dV, 
Hence if during the vibrations of sound, at those places and times where the air 
is condensed, either a small quantity of air is regularly forced in, or the pressure 
of the compressed air is increased by heating, this mass of air generates by its 
expansion a greater quantity of vis viva than was lost by its resistance to the 
condensation at the time the loss occurred. The first of the two causes is effective 
in reed pipes, the second in the tubes of the Pyrophone [see App. XX. sect N. 
No. 4], in which, together with the air which streams back into the tube, an 
increased quantity of gas is poured in from the gas tube, and this on burning 
increases the pressure during the time of re-expansion. 

The conditions which must be fulfilled to make reed pipes speak were given by 
me in the ' Transactions of the Association for Natural History and Medicine ' 
(Verhcmdlungen des naturhistorisch-medicinischen Vereins) at Heidelberg (26 July, 
1861), and I take the liberty of reprinting this short explanation here with a few 

IT improvements. 

I. The Blowing of Beed Pipes. 

By a reed pipe I mean any kind of wind instrument in which the path of the 
stream of wind is alternately opened and closed by means of a vibrating elastic 
body. The first work which made the mechanics of reed pipes accessible was 
that of W. Weber. But he experimented chiefly with metsJ reeds, which on 
account of their great mass and elasticity, could not be powerfully moved by the 
air unless the tone given by the pipe was not materially different from the proper 
tone of the reed independently of the pipe. Hence pipes with metal reeds are 
usually capable of producing only a single tone, namely that one among those 
theoretically possible which is closest to the proper tone of the reed. 

The case is different for reeds of light material which offers but little resistance, 
such as the cane reeds of the clarinet, oboe, bassoon, and the muscular reeds of 
the human lips in trumpets, trombones, and horns. Eeeds of vulcanised india- 
rubber, placed similarly to the vocal chords in the larynx, are also well adapted for 



APP. vn. THEORY OF PIPES. 391 

experiments ; but, to make them speak easily and well, care must be taken to 
place them obliquely to the current of air (p. 976). 

The action of reeds differs essentially according as the passage which they close 
is opened when the reed moves against the wind towards the windchest, or moves 
with the wind towards the pipe. I shall say that the first strike inwards, and the 
second strike mittvards. The reeds of the clarinet, oboe, bassoon, and organ all 
strike inwards. The human lips in brass instruments, on the other hand, are 
reeds striking outwards. The india-rubber reeds that I employ may be arranged 
to strike either inwards or outwards. 

The laws for the pitch of reed pipes are completely found, when we have deter- 
mined the motion of the reed as influenced by the alternating pressure of the air 
in the pipe and air chamber [see fig. 29, B, p p, on p. 96b] ; remembering that the 
effluent air cannot attain its maximum velocity until the passage closed by the 
reed has been opened as widely as possible. 

1) Beeds with cylindrical pipe without air chamber. The reed is regarded as 7 
a body which returns to its position of equilibrium by elastic forces, and is again 
brought out of that position by the pressure of the air in the pipe, which changes 
periodically with the sine of the time. The equations of motion * shew that the 
instant of greatest pressure within the pipe must fall between a maximum dis- 
placement of the reed outwards, which precedes it, and a maximum displacement 
of the same inwards, which follows it. If the vibrational period be divided into 
360°, like the circumference of a circle, the angle c, by which the maximum pres- 
sure precedes the passage of the reed through its position of equilibrium, is given 
by the equation 

tan € = 

where L is the length of the wave of the reed in the air without the pipe, X the 
wave-length of the tone which is actually produced, and ^ a constant which is 
greater for reeds of light material and greater friction than for heavy and perfectly 
elastic materials. The angle c must be taken between - 90° and -f 90°. <[ 

In the same way we must determine the time at which the greatest pressure 
within the pipe separates from the greatest velocity. The latter must coincide 
with the position of the reed for which the opening is greatest. The calculation 
of this magnitude results from my investigations on the motion of air within an 
open cylindrical tube {Journal fUr reine und angewandte Mathematik, IviL). The 
maximum of the velocity in the direction of the opening precedes the maximum 
of pressure by an angle 8 (considering the vibrational period as the circumference 
of a circle) which is given by the equation 

tan = sm — ^ L 

where S is the transverse section, I the length of the tube, and a a constant de- 
pending on the form of the opening, being 45° [but see note f and I p. 91] for 
cylindrical tubes, of which the section has the radius p. The angle 8 in this case 
is again to be taken between - 90° and + 90°. 

Now as air can only enter the pipe when the reed leaves the passage open, itf 
follows that for reeds which strike inwards the maximum velocity of the air directed 
outwards must coincide with the maximum displacement of the reed inwards. 
Hence we must have 

- . = 8 + i,r, 

and both S and c must be negative. 

For reeds which strike outwards, on the other hand, the maximum effluence of 
the air must coincide with the maximum displacement of the reed outwards, and 
we must have 

2^ = 8 + c, 

and both 3 and c must be positive. 

* To be treated as in Seebeck's theory of the foUowing App. IX. But the c there is the 
sympathetic resonance, Repertorium der Phy- complement of tne c here, and wave-lengths are 
sik, vol. viii. pp. 60-64. Also see equation 4o in here used instead of pitch numbers, as there. 



392 THEORY OF PIPES. app. vn. 

Both cases are included in the equation 

tan c = cot 8 
or 

^.^4^)^4^^^ _^ (,j 

■ 

in which the reeds must strike inwards or outwards respectively, according as the 
quantities on each side of equation (1) are positive or negative. 

Since S and fi^ are very small quantities, sin {4ir(Z + a)~X} cannot have any- 
sensible value unless X^ -L'^ is very small, that is, unless the pitch of the pipe 
nearly coincides with that of the reed sounded separately from the pipe. This 
is generally the case with metal reeds. The value of X is determined from 
equation (1). 

On the contrary when the difference of the two tones X - L is great, then 
51 sin {47r(/ + a)-r Aj must be very small, and hence approximatively 

Z + a = v.^, 

where v is any whole number. 

The alteration of pressure within the tube is proportional to sin {2ir{l + a)-7-X]j 
and hence is a minimum when 



and a maximum when 



l + a = 2v.^, 



1 + a=(2y + 1).^. 

4 



In the first case the force of the pressure of the air does not suffice to move the 
^ reed. In the second case it suffices when the reeds are not too heavy and have 
not too great a power of resistance. Hence the tones speak well for which 
approximatively 

Z + a = (2v + 1) . ^, 

that is, for which the column of air in the pipe vibrates as in a stopped pipe. At 
the same time we see that these tones are almost independent of the proper tone 
of the reed. 

Of this kind are the tones of the clarinet. Membranous reeds of india-rubber 
which strike inwards, attached to glass tubes 16 feet long, also speak easily and 
allow various upper partials to be produced which agree well with equation (1). 
The reeds which strike outwards must be tuned very low in order to give the 
pure tones of the tube. Hence the human lips are well adapted for this purpose, 
as the bundles of elastic fibres of which they are composed, are loaded with a 
f large quantity of watery inelastic tissue [see footnote, p. 97d\ Cylindrical glass 
tubes may easily be blown as trumpets, and give the tones of a stopped pipe. 
Of these the upper tones, for which the difiference L^ - X'^ is large, can be pro- 
duced with firmness and correct intonation, but the lower tones, on the other 
hand, being not quite independent of the value of L, that is, of the tension and 
density of the lips, are uncertain and variable. 

2) Beeds with conical pipes without air chamber. There is a remarkable 
difiference between cylindrical and conical pipes. The motion of the air in the 
interior of the latter may be determined on the same principles that I have used 
for cylindrical pipes. 

Put the potential of the motion of the air, inside the pipe, equal to 

— I sin -y (-K - r + a) . cos27m^ I + —^ . cos ^{B - r) . sin 2irn/, 

where r is the distance from the vertex of the cone, B the value of r at the open- 
ing [or base] of the cone, S its section, a the difiference between the true and 



APP. vn. 



THEORY OF PIPES. 



393 



reduced length, n the pitch number. Considering a -r X to be very small, and 
putting B - r ^ I, this gives 



- X* 
tan 8 = — -^ . sin 



2y(Z + g) 



[■ 



2ir{l + a) X 



V . . «: 2ir(i + a) 

2iriS X X 2irr X 



]. 



in which Z is to be referred to the place of the reed. 

Here also we have to put 

cot 8 » tan c. 

We are at present chiefly interested in those tones of pipe which dififer much 
from the tone of the reed, for which therefore L^ - H^ is great, tan c is also con- 
sequently very great, and tan 8 very small. For these then we must either have 
approximatively 

sin [2ir{l + a) -^ X] = 0, 

which gives no tone at all, because the alteration of pressure in the interior of the ^ 
pipe is too weak, or else 

tan [2ir(Z + a) -f X] = - 2wr ^ X (2) 

This is the equation for the powerful upper tones of the pipes. 

Below is the series of tones calculated from equation (2) for a conical pipe of 
zinc of the following dimensions : 

Length I = 129-7 centimetres [ = 51 -06 inch]. 

Diameter of the opening 5*5 and 0*7 ctm. [a2'17 and -28 inch]. 

Seduced length l + a, calculated 124-77 ctm. [» 49*12 inch]. 



Approximate 
Tone 


Wave-lengths 
calculated 


Length of the corresponding 
open 1 stopped 
pipes 


1. JB- 

2, 6- 

4. b' + 
6. d'% + 

6. g" - 

7. 6'> - 

8. c'" - 

9. d'" - 


centimetres 
283-61 » 

139-83 = 

91-81 = 

67-94 = 

53-76 = 

44-40 = 

87-79 = 

32-87 = 

29-22 = 


centimetres 
f X 141-80 

f X 139-84 

1 X 137-71 

f X 136-88 

I X 134-39 

I X 133-21 

f X 132-26 

1 X 131-50 

I X 131-47 


centimetres 
= t X 70-90 

= 1 X 104-88 

= f X 114-76 

= f X 118-89 

= 1 X 120-95 

= 1*1 X 122-11 

= 1^5 X 122-82 

= tV X 123-28 

= j\ X 124-17 



f 



The tones from the 2nd to the 9th could be observed, and were found to agree 
perfectly with the calculation. It appears from the last two columns that the 
higher tones were almost exactly those of a stopped pipe, the length of which is H 
equal to the reduced length of the pipe 124*77 ctm., and that the deeper tones 
approach nearer to those of an open pipe, the length of which was that from the 
vertex to the foot of the cone. The reduced length of this would be i? + a — 142-6 
ctm. [= 56*15 inch]. The tones of brass instruments are usually assumed to be 
the same as those of an open pipe, but the higher tones of these instruments are 
relatively too sharp * for the lower ones, in the present case by more than half 



* [The text has * flat,' but this is against 
the figures. As it wiU appear that the notes 
assigned to the pitches in the first column 
are only roughly approximative, it is best to 



calculate out the intervals in cents, and as- 
suming that the pitch varies inversely as the 
wave-length, we have in cents — 



For tones . 


1 


2 


1 3 


4 


5 


6 


7 


8 


9 


Beed pipe . 
Harmonics . 






1221 
1200 


1968 
1902 


2474 
2400 


2879 
2786 

93 


3210 
3102 

108 


3489 
3369 


3731 
3600 


3935 
3804 


Difference 





21 


51 


74 


120 


131 


181 



394 



THEORY OF PIPES. 



AFP. vn. 



a Tone. In trumpets and horns this error is perhaps to some extent compensated 
by the cups of the mouthpiece. In trombones the slides assist.* 

Whereas trumpets, trombones, and horns belong to the reed pipes of this 
class with conical pipes, and deep reeds which strike outwards, oboes and bas- 
soons have high reeds which strike inwards. When strongly blown they also 
give the higher Octave, and then the Twelfth, like an open pipe. The calculation 
from equation (2) for the oboe agrees very well with*Zamminer's measurements. 
[Zam. ibid, p. 306.] 

II. The Blowing of Flue Pipes. 

In my memoir on ' The Discontinuous Motions of Fluids ' {Monthly Proceed- 
ings of the Academy of Sciences at Berlin, April 23, 1868), I have described the 
mechanical peculiarities of such motions, and deduced from the theory how they 
are brought about by means of the blade-shaped current of air at the mouth of an 
f organ pipe which is blown, as described on p. 92a to p. 93a. The bounding surfaces 
of this current which cuts through and across the mass of air that runs into and 
out of the mouth of the pipe, are to be considered as vortical surfaces, that is, 
surfaces which are faced with a continuous stratum of vortical filaments or thread- 
like eddies. Such surfaces have a very unstable equilibrium. An infinitely ex- 
tended plane surface uniformly covered with parallel straight vortical filaments 
might indeed continue stable; but where the least flexure occurs at any tirne^ 
the surface curls itself round in ever narrowing spiral coils, which continually 
involve more and more distant parts of the surface in their vortex. 



Bhewing that the tones of the reed pipe are 
always too sharp, and not too /UU, as the 
German text states, the sharpness being a 
comma for tone 2, a Quartertone for tone 3, 
} Tone for 4, nearly a Semitone for 5, more 
than a Semitone for the rest, the last two 
heing equally too sharp hy about If Semitone. 
H The misprint of d'"| for d'" in the German text 



For tones . 



made the last tone appear to be a whole Tone 
too sharp. In determining the notes in colum.n 
1, the Author has probably assumed the velo- 
city of sound at 842 metres (which gives 1122 
feet, or the velocity at about 60° F., see note 
p. 90d), and divided it by the wave-lengths 
reduced to metres. This would give — 



the pitch nos. . 
While pitch nos. 
belong to equally ^ 
tempered notes / 



1 


2 


3 


4 


6 


6 


7 


8 


120-6 
124-6 


244-6 
249-2 


872-6 
878-6 


608-4 
498*4 


686-2 
628-0 


770-8 
781-6 


906-0 
940O 


1040*6 
1066-0 


B 


b 


n 


b' 


<^"l 


g" 


6"b 


c'" 



1170-4. 

1184*2 

d"' 



Whence it appears that g" and b"^ are much, 
and e'", d'" somewhat, too sharp, so that the 
d"'JI^ of the German text is a manifest error. 
This rough mode of comparing by vibrational 



numbers, does not however convey a proper 
conception. If we calculate the cents from 
C66, we find^ 



For tones 



the cents . 
But cents . 
belong to equally \ 
li tempered notes / 

Differences 



; 1 


2 


8 


4 

8617 
8600 

b' 


6 


6 ' 


7 

4688 
4600 

6> 


8 


9 


1044 
1100 

B 


2268 
2800 

6 


2996 
8000 

/If 


8928 
8900 


4264 
4800 

9" 


4774 
4800 

e'" 


4978. 
6000 

d'" 


- 66 


- 82 


-4 


+ 17 


+ 23 


-46 


-67 


-26 


i -22 



And this shews how veiv rough are the ap- 
proximations to the pitcn which are made in 
the text by means of equally tempered notes. 
— Translator,^ 

' * [* The conical tube examined by Prof. 
Helmholtz,' says Mr. Blaikley (see note, 
p. 97d), *was not a perfect but a truncated 
cone, and any such would have its series of 
intervals intermediate between 1, 2, 8, 4, 6, 
&c., and 1, 8, 6, 7, 9, &c. ; that is, a perfect 
cone, or one truncated to an infinitely small 
extent, would have the first, and an infinitely 
long cone ( = a stopped cylindrical tube) 
would have the second. Such a cone as 
Helmholtz describes is not a representative of 
the brass instrument family, for if cylindrical 



tubing were added at the small end, the series 
with this added tube would not even be so 
near the theoretical 1, 2, 8, 4, 6, &c., as on the 
original cone. There are brass instruments in 
which the series, so far from getting sharp on 
the higher tones, gets flat, 1,-2,-8,-4,-6, &c. 
Technically such instruments are said to be 
" sharp at the bottom '*. In short, trumpets 
and trombones, &c., are not conical in the 
ordinary sense of the word, but have in most 
cases a cylindrical tube expanding into a bell 
by a line of increasing curvature, so that the 
boundaries are approximately hyperbolic* 
MS. communication. See also note f, p. 99d. 
— Translator.] 



APP. vii. THEORY OF PIPES. 395 

This inclination of the dividing surfaces of masses of air when moved discon- 
tinuously, to resolve themselves into vortices, can also be clearly seen on cylin- 
drical streams of air, driven from cylindrical pipes and mixed with a little smoke 
to make them visible. In perfectly quiet air and under favourable conditions, they 
may reach a length of one foot to three feet. The least noise however makes 
them shrink up, as the vortices then commence close to their origin. Professor 
Tyndall has also observed and described a great number of similar phenomena of 
this kind, in burning gas jets.* 

This resolution into vortices takes place in the blade of air at the mouth of 
the pipe, where it strikes against the lip. From this place on it is resolved into 
vortices, and thus mixes with the surrounding oscillating air of the pipe, and 
accordingly as it streams inwards or outwards, it reinforces its inward or outward 
velocity, and hence acts as an accelerating force with a periodically alternating 
direction, which turns from one side to the other with great rapidity. Such a 
blade of air follows the transversal oscillations of the surrounding mass of air f 
without sensible resistance. During the phase of entrance of air, the blade is 
also directed inwards, and thus on its part reinforces the vis viva of the inward 
currents. Conversely, for the outward current. f 

If we suppose the accelerating force of the current of air to be represented by 
one of Fourier's series, the amplitude of any term of the order m will in general 
diminish as 1 -r m (see p. Sod). In fact we require only to use the expression 
given in App. III. p. 375, equations (lb) and (3) for the displacement ^ of a 

plucked string, in order to find the value of -^ for the time ^ = 0. We thus find the 

series which expresses the periodical alternation between a greater and smaller 
value of y, as shewn in fig. 19, p. 54c. 

From my memoir *0n the Vibrations of Air in Tubes with Open Ends,* 
already cited (p. 388a), it follows that throughout the tube a positive component of 
pressure coincides with the maximum velocity in the direction of the opening, and 
when multiplied by such velocity this component has the value 11 



aA^k^ S 



where 



a is the velocity of sound, 

A the maximum velocity at the end of the tube, 

iS the transverse section of the cylindrical portion of the tube, 

A;— 2l^-^X, X being the length of the wave. 

If, then, two trains of waves start from any transverse section in the directions of 
the two ends, and have the same velocity at that section, the above component 
of pressure must be directed in opposite ways in the two trains of waves. This 
holds for the place of blowing even when it is quite close to the end of the tube, so 
that one train of waves is infinitesimally short. Under these circumstances the 
acceleration produced by the air blown in, must correspond to twice that difference 
of pressure. Since A is the velocity at the opening, twice this difference of pres- f 
sure for the mth tone, will be 

g il ^ 2ir iSm« 

This would be the only difference of pressure if the tone blown exactly corre- 
sponded to the proper tone of the tube. But it may be shewn that this cannot be 
made to agree with the mechanism of blowing, and there is always a length j^ 
which must be intercalated between the two trains of waves in order to reduce 

* J. TyndaU On Sounds Lect. VI., also in Journal, January,- 1867 ; NcUure, vol. viii. pp. 

Philosophical Magazine, series iv. vol. xzxiii. 25, 45, 883, vol. z. pp. 161, 481, vol. xi. p. 825, 

pp. 92-99, and 875-391. [24 June 1875, p. 145; 27 April 1876, p. 

t The formation of this blade of air has 511]). Herr Sohneebeli also ^ave a mechani- 

been described by Messrs. Sohneebeli (Pogg., cal explanation of the principal features of 

Ann. cliii. p. 801), Sonreck (%b. clviii. p. 129), the process. (See the Translator's addition 

and Hermann Smith (English Meduinics^ at the end of this Appendix, p. 8966.] 



396 



THEORY OF PIPES. 



APF. VIL 



them to an aooordant series of constant vibrations, 
additional difference of pressure equal to 



In this case there is another 



- a A,^ sin 



^irmp 



For the smaller numbers expressing the order, the sine may be replaced by 
the arc, and this latter term considered as the greater. Consequently the lower 
partials of the musical tone produced, allow the coefficient m A^\o increase as 
l-~m, that is i4„ as 1 ^ m\ and the higher partials allow A^ to increase as 
1-rm^. The velocities of the partial vibrations in more distant parts of the 
external free air contain the factor h once more than the velocities in the tubes 
(see equations 12g and 12h in my memoir). These will consequently increase as 
1 -^ m f or lower values of tti, which is also the case for the velocities of violin 
strings, but for higher values of m they decrease as 1 -r-m*. The greater S is, the 
IT sooner will this more considerable decrease of the higher partials occur. It is 
for this reason especially that organ -builders compare the tones of narrow metal 
organ pipes with those of the violin and violoncello. 

The circumstances which affect the blowing of pipes and the value of the mag- 
nitude ^, require a more extended investigation, which I hope to be soon able to 
give elsewhere. 



Additions bt Tbanslatob. 



[It may be convenient for those not con- 
versant with mathematics to reproduce the 
account of the phenomena, which was given by 
me in pp. 708-711 of the Ist English edition. 

Herr Schneebeli had an experimental pipe 
constructed in the usual way ; with glass back 
and a movable lip and slit or wind way, through 
which was driven air impregnated with smoke, 
as is frequent] V done to make it visible. When 

^ he BO placed the lip and slit that the stream 
of air passed entirely outside of the pipe, no 
sound occurred ; but if he blew gently upon 
this sheet of air, at right angles, the pipe 
sounded, and the tone continued until he blew 
through the other end of the pipe ; neverthe- 
less under these circumstances it was veiy 
rare indeed to find that any smoke penetrated 
into the pipe. If the sheet of smoked air 
passed entirely inside of the pipe, there was 
also no sound ; but then on blowing through 
the open end, so as to force some of it out, 
sound was produced, and it was stopped by 
blowing against the slit. This case was there- 
fore the converse of the last. He concludes : 
'That the stream of air which issues from 
the slit forms a species of « air-reed (Luft- 
Lamelle, aerial lamina), and that this plays 
in the generation of vibrations in the mass of 

^ air, a part analogous to that of reeds in reed 
pipes '. He states that the vibrational nature 
of motion of the air between the slit and the 
lip can be shewn by attaching a piece of silk- 
paper to the edge of the lip or the split, and 
pressing a point against it. He further pro- 

Soses a theory founded on Helmholtz*s hydro- 
ynamicflbl investigations in the Berichte der 
Berliner Akademie, 1868, 28 April, Grelle 60, 
and states it to this effect : When the split is 
in the normal position the air-reed strikes the 
lip, a portion of the stream enters, and pro- 
duces a compression as in reed pipes ; the 
reaction of this compression affects the air- 
reed and bends it outwards ; on the pressure 
ceasing the air-reed returns to its original 
position and the process begins afresh. 

Mr. Hermann Smith states that the air 
from the bellows is not directed * against the 



edge of the lip,* and that, if it were so directed, 
the pipe would not speak. He also states that 
the sharpness of the lip is immaterial to mere 
speaking, and that a pipe that speaks well 
may have the edge of its lip half an inch 
thick. (Compare supri&, p. 60e, where the 
wind which excites the sound in the bottle 
is blown across its mouth and the edges of 
the opening are rounded, not sharp.) 

The source of tone, according to tx>th Mr. 
Hermann Smith and Herr Schneebeli, is the 
formation of what the former calls an ' aero- 
plastic reed,' and also simply an * air-reed,' 
and the latter a ' Luft-Lamelle ' rProf. Helm- 
holtz's * Luft-Blatt,' air^blade, or olattf drmige 
Schicht, * blade-shaped stratum or sheet,' as 
used supri, p. 894a), which is produced out- 
side of the pipe, and bends partly within 
it. For the formation of this reed both agree 
that it is essential for the exciting air to pass 
the lip, certainly not to enter the pipe. The 
existence of the reed is shewn by Mr. Her- 
mann Smith by interxxning a thin lamina, a 
shaving, or crisp tissue paper, which is caught 
by the air and vibrates as a reed,* and by Herr 
Schneebeli by the smoke mixed with air which 
enables the experimenter to see its motion 
directly, and also by a piece of silk-paper. 

Herr Schneebeli supposes this air-reed to 
act by producing condensation, but Mr. Her- 
mann Smith's theory of its origin seems to 
be as follows. The air driven rapidly and 
closely from the slit past the mouth of the 
pipe, in a flat stream, just and only just 
avoiding the edge of the lip, creates a vacuum, 
precisely as in the tubes for ether spray or 
perfume spray in common use, or in ordinaiy 
chimney-pots. The air in the pipe under 
the action of the atmospheric pressure at 

* Press % piece of crisp, but Tery light, thin paper 
flnoly against the outside of the windway by means of 
a card or piece of wood . Let the paper project apwarda 
till it nearly covers the mouth, but is quite clear of 
both lip and ears. The paper then resembles a free 
reed. On now blowing in the usual way through the 
slit, the paper will commence its vibrations, which Mr. 
Hermann Smith considers to correspond to those of his 
air-reed. The effect is easily observed. 



APP. VII. 



THEORY OF PIPES. 



397 



the upper open end immediately desoends to 
supply this vacuum, and by so doing not 
only bends the flat exciting stream of air 
outwards, but also of course produces a rare- 
faction in the tube, which by extending from 
the mouth upwards necessarily weakens the 
force of the outward rush of wind. The ex- 
ternal (not the exciting) air, takking advantage 
of this relaxation of force, enters the tube at 
the lip, causing a condensation in the lower 
part of the pipe, and the resulting wave of 
condensation before it has proceeded half-way 
meets the former wave of rarefaction, which 
continued to proceed from the further end of 
the tube, and thus forms a node. The node 
is consequently always nearer the mouth than 
the end of the pipe. The ratio of the length 
of the segment further from the mouth to 
that nearer to it varies from 4 : 3 to 7 : 6 ac- 
cording to the diameter or scale of the pipe 
flmd the strength of wind (see p. 916, and 
footnotes t, X)- 1° ^^^ meantime the exciting 
stream of air rights itself, passes over the 
vertical, bends inwards, and a small portion 
of it enters the pipe with the external air, to 
be cast out again by the returning wave of 
rarefaction, and by this time the exciting 
stream of air has been converted into a vibra- 
ting air-reed. That the first (but momentary) 
effect of the upward rush of the exciting 
stream of air is to abstract air from the pipe 
Mr. Hermann Smith considers to be demon- 
strated by inserting on the * languid,* just 
within the mouth, some filaments of cotton 
fluff, or down, which, in larger pipes, are shot 
out with energy. He supposes the air-reed 
afterwatrds to abstract and admit air in con- 
stant succession, thus producing the necessary 
stimulus for the sound heard, which would on 
this theory depend, among other conditions, 
upon the force of blast, its inclination to the 
mouth, the size and form of the mouth and 
ears, the interposition of obstructions between 
the reed and outer air (as the shading bar of 
the Oamba), the capacity and length of the 
pipe, and whether a node has to be formed in 
the pipe in the mode explained for open pipes, 
or in tne mode used for stopped pipes, which 
are acknowledged to speak more readily than 
the former. The external air of course passes 
continually, but intermittently, througn the 
mouth of the pipe. 

The law of vibration of the air-reed as 
stated by Mr. Hermann Smith, but unob- 
served and possibly unobtained by Herr Schnee- 
beli. is: * As its arcs of vibration are less, 
its speed is greater,' or * the times {of vibra- 
tion) vary with the amplitude,' being different 
from the usual law of a vibrating reed in 
which the time is independent of the ampli- 
tude of vibration. If by extraneous influence 
the pitch of the pipe is flattened, as by partly 
shading the mouth from the external air, Mr. 
Hermann Smith states that the path of the 
air-reed is lengthened, and conversely. When 
an organ pipe speaks the tones of the air- 
reed and pipe are distinct and may be sepa- 
rated or combined ; and when a pipe is said 
* to fly off to its Octave,* he says that the air- 



reed leaps back to its Octave speed, compel- 
ling the pipe to follow, and that this can be 
made visible. The natural pitch of the air- 
reed is also, he states, far higher than the 
pitch of the tones of the pipe. 

Herr Sonreck's account, although tho- 
roughly independent, agrees with Mr. Her- 
mann Smith*s so closely as regards the origin 
of the motion of air in the pipe that it seems 
unnecessary to cite it. He calls the blade of 
air merely the Anblasestrom, i.e., * blow-cur- 
rent * or * blast *. 

But so far as I have hitherto found, the 
first person who drew attention to the mode in 
which flue pipes were made to speak, was M. 
Aristide GavaiU^-GoU, the celebrated French 
oigan-builder, who in a paper presented to the 
French Academy of Sciences on February 24, 
1840 (which was never printed, owing appa- u 
rently to the death of M. Savart, one of the 
referees), ' demonstrated,' as he states in his 
paper printed in the Comptes Rendus for 1860 
(even then anterior to all the other writers), 
vol. 1. p. 176, * more clearly than had hitherto 
been done, the real function of the originator 
of the sound in the mouth of flue pipes, which 
originator he assimilated to a free aerial reed 
{anehe libre airienns) \ He also investigated 
the mode of blowing the flute, by the mouth 
or a mouthpiece. And lastly he treated of 
the analogy between *the transversal vibra- 
tions of vibrating laminse of air, and solid 
vibrating lamine,* which he supposed to be 
governed by the same laws, and from this 
examination he deduced * positive data for 
determining the height of mouths of flue pipes 
in relation to their intonation and the elastic IT 
force of air which excites them *. He informs 
me that he intends to publish this paper. 

In conclusion, it should be observed that 
this blade or flat current of air acts like a 
metal reed only so far as it oscillates back- 
wards and forwards, and not in other respects. 
It does not shut off and open out a stream of 
air alternately. It is moved inwards by the 
outward air, and outwards by the inclosed air, 
whereas the metal reed is moved only one way 
by the current of air, and the other way by 
its own elasticity. There is therefore simply 
an analogy and not a substantive similarity, 
so that the terms aero-plastic reed, air-reed, 
free aerial reed, suggesting a different opera- 
tion to what actually ensues, might be disused 
with advantage. The action seems really to 
be one of alternate rarefaction and condensa- 
tion. But there are numerous little points IT 
which require very careful study — the shape 
of the upper lip ; straight (as usual) or arched 
(as in Renatus Harris's flue pipes), the height 
of the opening of the mouth, the exact direc- 
tion of the blade of air in relation to that of the 
upper lip, the presence and shape of the ears, 
and the general arts of the * voicer ' whereby 
he makes a pipe * speak ' satisfactorily. All of 
these matters mfluence both pitch and quality 
of tone, and though they are daily practised, 
their theoty is as good as unknown. 

For observations on the action of reeds see 
App. XX. sect. N. No. 8.] 



396 EXPERIMENTS ON COMPOSITION OF VOWELS. app. viii. 



APPENDIX VIII. 

PRACTICAL DIBBOTIONB FOB PEBFOBBCINa THB BXPBBIMBNTB ON THE 

OOliPOBITION OF VOWELS. 

(See p. 122d,) 

To make the forks vibrate powerfully, it is necessary that the ratios of their pitch 
numbers should agree with the simple arithmetical ratios to the utmost nicety. 
After the forks have been tuned by the maker by ear and to the piano as accu- 
rately as is possible in this way, the necessary greater exactness is obtained by the 
electrical current itself. First the interrupting fork, fig. 33, p. 122c, is connected 
with the fork that gives the prime tone, and the movable clamp on the former is 

U arranged so as to make the unison perfect. This gives a maximum intensity to 
the prime tone, easily recognised by both eye and ear. The vibrations of this 
lowest fork are so powerful that the excursions of the extremities of the prongs 
under favourable circumstances amount to 2 or 3 millimetres (from '08 to '12 
inch). It should also be observed that if the unison has not been perfectly at- 
tained, a few beats of the fork are heard when the electric current is first brought 
to bear upon it, although these disappear when the apparatus is in full action. 
[This is accounted for in Appendix IX.] 

After perfect unison has been accomplished between the interrupting fork and 
that of the prim'e tone, the other forks are successively brought into electrical con- 
nection, with their resonance chambers wide open, and they are tuned until they 
reach a maximum intensity when excited by the current. The tuning is first per- 
formed with the file. The forks are sharpened, as is well known, by taking off 
some metal from their extremities, and flattened by reducing the thickness of the 
root of the prongs. Both must be done with the greatest possible uniformity to 
each prong. To discover whether the fork is too sharp or too flat, stick a little 

f piece of wax at the ends of its prongs (which flattens the fork) and observe whether 
the tone becomes louder or weaker. If louder, the fork was too sharp ; if weaker, 
it was too flat. Since alterations of temperature, and, perhaps, other causes exert 
a slight influence on the pitch of the forks, I have preferred to make the higher 
forks a little too sharp by filing, and to bring them into exact tune by attaching 
small quantities of wax to the extremities of the prongs. The quantity of wax is 
easily altered at pleasure, and by this means slight accidental variations of pitch 
can be readily corrected. 

It is not necessary to tune the resonance tubes so accurately ; if, when blown 
across, they give the same pitch as the forks, they are sufficiently well tuned. If 
they are too flat, some melted wax may be poured in to sharpen them. If they are 
too sharp, the opening must be reduced. 

It cost me some trouble to get rid of the noise of the spark at the point of in- 
terruption. At first I inserted a large condenser of tin foil such as is used in 
induction machines. But this merely reduced the spark to a certain size. No 
51 good effect followed from increasing the size of the condenser. The layers of the 
condenser are separated by thin varnished paper ; one is connected with the in- 
terrupting fork, and the other with the cup of quicksilver into which its end dips. 
After many vain attempts, I at last found that, by inserting a very long and thin 
wire between the two extremities of the conduction at the point of interruption, 
the noise of the spark was almost entirely destroyed, without injuring the action 
of the current on the forks. The wire thus inserted must have an amount of 
resistance far greater than that occasioned by the coils in all the electro-magnets 
taken together. When this is the case no sensible portion of the current will go 
through this wire. It is not till the conduction is broken and the thin wire forms 
the only connection for the extra current of the electro-magnets, that the current 
discharges itself through the wire. But to prevent the thin wire itself from 
generating any secondary current, it must not be coiled round a cylinder, but must 
be stretched up and down on a board in such a way that two adjacent pieces of the 
wire should be traversed by two currents, proceeding in opposite directions. For 
this purpose I screwed two hard india-rubber combs at l^e two ends of a board 



©WON OF VOWELS. 



r I ^.^_*g-g*-t;J^\^ '-^^itfyii^gire, Buoh as is used for Bpinning 



m 



VSVM^ (90 times) between the teeth of 
■^■■Bt feet) of this wire was brought 
^1^,10 such a way as not to produce 

i>anjK'»'5n'Saw^.(CB breaking the primary current a 
_ Jrj M p3£"M ™ fmi-^yjiia would have a direction in the 
_Kl$tiBiflRitWli^B^^ B9n wire, opposite to the secondary 
. ja^fKO^WteinHV^tlltfeould be entirely or partly pre- 

SAfl|'HtV«l]a of a Grove's battery. The 
80 j9)>»B) mJtiie another. The whole arrange- 
Ijr'nl I'SIS^Ki ^e figures 1 to 8 shew the 
M jl"1»J'M Ir^^* ^^*y^^ lines which lead to m, and otg 
-^i^Sil^^sPMi^f^^nn. the opening of the resonance 
^M k^^ wl^Qf WllS*! jgf 19'^ ^^ '° ii>°*<o° t^^e tuning-forks^ 



■^. 



i^C^|c<i^Q@3'C^Z|Std f its own electro-magnet. The 1i 
'<*^jp£^i^w^!§tat changed in order to make the 
'"'' *" ^ifB intelligible. The cells of the 

'"■tesistance-wire dd ; the condenser 

.^. -Seen only in section. 

!|i^^3|pl^£^|S[l3fip^3ill the electro- magnets in order, 
■'»*»'™^'™— ^^•■S.^igr^as sometimes more advantageous 
^<P^^*it should be separated into two 
~ f^tB, which are the most difficult to 
^a^i, and the five lower forks into the 
^^pxjugh the former than the latter. 
■JS^ie second pole of the battery e, 
^dsve so arranged that each vibration 
>Cl&3C^!u the upper prong dips into the 
lli^^'^^P'^S i^'ps '"to '*"« ""P i- When 
^V^*nn^2hrough the fork to h, and (hen 



400 PHASES OF WAVES CAUSED BY RESONANCE. app. vra. ix. 

through the eleotro-magnet f to k and e^. Between h and k it is generally neces- 
sary to insert a lateral hranoh h 1 k, having moderate resisting power, to weaken 
the current in the electro-magnet f sufficiently to prevent the fork b from making 
violent vibrations. The zigzag at 1 shews this branch. 

When the prongs of the fork move apart, the conduction will be broken at h, 
and after a short interval again completed at i, so that the current now passes 
from g through the lower prong of the fork to i, and thence by k to the battery at 
e^ But at the moment the conduction is broken either at h or at i, powerful 
secondary currents are formed by induction in the 8 electro-magnets of the tuning- 
forks, which would emit luminous and noisy sparks at the points of interruption, 
if the rush of electricity were not partly stored for the moment in the condenser c, 
and partly discharged through the very great resistance dd. 

This resistance dd, as is seen by the figure, forms a perpetual connection be- 
tween g and the battery, but it conducts so badly that no sensible part of the cur- 
U rent can pass through it, except at the moment when, on breaking the conduction, 
the great electro-motive force of the secondary currents is generated. 

The arrangement just described is preferable when the fork in front of the 
resonance chamber 1 is the Octave above the fork b. But if the fork opposite 1 
makes the same number of vibrations as the fork b, the wire i k must be removed, 
and both the other wires ending in i must be connected with h. 

To exclude particular forks from the circuit, short secondary connections of the 
coils of wire of their electro-magnets are introduced. The arrangement is shewn 
in fig. 32, p. 1215. The metal knobs h h are connected conductively with the 
clamping screw g in which the wire of the electro-magnet terminates. If the 
lever i is moved down, it presses with some friction on the nearer knob h, and 
forms so good a secondary conducting connection for the wire of the electro- 
magnets, that the greater part of the electric current passes by h h, and only 
an infinitesimally small part travels round by the much longer path of the electro- 
magnets. 

As regards the theory of the motion of the forks, it is immediately seen that 
^ the force of the current in the electro-magnets must be a function of the time. 
The length of the period is equal to the period of a vibration of the interrupting 
fork b. . Let the number of interruptions in a second be n. Then the strength of 
the current in the electro -magnets, and consequently the magnitude of the force 
exerted by the electro-magnets on the forks, will be of the form : 

Aq-^A^ . cos {2imt -I- Ci) + A^ . cos {4iimt + c^ 

+ A^ . cos {6imt -h c,) + &c. 

The general term of this series A^, cos {2irmnt + c^) is adapted for setting in 
motion a fork making mn vibrations in a second, but would have little effect on 
forks otherwise tuned. 



II APPENDIX IX. 

ON THE PHASES OF WAVES CAUSED BY RESONANCE. 

(See p. 1246.) 

Let a tuning-fork be brought near the opening of a resonance chamber, and sup- 
pose the ear of the listener to be at a great distance off in comparison with the 
dimensions of the opening. In the Journal fiir reine und angewandte Mathe- 
matik, vol. Ivii. pp. 1-72, in my paper on the * Theory of Aerial Vibrations in Tubes 
with Open Ends,' I have shewn that if a sonorous point exists at ^ in a space partly 
bounded by firm walls, and partly unbounded, the motion of sound at another 
point A^ in the same space, will be identical in intensity and phase with that 
which would have existed at £ if A had been the sonorous point. Let B be the 
position of the tuning-fork (or more properly of the end of one of its prongs), and 
A that of the ear. The motion of the air which begins when the tuning-fork is 
placed near the opening of the resonance chamber, is not easily determined, bat 



APP. IX. PHASES OF WAVES CAUSED BY RESONANCE. 401 

I have been able (in pp. 47 and 48 of the paper quoted above) to determine the 
motion when the tuning-fork is at a great distance. Let us suppose, then, that the 
fork is removed to the position of the ear A, and we shall then have to determine the 
motion of the sound at the point B near the opening. This motion is composed 
of two parts ; the first, having its potential denoted by ^ in the paper cited, corre- 
sponds with the motion which would also exist if the opening to the resonance 
chamber were closed, and in the above case is too small to be sensible ; the second, 
there marked % has, in open space and at some distance from the opening, the 
following value, using the notations explained in the above paper (p. 28, equation 
12h), 



*- - 2 — ' cos {kp - 27mt) (1) 

where Q is the sectional area of the resonance tube, p the distance from the middle 

2ir 

point of the opening, n the pitch number, — the length of the wave. The motion 1[ 

fC 

at an infinitesimal distance r from the sonorous point A is given by the equation 

^^^ oo«j 2^<-c ) ^2^ 

and if r, be the distance of the imaginary sonorous point A from the middle 
of the opening of the resonance tube, we find from equations (16c) and (13a) of the 
paper cited : 

,, . ^ k^ , Q.Bmkl. cos fca 

- tan («r, + c) = tan T2= x ^77- — r— (2a) 

^ ^ ' 2 2ir . cos k{l + a) ^ ' 

{I length of tube, and a a constant depending on the form of its opening), and 
finally by the same equations, the magnitude there called I is : 

^ „ 2k .sm kl ^^ k^ .mnkl _ 

I-X. z ±^Q» o_ ^:^ , ir 



2k 


. sin 


ki^ 


AQ. 


k\ 

2ir 


mnkl 
. sin Tj' 


1 


±jBr 


4ir 

• 


.sic 


• 





whence it follows that A==±n. — jt^^: — - (3) 

The sign + is to be so determined that the consonants A and H have the same 
sign, and in that case r2 must lie between and ir. 

In this case the strength of the resonance A is expressed in terms of the in- 
tensity of the sonorous point H, the section of the resonance tube Q, the distance 
Tj^ of the sonorous point from the opening of the tube, and the magnitude r^. The 
difference of phase between the points A and B is shewn by equations (1), (2), and 
(2a) to be 

7r-fcp + c=7r — fcp- At J - Tj. 

But the magnitude kp at all such distances of the point B from the middle of 
the opening as we can use, may be regarded as infinitesimally small, so that when 
we weaken the tone by withdrawing the fork further from the opening of the tube, IT 
we do not sensibly change the phase of the aerial vibration. But if we change 
the pitch of the tube, the expression for the phase will be altered only through a 
change in r^, which by equation (2a) depends on kl, and to this change there 
always corresponds a change in the strength of the resonance, since sin rj 
appears as a factor in the expression for that resonance in equation (3). The 
resonance is strongest when sin r2 ~ l* or r^ =» \v. Calling this maximum reson- 



ance ilp we have 



4^H 

^1 



kQr^' 

and for other pitches of the tube, supposing its sectional area Q to remain un- 
changed, 

A 
smr2 = J-. 

Whether r^ is to be taken smaller or greater than a right angle, depends upon 

D D 



402 PHASES OF WAVES CAUSED BY RESONANCE. apf. ix, 

whether the value of tan rj from equation (2a) is positive or negative. But 
since ky Q and oob ka are always positive, the value of tan r^ depends on the 

factor T7Y-: — v • The maximum resonance corresponds to cos k(l + a)^0: the 

cos k{1 + a) JT \ / 

minimum to siu kl^O. Hcncc r^ < ^ir whcu by lengthening the tube the reson- 
ance is brought towards its minimum ; but r^ > iir when the resonance is brought 
towards its maximum. In actual application the tube is always near its position 
of maximum resonance, and hence r^ < iv when the tube is too flat in pitch, and 
Tj > ^ir when the tube is too sharp in pitch. 

If we put the tube out of tune to such an extent that A^^i ' A^^ the phase of 
vibration alters by ^. Hence we are always able to estimate the amount of altera- 
tion of phase by the alteration of strength of resonance. 



A similar law holds for the phases of the vibrating forks as compared with 
IT those of the exciting current. To simplify the treatment, I will consider the case 
of a single vibrating heavy point, which is constantly restored to its position of 
rest by an elastic force. When the heavy point is moved to the distance x from 
its position of rest, let - a^ be the elastic force. Suppose moreover that there 
act, first a periodic force, similar to that generated by the electrical currents in our 
experiments, which may be represented by ^1 . sin nt, and secondly a force which 
damps the vibrations and is proportional to the velocity, so that we may write it 

*" ^ 'di' ^ ^OToe of the latter kind arises in our experiments partly from friction 

and resistance of the air, and also partly from the currents induced by the tuning- 
forks set in motion, and this latter part has most effect in damping the vibrations. 
If m is the mass of the heavy vibrating point, we have, therefore, 

w,^ - - a«ir - b^-j^+A.BinfU (4) 

f The complete integral of this equation is 

^^^^ *^'=+a^^r^^ (*»^) 

The term having the coefficient B in (4a) is sensible only at the beginning of 
the motion ; on account of the factor e~ it decreases with the increase of the 
time ty and ultimately vanishes. But its existence at the beginning of the motion 
occasions those transient beats mentioned in App. VIII., p. 3986, when n is slightly 
different from 

% The term with the coefficient A in equation (4a), on the other hand, corresponds 
to the sustained vibration of the heavy point. The vis viva t^ of this motion is 



(dx\^ 
-j:) , or to 



s, mA^ . sin^c 



'''~W- (6) 

When the pitch of the exciting tone, that is, n, can be altered, i^ will reach its 
maximum (which we will call i^), when 

sin* c = 1, or tan c = ± oo , 

J. mA^ 
giving -^^ 26*' 

Hence we may also write 

i^-^ F . sin2 € (6a) 



APP. IX. PHASES OF WAVES CAUSED BY RESONANCE. 403 

The same magnitude c therefore determines in equation (4a) the difference 
of the phases between the periodically changing displacements x of the heavy point 
and the changing values of the force, and, in equation (5a), the strength of the 
resonance. 

The condition tan c = + oo is by (4b) fulfilled when a^ = w n^. 

Hence if N be the value of n which answers to the maximum of the sym- 
pathetic vibration, we shall have 

^ = ^' (5b) 

This tone of strongest resorumce is the same as the tone which the heavy 
point would occasion, if it were set in vibration solely by the influence of the 
elastic force, without friction and without external excitement. Somewhat differ- 
ent from this is the pr<yper tone of the hody^ which it produces under the influence 
of friction and resistance of the air. The pitch of this proper tone v is given in If 
the second term of the equation (4a) 

V = 1 . 7 (a2w - ih% 
m 

Not until 2) = 0, that is, not until the friction and resistance of the air vanish, 

wUl v2 = - = 2^ 

m 

Now in all practical cases where we have to observe the phenomenon of 
sympathetic vibration, b is infinitesimal, so that the difference between the tone 
of greatest resonance and the proper tone of the vibrating body may be disregarded, 
as in the text. Introducing the magnitude N the equation (4b) becomes 

"^-miW^ (^) ^ 



On account of the question raised on p. 150b as to the behaviour of the basilar 
membrane of the ear for noises, we are interested further in the integral of an equa- 
tion in which A sin nt of equation (4) (p. 402&) is replaced by an arbitrary function of 
the time ^|. Of course, if this function vanishes for very great positive and negative 
values of the time, it could be transformed, by means of Fourier's integral, into a 
sum (integral) of terms such as A sin {nt + c), and then for each one of these 
terms, the solution just found might be applied, and finally the sum of all these 
solutions might be taken. But this form of solution becomes incomprehensible, 
because it exhibits a continuous series of tones each of which exists from ^ = - ao 
to i = + 00 . Hence we must proceed differently. 

The differential equation to be integrated is 

"*S+*^t+'»*-='^ (^) ^ 

in which x is the required, and iff the given function of the time, if/ being assumed 
to be finite for all values of t. 
Assume 

y + rri = ill i/r,.e«('-»).d« (6) 

where k represents one of the roots of the equation 

mic2 + b^K + a2 = (6a) 

that is 

^^^it-^) « 

which we will represent by 

#c = - a + )M 

dd2 



2m 



404 PHASES OF WAVES CAUSED BY RESONANCE. afp. ix. 

assuming the coeffioient of damping to be small enough for the root, which we 
represent by fi, to be possible. 

Hence, if ^ is a continuous function, 



d 
dt 



(y + ai) = i4#c r ^..e'^^^-'Kda + Aifft (6c) 

fgCy+^O^^*^' r ilfs.e'^'-'Kds -\- AKil^t^ A^ (6d) 

it J — CO ^•' 



dt^ 

Then multiplying (6) by a\ (6c) by b^, (6d) by w, and adding, and taking account 
of (6a), we obtain the following equation between the imaginary parts of the re- 
spective expressions, 



f 



d^x 



^ + 6^^ + a^a: = TnApiPt, 



dV^ dt 
Then assuming A = — 

equation (6) gives a value for x which satisfies the differential equation in «, and 
is finite for all values of the time, namely 

1 r< 

oj = -i-l ^, . 6 -«<<-*>. sin /3(i - s) . d«. 

pfn] -00 

That is, X is shewn to be a sum of superposed expiring oscillations, of which the 

initial time is s, and the initial amplitude -^, and every moment preceding the 

point of time t contributes to the result. But this contribution vanishes for those 
parts of the motion which were excited for a long time before the moment con- 
^ sidered, that is, for those for which the exponent a (^ - «) is a large number, and 
the motion therefore depends at every instant only on those forces ^ which have 
acted a short time previously. 

If the action of the force \fr takes place only during a limited time from t^ to 
^1, then X of the equation (6d) will not be a except up to the time t^, after 
which it will differ from nothing, and after t^ the motion will be that of simply 
expiring vibrations. Also the magnitude of x will depend upon how often large 
positive values of i/r occur at the same time as large positive values of sin pt^ and 
negative with negative. The value of x will be comparatively the greatest when 
^ and sin pt change their sign nearly at the same time. 

If \fft has had a constant value p from t ^ t^Xoi ^ t^^ then 



on putting 



x = jffe- *<«-«!) sin [p{t - ^) + e - i?] 

k cos 17= -a,&sini7=»)8 
' Hoosc -^[1 - a-(^i-Vco8i8(ti - g] 

-^ sin € - ^ « -'^-^o) • 8in^(*i - ^o)- 

If we suppose k to have the positive value of J {a? + ^\ yj will be an obtuse 
angle. If we give H the sign of the pressure ^, then the angle e, which lies 
between + \ir and - ^tt, will have the same sign as sin p{ti ~ t^. In this case the 
expression for x represents expiring vibrations, of which the initial amplitude 
(putting r = the length of the action ^ t^ - t^) has the value 

J5r = ^ V(l-2e--oo8)9r + e-2.r). 

This is a maximum for different values of , when cos (fir + 17) ■> cos 17 . a "'^ or, 
for small values of a and r, when fir approximately contains an uneven number 



APP. DC. X. SYMPATHETIC RESONANCE. 406 

of half periods of vibration of the proper tone ; and on the other hand jET is a 
minimum for an even number of such vibrations. 

After long continued action of the force p, however, the exponential functions 
vanish, and H receives the constant value 

E ~^-. 

On the other hand, for very small values of r the initial maxima for j8r °- v, may 
attain the value 

If the pressure p changes its sign whenever cos ^r does so^ the amplitude H after 
n such changes of sign will be 5] 

H = -^ (1 + e - •^) . (1 + 6 - «^ + e - 2«r + ... + e - ««T) 
fimk ' 

or 

Pmk 1 - e - *^ ^ ' 

This expression shews the reinforcement, increasing with every change of sign, 
which ensues upon the coincidence of the period of change of pressure with the 
period of the proper tone. The denominator (1 -e'") gives the amount of damp- 
ing during half the periodic time of vibration. Finally, when this is very small 
H will be very large, and at last, after an infinite number of repetitions, 

1 _ g -ar 11 



APPENDIX X. 

BBLATION BETWEEN THE 8TBENOTH OF BTMPATHBTIO BE80NAN0B AND THE 
LENGTH OF TIBiB BEQUIBBD FOB THE TONS TO DIB AWAT. 

(See pp. 113a and 142^2.) 

Ebtain the notation of App. IX., for the motion of a heavy point, reduced to 
its position of rest by an elastic force. When such a point is agitated by an ex- 
ternal periodic force, its motion is given by equation (4a), p. 402c. If we assume 
Ay the intensity of this force, to vanish, equation (4a) reduces to ^ 

m 
X ^ B ,e ' 2m . sin (vi -I- c) 

where v = • V (fl*w* - i fr*)» 

On account of the factor which contains t in the exponent, the value of x 
continually diminishes. As in the text, measure t by the number of vibrations of 
the tone of strongest resonance, and for this purpose put 

r= ^ t 

■62 /N 



^'m"{K -%)■'-- («) 



406 VIBRATION OF THE BASILAR MEMBBAKE. ait. x. xi. 

Let L be the vis viva of the vibrations at the time ^ = 0, and I at the time 

t =^ t, then 

80 that ^ = e-^^ 

and r-^.lognat^ (6a) 

In the table on p. 143a, it is assumed that 2/ » 10 Z, and the value of T is cal- 
culated on this assumption, as follows, after finding the value of p. In equation 
(6) sin^ c is put = y\^, corresponding with the condition that the strength of the 
IT tone of the sympathetically resonant body should be ^ of the maximum strength 
it can attain ; and the ratio N :n \q calculated from the numerical ratios corre- 
sponding to the intervals mentioned in the first column of that table. 

Equation (4b) in App. IX., p. 402c, may be written 



tan c = 



62 _ /3 



mN . /N 



' /N _ n\ /N n\ 

U n) ""'Kn^W 



In this equation N, giving the pitch of strongest resonance ; b\ the strength 

of the friction ; and m, the mass may be different for various fibres of Gorti. 

Hence in applications to the ear, we must consider h^ and m to be functions of N. 

Now since ihe degree of roughness of the closer dissonant intervals remains tolerably 

constant for constant intervals throughout the scale, the magnitude represented 

N , 
by tan c must assume approximatively the same values for equal values of ■—* and 

hence the magnitude — ^ ■■ — must be tolerably independent of the values of N, 

No very exact result can be obtained. Hence in the calculations which will 
follow hereafter fi is assumed to be independent of N, 



APPENDIX XL 

VIBRATION OF THE MEMBBANA BASILARI6 IN THE COCHLEA. 

(See p. 1466.) 

^ The mechanical problem here attempted is to examine whether a connected mem- 
brane with properties similar to those of the membrana basilaris in the cochl^ 
could vibrate as Herr Hensen has supposed this particular membrane to do ; that 
is, in such a way that every bundle of nerves in ttie membrane could vibrate sym- 
pathetically with a tone corresponding to its length and tension, without being 
sensibly set in motion by the adjacent fibres. For this investigation we may dis- 
regard the spiral expansion of the basilar membrane, and assume it to be stretched 
between the legs of an angle, of the magnitude 2i;. Let the axis of x bisect this 
angle, and the axis of y be drawn at right angles to it through the vertex of the 
angle. Let the tension of the membrane parallel to the axis of x be»P, and 
that parallel to the axis of ^ be = Q, both measured by the forces which when 
exerted on the sides of a unit square, parallel to x and y respectively, would balance 
the tension of the membrane. Let fi be the mass of this unit square, t the time, 
and z the displacement of a point in the membrane from its position of equilibrium. 
Moreover let Z be an external force, acting on the membrane in the direction of 
positive 2, and setting it in vibration. The equation of the motion of the mem- 



AFP. XI. VIBRATION OF THE BASILAR MEMBRANE. 407 

brane, deduced without material difficulty from Hamilton's principle by Kirchhoffs 
process, is then 

The limiting conditions are 

1) that ^ = along the legs of the angle, that is, 2f-0, when y- ±x. tan 17. 

2) that «« 0, when a;= y « 0, that is, at the vertex of the angle, and finaUy 

3) that z is finite, when x is infinite. 

The further development of the problem will shew how these two last limiting 
equations, which suffice for our purpose, may be replaced by certam determmate 
curves acting as fixed boundaries between the legs of the angle (p. 411c, d). 

By putting x^i . ^ P and y = v . ^/ the equation (1) may be reduced to theU 
better Imown form 

Z + ^ + ^ = M . ^ (la) 

* 

which is the equation of motion for a membrane stretched uniformly in all direc- 
tions, ( and V being the rectangular co-ordinates on its surface. 
For this notation the limiting conditions become 

p 

1) « = for V = ± f . V Q . taniy, 

2) = for £ = V = 0, 

3) z finite, for f = oo . 

The transformed problem consequently differs from the original merely in 
having a uniformly stretched membrane, and a different amount of angle, which 
we will represent by 2c. ^ 

Since in the applications which we have to make of the result, P will be very 
small in comparison with ©, the angle c for the transformed membrane will also 
be very small, and upon this circumstance mainly depend the analytical difficulties 

of the problem. 

After these preliminary remarks, we proceed to the analytical treatment of the 
equations (1) and (la) by introducing polar co-ordinates, assuming 



x^(. JP^r. VP.cps<o| ^^^^ 



0) 



y = v. ^0-r. 70. sin 
The equations (1) and (la) then take the form 

d^z 1 dz ^1 d^z d^z „ (.. 

df^'-T'dr^i^^'d^'^^'dr^'' ^ (^'^ 

The limiting conditions are now, that H 

p 

1) 2f = 0, when w -= ± c, and hence tan c « ^ -^ . tan rj, 

2) 2; = for r = 0, 

3) z is finite, when r is infinite. 

As regards the nature of the force Z, we shall assume that it consists of two 

dss 
parts ; the first depending on the friction, which we may put = - v . ^- where Z 

is a positive real constant ; the second^ depending on a periodically variable pres- 
sure exerted by the surrounding medium on the membrane, uniformly over its 
whole surface. Consequently we put 

^ = - V . _- + J , cos w^ 
at 



408 VIBRATION OF THE BASILAR MEMBRANE. apf. xi. 

and obtain as the equation of motion 

d^z 1 dz ^1 dH dH ^ dz . ^ , ,ox 

dr^ r dr 7^ d^^ '^ dt^ dt ^ ' 

Of the various motions which the membrane could execute under these circum- 
stances, we are interested solely in those which are maintained by the continuous 
periodical action of the force, and which must themselves have the same period. 
Let us consequently assume 

2? = i . e*"*, where i « V( - 1) (2a) 

and determine (; by the equation 

' ^'*i-g*^-g*<^' --)•«--" w 

In this case the real part of the value of z will satisfy equation (2) and corre- 
spond to a uniformly sustained oscillation of the membrane. 

Having thus eliminated the variable t from the differential equation, we proceed 
to do the same for co by means of the first limiting equation, after transforming 
both { and the constant A into a series of cosines of uneven multiples of the 

angle — .»Ao>. It is well known that between the limits fc«« + Jir and - ^ir 

4-4 / 1 1 \ 
il = — . (cos fed) - -.cos3/(o> + - . cos 5^ + ... ) (3) 

IT \ 3 o / 

If in the same way we put 

f i^ =» «1 . OOS ^ - - . Sj . cos 3^0) + ^ . Ss • °^8 S^ + (^*) 

o o 

then for each coefficient s^ we must have 

And since the first of our limiting conditions is satisfied by the equation (3a), 
whenever the series converges, there remain only the conditions that 

1) «« = for r « 0, 

2) 8^ finite, for r « ao . 

It is easily seen that every Sm is perfectly determined by these conditions. For 
if there were two different functions which satisfied the equation (3b) and the two 
limiting conditions, then their difference, which we will call 8, would satisfy the 
conditions 

^ d^S 1 dS / ^ . m%\ Si n /q«\ 

and hence be a BessePs function, and at the same time we should have 

1) 8 = 0forr = 0, 

2) 8 finite, for r = cx) . 

But these two conditions cannot be satisfied at the same time by a Bessel's func- 
tion, when V has a value differing ever so little from 0. It is only when v = 0, 
that is, when there is no friction, that the determination is insufficient. In that 
case oscillations once induced may continue for ever, even when there is no force 
to give fresh impulses. 

Particular integrals of the equation (3b) may be easily developed in the form 
of series, resembling the series for the related Bessel's functions which satisfy 
equation (3c). One of these series proceeds according to integral powers of r and 
is always convergent. But when the angle € is very small, the number of terms 



APP. XI. VIBRATION OF THE BASILAR MEMBRANE. 409 

in this series which are necessary to determine s is very large, and hence the series 
cannot he used for determining the progress of the function. — A second series 
which proceeds according to negative powers of r and gives a second particular 
integral is semi-convergent, and will not become an algebraical function, unless h 
is an uneven number. But in the latter case the first mentioned series will be 
infinite in its separate terms. 

It is therefore preferable for our present purpose to obtain the expression for 
8 in the form of definite integrals. 

Let ^ and if/ denote the following pair of integrals : — 

^ « I e . sm mht . at i 

* = J^-"*-V.e-*-^-(»+i).d«J ^'^ 

vvhere k= J{fin^ - inv) (4a) f 

and the sign of the root is so chosen that the possible part of i k is positive. 
Then 

a„ « — ^. (mh. \b + mh, d>. cos^m^ir - 1 (4b) 

which is the required expression for s^. 

To shew that the expression in (4b) really satisfies the equation (3b), substitute 
this value for s^ in that equation, and in differentiating under the integral signs of 

^ and ^, use partial integration to eliminate the factors cos t and (u- - j which 

appear under the integral signs. 
For r — we find 

Jivr^^^ "* mh 

and hence s^^mQ, 

For r = QO , we have ^ = ^ >- 0, and hence 






Hence the function s„ also satisfies the two limiting conditions, which have 
been already shewn to be sufficient to determine it. 

The equation (4b) may be used to determine the value of s^ when P, the ten- 
sion of the membrane in the direction x, is infinitesimal. In this case, as (lb) 
shews, r must be the infinite ; as also h, of which the value is 

2.VP.tanV 
Hence putting 

r == hp 
p will be the finite, namely 

_ 2a;. tan 17 



P = 



TT 



770" 



It is easily seen that under these circumstances mhff> will « 0. For we may 
write 

mhi, = p «A.e - ^'^•log" - (^ - ^)- 1^- (« + ^) . ^ (5) 

Jl ^ 

where I have put 

iK = I - W, 



410 VIBEATION OF THE BASILAR MEMBRANE. apf. xi. 

and I aooording to the above supposition will be positiva Sinoe within the whole 
extent of the integration t^ > 1 and hence log u> 0, the possible part of the ex- 
ponent will be negative throughout the same extent, and will contain the infinite 
factor h. Consequently every part of the integral vanishes, and hence also the 
whole value h ^. 

On the other hand the integral ^ or 

f *' •- {I '\X),hp.mnt 
^ j^e .Anmht.dt 

will have the possible part of the exponent negative and infinite for all those parts 
of the integral for which t is not infinitesimal, so that these will allsO. Bat 
this is not the case for those, parts of the integral for which t vanishes. 

Hence for an infinite h we may replace the above equations for ^ by the 
^ following : 

•• - (i _ ix) . hpt 

e . sin mht . dt 



Jo 



In this last form the integration may be effected and gives 



m 



^ fc . [(Z - iX)> . p« + w«] 
and 

or, by (4a), 



} («») 



*lil ~" 



iAp 



% 



,} <*> 



Or if, in order to get rid of the auxiliary magnitude p, we represent by ^fi the 
f value of y on the limits of membrane, we have 

and hence p = — ^tt\* 

SO that [using S^ for the modulus of 8^]^* 

4il 



S.= 



-• ^^[(^ - ^n^y^ nV] («) 



This value is quite independent of the magnitude of the angle through which 
the membrane is stretched. In place of the distance p or x from the vertex, we 
have only P the breadth of the membrane at the point in question. Hence this 
expression will still hold when the angle is -= 0, and the membrane vibrates like a 
string between two parallel lines, thus forming m vibrating segments which are 
U separated by lines of nodes parallel to the edges. 

The same expression also results for a string, if jsr is regarded from the first in 
equation (1) as only a function of ^ in a line, and supposed to be independent of 
X, but the limiting condition is retained that when y^±Py then z^O. Hence 
the motion of the membrane is the same as that of a series of juxtaposed but 
unconnected strings. 



The value of -. S^ in (5d) gives us the amplitude of the corresponding form 

of vibration having the pitch number ^^ ^nd having m vibrating transverse divi- 
sions of the membrane. The maximum of S will occur when 

m^^O -)32,xn2 = (6) 

* [In the 8rd Gennan edition Sm is used Sm is henceforth used for 5«« ; consequently 
without the explanation here inserted ; in the the reading of the Srd edition has been re- 
4th German edition by an error of the press tained. — Tr<milator,'\ 



APP. XI. xn. THEORY OF COMBINATIONAL TONES. 411 

The value of this maximum, which we call Sm is 

^ 4i4 

-*» ■■ — r-' 

-TTtlV 

The smaller the coefficient of friction v, the larger will be this maximum at the 
point in question. 

If we call b the value of fi which satisfies the equation (6), wb may write the 
equation (5d) thus 



-»« = 



Vf^^-(^-^)1 



When V is infinitesimal, and the condition of the maximum is not fulfilled in 
equation (6), the denominator of this expression becomes infinite, and hence Sm, 

infinitesimal. The amplitude of the vibrations — . 8^, will become finite forf 

those values of fi only which are so nearly » b, that b - )9 is of the same order 
as V. Under these circumstances, therefore, each simple tone sets in vibration 
only some narrow strips of the membrane in the direction of x, of which the first 

Q 

has one, the second three, the third four, &c., vibrating segments, and in which -> 

that is the length of the vibrating segments, has always the same value. 

The greater the coefficient of friction v, the greater in general wiU be the 
extent of the vibrations of every tone over the membrane. 

The present mathematical analysis shews that every superinduced tone must 
also excite all those transverse fibres of the membrane on which it can exist as a 
proper tone with the formation of nodes. Hence it would follow, that if the 
membrane of the labyrinth were of completely uniform structure, as the membrane 
here assumed, every excitement of a bundle of transverse fibres by the respective 
fundamental tone must be accompanied by weaker excitements of the unevenly ^ 
numbered harmonic undertones, the intensity of which would, however, be mul- 

tiplied by the factors ^, x^, and generally — ^. Although this hypothesis has been 

advanced by Dr. Hugo Biemann in his Musikalische Logik, there is nothing of the 
kind observable in the ear. I think, however, that this cannot necessarily be urged 
as an objection against the present theory, because the appendages of the basilar 
membrane probably greatly impede the formation of tones with nodes. 



The solution can also be extended without difficulty to the case where the 
membrane in the field of ^, v is bounded by two circular arcs, with their centre at 
the vertex of the angle. To this case correspond as boundaries in the real case, 
that is, in the field of x, y^ two elliptic limiting arcs, which when P vanishes be- 
come straight lines. It is only necessary to add to the value of <„ i^ (^b), a com- 
plete integral of the equation (3c), which can be expressed by Bessel's functions 
with two arbitrary constants, and to determine these constants in such a manner f 
as to make ^^ = on the limiting curves selected. When v is small this change 
in the limits has no essential effect on the motion of the membrane, except when 
the maximum of vibration itself falls in the neighbourhood of the limiting curves. 



APPENDIX XII. 

THEORY OF COMBINATIONAL TONES. 

(See pp. 162, note f, and 158, note*.) 



It is well known that the principle of the undisturbed superposition of oscillatory 
motions, holds only on the supposition that the motions are small, — so small, 
indeed, that the moving forces excited by the mutual displacements of the par- 
ticles of the oscillating medium should be sensibly proportional to these displace- 



412 THEORY OF COMBINATIONAL TONES. apf. xn. 

ments. Now it may be shewn that combinational tones must arise whenever the 
vibrations are so large that the square of the displacements has a sensible in- 
fluence on the motions. It will suSffice for the present to select, as the simplest 
example, the motion of a single heavy point under the inflnenoe of a system of 
waves, and develop the corresponding result. The motions of the air and other 
elastic media may be treated in a perfectly similar manner. 

Suppose thatL a heavy point having the mass m is able to oscillate in the 
direction of the axis of x. And let the force which restores it to its position of 
equilibrium be 

k ^ ax + bx*. 

Suppose two systems of sonorous waves to act upon it, with the respective 
forces 

/ • sin ptf and g . sin {qt + c) 

^ then its equation of motion is 

cPx 
- m . -— ^ ax + ba^ -hf . Binpt + g . sm (qt + c), 

at 
This equation may be integrated by a series, putting 

X = €Xi + c*a?2 + «*3?3 + ... 

and then equating the terms multiplied by like powers of c, separately to zero. 
This gives 

J2/W 

1) axi + m. -^ - - /i . sin j>f - y, . sin {qt + c), 
' 2) a«, + m . ^ - - tei«, 

3) ax^ + m . -^ » - 2bx^x^^ and so on. 

From the first equation we obtain 

x^^ A .%m(t . 7 ^ + 6\ + tt . sin j>t + t? . sin (g^ + c) 

where u = — ^ — and t? = — p^ — . 

mp^ - a mq^ - a 

This is the well-known result for infinitesimal vibrations, shewing that the 

body which vibrates sympathetically produces only its proper tone J — , together 

m 

Hwith those communicated to it, p and q. Since the proper tone in this case 

rapidly disappears, we may put il « 0. And then equation (2) gives 

- -— ^^^ COS 2p t - ^rrj-^^ COS %qt + c) 

2(4?»p2 - a ^ 2(4mg« - a 

m{p-qf-a ^^ ^' m(p + qy-a 

The second term of the series for x [involving iCa]* contains, then, a constant, 
and also the tones 2», 2q, {p - q), and (p+q). If the proper tone J - oi ^e 

body which vibrates sympathetically is deeper than (jp- g), as mfty be certainly 
assumed in most cases for the drumskin of the ear in connection with the auditory 



APP. XII. xm. MECHANISM OF THE POLYPHONIC SIREN. 413 

ossicles, and if the intensities u and v are nearly the same, the tone (p-q) will 
have the greatest intensity of all the tones in the terms of x^ ; it corresponds with 
the well-known deep combinational tone. The tone (p-^q) will be much weaker, 
and the tones 2p and 2q will be heard with difficulty as weak harmonic upper 
partial tones of the generating tones. 

The third term x^ [of the series for x] contains the tones 3p, dg, 2p + g, 2p- q, 
p + 2q, p" 2g, p and q. Of these 2jp - g or 2g -^ is a combinational tone of the 
second order according to Hallstroem's nomenclature (p. Ibid). Similarly the 
fourth term x^ [of the series for x] gives combinational tones of the third order ; 
and so on. 

If, then, we assume that in the vibrations of the tympanic membrane and its 
appendages, the square of the displacements has an effect on the vibrations, the 
preceding mechanical developments give a complete explanation of the origin of 
combinational tones. Thus the present new theory explains the origin of the 
tones {p + q), as well as of the tones (p - q), and shews us, why when the intensities 
u and V of i^e generating tones increase, Uie intensity of the combinational tones, IT 
which IB proportional to u i;, increases in a more rapid ratio. 

The previous assumption respecting the magnitude of the force called into 
action, namely 

k^ax + bx^ 

implies that when x changes its sign, k changes not merely its sign, but also its 
absolute value. Hence this assumption can bold only for an elastic body which is 
unsymmetrically related to positive and negative displacements. It is only in such 
that the square of the displacement can affect the motion, and combinational 
tones of the first order arise. Now among the vibrating parts of the human ear, 
the drumskin is especially distinguished by its want of symmetry, because it is 
forcibly bent inwards to a considerable extent by the handle of the hammer, and I 
venture therefore to conjecture that this peculiar form of the tympanic membrane 
conditions the generation of combinational tones. 

[See especially App. XX. sect. L. art. 5.] ^ 



APPENDIX XIII. 



DBSCBIPTIOM OF THB MBCHANIBM BMPLOTBD FOB OPBNINQ THE BBVBBAL SBRIBS 

OF HOLB8 IN THB POLYPHONIC 8IBEN. 

(See p. 162, note ♦. ) 

FiQ. 65 (p. 414a, b) shews the vertical section of the upper box of the double siren, in 
order to display its internal construction. E is the wind pipe which is prolonged 
into the interior of the box, and firmly fixed in the cross beam AA of the sup- 
port of the apparatus. The prolongation of the wind pipe into the box B has 
conical surfaces at its upper and lower ends, on which sUde corresponding hollow ^ 
surfaces in the bottom and top surfaces of the box, so that this box can revolve 
freely about the wind pipe as an axis. At a may be seen a section of the toothed 
wheel fastened to the cover of the box. At ^ is the driving wheel which is turned 
by the handle y ; and 8 is a pointer which is directed to the graduation on the 
edge of the disc cc. 

D is the upper extremity of the axis of the movable discs, of which only the 
upper one GO is here shewn. The axis turns on fine points in conical cups. The 
upper cup is introduced into the lower end of the screw 17, which can be more or 
less tightened by the milled screw head introduced above, so that any required 
degree of ease and steadiness in the motion of the axis may be attained. 

Inside the box are seen the sections of four pierced rings icA, X/i^ /lif, and vo, 
which fit on to one another with oblique, tile-shaped edges, and thus mutually hold 
each other steady. Each of these rings lies beneath a series of holes in the cover, 
and contains precisely the same number of holes as the corresponding series of the 
cover and of the rotating disc. By means of studs, shewn at i i in fig. 56 (p. 162), 



.@. ISlVjl .!?i«i|lf^i'fi1itcH IN BEATS. 

' iMiiiiiii'" 



^i^so ae either to make the holes of the 
id thus give free passage to the air and 
bo close the holes of the cover by the 



il 



-assjaa^&J5a!iflft,yS^;^.-f^^,^.j3^-j^^ and thus cut off their corresponding 
ra: -»,- -S- ;g; -^; •^- ;^; ;^: 

'"^C^d^ftU^S^ various tones of this sireo in snccession 
"" "" ~ "Irate or combined tones at pleasure. 




^^J^X XIV. 



-St..*. ^ 

^^^^^'Mi*B^^^^'^°i^^^'sF'^ TONES THAT BRAT TOOETHRR. 







S^nd note *.) 
'^^a^K'ibrates under the influence of two tones, 
sin (nt + e) 



3; 
|t|&^y|^4^[^<^Pl^4||'^i^J > B. We may then put 

f'"*"*"|-2^ii^i:!fc -n)l- c], and 
^^^^J^^ifc^^^tilJ;^"' - B»»[("> - »)(-»]. 00s ml. 

. ':£■%' 'tt'-ui^'oHiUsA^ I - 0] - c . cos <, 

(ml - .), 

t, which will alter slowly, if, as we have 



p:{i^^iia%:^C£|.i9|<leteimiiied b; 




^ 



'i^i ifei$§ [(«.-»).-.]-+ 1, 



APP. XIV. XV. INTENSITY OF BEATS OF DIFFERENT INTERVALS. 415 

and a minimum, 

C« = (il - B)\ when cos [(m - n) t - c] « - 1. 
The variable phase c of the motion is determined by 

tanc- -B»sin[(m -n)^-c] 

A + B . cos {{m - fi)t - c] 

As A>'B, this tangent never becomes infinite, and hence c remains included 
between the limits + iir and - -^^ to which it alternately approaches. As long 
as c increases, mt - € increases more slowly than int ; as long as c diminishes, 
mt - € increases faster than mt ; hence in the first case the tone flattens and in 
the second it sharpens. 

The pitch number of the variable tone, multiplied by 2 ir, is under these cir- 
cumstances equal to f 



d€ _ mA^ + {m + n) . AB . cos [(m - n)t - c] + n 



J52 



^ dt A^ + 2.AB. cos [(m - «) < - c]. + B^ 

The limits for the pitch number therefore correspond 

to cos [(m - n)t - c] becoming + 1 or - 1, 

and hence also to a maximum or minimum strength of tone. 

1) When the strength of tone is a maximum, the pitch number varies as 

mA + nB (m - n) B ^ (m - n) A 

A + B A + B A + B 

2) When the strength of tone is a minimum, the pitch number varies as 

mA - nB ^ . (w - n) JB ^ , (w» - n) -4 
-T^TB '•'^+ A-B '"''- A-S • 

Hence in the first case [or during the maximum strength] , the pitch of the 
variable tone lies between the pitches of the two separate tones. But during the 
minimum strength, if the stronger tone is also the sharper, the pitch of the 
variable tone is sharper than that of either of the single tones ; and if the stronger 
tone is the flatter, the pitch of the variable tone is flatter than that of either of 
the single tones. 

These differences are well heard with two stopped pipes ; and also with two 
tuning-forks, when first the higher and then the lower is placed nearer to the 
resonance chamber. 

[See Mr. Sedley Taylor's paper on this subject. Philosophical Magazine, July 
1872, pp. 56-64, where he gives several figures illustrating the variability of the 
pitch, and deduces the above results (1) and (2) from the figures only.] 



U 



APPENDIX XV. 



CALGUIiATION OF THB INTBKSITT OF THB BEATS OF DIFFEBBNT INTBBVALS. 

(See pp. 187a and note* and 193, note*.) 

Wb shall again employ the formulss for the strength of the sympathetic vibration 
developed in Appendix IX., equations (4a) and (4b), p. 402c, and (5) and (5a), 
p. 402d. For the tone of strongest resonance in one of Gorti's elementary organs, 
let n be its number of vibrations in 2?r seconds, n^ and n^ the corresponding num- 
bers of vibrations in 2ir seconds for two tones heard, and R, B" the greatest 
velocities of the vibrations which they superinduce in those Gorti's organs which 
have the same pitch, and B^ B^, the greatest velocities which both attain in their 



416 INTENSITY OF BEATS OF DIFFERENT INTERVALS. app. xv. 

representation of the number of vibrations n. Then by equation (5a) of Appen- 
dix IX., p. 402(2, we have 



where 





^1= 


JS'sincj, 


and B^ 


= S" 


.wa< 


h 


IT , 


. tancj 


n- n^ 
nj n 


, and TT . 


tancj 


n 


n 



and )3 is a magnitude which may be regarded as independent of n. Hence the 
intensity of the vibrations of the organ for the number of vibrations n, when both 
tones n^ and n^ afifeot it simultaneously, fluctuates between the values 

{B^ + J3j)8 and {B^ - B^f. 

The difference of these two magnitudes, which measures the strength of the 
II beats, is 

4SiBj = 4 5' 5". sin ci. sine, (7) 

Hence for equal differences in the amount of pitch, the strength of the beats is 
dependent on the product B B\ For the mth partial tone of the compound tone 

of a violin, we m^y, by Appendix VI., p. 597c, put S'* = — -, and hence if the m^h, 

and mgth partial tone of two compound tones of a violin, beat, we may put the 
intensity of their beats for equal differences of interval =» 

This is the expression from which the numbers in the last column of the table 
on p. 1876 have been calculated. [They are therefore 100 times the reciprocals of 
the products of the two numbers which give the ratio of the pitch numbers in the 
corresponding line of its third column.] 

For the calculation of the degree of roughness of the various intervals, men- 
tioned in pp. 193, 332, and 333, the following abbreviations of notation are intro- 
ITduced: 

Wi ^N{1 + 8). 

nj «J^(l-8). 

n ^N(l+ v). 

So that 

IT . tan C| = := ^— ^ X and ir . tan t^ «= := ^-- = 

^ + '^ » 1 + ^ 1 + y _ 1-8 

1+8 1+v 1-8 1+v 

Since powerful sympathetic resonance ensues only when v and 8 are very small, 
we may assume that, approximatively, 



tanc,.^, / ,„andtanc,^,-/ 



2ir (v - 8)' ' 2^ (v + 8)' 

^ Putting these values for c^ and €^ in equation (7) we have 

4.B,B,^^EB'\ ^^ ^ ^^^ ^^ _ g^,^ _y[^ ^ 4^ (^ ^ 8),j (7a) 

If then we consider v, that is, the pitch of the Gorti's organ which vibrates 
sympathetically, to be variable, 4 Bj^ B^ will reach its maximum when v ~ 0, and 
hence n » ^ = i (n^ + n,), and if we call the value of this maximum a we have 

s = 4:RB". ^ (7b) 

In calculating the degree of roughness arising from sounding two tones together 
which differ from each other by the interval 28, 1 have thought it sufficient to 
consider this maximum value, which exists in those Gorti's organs which are most 
favourably situated. Undoubtedly other beats of a weaker kmd will be excited in 



APP. XV. 



INTENSITY OF BEATS OF DIFFERENT INTERVALS. 



417 



the neighbouring fibres, but their intensity rapidly diminishes. It might therefore 
appear to be a more exact process to integrate the value of 4 jB^ ^, in equation 
(7a) with respect to v, in order to obtain the sum of the beats in all Corti's organs. 
This would require an at least approximate knowledge of the density of Corti's 
organs for different values of v, that is for different parts of the soale^ and of that . 
we know nothing. In sensation, the highest degree of roughness is certainly more 
important than the distribution of a less degree of roughness over many sensitive 
organs. Hence I have preferred to take only the maximum of the vibrations from 
(7b) into account. 

Finally we have to consider that very slow beats cause no roughness, and that 
when the intensity of the beats remains unaltered, and their number increases, 
the roughness reaches a maximum and then decreases. To express this, the value 
of s must be also multiplied by a factor, which vanishes when the number of beats 
is small, attains a maximum for about 30 beats in a second, and then diminishes, 
and again vanishes when the number of such beats is infinite. Suppose then that 
the roughness r^ due to the pih. partial tone, is expressed by ^ 



4^. 82. 1^2 



'^p- (^ + ^ .82)2 



8 



p' 



The factor of 8,, reaches its maximum value » 1, when j78 » ^ ; and becomes 
» 0, when 8, that is, half the interval between the two tones in the scale, is = 
or CD. Since 8 may be indifferently positive or negative, the expression can only 
involve even powers of 8. The above is the simplest expression which satisfies 
the conditions, but it is of course to a certain extent arbitrary. 

For $ we must put half the extent of the interval which at the pitch of the 
lower beating tone causes 30 beats to be made in a second. 

Since we have taken c* with 264 vibrations in a second, as the lower tone, 

16 
has been put = s^i . Hence we have finally 



264* 



r„ - 16 B' B" . 



p^OH^p 



2 



082 ^ 4„2§2) ^^2 ^ p2S2y 



IT 



And from this formula I have calculated the roughness of the intervals, shewn 
graphically in the diagrams, fig. 60, A and B, p. 1936, c, and fig. 61, p. 333a. 
The roughnesses due to the separate partial tones have been drawn separately 
and superimposed on one another in the drawing. 

Although the theory leaves much to be desired in the matter of exactness, it at 
least serves to shew that the theoretical view we have proposed is really capable 
of explaining such a distribution of dissonances and consonances as actually occurs 

in nature. 

Professor Alfred M. Mayer, of Hoboken, New Jersey,* has instituted experi- 
ments on the diuration of sensations of sound, and the number of audible beats. 
Between a vibrating tuning-fork and its resonator he interposed a revolving disc 
with openings of the same shape as that of the resonator, so that the sound was 
heard loudly when an opening in the disc came in front of that in the resonator, 
and faintly when the latter was covered. His results agree essentially with the 
assumptions I have made on pp. 143 to 145, and 183 to 185, but are more com- f 
plete as they have been pursued throughout the whole scale. His conclusions are 
as follows : — 



* SilUmarCs Journal, ser. iii. vol. viii. 
October 1874, Philosophical Maaaxyne^ May 
1876, vol. ii. [From the following table, p. 
418a, it is seen that the interval of a minor 
Third as the limit of continuity applies only 
to the Octave c to c'. For g"'\ supposing the 
law connecting D and N, given on p. 418d, to 
hold for such a high pitch, the interval of con- 
tinuity would have the ratio 8072 : 8072 + 226, 
or 122 cents, and the interval of maximum 
dissonance would be 49 cents, so that the 
interval of one Semitone is near the limit of 
continuity ; hence it is not surprising that no 
beats were heard in the case referred to on 
p. 173c, note *. But for cf'" the interval of con- 



tinuity would have the ratio 2048 : 2249, giving 
162 cents, and the interval of maximum disso- 
nance would be 67 cents, and hence the beats 
of h'" c"" should be quite conspicuous, agree- 
ing with observations. In reference to p. 144d, 
Prof. Mayer observes that the law aoruptly 
breaks down for vibrations below 40 in a 
second, and thinks that this abrupt breaking 
down *• can only be explained by the highly 
probable supposition that co-vibrating bodies 
in the ear, tuned to vibrations below 40 per 
second, do not exist, and therefore . . • the 
inner ear . . . can only vibrate en maua,' and 
also that such oscillations cannot last ^ sec. 
— TranslatoTJ] 

B B 



418 



BEATS OF COIMBINATIONAL TONES. 



AFP. XV. XVI. 



Note 


Pitoh number 


Number of the 

beats for which 

the Interruptions 

vanish 


[Cents in the 

corresponding 

interval • 


Number of beats 

for the greatest 

dissonance 


[Gents in the 
oarreaponding 
interval f i 


C 

c 
d 

B" 

g" 


64 
128 
256 
884 
512 
640 
768 
1024 


16 
26 
47 
60 
78 
90 
109 
185 


386 
308 
292 
251 
245 
228 
280 
214] 


6-4 
10-4 
18-8 
24-0 
31-2 
36'0 
43-6 ! 

540 

1 


165 

185 

128 

105 

102 

95 

95 

89] 



u 



APPENDIX XVI. 



ON BEATS OF OOMBINATIONAL TONES, AND ON OOMBINATIONAL TONES IN THE 

SIBEN AND HABIfONIUM. 

(See pp. 199a and note *, also 155c to 158a.) 

Let a, h, c, d^ e, /, g, h be whole numbers. Let an and 6n + 8 be the pitch numbers 
of the primes of two compound tones sounded simultaneously, where 8 is supposed 
to be very small in comparison with n, and a and b are the smallest whole numbers 
by which the ratio a : b can be expressed. The pitch numbers of any pair of 
partial tones of these two compound tones will be 

acn and bdn + di. 

These will beat with each other dS times in a second, if 

a d 

H ac = feci or X = — ' 

o c 

And since the ratio ^ is expressed in its lowest terms, thd smallest values of 

d and c are 

d = a and c = fe, 

and their other values are 

d == ha and c = hb. 

Now c and d represent the ordinal numbers of the partial tones which beat 
together. Hence the lowest partials of this kind will be the feth partial of the 
compound a n, and the ath partial of the compound fen + 8. The resulting number 
of beats is a 8. 

In the same way the 2feth partial of the first compound, and the 2ath of the 
^ second give 2a8 beats and so on. 

The first dififerential combinational tone of the two partials acn and bdn-^dS 
is 

± [{bd - ac)n + dS] 

where the + or - sign has to be taken so that the whole expression is positive. 



* [The interval is found as the ratio of the 
pitch number to the same increased by the 
number in the next column to it; thus for 
C it is 64 : 64 + 16 « 4 : 5, fuid for a' it is 
384 : 384 + 60 = 96 : 111, and from these I 
have calculated the oents as in p. 701 of the 
1st edition. 

If ^ be the pitch number, and D = dura- 
tion of residual sensations or the reciprocal of 
the numbers of vibrations producing a con- 
tinuous sound, 16, 26, &c., as in the next pre- 



ceding column, then Prof. Mayer finds — 
^ / 53248 «A 1 ^ ^ 

^ = [nT^ + ^) ' ioooo«^°^— ^^- 

latorJ] 

f [The interval is found as the ratio of the 
pitch number to the same increased by the last 
mentioned number of beats, thus 64 : 64 + 6*4. 
Prof. Mayer draws attention to the fact that 
his beats were all tones of the same pitch, 
whereas the beats of imperfect consonances 
are tones of variable pitch. — Translator.} 



APP. XVI. COMBINATIONAL TONES OF SIREN, ETC. 419 

Two other partials /an and gbn + gh give the differential combinational tone 

± [(9^ - af)n + gh]. 
When both sound together they produce {g:fd) 8 beats, if 

fed - oc =*+ (gf6 - a/) 
a g:^d 



or 



fe / + c" 



As before, it follows that the least value of ^+(2 is = a, and the other (greater) 
values are = ha, so that the smallest number of beats is 08. 

To find the lowest values of the partials which must be present in order to 
beat with the first differential tones, we will take the lower signs for c and d, and 
we thus obtain : ^ 

g = d = ^ or g == i {a + 1), and d = i{a - 1) 
/ = c = ife, or / = i (6 + 1), and c - i (fe - 1), 

according as a and fe are even or odd. If fe is the larger number, ^fe or |(fe + 1) is 
the number of partials which any compound must have in order to produce beats 
when the two tones composing the interval are sounded. If the combinational 
tones are neglected, about double the number, that is fe, are required. 

When simple tones are sounded together, the beats arise from the combina- 
tional tones of higher orders. The general expression for a differential tone of a 
higher order arising from two tones with the vibrational numbers n and m is 
+ (an - fem), and this tone is then of the (a + fe - l)th order. Let the pitch 
number of a combinational tone of the (c+d- 1) order arising from the tones an 
and (fen + 8) be 

+ [{bd - ca) .n + d8], 

and of another of the (/+ g - l)th order be ^ 

± [{gf^ -fa).n + gf8], 
then both produce (^T^ . 8 beats, when 

bd - ac = ±{bg - af) 
a g:^d 



or 



ft-/q:s- 



The lowest number of beats is therefore again aS, and the lowest values of 
c, dj /, g, are found as in the former case, so that the ordinal numbers of combina- 
tional tones need not exceed i(a + fe- 2), if a and fe are both odd, or ^(a + fe - 1), 
if only one of them is odd, the other being even. 

To what has been said in Chap. YIL, pp. 154-159, I will add the following cj 
remarks on the origin of combinational tones. 

Combinational tones must always arise when the displacement of the vibrating 
particles from their position of rest is so large that the force of restitution is no 
longer simply proportional to the displacement. The mathematical theory of this 
case for a heavy vibrating point is given in App. XII., pp. 411(2 to 415fe. The same 
holds for aerial vibrations of finite magnitude. The principles of the theory are 
given in my essay on the * Theory of Aerial Vibrations in Tubes with Open Ends,* 
in Crelle's Journal fiir Mathematik, vol. IviL p. 14. I will here draw attention 
to a third case, where combinational tones may also arise from infinitely small 
vibrations. This has already been mentioned in pp. 156^ - 157(2. It occurs with 
sirens and harmoniums. We have here two openings, periodically altering in 
size, and with a greater pressure of air on one side than on the other. Since we 
are dealing only with very small differences of pressure, we may assume, that the 
mass of the escaping air is jointly proportional to the size of the opening oi, and to 
the difference of pressure p^ so that 

q^co)p 

£ B 2 



420 COMBINATIONAL TONES OF SIREN, ETC. app. xvl 

where c is some constant. If we now assume for <o the simplest periodic function 
which expresses an alternate shutting and opening, namely 



O) 



= -4 . (1 - sin 2wnt), 



and consider j? to be constant, that is, suppose a> to be so small and the influx of 
air so copious, that the periodical loss through the opening does not essentially 
alter the pressure, q will be of the form 

g = 5 . (1 - sin ^irnt) 
where B = cAp, 

In this case the velocity of the motion of sound at any place of the space filled 
with air, must have a similar form, so that only a tone with the vibrational number 
n can arise. But if there is a second greater opening of variable size, through 
IF which there is sufficient escape of air to render the pressure j? periodically variable, 
instead of being constant, as the air passes out through the other opening, that is, 
if p is of the form 

I? = P . (1 - sin 2innt), 

then q will have the form 

q = cAP . (1 - sin 2im^) . (1 - sin 2innt) 
= cAP . [1 - sin 2imt - sin 2irmt - ^ cos 27r(m + n)t + iooa 2ir{m - n)^]. 

Hence, in addition to the two primary tones n and m, there will be also the 
tones m + n and m-n, thaf is, the two combinational tones of the first order. 

In reality the equations will always be much more complicated than those here 
selected for shewing the process in its simplest form. The tone n will influence 
the pressure p, as well as the tone m ; even the combinational tones will alter p ; 
f and finally the magnitude of the opening may not be expressible by such a simple 
periodic function as we have selected for o). This will occasion not merely the 
tones m, n, and m + n, m-n, to be produced, but also their upper partials, and 
the combinational tones of those upper partials, as may also be observed in experi- 
ments. The complete theory of such a case becomes extraordinarily complicated, 
and hence the above account of a very simple case may suffice to shew the nature 
of the process. 

I will mention another experiment which may be similarly explained. The 
lower box of my double siren vibrates strongly in sympathy with the fork a' when 
it is held before the lower opening, and the holes are all covered, but not when the 
holes are open. On putting the disc of the siren in rotation so that the holes are 
alternately open and covered, the resonance of the tuning-fork varies periodically. 
If n is the vibrational number of the fork, and m the number of times that a single 
hole in the box is opened, the strength of the resonance will be a periodic function 
of the time, and consequently in its simplest case equal to 1 - sin 2vmL 
IT Hence the vibrational motion of the air will be of the form 

(1 - sin 2irmt) . sin 2Tmt = sin 27mt + ^ cos 2ir{m + n)t - i cos 2ir{m - n)t, 

and consequently we hear the tones m + n, and m-n or n-m. If the siren is 
rotated slowly, m will be very small, and these tones, being all nearly the same, 
will beat. On rotating the disc rapidly, the ear separates them.* 

* [For the whole subject of beats and com- recent discussions in Appendix XX. sect. L. — 
binational tones the reader is referred to the Translator.'] 



APP. XVII. JUSTLY INTONED INSTRUMENTS WITH ONE MANUAL. 421 



APPENDIX XVII. 



PLAN FOR JU8TLT INTONED INSTRUMENTS WITH A SINGLE ICANUAL. 

(See p. 319c, and note f .) 

To arrange an organ or harmonium with twenty-four tones to the octave in such 
a way as to play in just intonation in all keys, the tones of the instrument must 
be separated into four pairs of groups, thus 



la) 

2 a) 

3 a) 

4 a) 



/ 
c 

9 
d 



a^ 



f4 



4 

«ib 
^b 



lb) /i a c^ 

2 b) C| e ab 

3 b) g, b e\) 

4 b) d, /# 6b 



If 



Each of these groups must have a separate portvent from the bellows, and 
valves must be introduced in such a way that the wind may be driven at pleasure 
either to the right or left group of any horizontal series. This would not be diffi- 
cult on the organ. On the harmonium the digitals would have to be placed in a 
different order from the tongues, and consequently it would, as on the organ, be 
necessary to have a more complicated arrangement for conducting the effect of 
pressing down a digital to the valve. 

Hence four valves are to be arranged by stops or pedals in a different way for 
every key. The following is a table of the arrangement of the stops for the four 
horizontal series of the tones named : — 



Miyor keys 


Series 


HinOT keys. 












1 


2 


3 
a 


4 

a 




Cb* 


b 


a 


(SiW 


«b* 


b 


b 


a 


a 


(B,b) 


i>b* 


b 


b 


b 


a 


(Fi) 


^b* 


b 


b 


b 


b 


(C^) 


-Kb* 


a 


b 


b 


b 


(Oy) 


^b* 


a 


a 


b 


b 


(D.) 


F 


a 


a 


a 


b 


^. 


C 


a 


a 


a 


a 


E, 





b 


a 


a 


a 


B, *orC|» 


D 


b 


b 


a 


a 


F,%*orO\, 


A 


b 


b 


b 


a 


C,t ' or DIf 


E 


b 


b 


b 


b 


CJfor^l, 


B 


a 


b 


b 


b 


D.Jfor£|, 


2f| 


a 


a 


b 


b 


^J'orBl, 



H 



The minor keys which have their names in parentheses, namely ^^bi -^ibi ^v 
C^, Gj, Dj, have a true minor Seventh, but too high a leading tone. [Their 
dominant chord has an impossible Pythagorean major Third.] For the six keys 
marked with {*), the arrangement of the stops is the same both for major and 
minor, f 

In order to have a complete series of tonics, each with a perfect major and 
minor form, it would be necessary to cut off ajb, ^ik ^ibi fv ^u Uu from the other 
notes, and to allow them to be replaced when needed by gjJL d#, ajL ctt, bjt, and 
/jtt» by means of a fifth stop. We should thus have 30 tones to the octave. By 
drawing out this stop we should have the following system of keys : — 



t [The scries in the first six lines is the same as in the six last. — Translator ] 



422 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



APP. XVII. XTHI. 



H 



Major keys 


Series marked with accented letters to shew 
that they are affected by the fifth stop 


Minor keys 


1 

a' 
a' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
b' 
b' 
b' 


2 


3 


4 


F 
C 
G 
D 
A 
E 
B 

c 

^9 

Et 


a' 
a' 
a' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
b' 
b' 


a' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
a' 
a' 

a' 
a' 
b' 


b' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
b' 
a' 
a' 
a' 
a' 


F 
C 
G 
D 
A 
E* 

Bit 

Flit 

CM 
OM 



To have a complete series of minor keys, 28 instead of 30 tones to the octave 
would be enough. They would suflBce for the 12 minor keys of A^, E^, J5„ FA or 

Gb, C^ or Db, G^4 °^ ^^* -^ifr ^^ ^^* ^» ^' ^' ^» »°^ ^* *°^ ^^^ ^7 major keys 
from C^ major to Gji major.f 



APPENDIX XVIII. 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



(See p. 3262^.) 



f Since the publication of the first edition of this book, I have had an opportunity 
of seeing the Enharmonic Organ^ constructed by General Perronet l^ompson^ 
which allows of performance in 21 major and minor scales with different tonics 
harmonically connected. This instrument is much more complicated than my 
harmonium. It contains 40 pipes to the octave, and has three distinct manuals, 
with, on the whole, 65 digitals to the octave, as the same note has to be sometimes 
struck on two or all of the manuals. This instrument allows of the performance 
of much more extensive modulations than my harmonium, without requiring any 
enharmonic interchanges. It is even possible to execute tolerably quick passages 
and ornamentations upon it, notwithstanding its apparently involved fingering. 



* [The E minor has the leading note, bat 
not the minor Seventh. The other minor 
keys have both.— TVatuZator. J 

f [As Prof. Helmholtz has retained this 
Appendix in his 4th German edition it is 
given in the translation. But the scheme 
^ explained has never been tried. The plan for 
24 notes is impracticable because of the de- 
fective state of the minor keys, and imperfect 
modulating power. It could only be used 
as an experimental instrument, and for that 
the double keyboard as explained on p. 8166 
suffices. The valve arrangement for 80 notes 
would be complicated, and even if it could be 
used would still have a very imperfect modu- 
lating power. The 58 division of the octave 
introduced by Mr. Bosanqnet, and subse- 
quently by Mr. Paul White, with fingerboards 
which have been actually used, as explained 
in App. XIX., and also App. XX. sect. F. 
Nos. 8 and 9, are so much superior in mani- 
pulation, musical effect, and power of modula- 
tion, that it is unnecessary to seek further. 
In App. XX. sect. F. the other principal 
methods that have been actually tried, are 



also explained. — Translator,'] 

X [* On the principles and Practice of Just 
Inton<Uion, with a view to the Abolition of 
Temperament, and embodying the results of 
the Tonic Sol-fa Associations, as iUustrated 
on the Enharmonic Organ . . . presenting the 
power of performing correctly in 21 keys (with 
the minors to the extent of involving not 
more than five flats), and a correction for 
changes of temperature. . . . Calculated for 
taking the place of the choir organ in a cathe- 
dral, and learned by the blind in six lessons. 
With an Appendix tracing the identity of de- 
sign with the Enharmonic of the Ancients.* 
By T. Perronet Thompson, F.B.S. Ninth edi- 
tion, 1866. The exact compass of this organ 
will be explained in App. XX. sect. F. No. 6. 
General Thompson was bom at Hull, in 1788, 
and died at Blackheath, 6 September, 1869. 
He had been four years in the navy before 
joining the army, and was prominent during 
the Com Law Abolition agitation. He was 
many years editor of the Westminster Revietc, 
and was first returned to Parliament for Hull 
in 1SS5.— Translator.] 



APP. XYUI. 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



423 



The organ was erected in the Sunday School Chapel, 10 Jewin Street, Aldersgate, 
London,* and was built by Messrs. Bobson, 101 St. Martin's Lane, London. It 
contains only one stop of the usual principal work, has Venetian shutters form- 
ing a swell throughout, and is provided witii a peculiar mechanism for correcting 
the influence of temperature on the intonation. 

Mr. H. W. Poole has lately transformed his organ f so as to get rid of stops for 
changing the intonation, and has constructed a peculiar arrangement of the digitals, 
which enables him to play in all keys with the same fingering. His scale contains 
not merely the just Fifths and Thirds in the series of major chords, but also the 
natural or subminor Sevenths for the tones of both series. There are 78 pipes to 
the octave, and F\^ has been identified with E^, &c., as upon my harmonium.| 

Successions of chords on General Thompson's instrument are extraordinarily 
harmonious, and, perhaps, on account of their softer quality of tone, even more 
surprising in their agreeable character than on my harmonium.§ I had an oppor- 
tunity, at the same time, of hearing a female singer, who had often sung to it, per- IT 
form a piece to the accompaniment of the enharmonic organ, and her singing gave 
me a peculiarly satisfactory feeling of perfect certainty in intonation, which is 
usually absent when a pianoforte accompanies. There was also a violinist ** present 
who had not been much accustomed to play with the organ, and accompanied well- ' 
known airs by ear. He hit ofif the intonation exactly as long as the key remained 
unchanged, and it was only in some rapid modulations that he was not able to 
follow it perfectly. 

In- London I had also an opportunity of comparing the intonation of this 
instrument with the natural intonation of singers who had learned to sing without 
any instrumental accompaniment at all, and are accustomed to follow their ear 
alone. This was the Society of Tonic Sol-faists, who are spread in great numbers 
(there were 150,000 in 1862 ff) over the large cities of England, and whose great 



* [Shortly before his death General Per- 
ronet Thompson presented this organ to Mr. 
John Curwen, mentioned in note ft, below. 
The General's executors had it reconstructed 
in a schoolroom at Plaistow, Essex. It was 
afterwards exhibited at the Scientific Loan 
Exhibition at South Kensington Museum in 
1876, and has remained there ever since, at 
the top of the staircase leading to room Q of 
the Science Collections. — Translator.] 

f SilUman*s American Journal of Science 
and Aria, vol. xliv., July 1867. [In its orig- 
inal form the instrument, with an ordinary 
keyboard and pedals, was termed the En- 
harmomc Organ, and is described in Silliman's 
Journal, vol. ix. p. 209, for May 1850. The 
new fingerboard is figured and described here- 
after, App. XX. sect. F. No. 7. — Translator.] 

X [The text is in error. There are 100 not 
78 pipes to the octave, and J^i is not identified 
with F^, — Translator.] 

§ [* On oigans of many stops, one or more 
ouj^t certainly to be tuned with mathemati- 
cally correct intonation, on account of their 
wonderful effect, to be employed (of course 
without using any others at the same time) 
as the music of the spheres {als Oesang der 
Sphiiren). It is impossible to form any notion 
of the effect of a chord in mathematically just 
intonation, without having heard it. I have 
such a one to compare with the others. Every 
one who hears it expresses his delight and 
surprise at a correctness of intonation that it 
does one good to hear (Jeder, der ihn hOrt, 
spricht sein frohes Erstaunen iiber diese 
wohlthtiende Reinheit aus).^ — Scheibler, Ueber 
mathematische Stimmung, Temperaiuren und 
Orgelstimmung nach Vibrations-Differenzen 
Oder SWssen, 1888. I have given the original 
words of the last German sentence, as it was 
impossible to do justice to its homely force in 



any translation. Every one who has heard 
just intonation will understand it. — Trans- 
lator.] 

** [A blind man, who had therefore no f 
notes to guide him. I had the pleasure of 
taking Professor Helmholtz to hear the organ 
on this occasion (20 April 1864), and can corro- 
borate his statements. Unfortunately the 
proper blind organist was not present. It is 
to this lady that General Thompson dedicates 
his little book, already recited, in these words : 
*To Miss E. S. Northcote. Oiiganist of St. 
Anne and St» Agnes, St. Martin's-le-Grand. 
In conmiemoration of the talent by which, 
after six lessons, she was able to perform in 
public on the enharmonic organ with 40 sounds 
to the octave ; thereby settling the question of 
the practicability of just intonation on keyed 
instruments, and realising the visions of Guido 
and Mersenne, and the harmonists of classical 
antiquity.' — Translator.] 

ft [The 20 years which have elapsed since 
Prof. Helmholtz's first acquaintance with the f 
Tonic Sol-fa movement have made a struggling 
system, slowly elaborated by a Gongregation- 
alist minister in connection with his ministry, 
into a great national system of teaching sing- 
ing. And as the system had the cordial 
approval of Prof. Helmholtz (see note p. 427d), 
I feel justified in adding a short account of 
its origin, progress, and present condition. 
In 1812 the two Miss Glovers, daughters of 
a clergyman of Norwich, then young women, 
now both dead at a veiy advanced age, in- 
vented and introduced into the schools under 
their superintendence a new sol-fa system, 
based upon the 'movable doh,* that is, the 
use of doh as the name of the keynote, what- 
ever that might be. This was little known 
beyond the town where it was used, but 
was published about 1827 as a Scheme for 



4^ 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



APP. xvin. 



progress is of much importance for the theory of music. The Tonic Sol-faists re- 
present the tones of the major scale by the syllables Do, Be, Mi, Fa, So, La, Ti^ 



tendering Psalmody Congregational^ and passed 
throagh three editions. About 1841 John 
Gorwen, then an unmarried Oongregationalist 
minister (bom 14 November 1816 at Heck- 
-mondwike, Yorks), visited the school, and at 
once saw that Miss Glover's scheme gave him 
the instrument he desired for his own work. 
In 1846 he married, and he and his wife 
struggled — it was a real and severe struggle, 
against small means — ^to make this system 
known and active. In the course of working 
it out various improvements suggested them- 
selves, and the Tonic Sol-fa system, as he 
termed it, is not precisely the same as Miss 
" Glover's ; it is essentially John Gurwen*s. 
Thus Miss Qlover's scheme (as she says in a 
MS. preface in 1862 to the 2nd edition of the 
description of her Harmonicon, in the Science 
Collections, South Kensington Museum) was 
founded on temperament ; Gurweu*s on just 
intonation; and the alterations that this 
change involved were many and laborious. 
Here Curwen was, I believe, much assisted by 
the personal friendship of General Penonet 
Thompson, whose works he constantly quoted 
in the first book he issued. Singing for Schools 
and Congregations, 1843-8. A remarkable 
power of methodising, systematising, and 
teaching, of making friends and co-workers, 
and of utilising suggestions carried everything 
before it — at last. But the work was long, 
and the opposition strong. There was only an 
* Association* when Prof. Helmholtz made the 

«r acquaintance of the Tonic Sol-fa system. But 
the Association grew to be a * Gollege,* which 
held its first * summer term ' on 10 July 1876, 
having been ' incorporated ' on 26 June 1875, 
and there were in 1884, 1420 * Shareholders * 
in this Gollege, which opened its * Buildings ' 
(at Forest Gate, London, E.) on 5 July 1879. 
John Gurwen lived lon^ enough to see the 
opening and to preside at the unveiling of Miss 
Glover's portrait in it, never having neglected 
to own his obligations to her initiative. On 
a stone at the entrance of the present Gollege 
building he placed this inscription : * This 
stone was laid by John Gurwen, May 14, 1879, 
in memory of Miss Sarah Glover, on whose 
** Scheme for rendering Psalmody Gongrega- 
tional" the Tonic Sol-fa method was founded*. 
John Gurwen died 26 May 1880, of weakness 

f of the heart. His eldest son, John Spencer 
Gurwen, Associate of the Royal Academy of 
Music, has been since that date annuallv 
elected as President of the Gollege. The work 
of the Gollege is chiefly examinational, carrying 
on classes by post in the various branches of 
musio,and granting certificates shewing various 
degrees of attainment, on the authority of duly 
appointed examiners. From 1868 to 1884 the 
numbers of these certificates granted have 
been: Junior, 52,000; Elementary, 167,000; 
Intermediate, 44,000; Matriculation, 8850; 
Advanced, 520; Musical Theory (including 
Harmony, Gomposition, Form, Expression, 
Acoustics, &c.), 8200; total 275,070, as the 
Secretary informs me. During the summer 
there is always a term for the special vivd voce 
instruction of teachers. Of course laige classes 
are constantly going on everywhere. I quote 
the following from a letter dated 15 October 



1884, written by John Spencer Gurwen to the 
Editor of the Times : — 

At the most modest estimate, during the 30 
years our system has been at work, we have taught 
at least the elements of music to four million per- 
sons. There are now, in the elementary schools 
of the United Kingdom, about one million chil- 
dren learning to sing at sight upon our system. 
The Tonic Sol-fa Gollege has 28 different kinds 
and grades of musical examinations, and these 
were passed last year by 18,716 persona. Every 
examination includes individual tests in singing 
at sight We have between 4000 and 5000 teachers 
at work, and at the present time tbev have under 
instruction some 200,000 adults, in addition to the 
children already mentioned. I lately inquired of 
16 of our most active professional teachers 1k>w 
many pupils, adults ana children, they were in- 
structing per week in their classes. The number 
proved to be 61,051. We have a well-organised 
movement. During the last four years I have 
attended 166 meetings in the length and breadth 
of the kingdom, my travels extending over 13,000 
miles, and ranging from Plymouth to Landon- 
derry, from Inverness to Norwich. These meet- 
ings, at which demonstrations of musical educa- 
tion are invariably given, have been attended by 
at least 100,000 people. I have further travelled 
in France, Germany, Austria, and Switzerland, 
studying the condition of popular musical instruc- 
tion in schools, singing clubs, &c, so that we may 
bring our practice up to the best continent^ 
models. The qnantity of music printed in the 
Tonic Sol-fa notation is enormous, and is in- 
creasing very rapidly. Two-thirds of our pupils, 
having been grounded in our notation, go on to 
learn the oMinary staff notation, and prove 
themselves excellent readers of that notation. 

With regard to teaching music in schools, 
the following is compiled from the papers 
issued by the Educational Department in 
1884, England and Wales G. 8941, and Scot- 
land G. 8942. They refer to 27,380 subordi- 
nate educational departments for England and 
Wales. Of these, 21,743 teach music by ear 
only ; 1429 by the staff or ordinary notation ; 
3871 by Tonic Sol-fa ; 32 by both systems ; 
and 2161 in some other way. For Scotland 
there are 3403 subordinate departments, of 
which 1238 teach by ear only; 8 by the 
late Dr. Hullah's modification of Wilhelm's 
method, 174C by Tonic Sol-fa; 117 by old 
notation with movable doh (for which many 
teachers have a strong predilection), and 7 by 
more than one system. There are 94 depart- 
ments in England, and 277 in Scotland making 
no returns. These returns shew that Tonic 
Sol-fa is the national system of teaching 
music by note in the primary schoohi of Eng- 
land and Scotland at the present day. 

John Gurwen having started his system 
from purely philanthropic motives, gladly 
placed his notation at the disposal of all who 
liked to use it. A strong proof of the success 
of his system is furnished by the fact that all 
the principal London publishers have availed 
themselves of this permission. Gounod*s Re- 
demption and Mackenzie's Rose of Sharon are 
among the latest additions to the Tonic 
Sol-fa repertoire. It is estimated that at the 
present time there are 40,000 pages of music 
printed and published in this latter notation. 
But the educational works on music and the 
system are the private property of the firm of 



APP. XVIII. 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



425 



Doy where Do is always the tonic [vowels as in Italian]. Their vocal music is not 
written in ordinary musical notation, but is printed with common types, the initial 
letters of the above words representing the pitch.* 

When the tonic is changed in modulations, the notation is also changed. The 
new tonic is now called Do, and the change is pointed out in the notation by giving 
two different marks to the note on which it occurs, one belonging to the old, and 
one to the new key. This notation, therefore, gives the very first place to repre- 
senting the relation of every note to the tonic, while the absolute pitch in which 
the piece has to be performed is marked at the commencement only. Since the 
intervals of the natural major scale are transferred to each new tonic as it arises 
in the course of modulation, all keys are performed without tempering the inter- 
vals. That in the modulations from G major to O major, the Mi (or b^) of the 
second scale answers precisely to the Ti of the first is not indicated in the nota- 
tion, and is only taught in the further course of instruction. Hence the pupil has 
no inducement to confuse a with a^-f IT 



John Curwen & Sons, and are of sach a remark- 
able character that a gold medal was awarded 
for them at the International Health and Edu- 
cation Exhibition at South Kensington in 1884. 
It would indeed be difficult to find so much 
information on music and the method of 
teaching it (in both notations), so succinctly 
and plainly given, and at so cheap a rate, as 
in the late John Gurwen*s Teacher*8 MantMl, 
Siandftrd Course^ Musical Theoryt How to 
Observe Harmony^ How to read Music, not to 
mention the very large number of books and 
music intended for immediate class use. John 
Gurwen's especial desire was to teach *the 
thing Music,* as he words it, and the peculiar 
means which he elaborated for this purpose, 
he valued only because it proved effectual for 
that purpose. 

As one who was personally acquainted 
with John Curwen and his work for a quarter 
of a century, I may be permitted to give this 
testimony, and to refer all those who would 
learn the history of this successful musical 
educationist to the Memorials of John Cur- 
wen, compiled by his son, J. Spencer Curwen, 
1882.— Tratwiator.] 

* [Great care has also been bestowed on 
the representation of rhythm, and exercises in 
rhythm form an important part of the Stan- 
dard Course, and the practice of Tonic Sol-fa 
teachers. — Translator S] 

t [In a footnote to this passage Prof. Helm- 
holtz gives a list of the Tonic Sol-fa works, 
which is superseded by the note I have in- 
serted above, and at the end of it he says:] 
In France singing is taught by the Gaitn- 
Paris-CIievi system, on similar principles and 
with the help of a similar notation. [This 
statement is misleading. Neither principles 
nor notation are alike. In 1818 P. Galin, 
*Instituteur k I'Ecole des Sourds-Muets de 
Bordeaux,' published his Exposition d^une 
Nouvelle MHhode pour VEnseignement de la 
Musique. It follows from g. 162 of his book 
r3rd ed. 1862, reprinted by Kmile Chev6) that 
Gralin skdopted as his normal intonation Huy- 
ghens*s cycle of 81 divisions of the octave, 
which closely represents the meantone tem- 
perament (see App. XX. sect. A. art. 22, ii.), 
although Galin did not seem to be acquainted 
with it under that name, and seems to an- 
nounce, as his own discovery {ibid. p. 80, and 
especially p. 107) what was in fact Huyghens's 
more than 120 years previously : viz. that } 
of a whole Tone = I major Semitone = J of a 



minor Semitone, but the curious thing is that 
he considers the resulting flat Fifth of 696-778 
cents to be correct, and the Fifth with 701*955 
cents from the ratio of 2 : 8 to be wrong. 
This is enough to shew how widely Galin's 
principles differed from Curwen*s. The nota- 
tion of intervals which Galin used was Rous- 
seau's numerical expression of the major scale 
asl28456 7, indicating a rising Octave by 
overdotting and a falling by underdotting, 
but calling the figures ut rS mi fa sol la si. 
Here the only resemblance is the movable ut 
(=3 doh), as distinguished from the usual 
French custom of making ut « C In mark- 
ing sharps and flats and time the difference is 
greater, but need not be pursued. We should 
observe, however, that on this system, as Galin 
expressly states (p. 81), gji is flatter than a]^. ^ 
Galin was bom 16 Dec. 1786, and died SO 
Aug. 1822. His pupils and especially Aim^ 
sjid Nanine Paris (the latter of whom married 
Emile Chev6, a surgeon), continued to teach 
his system, and supplied it with text-books. 
The principal one is Mithode (Umentaire par 
Mme. Chevi (Nanine Paris). La partis Jheo- 
rique de cet ouvrage est ridigie par Emile 
ChevS. In this theoretical part, p. 292, 1 find 
that Chev^ imagined Galin to have called his 
single division half of a minor Second, whereas 
he says, as above, that it was half of a minor 
Semitone, which is totally different. The con- 
sequence is that Chev^ makes Galin's scale a 
division of the octave into 29 divisions, in- 
stead of 31, and hence he obtained a sharp Fifth 
of 708*46 cents, a very sharp major Third of 
413*8 cents, much sharper than the Pytha- 
gorean (App. XX. sect. A. art. 23, vi.). If he f 
could have tuned an harmonium to tms major 
scale and played the major chords, he would 
have been scared at the result. He makes 
gji much sharper than a^y ; his a\f was indeed 
flatter and gt sharper than on the Pytha- 
gorean system. It is evident that his pupils 
when they sang in chorus could not have 
used his theoretical scale. Hence his prin- 
ciples were entirely different from Curwen's. 
The notation remained the same as with Galin, 
sharps and flats being denoted by acute and 
grave accents drawn through the stems of the 
figures, but their meaning was altogether dif- 
ferent. Also he retained the movable ut of 
Galin, and on p. 327 he made out a general 
table of the relation of modulations, which re- 
sembles my Duodenarium, App. XX. sect. E. 
art. 18. M. Aim^ Paris also introduced apian for 



426 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



APP. XVIIL 



It is impossible not to acknowledge that this method of notation has the great 
advantage to the singer of giving prominence to what is of the greatest im- 
portance to him, namely, the relation of each tone to the tonic. It is only a 
few persons, unusually ^ted, who are able to fix in their mind, and re-discover 
absolute pitches, when other tones are sounded at the same time. But the ordinary 
notation * gives directly nothing but absolute pitch, and that too only for tempered 
intonation. Any one who has frequently sung at sight is aware how much easier 
it is to do so from a pianoforte vocal score, in which the harmony is shewn, than 
from the separate voice part. In the first case it is easy to see whether the note to 
be sung is l£ie root. Third, Fifth, or dissonance of the chord which occurs, and it is 
then comparatively easy to find one's way ; f in the second case the only resource 
of the singer is to go up and down by intervals as well as he can, and trust to 
the accompanying instruments and the other voices to force his own to the right 
pitch. 

Now the instruction conveyed to a singer who is familiar with musical theory 
IT by an examination of the pianoforte vocal score, is conveyed by the notation itself 
of the Tonic Sol-faist even to the uninstructed. I have convinced myself that by 
using this notation, it is much easier to sing from the separate part than in 
ordinary musical notation, and I had an opportunity when in one of the primary 
schools in London, of hearing more than forty children of between eight and 



mivrking modulations which htus a great re- 
semblance to John Gurwen*8 * bridge tone/ 
but both plans were absolutely independent. 
The * langue des dur^s * of Aim^ Paris was, 
however, avowedly adapted to the Tonic Sol-fa 
system by John Gurwen. Both M. and Mme. 'A. 
Chev^ are dead, and after some time their 
son Amand Ghev6 revived the system, which 
has had great success in France, and gained 
many prizes in choral competitions, shewing 
that fimile Ghev^'s theoretioeJ scale could not 
have been Sidopted. From a correspondence I 

f had with M. Amand Ghev^ I found he did 
not hold with his father's 29 division of the 
octave, but adopted the 58 division (not 
however as representing just intonation with 
a major Third of 17 degprees or 884*9 cents, 
but) as representing the Pytha.gorean intona- 
tion with a major Third of 18 degrees or 407*5 
cents (App. XX. Sect. A. art. 22, iii.). As this 
would be frightful in part singing, it is pro- 
bable that his pupils, although strictly taught 
to make gji sharper than a^ (indeed to make 
the intervals g to a^ and ^ to a identical, 
each containing 4 degrees or 90*6 cents, with 
an interval of 1 degree or 22*6 cents between 
them), in choral singing insensibly use the 
equal temperament which GaUn and £mile 
Gheve for different reasons inveighed against. 
At any rate the Galin-Paris-Ghev^ system, 

^ clever and successful as it is, is after all and 
was from the first a tempered system, and in 
its Gheve form a (theoretically) very badly 
tempered system, and hence not in the slightest 
degree similar in principle to the Tonic Sol-fa, 
which as taught by John Gurwen was always a 
system of just intonation. Another immense 
difference must be noted. Gurwen founds 
evexything upon the major chord do mi so a,t 
all pitches, then proceeds to its dominant 
90 ii r«, and fixuJly to its subdominant 
fa la do, in every case drawing attention to 
the char<icter of the notes in the scale. The 
Ghev^ system began by teaching the melody, 
ut ri mi fa sol, and not advancing till this 
melody was thoroughly impressed on the mind 
of the pupil for any tt/, taken backwards or 
forwards, or stopping at any note and begin- 
ning again at that note. Afterwards the sys- 
tem took the melody ut^ si la sol, and treated 



it in the same way. Finally the two were 
united ^Aut rtmi fa sol la si ul}. On these 
melodies all is founded, and the pupil is told 
to take any other intervals by imagining the 
intermediate notes^ toithout uttering them, thus 
(the notes in roman letters bemg merely 
imagined), ut re mi fa sol la si ut This is 
developed in Mme. Ghev4*s Science et Art de 
V intonation, thioria et pratique^ sysiHne des 
points d'appui, 1868. On the title-page she 
says : * Les grands ressorts de notre m6thode, 
pour r^tude de Tintonation, consistent en 
ceci: 1° Ghercher les sons un d un et 1» 
^mettre aussi un d un, en les d^tachant les 
uns des autres. Hors de \k point de suco^ 
possible. 2^ Se servir de deux rapports que 
I'on connatt, pour trouver un troisi^me rapport 
qu*on ignore; c*est-&-dire, aller du oonnu k 
I'inconnu ; ce qui conduit k penser par degr^ 
conjoints, en (mantant par degr^s disjoints,' 
May 1868. The two systems of Ghev^ and 
Gurwen are therefore distinct in principle, 
value of the signs, form of the signs, notation 
of rhythm, and mode of teaching. They are 
alike in being taught without an instrument, 
but for very different reasons; in the Tonic 
Sol-fa to allow just intonation to become the 
pupil's guide ; in the Ghev^ to allow of taking 
gjt sharper than ok, and to make e to f the 
same as ^ to a, but different from a[> to a. 
They are also alike in having a movable do or 
ut, a very ancient device. And also alike in 
their nomenclature of lengths, * langue des 
durdes,' which was an original invention of 
Aime Paris. As to priority of invention, Miss 
Glover taught her system in 1812, Galin pub- 
lished his in 1818. Both used tempered sys- 
tems. — TranslcUor.] 

* [Usually called * the Staff Notation ' or 
* the Old Notation * by the tonic Sol-faists by 
way of distinction. — Translator,'] 

t [After a pupil has thoroughly acquired 
music on the Sol-fa notation, it becomes part 
of his duty to learn the other, and a course of 
instruction has been prepared for this puipose 
by Mr. Gurwen, which when properly mastered 
(a comparatively easy task) puts the pupil in 
a condition to sing at sight from the old 
notation an readily as from the new. — Trans- 
lator] 



APP. XVIII. 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



427 



twelve years of age, that performed singing exercises in a manner that astonished 
me (' mich in Erstaunen setzten ') by the certainty with which they read the 
notes, and by the accuracy of their intonation.* Every year the London schools 
of Sol-faists are accustomed to give a concert of two or three thousand children's 
voices in the Crystal Palace at Sydenham, which, I have been assured by persons 
who understand music, makes the best impression on the audience by the har- 
moniousness and exactness of its execution, f 

The Tonic Sol-faists, then, sing by natural, and not by tempered intervals. 
When their choirs are accompanied by a tempered organ, there are marked differ- 
ences and disturbances, whereas they are in perfect unison vdth General Thomp- 
son's Enharmonic Organ. Many expressions used are very characteristic. A 
young girl had to sing a solo in F minor, and took it home to study it at her piano- 
forte. When she returned she said that the A\} and D\^ on her piano were all 
wrong. These are the Third and Sixth of the key in which the deviation of 
tempered from just intonation is most marked. Another girl was so charmed with 
the Enharmonic Organ that she remained practising for tfuree hours in succession, IT 
declaring that it was pleasant to be able to play real notes. Generally in a large 
number of cases, young people who have learned to sing by the Sol-fa method, 
find out by themselves, without any instruction, how to use the complicated 
manuals of the Enharmonic Organ, and always select the proper intervals. 

Singers find that it is easier to sing to the accompaniment of this organ, and 
also that they do not hear the instrument while they are singing, because it is in 
perfect harmony with their voice and makes no beats. 



*[0n ao April 1864, after we had heard 
Gen. Perronet Thompeon's oigan, I had the 
pleasure of taking Prof. Helmholtz to hear 
the singing of the children in the British and 
Foreign School here alluded to, which was 
situate behind the chapel in Tottenham Court 
Road. The master of the school, Mr. Gardi- 
ner, was a very good Tonic Sol-fa teacher, but 
the children were those who ordinarily at- 
tended (about forty were then present) and 
had received only ordinaxy instruction. After 
hearing them sing a few tunes in parts, from 
the Tonic Sol-fa notation. Prof. Helmholtz 
himself * pointed * out an air on the * modu- 
lator* or scale drawn out large on a chart, 
from which the pupils learn to sing (that is, 
by means of a pointer shewed the Tonic Sol-fa 
names of the tones the children were to sing), 
and the class followed in unison at sight. 
Then, on the suggestion of Mr. Gardiner, the 
class was divided into two sections, and Prof. 
Helmholtz pointed a piece in two parts, one 
with each hand, while the class took them at 
sight. Of course the piece was simple, but 
the dissonance of a Semitone was purposely 
introduced in one place between the parts, 
and Prof. Helmholtz was delighted at the 
firmness and correctness with which the chil- 
dren took it. I recollect his saying to me 
afterwards, * We could not do that in Ger- 
many ! ' meaning, as he subsequently ex- 
plained, that there was no German system of 
teaching to sing which could produce such 
results on such materials. The following is 
an extract of a letter from Prof. Helmholtz to 
Mr. Curwen printed on p. 159 of the Memo- 
riaUf dated 21 April 1864, the day after his 
visit to the class : * We were reaJly surprised 
by the readiness and surety [certainty] with 
which the children succeeded in reading music 
that they did not know before, and in follow- 
ing a series of notes which were indicated to 
them on their modulatory board [modulator]. 
I think that what I saw shewed the complete 
success of your system, and I was peculiarly 
interested by it, because during my researches 



in musical acoustics I came from theoretical 
reasons to the conviction that this was the 
natural way of learning music, but T did not 
know that it had been carried out in England 
with such beautiful results.* — TranslcUor.] 

t [I am informed by the Secretary of the 
Tonic Sol-fa College that the first Crystal 
Palace Festival of the Tonic Sol-faists was 
held on 2 September 1857, with a choir of IT 
about 8200 children and 800 adults. These 
concerts have been continued year by year to 
the present time. For many years two con- 
certs were given, one juvenile and one adult, 
the singers varying in number from 8500 to 
5000. Some of these performances were so 
popular that a repetition was given a few weeks 
later. The plan of testing the great choirs in 
sight singing was first tried at the Festival on 
14 August 1867, at which I was present, when 
an anthem specially written for the occasion 
by Mr. (now SirJ G. A. Macfarren (Professor of 
Music at the University of Cambridge,and Prin- 
cipal of the Royal Academy of Music) was sung 
by a choir of 4500 voices. Of the performance 
of this anthem Mr. Macfarren wrote a short 
time after in the Comhill Magazine thus : 
* A piece of music which had been composed ^ 
for the occasion, and had not until then been 
seen by human eyes save those of the writer 
and the printers, was handed forth to the mem- 
bers of the chorus there present, and then, 
before an audience furnished at the same time 
with copies to test the accuracy of the per- 
formance, forty-five hundred singers sang it at 
first sight in a manner to fulfil the highest 
requirements of the severest judges.* Mr. 
Macfarren was himself present, and publicly 
expressed his own satisfaction. 

Sight-singing tests have been given almost 
every year since, and always with the same 
success. They have become a common part of 
public concerts intended as * demonstrations,' 
and are regarded by Tonic Sol-faists as no 
more extraordinary than reading the words 
at sight would be considered. — Translatai'.] 



428 



JUST INTONATION IN SINGING. 



App. xvin. 



I have myself observed, that singers accustomed to a pianoforte accompani- 
ment, when they sang a simple melody to my justly intoned harmonium, sang 
natural Thirds and Sixths, not tempered, nor yet Pythagorean. I accompanied 
the commencement of the melody, and then paused while the singer took the 
Third or Sixth of the key. After he had struck it, I touched on the instrument 
the natural, or the Pytlmgorean, or the tempered interval. The first was always 
in unison with the singer, the others gave shrill beats. 

After this experience, I think that no doubt can remain, if ever any doubt 
existed, that the intervals which have been theoretically determined in the preced- 
ing pageSy amd there called natural^ are really natural for tmcorrupted ears ; that 
moreover the deviations of tempered intonation a/re really perceptible and un- 
pleasant to uncorrupted ears ; and Uistly that, notwithstamding the delicate dis- 
tinctions in particular intervals, correct singing by natural intervals is much easier 
than singing in tempered intonations. The complicated calculation of intervals 
which the natural scale necessitates, and which undoubtedly much increases the 

IT manual difficulty of performance on instruments with fixed tones, does not exist 
for either singer or violinist, if the latter only lets himself be guided by his ear. 
For in the natural progression of correctly modulated music they have always and 
only to proceed by the intervals of the natural diatonic scale. It is only the 
theoretician who finds the calculation complicated, when at the end of numerous 
such progressions he sums up the result, and compares it with the starting- 
point. 

That the natural system can be carried out by singers, is proved by the English 
Tonic Sol-faists. That it can also be carried out on bowed instruments, and is 
really carried out by distinguished player6, I have no doubt at all after the experi- 
ments of Delezenne already mentioned (p. 325, note *), and what I myself heard 
when I was listening to the violinist who accompanied the Enharmonic Organ. 
Among the other orchestral instruments, the brass instruments naturally play in 
just intonation, and can only be forced to the tempered system by being blown out 
of tune."^ The wooden instruments could have their tones slightly changed so as 

U to bring them into tune with the rest. Hence I do not think that the difficulties 
of the natural system are invincible. On the contrary, I think that many of our 
best musical performances owe their beauty to an unconscious introduction of the 
natural system, and that we should oftener enjoy their charms if that system were 
taught pedagogically, and made the foundation of all instruction in music, in place 
of the tempered intonation which endeavours to prevent the human voice and 
bowed instruments from developing their full harmoniousness, for the sake of not 
interfering with the convenience of performers on the pianoforte and the organ. 

Musicians have contested, in a very dogmiatic manner, the correctness of the 
propositions here advanced. I do not doubt for a moment that many of these 
antagonists of mine really perform very good music, because their ear forces 
them to play better than they intended, better than would really be the case if they 
actually carried out the regulations of the school, and played exactly in Pytha- 
gorean or tempered intonation. On the other hand, it is generally possible to con- 
vince oneself from their very writings, that these writers have never taken the 
trouble to make a methodical comparison of just and tempered intonation. I can 

f only once more invite them to hear, before uttering judgments, founded on an im- 
perfect school-theory, concerning matters which are not within their own personal 
experience. Those who have no time for such observations, should at any rate 
glance over the literature of the period during which equal temperament was 
introduced. When the organ took the lead among musical instruments it was 
not yet tempered. And the pianoforte is doubtless a very useful instrument for 
making the acquaintance of musical literature, or for domestic amusement, or for 
accompanying singers. But for artistic purposes its importance is not such as to 
require its mechanism to be made the basis of the whole system of music, t 



• [On this sentence Mr. Blaikley observes 
{Proceedings of the Musical Associaiion, vol. 
iv. p. 66) : * It seemed to me worth attention 
that this must be taken as being particularly 
and not generally true : that is, that though 
the ideal brass instrument has such character- 
istics, this ideal is not necessarily attained to 
in practice.* See pp. 99 and 100. — Translator.] 



t [This last paragraph, from ' Musicians 
have contested * to * the whole system of 
music,* is an addition to the 4th Qerman edi- 
tion. The remainder of this Appendix, which 
concludes the work in the Srd German edition, 
was occupied with a description of the musical 
notation which I employed in my footnotes 
and Appendix to the 1st English edition ; but 



^ it:|tiii<ii§. 

ii!|j||[|wfl 
:|aitM 



StBi§*° from p. 23 of Mr. R H. M. 
^iiSa'^^vak and Temperament, 1876] 




[ai^a) for 53 equal divisions of the 
iD^^eotioQ of two digitals standiag 



.OffJ^J^iraj have thought it right to omit the 



430 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XIX. XX. 



one above the other. All the digitals are of the same form and differ only in 
colour. The middle part of the figure presents an elevation of the front ends of 
these digitals. In the lower part there is a view as seen from above [plan]. Pro- 
ceeding from one of the tones, as c, upwards and backwards, leaping over an in- 
termediate digital in the way, we pass to d and e [on white digitals], and then 
continuing by major Seconds we pass to/|^ p^l, a^ [on black digitals], and finally 
bjt or y/ c [on a white digital again]. The sign / means, as has been« explained 
in the text (p. 3296), sharpening by a comma |^ [or one of the 53 degrees » 22 '642 
cents] and is very nearly equivalent to our superior ^ [which means sharpening by 
a comma of Didymus g^ = 21'5 cents, for which 22 cents is usually employed]. 
Between the members of this series are inserted, on the digitals leapt over, those 
of another series proceeding by major Beconds, d\^, e\} [both black], /, g, a, 6, cji 
[all five white]. 

The series which lie just above one another differ from each other by a comma 
IT of the same kind, the upper being the sharper. 

In playing the scale of c major* as c, d,\e, /, ^,\a,\i, c', observe that 
a horizontal line drawn through the points where d and g are printed in the 
figure will just pass through all the required keys. At\«,\a,\5, we thus 
come on a deeper intermediate series, f Every major scale is fingered in precisely 
the same way no matter with what note it begins. 

The harmonium constructed by Mr. Bosanquet distributes the 53 tones over 
84 digitals, some of those at the upper part of the manual being identical with 
some of those at the lower part, in order to avoid having frequently to jump from 
upper to lower digitals. In the system of 53 divisions / / / b = \ c, since five 
smallest degrees represent a diatonic Semitone. [For a further account of Mr. 
Bosanquet's notation see App. XX. sect. A. art. 27. For a more detailed plan of 
his generalised fingerboard see ibid, sect. F. No. 8, and for his methods of tuning 
see ibid. sect. G. art. 16.] 

«r *♦* [This concludes the work in the German. Appendix XX, has been en- 
tirely written by the Translator^ and Prof, Helmholtz is in no respect responsible 
for its contents,^ 



APPENDIX XX. 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



SECTION A. 



ON TEMPEBAMEKT. 

(See notes pp. 30^ 281, 315, and 829.) 



Art. 



1. Object of Temperament, p. 431. 
IT 2. Equal Temperament and Gents defined, 
p. 431. 

3. No recurrence possible of notes tuned by 

just Fifths and just major Thirds, p. 431. 

4. Generation of the Comma, p. 431. 

5. Generation of Meantone Fifths, p. 431. 

6. Generation of the Skhisma, p. 432. 

7. Generation of Helmholtzian Fifths, p. 432. 

8. Generation of Skhismic major Thirds, 

p. 432. 

9. Generation of the Pythagorean Comma, 

p. 432. 

10. Generation of the equal Fifth, p. 432. 

11. Generation of the Great Diesis, p. 432. 



Art 
12. 
13. 



Generation of the Mercatorial, p. 432. 

Notation adopted and Fundamental rela- 
tions between tempered Fifths, major 
Thirds, Commas, and Skhismas, p. 432. 

14. Linear and Cyclic Temperaments, p. 432. 

Ltndor Temperaments^ pp. 43d-485. 

15. The Pythagorean, with its usual 27 notes 

tabulated, p. 433. 

16. The Meantone Temperament, with its usual 

27 notes tabulated and their pitch num- 
bers calculated for 4 pitches, p. 438. 

17. The Skhismic Temperament, p. 435. 

18. The Helmholtzian Temperament, p. 485. 

19. Unequal Temperaments, p. 435. 

Cyclic Temperaments, pp. 435-441. 



*[In the Germsui edition a cross was 
placed on the digitals of the plan which were 
played in this key, but the German copy 
could not be used here because it followed 
German musical notation. The text has been 



altered accordingly. — Translator,^ 

+ [A horizontal line through h in the 
figure will pass through cdefgabc, and 
thus give the Pythagorean major scale. — 
Translator.] 



SECT. A. 



ON TEMPERAMENT. 



431 



Art. 

20. Conception of a Gyolio Temperament, p. 

485. 

21. Equations and conditions for Cyclic Tem- 

perament, p. 435. 

22. Cycles, i. of 12 (equal) ; ii. of 81 (Huy- 

ghens) ; iii. and iv. of 58 (Mercator and 
Bosanquet), p. 486. 
28. Cycles derived from the ratio of the inter- 
vals of a Tone to a Semitone in 1. as 
2 : 1, equal cycle of 12 ; in ii. as 5 : 8, 
Huyghens*s cycle of 81 ; in iii. as 9 : 4, 
Meicator*s cycle of 58 ; in v. as 8 : 2, 
Woolhouse's cycle of 19 ; in vi. as 5 : 2, 
Chev^*s cycle of 29; in vii. as 7:4, 
Sauveur's cycle of 48; in viil. as 9:5, 



Art. 

Estdve*s musician's cycle of 55 ; in ix. 
as 8 : 5, Henfling's cycle of 50, p. 486. 

24. Paper Cycles for calculation, x. of 80108 ; 

XI. of 8010 ; xii. of 801 ; xUi. of 1200, 
p. 487. 

25. Equal Temperament tabulated in various 

pitches, p. 437. 

26. Synonymity of Equal Temperament nota- 

tion, p. 438. 

27. Notation of Bosanquet*s cycle and its tabu- 

lation, p. 488. 

28. Expression of just intonation by the cycle 

of 1200, p. 439. 

29. Beferences, p. 441. 



Art. 1. — ^The object of temperament (literally * tuning '), is to render possible 
the expression of an indefinite number of intervals by means of a limited number IT 
of tones without distressing the ear too much by the imperfections of the conso- 
nances. The general practice has been from Uie earliest invention of the key- 
board of the organ to the present day to make 12 notes in the Octave suffice. This 
number has been in a very few instances increased to 14, 16, 19, and even to 31 
and 63, but such instruments have never come into general use. 

Art. 2. — ^The system which tuners at the present day intend to follow, though 
none of them absolutely succeed in so doing (see infr^ sect. G.), is to produce 12 
notes reckoned from any tone exclusive to its Octave inclusive, such that the Octave 
should be just and the interval between any two consecutive notes, that is, the 
ratio of their pitch numbers, should be always the same. This is known as Equal 
Temperament (see supr&, pp. 3206 to 327c). The interval between any two notes 
is an Eqtuil Semitone, and its ratio is 1 : ^^2 « 1 : 10594631, or very nearly 
84 : 89. If we further supposed that 99 other notes were introduced so as to make 
100 equal intervals between each pair of equal notes, these intervals would be those 
here termed CentSj having the common ratio 1 : i2oy2 = 1 : 1-0005778, or veryf 
nearly 1730 : 1731. As the human ear is, except in very rare cases, insensible to 
the interval of a cent, we need not divide further, except occasionally for purely 
theoretical purposes, to avoid errors of accumulation, as in this section, when even 
the thousandth part of a cent may have to be dealt with. In practice the errors 
of tuning would soon far exceed the errors arising from systematically neglecting 
amounts of less than half a cent. The mode of finding cents from the ratios of 
pitch numbers, wave lengths, or vibrating lengths, is given in sect. C, and the 
values of most of the usually recognised intervals are represented in cents in 
sect. D. From these we take, up to 3 places of decimals, 

One just Fifth » 701*955 cents 

major Third = 386-314 
Comma » 21*506 
Skhisma » 1*954 









9» 



Art. 3. — No recurrence of notes formed by taking intervals of Fifths, major f 
Thirds and Octaves is possible because no powers of the numbers §, f , 2, or of any 
combination of them, however often repeated, can produce a power of any single 
one of them. When we only proceed to 3 places of decimals of cents (then of 
course using multiples for powers), there would be a recurrence, but so remote that 
it would be practically at an infinite distance, and would after all only arise from 
our not having carried the decimals far enough. The nearest approximations of 
any practical value are given in arts. 4, 6, 9, 11, 12. 

Art. 4. — Four Fifths up and two Octaves down, together with a major Third 
down, give the comma (of Didymus ratio, 80 : 81, which is always intended when 
no qualification is added), that is, in cents, 

4 X 701*955 - 2 X 1200 - 386*314 - 21*506. 



Art. 5. — Consequently if we used Fifths di- precisely two Octaves more than an exact 

minished by the small but sensible interval of a major Third. These (for a reason given in 

quarter of a Comma, that is 701*955 - 1 x 21*506 art. 16) were called meantone Fifths, and were 

or 696*578 cents, four of these Fifths would be long in use. 



i32 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Art. 6. — Eight Fifthaup and also a major Third up, with five Octaves down, 
give the Skhisma, that is, in cents, 

8 X 701-965 + 386-314 - 5 x 1200 = 1-954. 
From this we can deduce two different usages. 



Art. 7. — If we employ Fifths diminished 
by the insensible interval of ^ x 1*954, or 
701-955 - '24425 «= 701*71075, eight of these 
Fifths added to a just major Third would give 
exactly five Octaves. These are the Fifths 
proposed suprii, p. 816a, and may hence be 
called Helmhoitz's. 

Art. 8. — But if we diminished the major 



Third by a Skhisma, giving 386-314 - 1-954 
=: 384*360 cents, which may be called a Skhismic 
major Third, then this major Third added to 
five Octaves will give exactly eight Fifths. This 
is the relation which Prof. Helmholtz pointed 
out (as existing, but not designed) in medieval 
Arabic scales, suprii, p. 281a, and vrill be called 
Skhismic. 



Art. 9. — ^Twelve Fifths up and seven Octaves down give the sum of a Comma 
fand a Skhisma, known as the Pythagorean Comma, that is, in cents, 

12 X 701-955 - 7 X 1200 = 23-460 « 21-506 + 1-954. 



Art. 10. — ^Hence if we used Fifths dimin- 
ished by the scarcely perceptible interval of 
xV X 23-460 =1-9550, or 701-955 -1-955 =700 
cents, twelve of these Fifths, known as equal 
Fifths, would give exactly seven Octaves. 
These are the Fifths now in general use. The 
amount subtracted, 1*95500, is very nearly the 



Skhisma, which, more fully calculated, has 
1-95S72 cents. The difference between these 
two intervals is far beyond aU powers of ap- 
preciation by any acoustical contrivance. The 
Skhisma wUl therefore be considered as the 
twelfth part of a Pythagorean CJomma, and 
also as the error of an equ^ Fifth. See p. S16d. 



Art. 11. — One Octave up and three major Thirds down give the difference 
hetween two Commas and a Skhisma, known as 'the Great Diesis,' that is, in 
cents, 

1200 - 3 X 386-314 =» 41 059 = 2 x 21-506 - 1-964. 

Art. 12. — Fifty-three Fifths up and thirty-one Octaves down give what may be 
"called* a Mercatorial, because on it depends the advantage arising from the use of 
Mercator's 53 division of the Octave. It is less than two Skhismas by about one- 
third of a cent, that is, in cents. 



53 X 701-955 - 31 x 12O0f- 3-615 - 2 x 1-954 - -293 



(5) 



Consequently, as ^ x 3-615 « '068, if we used Fifths which were too flat by this 
imperceptible interval, or had 701 -955 - -068 = 701 -887 cents (which may be called 
Mercator's Fifths, from their inventor), we should have precisely 53 Mercator's 
Fifths = 31 Octaves (6) 

On these relations depend all systems of temperament which are Vorth con- 
sideration. 

Art. 13. — Let us suppose that, measured in cents, in any system of temperament 

V represents the Fifth adopted, T the major Third adopted, and K and S the 

Comma and Skhisma adopted, so that K + S will correspond to the Pythagorean 

Comma, and 2 K - Sto the Great Diesis. Then as the four first relations must 

IT hold for these tempered intervals, and an Octave has 1200 cents, we must have 

from art. 9; 127 - 8400 = Z + S, whence V ^ 700 + ^ {K + S) 

from art. 11 ; 1200 - 3T « 2Z - iS, whence T = 400 - J (2Jr - S) 

And deducing the values of K and S from these equations, 

Z « 4F - T - 2400, which is the relation in art. 4, 
S » 8F + T - 6000, which is the relation in art. 6. 

So that there are only two independent equations connecting the four intervals 
V, Ty K, S. Hence, on assuming values for any two of them we may find cor- 
responding values for the other two. But no results are of any European interest 
unless V and T both approximate very closely to the just values 701*955 and 
386-314 cents. 

Art. 14. — ^There are two quite different kinds of temperament, the Linear and 
the Cyclic. The Linear contains an endless series of notes which never recur in 



SECT. A. 



ON TEMPERAMENT. 



438 



pitch. The Cyclic contains also an endless series of notes which, however, do 
recur in pitch, although usually under different names. Hence in Cyclic tempera- 
ments all the intervals are made up of aliquot parts of an Octave, or 1200 cents, 
which is not the case in Linear temperaments. In both of them the main object 
is to substitute a series of tempered Fifths for the several series of Fifths and 
major Thirds introduced, supr&, p. 276a, and exhibited at full in the Duodenariimi, 
infr&, sect. E. art. 18. The advantage of the Cyclic over the Linear temperaments 
consists chiefly in a power of endless modulation — a very questionable advantage 
when harmoniousness is sacrificed to it. 

Linear Tempbbamekts. 

Art 15. — The Pythagorean or Ancient Greek Temperament 

Assume 7=701-965 and Z^O. 

Then from art. 16, fif«12 F - 8400 « 23 460 r 

and T=400 + i . 5 =. 407 820 

« 386-314 + 21-606 



The major Thiid is a whole Comma too 
sharp, and hence this system is quite unfit for 
harmony. It was the theoretical Greek scale, 
and is still much used by violinists. See Gomu 
and Mercadier*s experiments, inM, sect. G. 
art. 6 and 7. The following are the 27 tones 



which this temperament would require for 
ordinary modulations, with the cents in the 
intervals from the lowest note, the logarithms 
of those interval ratios, and the pitch numbers 
toe' 264. 



Pythagorean Intonation, 



No. 
1 


Note 


Cents 


Log 



Pitch 


No. 


Note 


Cents 
611-7 


Log 
15346 


Pitch 


c' 





264-0 


15 


1, 


375-9 


2 


&'« 


28-5 


00589 


267-6 


16 


678-5 


17021 


390-7 


8 


4 


90-2 


02268 


278-1 


17 


^ 


702-0 


17609 


396-0 


4 


4 


118-7 


02852 


281-9 


18 


1* 


725-4 


18198 


401-4 


5 


.>b 


180*5 


04527 


298-0 


19 


792-2 


19873 


417-2 


6 


208-9 


05115 


2970 


20 


9'9 


815-6 


20461 


422-9 


7 


^'?t 


227-4 


05704 


801-1 


21 


nb 


882-4 


22136 


439-5 


8 


4 


294-1 


07879 


812-9 


22 


a' 


906-9 


22724 


445-5 


9 


d% 


817-6 


07967 


817-2 


23 


9'9ii 


929-3 


23313 


451-6 


10 


fb 


884-4 


09642 


829-6 


24 


bV 


996-1 


24988 


469-3 


11 


V 


407-8 


10231 


834-1 


25 


a't 


1019-6 


25576 


475-7 


12 


f 


498-0 


12494 


852-0 


26 


4 


1086-3 


27261 


494-4 


13 


n 


521-6 


13082 


856-8 


27 


y 


1109-8 


27840 


601-2 


14 


9'^ 


588-8 


14757 


370-8 


1' 


c" 


1200-0 


30108 


628-0 



f 



• 

These can he all exhibited and calculated as a series of 26 perfect Fifths up, 
namely, 

«bb «bb *bb> /b cb gb d^^b eh bb, fc g dae b, 



fb cb gbdbaheb bb, fc g da e 



f 



The 17 notes of the medieval Arabic scale (supr&, p. 281c') are those in the first 
line of this series, adding d\f\^ at the beginning, and omitting b at the end, with 
all the jt and M notes in the Table. 

Art. 16. — The Meantone Temperament, 

The major Thirds are assumed to be perfect, and the Comma is left out of 
accoxmt. Hence, 

T= 386-314, K^O. Whence by art. 13 
F- 696-578 as in art. 5, and S= -.41-059. 



Consequently the Second of the scale, which 
is always two Fifths less an Octave, will 
have 193-157 cents or be half a Comma or 
10*758 cents flatter than the just major Tone 
of 208*910 cents too flat, and hence by the 
same amount sharper than the just minor 



Tone of 182-404 cents. From this mean value 
of the Tone the temperament receives its 
name. This was the temperament which pre- 
vailed all over the Continent and in England 
for centuries, and for this, and the Pythagorean, 
our musical staff notation was invented, with 

WW 



434 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



a distinct difference of meaning between sharpe 
and flats, although that difference was differ- 
ent in each of the two cases. For the history 
of its invention see infr&, sect. N. No. 3. This 
temperament disappeared from pianofortes in 
England between 1840 and 1846. (See infri, 
sect. N. No. 4.) But at the Great Exhibition 
of 1861 all English organs were thus tuned. 
If carried out to 27 notes bearing the same 
names as in art. 15, but having the different 
values in the following table, it would prob- 
ably have still remained in use. Handel in 
his Foundling Hospital organ had 16 notes, 
tuned from cD^ to of in the series of Fifths in 
art. 15. Father Smith on Durham Cathedral 
and the Temple organ had 14 notes from a|^ to 
djj^ and the modem English concertina has 
the same compass and uses the same tem- 
ITperament, and the same number of notes. 
The only objection to this temperament was 
that the organ-builders, with rare exceptions, 
such as those just mentioned (see also d20c 
and note §), used only 12 notes to the Octave, 
e^ b\ffcgdae bjt^ejj^gjj^ The consequence 
was that in place of the chords a|^ c e}^^ f a^ 
c, &o., organists had to play gjt c e\f, j gjt c, 
where gjt was a Great Diesis (41*059 cents^^too 
flat, and the horrible effect was familiarly 



compared to the howling of ' wolves \ Simi- 
larly for 6 dji fk it was necessary to use b «rU 
fjL e\^ being a Great DiSsis too sharp, with 
similar excruciating effects. In modem music 
it is quite customary to use keys requiring 
more than two flats and three sharps, and 
hence this temperament was first styled ' un- 
equal' (whereas the organ, not the tempera- 
ment was — ^not unequal, hut— -defective) and 
then abandoned. But with the 27 notes here 
given there would have been nothing to o^id 
the ears of Handel and Mozart. At the {ire- 
sent day, ears accustomed to the sharp lead- 
ing note of the equal temperament (where b : cf 
has 100 cents) are shocked at the nat leading 
note of the meantone temperament when 6 : ef 
has 117*1 cents. But played with 27 or 36 
digitals on Mr. Bosanquet*s generalised key- 
board (Appendix XIX. and also XX. , sect. F. 
No. 8) it is the only temperament suitable to 
the organ. In my examination of 60 tempera- 
ments {Proc, Royal Soc,, vol. xiii. p. 404) I 
found that this was decidedly the beet for 
harmonic purposes. For simple melody per- 
haps the Pythagorean is preferred by violinists, 
but that was always absolutely impossible for 
harmony. 



Meantone Intonation. 





No. 


Notes. 


Cents 


Logs 


Handel 


Smart 


Helmholtz 


Durham 




1 


c' 










262*7 


269*1 


264-0 


288-6 




2 


CS 


76*1 


01908 


264*1 


272*0 


275-9 


296-8 


ir 


3 


^'t 


117*1 


02938 


270*4 


277-3 


282-5 


303-4 


4 


4if 


162*1 


08816 


i75-9 


282*9 


288-2 


309-6 




5 


d^ 


193*2 


04846 


282*6 


289-7 


295-2 


317-1 




6 


sy 


284*2 


06876 


289*3 


296*7 


302*2 


324-7 




7 


269*2 


06763 


295-2 


302*7 


308-4 


831-3 




8 


«> 


810*3 


07783 


302-8 


810-0 


816-8 


339-2 




9 


«' 


386*3 


09691 


316-9 


323-9 


830-0 


854-5 




10 


n 


427*4 


10721 


328*5 


381*7 


337-9 


368-0 




11 


»'9 


462*4 


11599 


330-1 


338-4 


844-8 


870-4 




12 


r 


608*4 


12629 


338*0 


846*6 


863-1 


379-2 




IS 


ft 


679*6 


14637 


363*2 


362*1 


369-0 


896-8 




14 


/'Iff 


620*6 


16667 


361*7 


370*8 


377*8 


405-8 




16 


666*5 


16444 


369-0 


378*4 


885*6 


414-1 




16 


9 


696*6 


17474 


377-9 


387*6 


894*8 


424*0 




17 


a' 


y )> 


787*6 


18604 


387-0 


396*8 


404*2 


484*S 




18 


t. 


f 


772*6 


19382 


894-9 


404*9 


412*5 


443-1 




19 


a' 


1 


813*7 


20412 


404-3 


414*6 


422*4 


463*7 




20 


^\ 


\t 


848*7 


21290 


412-6 


423-0 


481-0 


463-0 




21 


V 


889*7 


22320 


422*5 


483-2 


441-4 


474*1 


IT 


22 


*'bb 


930*8 


23360 


432-6 


443-6 


452-0 


485-5 


23 


4 


966*8 


24228 


441-5 


452-7 


461-2 


495*4 




24 


h% 


1006*8 


26268 


452-1 


463-6 


472*8 


607*8 




26 


h' 


1082*9 


27166 


472*4 


484-3 


493-5 


630*1 




26 


c'b 


1124*0 


28196 


483*7 


495*8 


605-3 


542-8 




27 


^% 


1158*9 


29073 


493-6 


506*4 


516*6 


658-9 




1' 


c'' 


1200*0 


30103 


605*4 


518*2 


528*0 


667*2 



On account of the great historical interest 
attaching to this temperament, I give the 
whole 27 notes, shewing their value in cents 
and logarithms, whence the pitch numbers 
can be calculated out for any pitch, and I 
have actually calculated them out for 4 pitches. 
That headed 'Handel' has A 422*5, the 
pitch of Handers own fork, the common 
pitch of Europe for two centuries (see infri, 
sect. H.>. The piano of the London Phil- 
harmonic Society was tuned to A 423*7 or 
very nearly this pitch when that Society was 



founded in 1813. But about 1828 Sir George 
Smart, the conductor of that Society*8 con- 
certs, raised the pitch to A 438*2, as I hi^e 
determined from his own fork, and colunm 
' Smart * gives the notes for this pitch. As 
Sir George considered the fork C 518 to corre- 
spond to his i4 433-2 (it is only *2 vib. too 
flat), he manifestly used meantone tempera- 
ment even so late as this, for the equal C to 
A 433*2 would have been much flatter, namely 
C 515-1. This was a very curious anticipa- 
tion of the French pitch of 1859. The next 



SECT. A. 



ON TEMPERAMENT. 



435 



pitch which takes Helmholtz's c' 264 for com- 
parison, gives a' 441*4, and Father Smith's 
pitch for the Hampton Court Palace organ, 
determined from an unaltered pipe, 1690, was 
a' 441*7. Hence this was a regular meantone 
pitch. The last column shews the extra- 
oidinarily high pitch used by Father Smith 
for the Durham Cathedral organ, determined 
from an original g'^ pipe, found with all the 
others by the orgaKist Dr. Armes and mea- 



sured by me. Now omitting Smart's pitch, 
which does not belong to the old organ period, 
a curious relation will be found to connect the 
othert hiee. Handel's c'^ is Belmholtz's c', 
and this pitch was therefore a * small Semi- 
tone ' of 76*1 cents sharper, and Handel's d! 
282-6 is practically the Durham c' 283*6, which 
was therefore a Tone of 198*2 cents sharper 
than Handel's pitch. 



Art. 17. — The Skhismic Temperament. 

The condition is that the Fifths should be perfect and the Skhisma should be 
disregarded. This gives 

7=701-955, S = 0, and hence by art. 13, jS"= 23*460, If 

T= 400 - I -S:= 384-360= 386*314 - 1-954 as in art. 8. 



That is the major Third is too flat by a 
Skhisma, whence the name of the tempera- 
ment (see supr&, p. 281a). The e£Fect of this 
fiat major Third is very good indeed. On 
looking at the Table in art. 15 we see that c' : f\f 
is such a major Third, and looking to the lists 

«bb ^bb ^bb /b ^b 9b ^b «b «b 

^b^b/ c g d a e b 
Having an English concertina (which has 14 
notes) tuned in perfect Fifths from ^j^ to c^ in 
the series in art. 15, 1 have been able to verify 
this result for six of the major Thirds, and to 
determine that although a <A e^ e gji b^ are 
horrible chords, a d\f e, e ak b are quite smooth 
and pleasant. The major Third c' : f]^ of art. 15 



of Fifths given below the Table, we see that 
fy is the eighth Fifth below c, which follows 
from art. 18 whenever S = 0. Hence gener- 
ally the notes in the top line will be major 
Thirds above those in the bottom line re- 
spectively — 

b^fcgdaeb /jfcj 

4 4 4 ^# **# ^ ^ 41 ^ j^4 

beats 16 times in 10 seconds, which is scarcely 
perceptible and far from disagreeable. But it 
is evident that if this system of tuning were 
adopted, a di£ferent musical notation would 
be necessary, and a convenient t3rpographical 
modification of Mr. Bosanquet's will be ex- 
plained on p. 438(2. 



Art. 18. — The HelmhoUzian Temperament. 

In this case the major Thirds are taken perfect, and the Skhisma is disregarded. 
Then by art. 13, 

K= 20-534= 21-506 -1072 
and F= 701-711 = 701-956 - 1 x 1-954 as in art. 7. 

The Comma and the Fifth are therefore imperceptibly flattened. In this case 
also the major Third would be the eighth Fifth down. And the same reason for 
altering the notation would hold as for art. 17. 

Art. 19. — In their endeavours to avoid the * wolves ' of meantone temperament 
musicians invented numerous really unequal temperaments, which it would be 
uncharitable to resuscitate. There is, however, a really practicable unequal 
temperament which I call Unequally Just, but it cannot well be explained till the 
Duodenarium has been developed. (See infr&, sect. E. art. 25.) I proceed, there- 
fore, to the consideration of the 

Cyclic Temperaments. 

Art. 20. — The Octave of 1200 cents being divided into different sets of aliquot 
parts called degrees, certain numbers of those degrees may approach to the value 
of the just Fifth 701*955 and major Third 386 314, and from these the whole scale 
may be constructed, each interval being more or less well represented by a certain 
number of degrees. There would then be this advantage, that the number of 
values of notes (whatever happened to their names) would be strictly limited by the 
number of degrees in the Octave, and hence values would recur, and the whole 
scale could always be expressed by a limited number of cyclic Fifths. 

Art. 21. — The equations for finding slich cycles may be immediately derived 
from those in art. 18, thus : 

Let m be the number of degrees, and n= 1200-^m be the number of cents in 
one degree, so that 1200=ww. Put V=nv, T^nt, K=nk, S^ns in the four 
equations art. 13, and divide out by n. Then 12v -Im^k + s, m-3^ = 2Ar-s, 
whence A: = 4t; - i - 2w, s = Sv-\-t- 6m. On assuming values for m, beginning at 
12, and putting first A; = 0, and then s = 1, 2, 3, &c., or - 1, - 2, - 3, &c., and next 

F F 2 



f 



436 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



A pp. XX. 



« = 0, and then A; « 1, 2, 3, or - 1, - 2, - 3, &c., we get the corresponding values of 
V and t, whence the scale. Most such scales would be useless. For practical 
tuning m should be small, and v : m, t : m should be nearly the ratios of the 
numbers of cents in the just Fifth and major Third to 1200 (or of the logarithms 
of their interval ratios to log 2 » *30103). Now the approximate values of 



are 1, 



3 7 



1200 



andof?§?:^areUi, 

1200 3 12' 28 



2' 5' 12' 53 
9 



31 JL 



10 - A 
~~31~* 



19 = 17A &e. 
59 53 ' 



Next take the Pythagorean major Third from art. 15. The approximate 
values of 

IT 407-810 1 1 17 ^ 18 A ^ 

'1200 """^ 2' 3' 50 ~ ~W *^- 

Finally, take the meantone Fifth from art. 16. The approximate values of 

696-578 1 1 4 5 9 14 23 . 
T200" ' 2' 5' T 12' 19' 3i' 

Art. 22. — These numbers suggest cycles of 12, 31, and 53 degrees. 



i. The cycle of 12 with a Fifth of 7 and a 
major Third of 4 degrees would imitate Pytha- 
gorean intonation well and just intonation in- 
differently. It is the equal temperament of 
to-day. Here w = 12, t? = 7, i = 4, A; = a = 0. 
In cents, one degree = 100, V = 700, T = 400, 
K=zS =0. See art. 26. 

ii. The c^cle of 81, with a Fifth of 23 and 
^ a major Third of 10 degrees would imitate 
meantone temperament very closely. It is the 
Harmonic Cycle of Huyghens. Here m s 81, 
i; = 18, t = 10, ^ = 0, « = - 1. In cents, one 
degree =88-710, F= 696-778, r= 387 -097, i:=0, 
S= - 38-710. 

iii. The cycle of 68, with a Fifth of 81 and 
a major Third of 18 degrees, is an extremely 
close approximation to Pythagorean tempera- 
ment. It is Mercator's cycle. Here m = 68, 
t) = dl, ^=18, ^=0, 8=1, In cents, one degree 
^22-642, 7=701-886, r= 407-647, X=0, 
S = 22-642. 

iv. The cycle of 68, with the same Fifth 
of 31, but a major Third of 17 degrees would 
give a sufficiently close approximation to just 



intonation. (See p. 328d.) As it seems to 
have been first supplied with a fingerboard 
by Mr. Bosanquet, it is properly called Bosan- 
quet*8 cycle, but as will be seen (infrit, sect. F. 
No. 9), Mr. J. Paul White has also invented 
a keyboard for it. Long previously to either 
Qen. T. Perronet Thompson used it extensively 
in his works on the Enharmonic OuUar and 
JuMt InUmation as a convenient approximation 
to just intonation, and from his works it was 
introduced into the Tonic Sol-fa books for the 
same purpose. Here m = 63, t) = 31, ^ «= 17, 
A; = 1, 8 = 0. In cents, one degree = 22*642, 
Fa 701-886, 2r=884-906. Observe that in 
art. 21, Skhismio F» 701-966 is only the im- 
perceptible interval -069 cents sharper, and 
Skhismic T = 384-360 is only the imperceptible 
interval -666 cents flatter. Hence Skhismic 
intonation and Bosanquet*s cycle are audibly 
interchangeable within the limits of a few 
keys. It is only when the modulation beyond 
63 degrees is required that the cyclic intona- 
tion has the advantage. See art. 27. 



Art. 23. — Besides these the following temperaments have been at least proposed. 
if They chiefly depend upon assigning imaginary or arbitrary evaluations of the ratio of 
a Tone to a Semitone, the Comma being neglected, and the Octave supposed to con- 
sist of 5 Tones and 2 Semitones, so that if Tone : Semitone «2) : q, the number of 
degrees of the cycle will be 5p + 2g, and v = 3j? + g, t = 2p, fc « 0, 2^ - s, the Diesis 
= - 5 variable. This applies to all temperaments where K== 0, thus (art. 22) in i., 
jp : g = 2 : 1 ; in ii., ^ : g = 6 : 3 ; in iiL, jp : 2 = 9 : 4. 



We thus obtain, among others, 

V. Woolhouse's cycle of 19, ^ : g = 3 : 2, 
t?=ll, i=6, fc=0, «= -l,2fc-a=l. In cents, 
one degree = 6316, V = 694-76, T = 378-96. 

vi. Chevy's cycle of 29, jp : g = 6 : 2, « = 17, 
^ = 10, fe=0, «=1, 2*-«= -1. In cents, one 
degree = 41-380, V = 708-460, T = 413-80. 

vii. Sauveur*s cycle of 43 m^rides, p:q 
=7:4, v=26, < = 14, ^=0, s= - 1, 2fc-«=l. 
In cents, one degree = 27-907, 7=697*674, 
T= 390-698. 

viii. The Musician's cycle of 66, in 1766, 



according to Sauveur and Est^ve, p : $ » 9 : 5, 
tj=32, 4=18, fe=0,«=-l,2/c-»=l. Incents, 
onedegiee = 21-818, 7 » 698-176, T « 892-724. 

ix. Henfling's cycle of 60, in 1710, p : q 
=8:6, t? = 29, i=16, fc=0, «=-2. In cents, 
one degree = 24, F=696, T = 384, ir = 0, 
S = - 48. 

Both Fifth and Third are much too flat 
in V. and too sharp in vi. Both vii. and viii 
were decent approximations, and convenient 
on paper. It would not have been worth 
while to produce them on instruments. 



SECT. A. 



ON TEMPERAMENT. 



437 



Art. 24. — But paper cycles are sometimes extremely useful for the purposes of 
calculation, as in the following cases. 



X. Cycle of 80108 jots (de Morgan's name), 
t; = 17609, t = 9691, k = 689, a = 48, 2fc - « 
B 1080. In cents, one degree = -089868, 

V = 701-950, T = 886-8186, K = 21-4862, 8 = 
1-91848. 

This is therefore an exceedingly accurate 
representation of just intonation. It is 
derived from 10000 x log 2, using 6 place 
logarithms, and the only reason for the differ- 
ences from just intonation is that it is taken 
strictly to the nearest integer. Thus 10000 x 
log $ = 17609-18, and this would have made 

V correct. Mr. John Curwen used this in his 
Musical StaticSf to avoid logarithms. 

xi. Cycle of 8010 degrees, t; = 1761, t = 969, 
A = 66, « = 7, 2Aj - » = 108. In cents, one de- 
gree = -89871. V = 702-060, T = 886-8186, K = 
21-9269, S = 2-7907. This is derived from 
1000 X log 2 to 4 places, and is consequently 
not quite so accurate as the last. 

ni. Cycle of 801 degrees, v = 176, t = 97, 
A; = 5, 8 = 0, 2Xc - s = 10. In cents, one degree = 
3-9866, y=701-661, r=886-711, JE:=19-98866, 
5 = 0. 

This was the cycle used by Sauveur {M^m. 
de VAcadSmie, 1701, p. 810) as a finer division 
than was given by his cycle of 48 m^rides (see 
vii.). As 801=7 x 48, he called each degree a 
heptam^ride, which he made = -08987 of an 
(equal) Semitone. He also gives a rule for 
finding the number of heptam^rides in any 
interval under 6:7 = 267 cents, which is the 
equivalent of my rule for finding cents (infrd, 
sect. C, I. 4, note), only my rule extends to 
498 cents. Sauveur's rule is : multiply 876 by 
the ^fferences of the interval numbers and 



divide by their sum. For 6 : 7, this gives 67 

7 
heptam^rides, and as log ^ = *067 to three 

places, this is correct. It is the earliest in- 
stance I have met with of the bimodular 
method of finding logarithms. Sauveur*s 876 
is an augmented bimodulus for 869, for the 
same reason as I selected 8477 in place of 
8462, p. 447c'. 

I have here taken the values of v and t as 
they ought to be, but judging by vii. Sauveur 
took V = 176 and i = 98, and hence got the 
results there given, which agree better with 
meantone intonation. IT 

Observe that the Helmholtzdan F» 701-711 
\s only -060 cents, or imperceptibly larger, and 
the cyclic T is only -897 cents, also imper- 
ceptibly larger than just. Hence the Helm- 
holtzian intonation and Sauveur's cycle of 801 
are interchangeable within 801 degrees. 

xiii. Cycle of 1200, or the Centesimal Cycle. 
If we refrain from using decimals of cents, we 
recJly use a cycle where one degree = 1 cent, 
t7=F==702, t=r=886, A;=Z^=22, « = fif=2, 
2k " 8 = 42. These are quite imperceptibly 
different from the just for a single key, but 
when modulation is extended, the relative 
value of distant notes to the starting note will 
be slightly altered. See infr&, art. 28. In the 
body of this work and after this section 
* cyclic cents,* as they may be called, will be 
used, unless accumulated fractions of a cent 
become sensible. But in the investigation of IT 
this section it was necessary to shew differ- 
ences much more minute than a single cent. 



Art. 25. — ^The only cycles requiring further attention, then, are i., the Equal, 
and iv., Bosanquet's. The method of tuning Equal Temperament is given inirk 
sect. G. art. 10. The pitch of the notes used is very variable. Six principal 
pitches are tabulated below. 



Equal Intonation. 











Italian 


French 


Scheibler's 


Society 


English 


Schnitger, 


No. 


Notes 


Cents 


Logs 


MUitary 


Normal 


Statt^[ardt 


of Arts 


Band 


1688 










L 


ii. 


Ul. 


IV. 

264-0 


V. 


VI, 


1 


c' 








266-9 


268-6 


261-6 


268-76 


290-9 


2 


i* 


100 


02609 


271-1 


274-0 


277-2 


279-7 


284-7 


808-2 


8 


200 


06017 


287-3 


290-8 


293-7 


296-3 


301-7 


326-4 


4 


P 


800 


07626 


804-3 


807-6 


811-1 


314-0 


319-6 


846-9 


6 


400 


10084 


822-4 


326-9 


829-6 


332-6 


388-6 


366-5 


6 


f ^ 


600 


12648 


841-6 


346-3 


849-2 


362-4 


358*8 


388-8 


7 


«7 '! 


600 


16062 


861-9 


366-8 


870-0 


378-4 


380-1 


411-4 


8 


700 


17660 


383-4 


387-6 


892-0 


895-6 


402-7 


436-8 


9 


'■ 


800 


20069 


406-2 


410-6 


415-3 


419-1 


426-6 


461-8 


10 


900 


22677 


430-4 


436-0 


440-0 


4440 


462-0 


489-2 


11 


?« 


1000 


26086 


456-0 


460-9 


466-2 


470-4 


478-9 


618-3 


12 


1100 


27694 


483-1 


488-3 


493-9 


498-4 


607-4 


649.1 


1' 


c" 


1200 


30108 


611-8 


617-2 


623-2 


628-0 


637-6 


581-d 



v 



i. The pitch officially adopted for Italian 
military bands in August 1884. The standard 
was a B^466, because B)^ can be produced 
on the brass instruments without using the 
valves. It is really the nearest approach in 
whole numbers to the old arithmetical pitch 
of c"512. 

ii. French diapason normal intentionally 



a'436, giving equal c"617*3, is practically the 
same as Smart*s pitch, which is the lowest 
that has been used for equal temperament in 
England, and was contemporary with its in- 
troduction there. On 19 March 1885 this was 
also officially adopted as the pitch of Belgian 
military bands, which had hitherto used 
X461'7, or say il462, as given in col. v. 



438 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



iii. Scheibler's pitch, proposed at Stutt- 
gardt, often called the German pitch, having 
^440. 

iv. The pitch proposed by the Society of 
Arts, known in Germany as Bnglish pitch, 
having c"528, and a'444. Unfortunately the 
original fork tuned for the Society of Arts by 
Griesbach proved to be c"584*i6, equivalent to 
equal a'449*4, and commercial copies vary from 
c"638-3 to c"636-5. 

Helmholtz's just c"528 a'440, may be con- 
sidered as represented by iii. and iv. jointly. 



v. The highest usual English pitch, known 
as * band pitch,* or * Kneller Hall pitch/ to 
which military brass instruments are tuned in 
England, adopted as the pitch of musical in- 
struments at the International Inventions and 
Music Exhibition, London, 1885. 

vi. The original pitch of the St. Jacobi 
organ at Hamburg built by Schnitger 1688, 
the oldest as well as the sharpest example of 
e^ual temperament I have found. On these 
pitches, see the abstract of my History of 
Mtuical Pitchf infr4, sect. H. 



Art. 26.— The notation of music (see art. 16) was adapted to either the 
Pythagorean or Meantone intonation, in which there was a Diesis or interval 
between a sharp and a flat, not to the equal where the Diesis disappears and sharp 
coalesces with flat. In the table only the sharps are noted as usual, but they 
IT imply flats. If we arrange the notes in three lines, in the same order of Fifths as 
in art. 15, but continue them to 36 tones, we shall have 

g\>b ^bb »bb «bb ^bb /b cb gb ^b «b «b ^b 

F C G DA E B F% Cjt ok Di Aj^ 

^S ^S /SS ^^SS QMi (*Wf (*SSf 6TsK trSSL nrlS cSSjI (tSSa 

TT Ti •'trtr tTrT •'Tm tTTT Trfr tm W •'ITTnT trim •^tTTTtr 

The middle line indicates the ordinary notes, but those in the upper and lower 
line are (at least from abb to ^) occasionally met with in modulations. Now the 
three notes in each column have the same meaning precisely in equal tempera- 
ment. They are absolutely identical. But in the Pythagorean and Meantone tem- 
peraments they have three different meanings, as shewn in the tables of arts. 
15 and 16. This confusion arises from equal temperament being cyclic. If we 
begin at F and proceed by Fifths to Ai we have exhausted all our 12 values. 
The Fifth above ilj is played by F^ but it would be considered * bad spelling ' to 
write it so, for &b ^f ^^ called a Fifth, and a| to/ a diminished Sixth, although they 

IT make the same interval precisely. This arises from history. It has been pro- 
posed to alter the notation, but the objections to changing are so great that the 
matter is mentioned here chiefly to explain how the apparently absurd synonymity 
of equal temperament arose, and also because this synonymity is a cardinal point 
in Mr. Bosanquet's notation. 

Art. 27. — In Mr. Bosanquet's cycle, art. 22, iv., there are 53 notes to be supplied 
with names, and moreover after the 53 notes have been exhausted the values 
recur, but, if the old notation is to be in any way preserved, the old names do not 
recur. Hence there will be here also another and a different kind of synonymity, 
which will affect the position of the notes. In the following tables I have first 
arranged the notes by Fifths and then by regular ascent. The large letters may 
be considered regular. They are each supposed to have all the synonyms of equal 
temperament already explained, and hence are written only as the line of capitals 
in art. 26. They are divided into * sets ' of 12, each set being distinguished by a 
superior or inferior number, because each is one degree (22*642 cents, and hence 
very nearly a real Comma of 21-506 cents) sharper or flatter respectively. Under 

f these capital letters is written the number of the note in the cycle according to 
Mr. Bosanquet's arrangement, dictated by practical convenience in performance. 
Now there are 12 notes in each line, and hence after 4 lines and 5 Fifths, indicated 
by II, we have exhausted all the 53 values. The names of the letters are, however, 
continued on the same plan, but they are now synonymous with those at the 
beginning of the series, and hence the name of the 54th Fifth, or F^, numbered 
27, is written in small letters under the first note FjL which is also numbered 
27, and the series after F^ in capitals is written after /^ in small letters. These 
small letters have the same value as the large ones above them. This synonymity 
forms the chief difficulty of the instrument when modulations oblige the player 
to proceed beyond the first 53 notes. For this reason, partly, Mr. Bosanquet has 
in practice extended his keyboard to contain 7 sets or 84 notes. The inferior and 
superior numbers are my typographical contrivances, not Mr. Bosanquet's. He 
uses sloping lines like those supr£, p. 220c, last bar, ascending for my superiors, 
descending for my inferiors, and repeated twice, three times, &c., for my 2, 3, 
&c. These are very convenient in musical notation, and, on account of using the 



SKCT. A. 



ON TEMPERAMENT. 



439 



equal temperament synonyms, are the only alterations required to adapt ordinary 
music for performance on this cycle. 

Mr, Bosanquet's Notes — in Fifths. 



^4 


<^4 


g4 


2)4 


^4 


i^. 


C, 


o. 


i). 


^ 


E, 


B» 


27^ 


6^ 


86^ 


ir 


4ir 


28 


1 


32, 


^ 


41 


19 


80 


P 


ci 


ir^ 


d^ 


ai 


el 


61 


/I 


4 


4 


4 


^4 


^4 


g4 


d4 


^4 


^a 


C, 


G, 


D. 


4. 


s. 


B. 


2fir 


6^ 


87^ 


16^ 


46^ 


24 


2 


83.. 


11 


^2, 


2P. 


51 


P 


c« 


f 


d» 


a* 


«> 


&* 


n 


4 


4 


4 


4 


^4 


^1 


^4 


A# 


^ 


F^ 


Ci 


Ox 


A 


^, 


JB, 


Bi 


29r 


7^ 


88^ 


16^ 


47^ 


25 


8 


^ 


1^. 


43 


21, 


52 


f 


c» 


<?• 


d» 


a» 


e' 


6» 


4 


4 


d^ 


4 


n 


^ 


^# 


^t 


^ 


^ 


C 


o 


D 


il 


JS7 


£ 


80 


8^ 


89^ 


17^ 


48^ 


26 


4 


85 


18 


44 


22 


53^ 


f* 


c* 


9* 


d* 


o* 


e* 


6* 


/I 


c*! 


gi 


^1 


4 


^t 


0^1 


G»| 


Dijf 


^1 


F» 


Ci 


Gi 


2>i 


A^ 


JKi 


Bi 


31'^ 


9 ^ 


40^ 


is'^ 


49^ 


27 


5 


86 


14 


45 


28 


1 


P 


c» 


Sf» 


d» 


a» 


•» 


6» 


/^ 


c^ 


^ 


d^ 


-1 


^ 


^ 


^ 


^1 


^1 


F* 


0« 


G" 


D* 


4« 


E^ 


B* 


32^ 


10^ 


41^^ 


19^^ 


60^ 


28 


6 


87, 


15 


46 


24 


2 


P 


c« 


1?* 


£j« 


a« 


*• 


6« 


/'# 


4 


9'$ 


4 


4 



1 



ifr. Bosanquet's Cycle of 53. 



Cyclic 
Nos. 



1 
2 
8 
4 
5 
6 
7 
8 
9 

10 
11 
12 
18 
14 
15 
16 
17 
18 

19 
20 
21 
22 
28 
24 
25 
26 
27 



Names and 
Synonyms 



O, 6» 

Oi 6» 
C 6* 






6» 
6« 



D 

5Jfd» c'Jf 

E, d^d^ 
E^ d^ 

e\ d^ 

E d% 
F^ e^ d% 

F e* 

FJtP «* 



Cents 



1182-1 

1154-7 

1177-4 

1200=0 

22-6 

45-8 

67-9 

90-6 

118-2 

185-8 
158-5 
181-1 
208-8 
226-4 
249-1 
271-7 
294-8 
817-0 

889-6 
862-8 
884-9 
407-5 
480-2 
452-8 
475-5 
498-1 
520-8 



Logs 



28899 
28967 
29585 

00568 
01186 
01704 
02272 
02840 

08408 
08976 
04544 
05112 
05680 
06248 
06816 
07884 
07952 

08520 
09088 
09656 
10224 
10792 
11860 
11905 
12496 
18064 



Pitch 
Nnmbers 



507-69 
514-87 
521-14 
26400 
267-48 
271-00 
274-56 
278-18 
281-84 

285-55 
289-81 
29812 
297-00 
800-89 
804-85 
808-86 
812-98 
817-05 

821-22 
825-45 
829-78 
884-07 
888-47 
842-98 
847-44 
852-01 
856-65 



Cyclic 
Nos. 



28 
29 
80 
81 
82 
88 
84 
85 
86 

87 
88 
89 
40 
41 
42 
48 
44 
45 

46 
47 
48 
49 
50 
51 
52 
58 
1' 



Names and 
Sjmonyms 




e^ 



P 



Pi 
P» 



9" 



9^ 

9'% 



a' 



Cents 


Logs 


Pitch 
Numbers 

861-84 


548*4 


13682 


566-0 


14200 


36610 


588-7 


14768 


370-92 


611-8 


15385 


375-80 


684-0 


15903 


380-75 


656-6 


16471 


885-76 


679-2 


17089 


890-84 


701-9 


17607 


395-98 


724-5 


18175 


401-19 


747-2 


18744 


406-48 


769-8 


19311 


411-83 


792-5 


19879 


417-25 


815-1 


20447 


422-74 


887-7 


21015 


428-81 


860-4 


21583 


483-95 


888-0 


22151 


439-66 


905-7 


22719 


445-45 


928-8 


28287 


451*81 


950-9 


28855 


457-25 


978-6 


24423 


468-27 


996-2 


24991 


469-37 


1018-9 


25559 


475-55 


1041-5 


26127 


481-81 


1064-2 


26695 


488-15 


1086-8 


27263 


494-58 


1109-4 


27831 


501-09 


1182-1 


28399 


507-09 



ir 



n 



Art. 28. — The cycle of 1200 is especially used for indicating the relations of 
just notes and the mode in which the notes of tempered and inharmonic scales 
generally fit in among these just notes. The series of 117 just notes to the Octave 
is developed in sect. E. infr&, and the value of each note is given {ibid. art. 18) by 
the numbers of the corresponding note in the cycles of 53 and 1200. The number 
in the cycle of 53, by means of the table in art. 27» gives all the information 
required as to these substitutes, including Mr. Bosanquet's names, which are 
different from those assigned to just intonation on the principles of Chap. XIV. 
pp. 2766 to 277a. To shew the difference between cyclic and just cents the 
following table is added, in which all the names of the 117 just notes in the 



440 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. 



Duodenarium of sect. E. p. 463, are placed in alphabetical order for easy reference, 
with their cyclic and just cents, logarithms, and pitch. ' It must be remembered 
that the inferior and superior numbers in this table refer to differences of a Comma 
of 22 cyclic cents, or one of 21 '6 just cents, and in that of the cycle of 53 on p. 439, 
to a degree of 22*6 cents, hence ^e same name has distinctly different meanings. 
Thus Bosanquet's No. 5, or Cjj^ = c\ has 22*6 cents, and just c^ has 21*5 cents» 
which agrees well with 22*6, but just CJ| has 49*2 cents and agrees more nearly 
with BotNuiquet's No. 6, or C^ with 45'F cents. 



Expression of Just Intonation in the Cycle of 1200. 



Note 



A* 



Cyclic 
Cents 



Just 
Oenta 




905*9 
927*4 
-884-4 
862-9 
998*0 
976-6 
9661 
1068-7 
1047-2 
792-0 
818-7 
885-2 
721-5 
748-0 
764-5 
660-8 
1109-8 
1068-3 
1066-8 
1180-4 
1158-9 
1187-4 
72-5 
60-4 
9961 
1017-6 
1089-1 
1908-9 
925-4 
946-9 
968-4 
1838*2 
854-7 

21-5 
1178-5 
118-7 
92-2 
70-7 
49*2 
184-4 
162-9 
141*3 
255-0 
1107-8 
429-3 
1150-0 
1037-1 
1058-7 
945-0 
203-9 
225-4 
182-4 
296-1 
274-6 
263-1 
366-8 
345-3 
458-9 



Log» 



22724 
28264 
22185 
21645 
26087 
24497 
28958 
26809 
26270 
19873 
20412 
20952 
18100 
18689 
19179 
16327 
27840 
27300 
26761 
29613 
29078 
28584 
01822 
01282 
24988 
25527 
26067 
22676 
23216 
23764 
24294 
20902 
21442 

00640 
29564 
02862 
02312 
01770 
01238 
04625 
04085 
03546 
06398 
27791 
28330 
28870 
26018 
26567 
23706 
05115 
05666 
04676 
07427 
06888 
06349 
09201 
08661 
11513 



Pitch 



445-5 

451-1 

440-0 

434-6 

469-9 

464-1 

458-3 

480-4 

488-4 

417-2 

422-4 

427-7 

400*5 

406-5 

410-6 

384-5 

501-2 

495-0 

488-9 

5221 

515-6 

509-3 

275-3 

271-8 

469-3 

476-2 

481-1 

446-0 

460-6 

466-2 

461-9 

427-2 

482-5 

264-0 

267-8 

521-6 

281-9 

278-4 

275-0 

271-6 

293-7 

290-0 

286-6 

305-9 

600-6 

506-9 

513-2 

480-7 

486-6 

456-7 

297-0 

300*7 

293*3 

313-2 

809-4 

305-6 

326-3 

322-3 

344-1 



Note 



Z?» 



Cyclic 
Cents 



m 



90 
112 
184 
156 
20 
42 
64 
1150 
408 
886 
864 
500 
478 
456 
434 
570 
548 
294 
316 
338 
224 
246 
268 
182 
154 
498 
520 
542 
476 
612 
590 
568 
682 
660 
638 
762 
406 
428 
460 
836 
358 
702 
724 
630 
794 
772 
750 
886 
864 
842 
956 
610 
632 
654 
518 
540 
662 
448 



Just 
Cents 



90-2 
111-7 
132-5 
154-7 
19-6 
41-1 
62-6 
1148-9 
407-8 
886-3 
864-8 
500-0 
478-5 
457-0 
435-6 
570-7 
549-2 
294-1 
816-6 
8371 
223-5 
245-0 
266-6 
131-8 
152-8 
496-0 
519-6 
541-1 
476*5 
611*7 
590-2 
668-7 
682-4 
660*9 
639-4 
753-1 
405-9 
427*4 
448-9 
885-2 
356-7 
702-0 
723-6 
680-4 
794-1 
772-6 
761-1 
886-3 
864-8 
843-3 
957-0 
609-8 
631-3 
662-8 
517-6 
539-1 
560-6 
446-9 



Logs 



02263 

02803 

03342 

03882 

00490 

01080 

01669 

28821 

10231 

09691 

09152 

12542 

12003 

11464 

10924 

14316 

13776 

07379 

07918 

08458 

05606 

06145 

06688 

03293 

03833 

12493 

13088 

13573 

11954 

16846 

14806 

14267 

17119 

16679 

16040 

18892 

10181 

10721 

11261 

08409 

08948 

17609 

18149 

17070 

19922 

19382 

18843 

22234 

21694 

21166 

24007 

16297 

15836 

16376 

12984 

13524 

14063 

11210 



Pitch 



278-1 

281-6 

285-0 

288-7 

267-0 

270-3 

273-7 

512-6 

334-1 

330K) 

825-9 

352-4 

348-0 

343-8 

339-5 

367*7 

362-6 

312-9 

316-8 

820-8 

300-4 

304-1 

307-9 

284-8 

288-4 

852-0 

856-4 

360*9 

847-7 

375-9 

371-3 

366-7 

391-6 

386-7 

381-9 

407-9 

833-7 

887-9 

842-1 

820-4 

324-4 

396-0 

401-0 

891-1 

417*7 

412-5 

407-2 

440-5 

435-1 

429-7 

458-9 

375-5 

380-2 

384-9 

356-0 

860-4 

365-0 

841-8 



SECT. B. 



ON THE DETERMINATION OF PITOH NUMBERS. 



441 



If it is wished to introduce the series of 
natural harmonic Sevenths as in Poole (infr&, 
sect. F. No. 7), X being any note, ^ X will have 
the number of X in Bosanquet's cycle dimin- 
ished by 1, the cyclic cents of X diminished 
by 27, the just cents of X by 27'S, the log of 
X by *00584» and the pitch number of X by ^ 
of its value. Thus A has Bosanquet^s number 
44, cyclic cents 906, just cents 905*9, log *22724, 



and pitch number 445 '5. Then ior'^ A, Bosan- 
quet*8 number is 43 (having 888 cents, log 
'22151, pitch number 489*7), the cyclic cents 
are 906 - 27 = 679, the just cents 905*9 - 27*8 
= 878-6. log = -22724 - -00684 = -22140, the 
pitch number = 445*5 - 1^ x 445*5 = 445-5 - 6*96 
= 488*5, shewing that Bosanquet's substitute 
is a trifle too sharp. 



Art. 29. — ^Those who require more information are referred to my paper on 
'Temperament,* Proc, B. S., vol. xiii. pp. 404-422 (where the subject is treated 
more in detail and in an entirely dififerent manner), and to the memoirs and 
essays of Salinas, Zarlino, Huyghens, Sauveur, Henflins, B. Smith, Marpurg, 
Est6ve, Cavallo, Bomieu, Lambert, T. Young, Bobison, Farey, Delezenne, Wool- 
house, De Morgan, Drobisch, Naumann, there cited. Also to Mr. Bosanquet's 
treatise on Musical Intervals and Temperament, 1876, to his papers on * Tempera- IT 
ment ' in the Proc. of the Musical Association, first year, pp. 4-17, 112-54, and his 
article on * Temperament ' in Stainer and Barrett's Dictionary of Musical Terms. 
Also to Mr. Lecky's article on ' Temperament ' in Grove's Dictiona/ry of Music. 

SECTION B. 

ON THE DBTEBMINATION 07 PITCH NUMBBBS. 

(See notes pp. 11, 66, 168, 176.) 



No. 

1. The String (Euler and Bemouilli, Thomp- 

son, Grieshach, Delezenne), p. 441. 

2. The Siren, p. 442. 

8. Optical Method (McLeod and Clarke), p. 442. 
4. Electrical Methods (Mayer, Glazehrook), 
p. 442. 



No. 



5. The Clook (Eoenig, Lord Rayleigh), p. 442. 

6. Harmonium Beeds (Appunn, Lord Ray- 

leigh), p. 443. 

7. Tuning-forks (Soheihler), how to form and 

use a tuning-fork tonometer, p. 448. 



The determination of the pitch number of any note heard is a very difficult 
problem to solve. The following methods have been used. % 

1. The String. Supposing that a heavy string of uniform density, perfect elas- 
ticity, of no thickness, but capable of bearing a considerable strain, could have its 
vibrating length determined with perfect accuracy — none of which conditions 
can be more than roughly fulfilled — then the pitch numbers of its parts would be 
inversely proportional to their lengths. The formula has been worked out by 
Euler and Bemouilli, and amounts to this. 

Let L be the vibrating length of a suspended string in English inches, I the 
same in French millimetres, W the stretching weight in any unit, w the weight of 
the vibrating length of the string in the same unit, V the pitch number. Then 

2 log F = 1-98485 + log TF - (log w + log L) 
=: 3-38968 + log W - (log w + log I). 

This was used for careful measures by Euler, Dr. Bobert Smith, Marpurg, 
Fischer, and De Prony. Probably on account of the necessary thickness of the 
string the results could not be trusted within 5 vib. IT 



The work is also extremely difficult, and 
depends ultimately on determining a unison 
between two tones of very different qualities. 
General T. Perronet Thompson used such an 
instrument for tuning his organ (described in 
Ju8t Intonation, 7th ed. p. 69). As his string 
was No. 20 (1*165 mm. in diam.) no reliance 
could be placed on the perfect exactness of his 
results. Mr. J. H. Grieshach in 1860 tuned a 
string 5*17 mm. in diam. till one quarter 
of its length was in unison with a given note, 
and then counted the vibrations of the whole 
string automatically. The instrument is in 
the South Kensington Museum, and was de- 
scribed in the Journal of the Society of Arts, 
6 April 1860, p. 353. The results were 3 to 6 
vibrations wrong. 

Delezenne {MSm, de la Soc, des Sciences a 



Lille, 1854, p. 1) made the best use of the 
string. He stretched 700 millimetres of wire 
on a violoncello body, and tuned it to Mar- 
loye's 128 vib. (which was probably accurate, 
as Marloye*s 256 vib. certainly was), and 
then by a movable bridge cut off the length, 
which when bowed was in unison with the 
fork. This fork had been adjusted bv slid- 
ing weights to the pitch of a note heard. 
Then measuring this length in millimetres, he 
divided 128 x 700 = 89,600 by it, to find the vib. 
This assumed that lengths were inversely as 
the vib. or pitch numbers. But he found that 
the same fork was in unison with 208-8 mm. 
of a string '6154 mm. thick, and 198*9 mm. 
of a wire *1280 mm. thick. The former gave 
439*6, the latter 450*5 vib. The thick wire 
therefore gave a pitch 42 cents flatter than 



442 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APr. XX. 



the thin. Henoe he confined his observations 
to the thinnest wire that would bear the strain. 
In conjunction with Mr. Hipkins of Broad- 
woods' and the foreman tuner, Mr. Hartan, 
I made some experiments on 2 April 1885 
with the monoohord at Broadwoods*, haying 
a string of *98 mm. in thickness. Nineteen 
tuning-forks about 20 vib. apart, with pitches 
from 223-77 to 578*40 vib. accurately known, 
were brouffht into unison with lengths of the 
monoohora limited by a movable bridge touch- 
ing, but sliding easily under the string, which 



was pressed down on it by a knife-edge. The 
intervals between the lowest and each of the 
other forks, and the longest and each of the 
other lengths (assuming them to be inversely 
as the number of vibrations), were calculated 
in cents. The former were generally sharper 
by the following cents, the minus sign shew- 
ing when they were flatter: 07618 39-^ 
2232291118955-^-4. These imgnlar 
differences demonstrate that such a monochozd 
gives very uncertain results, even when the 
unisons are estimated by veiy sensitive ears. 



2. The Siren. This has been described in the text, p. 12. But only the most 
carefully constructed sirens with bellows of constant pressure, as that described in 
App. I., or the ' Soufflerie de precision ' of M. Gavaill^-Coll, worked by well prac- 
tised operators, can give good results. Here also a unison between tones of very 

IT different qualities, one of which is fixed and the other variable, has to be deter- 
mined. The best work that I know with the siren was that done by M. Lissajous 
(who used M. Cavaill^-Goirs bellows, as the latter tells me) in determining the 
pitch of the ' Diapason Normal ' at Paris, which was meant to give 435 vib. at 
16^ = 69° R, and actuaUy gave 436-45 vib. 

3. The Optical Method of Professor Herbert McLeod, F.B.8., and Lieut. R G. 
Clarke, RE. {Proceedings ofBoyal Society, Jan. 1879, vol. xxviii. p. 291, and Philo- 
sophical Transactions, vol. dzxi. pp. 1-14, plates 1 to 3), consisted in viewing white 
lines on a rotating cylinder through the shadow of a vibrating fork. The machine 
is difficult to manipulate, but in the hands of its inventors gave extremely accurate 
results. 

4. The Electographic Method, invented by Prof. A. Mayer, of Stevens Institute, 
Hoboken, New Jersey, U.S., consisted in causing a tuning-fork by means of a 
copper-foil point to scribe its vibrations on the camphor-smoked paper cover of a 
brass rotating cylinder^ and marking seconds by passing a strong induction spark 
through the fork, scribing point, and paper cover at the passage of a seconds pen- 

IT dulum through a spot of mercury, and then counting the sinuosities at leisure. 
The weight of the scribing point had to be allowed for, but the results were very 
accurate. 

For another means of determining the frequency of a fork used as an inter- 
rupter of electricity, see Mr. B. T. Glazebrook's paper in PhilosophiccU Magazine, 
Aug. 1884, vol. xviii. pp. 98-105. 

5. The Clock Dr. Koenig (in Wiedemann's, late Puggendorff's Annals, 1880, 
pp. 394-417) describes a large tuning-fork having the pitch number 64, which was 
made to act on a clock at a constant temperature of 20"" C. => 68'' F., functioning as 
a pendulum, so that every single vibration was registered for many hours, and he 
was thus enabled to determine one standard pitch with extreme accuracy. He also 
found from this that his old well-known forks of nominally 256 double vib. had been 
tuned at too high a temperature, and at 20" C. gave 256 1774, and at 15° G. =s 59** F., 
256*28 d. vib. He also determined the pitch of the Diapason Normal at 15*" G. as 
436 '45 d. vib. A rise in temperature of 1° F. flattens tuning-forks by 1 vib. in 

f from 16,000 (Koenig) or 20,000 (Scheibler) or 22,000 (Mayer) double vibrations in 
a second (see my ' Notes of Observations on Musical Beats,' Proc, B. S., 28 May 
1880, vol. XXX. p. 523), and flattens harmonium reeds by about 1 in 10,000 vib. 
(See my paper * On the Influence of Temperature on the Musical Pitch of Har- 
monium Beeds.' Proc, B, S., Jan. 1881, p. 413.) 



Lord Bay leigh {Philosophical Transacticms, 
1888, Part I., pp. 316-d21) desoribes another 
method of determining the frequency of a 
standard fork by means of a clock. * The ob- 
server looking over a plate carried by the upper 
prong of the fork [of intentionally 82 vib.] ob- 
tained 82 views per second, i.e. 64 views of 
the pendulum, in one complete vibration. The 
immediate subject of observation is a silvered 
bead attached to the bottom of the pendulum, 
upon which as it passes the position of equili- 
brium the light of a paraffin lamp is concen- 
trated. Close in front of the pendulum is 



placed a screen perforated by a somewhat 
narrow vertical slit. If the period of the pen- 
dulum were a precise multiple of that of the 
fork, the flash of light, which to ordinaiy ob- 
servers would be visible at each passage, 
would either be visible, or be obscured, in a 
permanent manner. If, as in practice, the 
coincidence be not perfect, the flashes appear 
and disappear in a regular cycle, whose period 
is the time in which the fork gains (or loses) 
one complete vibration. This period can be 
determined with any degree of precision by a 
sufficient prolongation of the observations.' 



SECT. B. 



ON THE DETERMINATION OP PITCH NUMBERS. 



i43 



6. Harmonium Beeds. 

Herr Georg Appunn, of Hanau, invented tonometers of 65, 33, and 57 reeds, 
serving for many important experiments (see for example suprdi, p. 176, footnote f ). 
Copies of all three are at the South Kensington Museum, and of the two first at the 
Museum of King's College, London. These reeds were tuned to make 4 beats in 
a second with each other, so that the 65th reed made with the first, which was 
an Octave flatter, 4 x 64 = 256 beats, and consequently, according to the theory of 
beats (see text. Chap. VIII.)) the pitch number of the lowest note should be 256. 
Unfortunately, the condensed air in which the beats took place accelerated the beats 
by 76 in 10,000, as I determined by long-continued observations and experiments 
(described generally in my first paper already cited, Prqc. B, S., vol. xxx. pp. 527- 
532), and consequently the results had to be lessened by that amount, making the 
pitch number of the lowest reed about 254. These reeds, too, were not sufficiently 
permanent in pitch. Hence this instrument, though otherwise very useful, failed % 
in determining pitch with sufficient accuracy. 



Lord Bayleigh {Proc, Mus. Assn. vol. v., 
1878-9, p. 15) discovered a way of determin- 
ing the pitch of two low harmonium reeds, 
the lowest C and D on his harmonium. Keep- 
ing the wind for 10 minutes or 600 seconds 
as constant as possible and using resonators 
tuned by partiiJly covering with the finger to 
about the 9th and 10th partials of the low C, 
two observers counted the beats, one between 
the 9th partial of C and the 8th of D, and the 
other between the 10th partial of C and the 
9th of D. They thus found 

9 C - 8 D = 2892 ^ 600 
9 D - 10 C = 2841 4- 600 
Whence 

C = (9 X 2892 + 8 X 2841) -f 600 
= (21628 + 18728) -5- 600 = 67-09 
and similarly 

Z) = (10 X 2892 + 9 X 2841) 4- 600 = 7498 



As these notes make an interval of 192*5 
cents with each other, Lord Bayleigh had 
evidently (as he suggested) altered the interval 
to about a meantone 198*2 cents. His object 
was to determine the pitch of a fork of 
Koenig*s, supposed to vibrate 64 times in a 
second. Now as Koenig's 256 is reallv 256*28 
at 59° F., this 64 should be 64*07 at the same 
temperature. Lord Bayleigh, to take ac- 
count of the effect of the simultaneous beating 
of the two reeds, sounded both of them at the 
same time with the fork, and on different days 
obtained the following results (temperature 
not named) : — 

Harmonium 67*09 Tuning-fork 64*06 
67*04 „ „ 64-07 

67-17 „ „ 64*17 

67*19 „ „ 68-98 

Which were wonderfully accurate. 



ft 



It 



»> 



IT 



7. Tuning-forks, 

All the above methods have one important fault. The measuring instruments 
are not easily portable and not readily applicable to all kinds of sustained tones, 
while the two first required trained ears to discriminate unisons between tones 
of different quality, with great accuracy, that is to say, at least 1 vib. in 10 sec. All 
these faults are obviated by the Tuning-fork Tonometer invented by J. Heinrich 
Scheibler {b. 1777 d. 1837), a silk manufacturer of Grefeld in Bhenish Prussia. 
The simplest process of making such a Tonometer, although not the one used by 
Scheibler (see his pamphlet cited in note X, p. 199^), is as follows. I quote prin- 
cipally from my * Notes on Musical Beats,' already cited. 



Obtain a set of about 70 good forks with 
parallel prongs, and of a tolerably large size ; 
tune the lowest to about the c' (or 6 for English 
high pitch) and tune the rest roughly each 
about four beatd in a second sharper than the 
preceding. Then fit them with wooden collars 
or handles, and allow them to rest for three 
months, if possible in the same temperature 
at which they will be counted, and never 
alter their pitch again by filing, but count 
the beats between each set most carefully, at 
a temperature which remains as uniform as 
possible. It may be necessary to use a high 
temperature ; thus Scheibler's was from 15° R. 
to 18** It. ^ 66*''76 to 72° -6 F., which I reckon 
at 69° F. as a mean ; and Koenig now works 
at 20° C. = 68° F. Count on one day the beats 
between forks 1 and 2, 8 and 4, 5 and 6, &c., 
and on another between forks 2 and 8, 4 and 5, 



&c., so that the same fork is not used forf 
two counts on the same day. Excite by strik- 
ing with a soft ball of fine flannel wound round 
the end of a piece of whalebone, as a bow is 
not convenient unless the forks are tightly 
fixed. Each blow or bowing heats, and hence 
flattens, and this tells if the experiments on 
any one fork are long continued. Count each 
set of beats for 40 seconds if possible, and 
many times over, registering the temperature 
and the beats, and taking the mean. Having 
counted all, observe those forks which are 
near the Octave of the lowest fork. Find two 
such, beating with the Octave (that is, the 
second partial) of the lowest fork less than 
they beat with each other. Then the sum of 
all the beats from the lowest fork to the lower 
of the two forks, added to the beats of the 
Octave (that is, the second partial tone of the 



444 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



lower fork) with that fork, is the pitch of the 
lowest fork. Hence the pitch of all the forks 
is known. The extra high forks are for verify- 
ing hy the Octaves of several low forks, and 
for the purpose of subsequently measuring. 
From such a tonometer any other can be 
made, and the value of each fork at another 
temperature calculated. 

Scheibler made a 52-fork tonometer with 
infinite trouble, on another plan, described in 
his book and counted it with marvellous accu- 
racy. This tonometer, which I have made 
many efforts to find, has absolutely disap- 
peared, and his family knows nothing of it. 
But he left behind him a 56-fork tonometer, 
believed to proceed from 220 to 440 vibra- 
tions, by steps of 4 vibrations, and through 
^ the kindness of Herr Amels, an old friend of 
* the Scheibler family, who obtained it from 
Soheibler's grandson, I had the use of it for 
a year. I had to count it as well as I could, 
just as if it had been a set of forks such as I 
have described, and I found it was not what 
was thought, but that only 82 sets of beats 
were 4 in a second, and the other 28 sets 
varied from 88 to 42 in 10 seconds. I found 
also that the extremes were probably of the 
same pitch as in the original 52-fork tono- 
meter. After then counting it as well as I 
could, and obtaining 219*27 vibrations in place 
of 219-67, at 69" F.. I distributed the error of 
4 beats in 10 seconds, as 2 in 100 seconds, 
among 20 of the 28 sets which were not 
exactly 4 beats in 10 seconds, leaving the 
first 8 sets, which I had repeatedly counted 
and felt sure of, unaltered. Then I reduced 
«rall the values from 69° to 59* F. Finally 
to verify my result I measured by beats 
with Scheibler's forks as thus determined; 
first 6 large forks of various pitches, which 
I had had made for me in Paris, and then 
4 forks of Koenig's belonging to Professor 
McLeod. Professor McLeod himself kindly 
measured all of them, also, by his machine, 
and Professor Mayer also obligingly measured 
the first 5 forks by his electrographio method, 
both with the greatest care and precaution. 
The three sets of measurements agreed to 
less than 1 beat in 10 seconds, and more 
often less than 1 beat in 20 seconds, when 
reduced to the same temperature. Thus the 
value of the tonometrical measurement by 
beats only, and the possibility of counting 
a tonometer sufficiently, was fully esta- 
blished. Koenig*s measurements of his own 
«]• forks reduced to 59° F., and of the actual 
" Dianason Normal at the Conservatoire, Paris, 
intended to be used at the same tempera- 
ture, also afl^ree with mine within less than 
the name limits. 

The pitch of all sufficiently sustained tones 
ran thus be determined mechanically. We 
find two forks, whose pitch is known, with 
each of which the new tone beats more slowly 
than the forks beat with each other, and we 
verifv the count, by seeing that the sum of 
the beats with both forks is the number of 
beats of the forks with one another. The 
nitch number is then that of the lower fork 
increased by the number of beats made with 
it in a second, and that of the upper fork 
diminished by the number of beats made 
with it in a second. The following notes 
are the result of njuch experience. 



Tuning-forks are comparatively simple in 
quality of tone but always possess an audible 
second partial or Octave, and sometimes higher 
partials still, capable of being so reinforced 
by resonance jars properly tuned to them, 
that beats can be separately obtained from 
them and counted. This, as we have seen, is 
a matter of great importance in the oon- 
struotion of a tuning-fork tonometer. When 
the tone is very compound, as in the case of 
bass reeds (especially those of Appunn's tono- 
meter, furnished with a bellows giving, when 
properly managed, a perfectly steady blast 
for an indefinite length of time), beats can 
be obtained and counted from the 20th to the 
80th and even the 40th partial, without any re- 
inforoement by a resonance jar. (See p. 176d'.) 
Taking tuning-forks first, I find it advan- 
tageous to hold the beating forks over one or 
two resonance jars, tuned, by pouring in 
water, to the pitch of the partial to be ob- 
served, whether it be the prime of both or 
the prime of one and the second partial (or 
Octave) of the other. There may be small 
differences, but I have not found any differ- 
ence appreciable by my methods of observa- 
tion in the number of beats in a second, 
whether the resonance jar is the same or 
different for the two forks, and whether it is 
exactly or very indifferently tuned to each 
fork, but a tolerably accurate tuning much 
improves the tone and length of the beat. In 
that case the resonance jar practically quenches 
all other partial tones, and the beats are 
distinctly heard as loudnesses separated by 
silences. If no jar is used, the other par- 
tials are heard. In the case of the Octave, the 
low prime becomes a drone and fills up the 
silences. In the case of beating primes, the 
Octaves, which are beating twice as fast, tend 
to confuse the ear. Sometimes the second 
partial of a fork is so much stronger than the 
prime, that when the fork is applied to a 
sounding-board, only the Octave is heard, 
which is often inconvenient to the fork tuner. 
This is entirely avoided by the resonance jar. 
Beats being a case of interference, the ampli- 
tude of the beating partials should be equa- 
lised as much as possible. With two forla of 
very different size and power, it is easy to 
regulate the amplitude by holding the louder 
fork further from the jar. Otherwise the 
beats become blurred and indistinct. For 
powerful reeds or organ pipes, beating with 
forks, it is best to go to a considerable dis- 
tance from the reed or pipe and hold the fork 
close to the ear or over a jar. I find 80 or 40 
feet necessary for organs ; in Durham Cathe- 
dral, where the pressure of wind was strong 
and my forks weak, I found 60 or 70 feet dis- 
tance much better. As I was not able latterly 
to go to a distance from Appunn*s reed tono- 
meter, having to pump it myself, I found it 
impossible to count the primes of the upper 
reeds by the Octaves of my forks, which were 
completely drowned by the reeds. 

I find beats of all kinds most easy to 
count when about 8 or 4 in a second. They 
can be counted well from 2 to 5 in a second. 
Above 5 they are too rapid for accuracy; 
below 2, and certainly below 1, they are too 
slow, so that it is extremely difficult to tell 
from what part of the swell of sound the beat 
should be reckoned. Partly from this reason, 



8BGT. B. 



ON THE DETERMINATION OF PITCH NUMBERS. 



445 



perhaps, I have found great variety in count- 
ing successive sets of such slow beats. I 
never use beats of less than one in a second, 
if I can avoid it. When the beats are slow it 
is difficult to discover by ear which of the 
two beating tones is the shaiper; and even 
fine ears are often deceived. It is easy to 
discover, however, by putting one of the forks 
under the arm for a minute. This heats and 
flattens it by 2 or 8 beats in 10 seconds. 
Hence if the beats with the heated fork are 
slower, that fork was sharper, because it has 
been brought nearer the other; if faster, it 
was flatter and has been brought further away. 
Count for 10, 20, or 40 seconds, according to 
the fork. Up to 20 or SO beats in 10 seconds 
it is easy to count in ones, but from SO to 60 
it is best to count in twos, as one-ee, two-ee, 
&C., beginning with ofi«, and hence throwing 
off one at the end. When counting for 2U 
seconds I always count in twos, and for 40 
seconds in fours, as one-ee-ah-tee, two-ee-ah- 
tee, &c., because I have to divide the result by 
20 or 40 ; and this division is avoided by the 
count itself. As my counting was never for 
more than 40 seconds, small errors of the 
clock or pendulum were imperceptible. I 
generally used a marine or pocket chro- 
nometer when TOA-lring the principal count for 
40 seconds, but for merely determining pitch 
from a fork of known pitch, 10 seconds of 
time, and any ordinary seconds watch suffice. 
For Prof. McLeod's observations, which lasted 
5 minutes or more, extreme accuracy in rating 
an astronomical clock was necessary. Sup* 
pose a watch to gain 5 minutes or 800 seconds 
in 24 mean hours, which is an extreme case, 
so that 86,700 watch seconds » 86,400 mean 
seconds, then 10 watch seconds » 9*9654 mean 
seconds, and 40 watch seconds = 89*8616 mean 
seconds. Hence no perceptible error will arise 
from identifying watch and mean seconds. 
But 800 watch seconds ^ 298*962 mean seconds, 
and the error would have to be allowed for. 
Scheibler used a metronome corrected daily by 
an astronomical clock, and graduated. On 
this a movable weight enabled him to make 
one swing of the pendulum take place in the 
same time as 4 beats were heard, and then 
from the graduation he read off the rate. 
But counting by the seconds hand of a watch 
is much easier and altogether more conve- 
nient, while it is probably as accurate. Owing 
to difficulties in beginning and ending the 
count, I find the possible error per second 
to be 2 divided by the number of seconds 
through which the count extends; and that 
it is best to take a mean of 6 to 10 counts 
for each set of beats. As most persons, in- 
cluding myself, begin to count from one and 
not from Tioughtf it must be remembered that 
the last number uttered on counting the last 
beat, is one in excess of the real number of 
beats. Thus if in counting for 10 seconds 
we end with 87, the number of beats was 86 
in 10 seconds. If in counting by twos, one-ee, 
two-ee, &o., the last was 19, then we have 
counted only 18 pairs, and hence there were 
also 36 beats in 10 seconds. If we end with 
19-ee, there were 18} pairs or 87 beats in a 
second. It is best to count the same set of 
beats in one, twos, and fours to realise these 
corrections, which are extremely important. 
Temperature must never be neglected. 



Forks should not be touched with the un- 
protected hand ; they otherwise easily flatten 
by 2 beats in 10 seconds. Interpose folds of 
paper. I use two folds of brown paper 
stitched between two pieces of wash-leather. 
Large forks are generally on resonance boxes 
and need not be touched, otherwise the same 
precautions should be used, as they are very 
sensitive, and retain the heat longer than 
small forks. Scheibler's forks are fitted with 
wooden handles. In tunmg, the file heats and 
flattens; the result of tuning, therefore, can 
seldom be known for a day or two, when the 
forks have cooled and * settled,' as they will 
be sure to * jump up '. I find it best to leave 
off filing when the forks are two or three 
tenths of a vibration too flat. In sharpening 
there is, therefore, great danger of doing too 
much, as the fork remains apparently at the T 
same pitch, the flattening by heat balancing 
the sharpening by filing. Hence all copies 
should be compared some days after, by 
means of a third fork about four vibrations 
flatter or sharper than each, to avoid the 
slow beats of approximate unisons. The 
flling also seems to interfere with the mole- 
cular arrangement of the forks. 

The thermometer should be always con- 
sulted when beats are taken. But if the beats 
are between two forks, of which the pitch of 
one at a given temperature is known, and 
both forks may be assumed to be altered in 
the same ratio by heat, then the temperature 
need not be observed ; but the unknovm fork 
may be presumed to be as many vibrations 
sharper (or flatter) than the measured fork at 
the temperature at which the latter was 
measured, as beats in a second were observed % 
to take place. This is because the alteration 
is very small, and would be quite inappreci- 
able for the few vibrations between them. 
But for tonometrical purposes an allowance 
must be made. 

When forks are counted without a reso- 
nance jar, they should not be applied to a 
sounding-board, or held one to one ear and 
one to the other, but should both be held 
about six inches from the same ear, and 
their strengths should be equalised by hold- 
ing the weaker fork closer to the ear than 
the stronger. 

When the forks are screwed on and off a 
sounding-board or resonance box, there is 
great danger of wrenching the prongs, unless 
they are held below the bend, but I have con- 
stantly seen this precaution neglected. Af 
wrench immediately affects the pitch and 
duration of sound of a fork, and renders 
it comparatively worthless. Such cases have 
come within my observation. To prevent 
wrenching when flling forks, only one prong 
should be inserted in the vice. And for even- 
ness file the same quantity off the Inside of 
each prong, counting the number of strokes 
with the file, near the tips for sharpening, 
and near (not at) the bend for flattening. 

The next enemy to be guarded against is 
rust. Forks should be kept dry, and occasion- 
ally oiled with gun-lock oil. Bust towards the 
tip affects the fork much less than rust at 
the bend. My observations and experiments 
shew that errors from rust can scarcely exceed 
a flattening of 1 vibration in 250, and are 
generally very much less. But as the amount 



446 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR 



A pp. 



is unceitain, rast spoils a fork for acourate 
tonometrical purposes. With eare, however, 
the pitch of a tuning-fork remains remarkably 
permanent. Scheibler^s had evidently not 
altered in more than forty years. 

When the pitch to be ascertained is of a 
veiy short sounding tone, as that of a glass 
or wood hormonicon, or very high, it requires 
an extremely delicate ear indeed to be able to 
determine between which two forks, or the 
octaves of which two forks the tone lies. 
In this case I have been fortunate in having 
the kind assistance of Mr. A. J. Hipkins of 
Broadwoods*, without whose accurate appre- 
ciation of differences of pitch I should nave 
frequently been altogether at a loss. 

Dr. Koenig (27 Qua! d'Anjou, Paris) makes 
IT tuning-fork tonometers of beautiful workman- 
ship, but they are necessarily very expensive. 
The laigest, proceeding from 64 to 21845 double 
vibrations at 20° F. with sliding weights, costs 
12001. The medium has 67 forks from 256 
to 512 double vibrations at intervals of four 
beats each, with f and a' which fall between 
pairs of forks, mounted on resonance boxes, and 
costs 120{. A smaller set without resonators 
costs 60Z. A small set of 13 forks in a case, 
giving the equally tempered Octave c' to c" for 
a' 435 double vibrations, costs only 71. 4a. , and 
for the same price another set 4 double vibra- 
tions lower, for tuning by beats to French 
pitch, can be obtained. This apparently high 



price arises from the great difficulty of tuning 
such a succession of forks with perfect accu- 
racy to particular pitches. This accuracy is, 
however, not necessary, provided the count be 
accurate. Any tuning-fork maker would make 
a set of forks such as has been described. 
The count must be made by the investigator 
himself, and he should verify by a set of 
Koenig^s forks of c', b', g\ c'\ such as may be 
found in many places, remembering that all 
the older sets when reduced for temperature 
give at 16° C.=59° F., c' 266-3, «' 320-3, g' 
384-4, &' 512-6. ProL McLeod's determina- 
tions by his machine at this temperature, as 
the mean of many measurements, were c* 
256-310, another copy 256-306, «' 320-872, g' 
384-437, &' 512-351. Koenig considered them 
correct at 26-2° 0. =79-16° F. 

For my own use after returning Scheibler's 
forks to Air. Amels, I had 105 forks constructed 
proceeding from 223-77 to 586-12 vib., which, 
after being tuned partly by Scheibler's maker 
in Grefeld by the forks already described, and 
partly constructed to differences of about 4 
beats by the late Mr. Valantine of Sheffield, 
wero all very carofully counted again by me 
with Scheibler's own forks, the means of many 
determinations up to two places of decimals 
being assumed as correct. With this perfectly 
unique set of forks I have, since that time, 
made all the determinations of pitch mentioned 
in this book. 



IT 



SECTION C. 



ON THE CALCULATION OF CENTS FROM INTBBVAL BATI08. 



(See notes pp. 13, 41, and 70.) 



Art. 

1. Nature of Cents, and necessity for using 

them, p. 446. 

I. First Method^ without Tables or 

Logarithms^ p. 447. 

2. When the interval exceeds an Octave, 

p. 447. 

3. When the interval lies between a Fourth 

and Fifth, p. 447. 

4. When the interval is less than a Fourth 

p. 447. 

II. Second Method, with Tables hut 
without Logarithms^ p. 447. 

5. Previous Reduction, p. 447. 

IT 6, 7. Rule and example, p. 447-8. 
III. Third Method, by Five Place Logarithms, 

p. 448. 
8. ReGLSon for previous methods, p. 448. 



Art. 
9, 10. Rule and examples, p. 448. 

11. To find to the tenth of a cent, p. 448. 

IV. Fourth Method, by Seven Place 
Logarithms. 

12. Rule and examples finding to the thou- 

sandth of a cent, p. 449. 
V. Finding Interval Ratio from Cents. 
18. Without Logarithms, p. 449. 

14. By Five Place Logarithms, p. 449. 

15. Bv Seven Place Logarithms, p. 450. 

16. Given a note of any pitch number to find 

the pitch number of a note which makes 
with it an interval expressed in cents, 
p. 451. 

Principal Table, p. 460. 

Auxiliary Tables, I. II. III. IV., p. 451. 



1. When the * interval numbers,' that is the pitch numbers of two notes, have, 
been found (or the * interval ratio,' that is ratio of those numbers given theoretically 
by means of pitch nimibers, or of numbers in proportion to them, or of lengths of 
strings assumed to be perfect, or of wave-lengths), it is necessary, in order to have 
a proper conception of the interval itself by comparison with a piano or other 
instrument tuned in intentionally equal temperament, to determine the number 
of centSy or hundredths of an equal Semitone, in that interval. Such cents have 
been extensively used in the notes, and occasionally introduced into the text, of 
this translation, see pp. 41{^, 50a, 56a, &c., and supr&, sect. A. art. 2, p. 431&. 



SECT. C. 



ON THE CALCULATION OF CENTS. 



447 



I. First Method without either Tables or Logarithms, 

2. If the greater number of the ratio be more than twice the smaller, divide the 
greater (or else multiply the less) by 2 until the greater number is not more than 
twice the smaller. This is equivalent to lowering the higher or raising the lower 
tone by so many Octaves. Hence for each division or multiplication by 2 add 1200 
to the result. 

Ex. To find the cents in 47th harmonic. which 'reduced' interval ratio we have to 
Interval ratio 1 : 47. Multiplying the smaller determine the cents as imder and then add 
number 5 times by 2, the result is 82 : 47, for 6 x 1200 = 6000 to the result. 

3. If the reduced interval ratio be such that 3 times the larger number is 
greater than 4 times the smaller, but twice the larger number is less than 3 times 
the smaller number, then multiply the larger number by 3, and the smaller by 4, ^ 
for a new interval ratio, and add 498 cents to the result. 



Ex. For 82 : 47, then 8 x 47 » 141 is greater 
than 4 X 82 = 128, but 2 x 47=94 is less than 
8 X 82 = 96. Hence we use the interval ratio 
128 : 141 and add 498 cents to the result. If 
however as in 82 : 49, twice the larger number 
or 2 X 49ss98, is not less than three times the 
smaller or 8 x 82 == 96, we use this interval 
ratio 96 : 98 or its equivalent 48 : 49 and add 
702 cents to the result. In the firat case the 



given interval having the ratio 82 : 47 lies 
between a Fourth and a Fifth, in the second 
case it is greater than a Fifth, but in both 
cases the reduced interval ratio 128 : 141 or 
48:49 is less than a Fourth. The object 
of this reduction, which is seldom necessary, 
is to have to deal with ratios less than a 
Fourth. 



4. Multiply 3477 by the difference of the numbers of the reduced interval ratio, 
and divide the result by their sum to the nearest whole number, and if the quotient 
is more than 450 add 1. To the result add the numbers of cents from arts. 1 and 
2. The result is correct to 1 cent. 



Ex. 1. Interval ratio 128 : 141 



8477 

18 difiFerence 



1048 L 
8477 



Sum 
269)45201(168 

269 498 from art. 8 
6000 from art. 2 

laso 

1614 6666 cents result 



2161 or 5 Octaves 
2152 6 Semitones 

and I Semitone 

in the interval of 47th harmonic from the fun- 
damental. 

Ex. 2. Interval ratio 48 : 49, difference =1 
Sum 

97)3477( 86 
291 702 



*,*The number 8477 depends on the 
principles explained in my paper 'On an H 
Improved Bimodular Method of Computing 
Logarithms,* Proc. R^ 5., Feb. 1881, vol. xxxi. 
p. 882. Gents are in fact a system of logs in 
which cent log 2=1200, and its bimodulus is 
2 X cent log 2 -f nat log 2 = 2400 -f '69815:= 
8462*4. But if this number had been selected 
there would have been constant additive cor- 
rectioDS from the first. Hence an augmented 
bimodulus 8477 has been selected=9x886^, 
or 9 times the cents in the ratio 4 : 5. The 
result is that the rule is exact for intervals of 
a major Third. For less intervals it gives too 
great a result, but never by more than *6 
cent, which may be neglected. Between a 
major Third and a Fourth it gives too small 
a result, but only after 450 by about 1 cent. 
For small numbers, few calculations, and in 
the absence of tables this method is very 
convenient. For Sauveur's previous use ofU 
an augmented bimodulus, see supr^, p. 4876, 
sect. A. art. 24, xii. 



567 788 cents in the interval 
588 82:49, or about 7i 
— Semitones. 



II. Second Method, tvith Tables, but without Logarithms. 

5. The reduction for Octaves is always supposed to be made as in art. 2, and 
hence only intervals of less than an Octave will be considered. 

If the interval numbers (art. 1) contain taken at 2640 : 4785, so that the rule applies 
decimals they must be multiplied by 10 till to whole numbers only, 
the decimals disappear. Thus 264:478*5 is 

6. Eule. Annex 0000 to the larger number and divide by the smaller to the 
nearest whole number. If the quotient is less 11290, take the nearest * quotient ' 



448 ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. app. xx. 

in the Principal Table below. The corresponding nearest whole number of ' cents ' 
is on the same line. 

Ez. 48 : 49. 12 I 490000 Ne&rest quotient In Table 10210 for cents 36 aa 

' in art. 4, ex. 2. 

Since 48 » 4 x 12 use short division. 4 I 40888 



10208 



7. If the quotient exceeds 11290, look for the next less quotient in Auxiliary 
Table I, multiply and divide by the numbers in the col. of multipliers and 
divisors, and thus reduce the quotient to one in the table. Then proceed as before 
and add the number of cents on the line with the next least quotient in Auxi- 
liary Table I. 

Ex. Ratio 82 : 47 as in art. 8. Since 82 :» 4 x 8 proceed thus : 
U 4 I 470000 



8 



117600 



11688 

8 Next less quotient 18888, mult. 8, div. 4, cents 498. 



44064 



11016 Nearest 11019 cents 168 

add 498 

as before, 666 cents for the 47th harmonic. 

Actually 11016 lies exactly half-way be- the error of 1 cent in the final result is always 

tween 11018 and 11019, and in that case the possible, and is here disregarded. It is avoided 

^ rule is to take the larger number. On account by the following methods, 
of the approximative nature of the calculation 

III. Third Method, by Five Place Logarithms. 

8. This is by far the best, most exact, and at the same time easiest method, 
but as many musicians are not familiar with logarithms, and it is important that 
they should be able to reduce interval ratios to cents, the two preceding methods 
have been inserted. 

9. After reducing for Octaves as in art. 2, subtract the log of the smaUer 
number from that of the larger. If the resulting log is less than -05268, the 
number of cents is given opposite to the nearest log in the Principal Table. The 
decimal point, zeroes after it, and characteristic are omitted in practice, but are 
used here for completeness. 

Ex. Interval ratio 48 : 49. The difference between any two loga- 

log 49 = 1*69020 rithms in the table is 25 or 26, henoe the 

log 48 » 1-68124 nearest is that which differs by less than 

18. In this case it differs only by 7. 

f diff. -00896 

nearest log -00908, cents 86. 

10. If the log exceeds 05268, find the nearest log, in Aux. Table II., subtract 
it, take the cents from the Principal Table for this diff. as in art. 9, and add the 
cents opposite the next least log in Aux. Table II. 

Ex. Interval ratio 32 : 47. 

log 47 = 1-67210 
log 82 = 1-50516 

1st diff. -16695 
Next least, Aux. T. U. -15051, cents 600 



2nd diff. -01644 
Nearest log -01656, cents 66 

result 666 as before for the 47th harmonic. 
11. If it is desired to find the number of cents to the nearest tenth of a cent. 



8BCT. C. 



ON THE CALCULATION OF CENTS. 



449 



take the next least number in the Principal Table, find the difference, and add the 
tenths of cents from Aux. Table IIL llius — 



Ex. in art. 10. 



2nd diff. -01644 
Next least -01681 cents 65 



drd diff. 



13 



ff 



cents 65*5 result. 



IV. Fourth Methody by Seven Place Logarithms. 

12. As a general rule the approximation in art. 10 is amply sufficient, and is 
generally used here. But occasionally it is advisable to proceed to three places of 
decimals of cents, as in the whole of sect. A. on * Temperament '. The process is 
then conducted by Aux. Table IV., the method of using which will appear by the U 
following examples : — 

Ex. 1. Interval ratio 82 : 47. 

log 47 = 1-672 0979 
log 82 = 1-505 1500 

difference -166 9479 
600 cents -150 5150 



60 
5 



ti 



t» 



•6 
•007 ., 



-016 4829 
•015 0515 

•001 8814 
-0012548 

•0001271 
•0001254 

•000 0017 



665*507 cents result. 



Ex. 2. Interval ratio 264 : 478-5. 
log 478-5 » 2-679 8819 
log 264 » 2-421 6089 


difference 
1000 cents 


•258 2780 
•260 8583 


20 


•007 4197 
•005 0172 


9 


•002 4025 
•002 2577 


•5 .. 


-0001448 
•0001254 


•07 „ 


•000 0184 
•000 0176 


•007 „ 


•000 0018 



H 



1029*5707 cents result. 



Y. Method of finding the Interval Batio from the Cents, 

13. Without Logarithms, If the cents are less than 210, the ratio is that of 
10000 to the quotient opposite the cents in the Principal Table. If the cents are 
greater than 210, subtract the next least number of cents in Aux. Table I., and 
multiply and divide the quotient opposite the diff. of cents in the Principal Table 
by the corresponding divisor and multiplier respectively (observe this inversion, 
multiply by divisor, and divide by multiplier) in Aux. Table I. 



Thus, given 666 cents, 
subtr. next least 498 in Aux. Table I. ; take 3 as 

div. and 4 as mult. 

168 



This is the correct ratio for 666 cents, it 
is larger than 1*4688 obtained from 82:47 
in art. 7, because the cents were in excess, ^ 
but the difference is quite unimportant. 



quo. to 168 cts. 11019 in Principal Table. 

4 



8 



44076 



14692, ratio 1-4692. 



14. By Five Place Logarithm's. 

Given 665*5 cents as results from art. 11 — 

Gents Logs 

600 *15051 Aux. Table II. 

65 -01681 Principal Table 

•5 '00013 Aux. Table III. 



Sum '16695 = log 1*4687, which is nowOOOl smaller than in 

art. 7, and is the correct value of 665*5 cents. 

G G 



460 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APF. XX. 



15. By Seven Place Logarithms. 



12. 



From Auz. Table IV. Cents 665-507, art. 



600 cents 


•150 5150 


60 


•015 0515 


5 


•0012548 


•6 


-0001254 


•007 „ 


-000 0018 



which is the more correct value of 47 -S- 32, 
obtained by carrying the division one step 
further than in art. 7. 



•166 9480 = log 1-46875, 



Prinoipal Table for the Calculation of Gents. 



IT 



II 



f 



Cents ( 


Quotients 


Logs 


[}ents Quotients 


Logs 


Cents IQuotients 


Logs Cents Quotients 


Logs 


1 


10006 


00025 


54 


10317 


01366 


107 


10638 


02684 


160 


10968 


04014 


2 


12 


50 


55 


23 


380 


108 


44 


709 








8 


17 


75 


56 


29 


405 


109 


50 


734 


161 


10974 


04089 


4 


28 


00100 


57 


35 


430 


110 


56 


760 


162 


81 


064 


5 


29 


125 


58 


41 


455 








163 


87 


089 


6 


85 


151 


59 


47 


480 


111 


10662 


02785 


164 


94 


114 


7 


40 


176 


60 


53 


505 


112 


69 


810 


165 


11000 


139 


8 


46 


201 








118 


75 


835 


166 


06 


164 


9 


52 


226 


61 


10359 


01680 


114 


81 


860 


167 


18 


189 


10 


58 


251 


62 


65 


555 


115 


87 


885 


168 


19 


214 








68 


71 


580 


116 


93 


910 


169 


26 


240 


11 


10064 


00276 


64 


77 


605 


117 


99 


935 


170 


82 


265 


12 


69 


801 


65 


83 


681 


118 


10705 


960 








13 


75 


826 


66 


89 


656 


119 


11 


985 


171 


11088 


04290 


14 


81 


851 


67 


95 


681 


120 


18 


08010 


172 


• 45 


316 


15 


87 


876 


68 


10401 


706 








178 


51 


340 


16 


98 


401 


69 


07 


781 


121 


10724 


03085 


174 


57 


365 


17 


99 


427 


70 


18 


756 


122 


30 


061 


175 


64 


390 


18 


10105 


452 








123 


87 


086 


176 


70 


415 


19 


10 


477 


71 


10419 


01781 


124 


43 


111 


177 


76 


440 


20 


16 


502 


72 


25 


806 


125 


49 


136 


178 


88 


465 








78 


31 


831 


126 


65 


161 


179 


89 


490 


21 


10122 


00527 


74 


87 


856 


127 


61 


186 


180 


96 


516 


22 


28 


552 


76 


43 


881 


128 


67 


211 








28 


84 


577 


76 


49 


907 


129 


74 


236 


181 


11102 


04541 


24 


39 


602 


77 


55 


982 


130 


80 


261 


182 


09 


566 


25 


45 


627 


78 


61 


957 








183 


15 


591 ; 


26 


51 


652 


79 


67 


982 


131 


10786 


03286 


184 


22 


616 


27 


57 


677 


80 


73 


02007 


182 


92 


811 


185 


23 


641 


28 


68 


702 








133 


99 


887 


186 


34 


666 


29 


69 


728 


81 


10479 


02082 


184 


10805 


362 


187 


41 


691 


80 


75 


763' 


82 


85 


057 


135 


11 


887 


188 


47 


716 








88 


91 


082 


136 


17 


412 


189 


58 


741 : 


81 


10181 


00778 


84 


97 


107 


137 


28 


437 


190 


60 


766 ' 


82 


87 


808 


85 


10503 


182 


138 


80 


462 






1 


88 


98 


828 


86 


09 


157 


139 


36 


487 


191 


11166 


04791 > 


84 


98 


853 


87 


16 


183 


140 


43 


512 


192 


78 


816 


85 


10204 


878 


88 


21 


208 








198 


79 


842 


36 


10 


908 


89 


28 


238 


141 


10849 


03587 


194 


86 


867 


I 87 


16 


928 


90 


84 


258 


142 


55 


562 


195 


92 


892 


88 


22 


953 








143 


61 


687 


196 


99 


917 


89 


28 


978 


91 


10540 


02288 


144 


67 


612 


197 


11205 


942 


40 


88 


01008 


92 


46 


808 


145 


74 


687 


198 


12 


967 








93 


52 


333 


146 


80 


663 


199 


18 


992 


41 


10240 


01029 


94 


58 


358 


147 


86 


688 


200 


25 


06017 


42 


46 


054 


95 


64 


883 


148 


93 


713 








48 


52 


079 


96 


70 


408 


149 


99 


788 


201 


11281 


05042 


44 


57 


104 


97 


76 


433 


150 


10906 


763 


202 


87 


067 


45 


63 


128 


98 


82 


458 








203 


44 


092 


46 


69 


154 


99 


88 


484 


151 


10912 


03788 


204 


50 


118 


47 


75 


179 


100 


95 


509 


152 


18 


813 


205 


57 


143 


48 


81 


204 








153 


24 


888 


206 


64 


168 


49 


87 


229 


101 


10601 


02534 


154 


SO 


863 


207 


70 


193 


50 


93 


254 


102 


07 


559 


155 


37 


888 


206 


77 


218 








103 


13 


584 


156 


43 


913 


209 


88 


243 


51 


10299 


01279 


104 


19 


609 


157 


49 


989 


210 


90 


268 


52 


10805 


805 


105 


25 


634 


168 


56 


964 








53 


11 


330 


106 


32 


659 


159 


62 


989 









SECT. D. 



MUSICAL INTERVALS. 



461 



16. Henoe given a note of any pitch and the interval in cents between that and 
another note, it is easy to determine the pitch of this second note. 



Ex. Requiied the reduced 47th harmoziic 
to A 458'9, the concert organ pitch of Mr. H. 
Willis, to which is tuned the great organ at 
the Albert Hall. 

log 468-9 = 2-65696 
cents 666-6, art. 14, give log = -16696 

log 666*7 = 2-82891 



Hence 666*7 is the pitch number of the 
note required. Thus it is possible, for any 
given pitch of the tuning note, to calculate the 
pitch of the notes for any given temperament, 
and hence, as will be shewn, to tune in that 
temperament. 



Auxiliary Table I. 


Gents 


Quotients 


Maltipliers 

and 

Divisors 


204 


11260 


x8- 


r 9 


316 


12000 


x5-^ 


i- 6 


886 


12600 x4. 


h 6 


498 


18838 


x3- 


r 4 


702 


16000 


x2-i 


r 3 


884 


16667 


X6-- 


-10 


1018 


18000 


x6-i 


r 9 


1200 


20000 


xl-i 


r 2 


Aux. Table 


Aux. Table 


II. 






[II. 


Gents 


Logs 


Gents 


Logs 


100 


02609 


•1 


•00003 


200 


06017 


*2 


06 


800 


07626 


•3 


08 


400 


10084 


•4 


10 


600 


12648 


•6 


13 


600 


16061 


•6 


16 


700 


17660 


•7 


18 


800 


20069 


•8 


20 


900 


22677 


•9 


28 


1000 


26086 


1-0 


26 


1100 


27694 






1200 


80103 









Auxiliary 


Table IV 


• 


Gents 


Logs 


Gents 


Logs 


100 


026 0868 


•1 


000 0261 


200 


060 1717 


•2 


0602 


300 


076 2676 


•3 


0768 


400 


100 8438 


•4 


1008 


600 


126 4292 


•6 


1264 


600 


160 6160 


•6 


1606 


700 


176 6008 


•7 


1766 


800 


200 6867 


•8 


2007 


900 


226 7726 


•9 


2268 


1000 


260 8688 






1100 


276 9442 






1200 


801 0300 






10 


002 6086 


•01 


000 0026 


20 


05 0172 


•02 


050 


30 


07 6268 


•03 


076 


40 


10 0848 


•04 


100 


60 


12 5429 


•06 


125 


60 


16 0616 


•06 


151 


70 


17 6601 


•07 


176 


80 


20 0687 


•08 


201 


90 


22 6778 


•09 


226 


1 


000 2609 


•001 


000 0003 


2 


6017 


•002 


5 


3 


7626 


•003 


8 


4 


001 0034 


•004 


000 0010 


6 


2648 


•006 


18 


6 


6052 


•006 


16 


7 


7660 


•007 


18 


8 


002 0069 


•008 


20 


9 


2677 


•009 


23 



H 



n 



SECTION D. 



MUSICAL INTBBVALS, NOT EXCEBDINQ AN OCTAVE, ABBANOBO IN OBDEB OF WIDTH. 

(See notes pp. 13, 187, 213, 264, and 333.) 



H 



Art. 

1. Width of an interval, p. 461. 

2. Oyclic and actual Fifths and major Thirds, 

p. 462. 

3. Cyclic and Exact cents, p. 462. 

4. Interval ratio, p. 452. 
6. Logarithms, p. 462. 

6. Theoretical and practical intervals, p. 452. 

7. Calculation of just intervals by Fifths and 

major Thirds up and down, p. 462. 

8. Calculation of interval ratios in the same 

way, p. 462. 



Art. 

9. Harmonics, p. 462. 
10. Intervals in an Octave, p. 463. 

Table I. Intervalsnot exceeding an Octave, 

p. 463. 
Table II. The unevenly numbered harmo- 
nics of C 66 up to the 63rd, p. 457. 
Table III. Number of any intervals, not ex- 
ceeding the Tritone, contained in an 
Octave, p. 467. 



1. An interval was defined sapr& p. ISd, note I, The width of an interval is 
measured by the number of cents it contains. Beside the usual diatonic intervals, 
a large number of others occasionally occur, which it is convenient to have arranged 

o o 2 



452 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



according to their widths as measured in cents. Many of these are furnished in 
the following table. 



2. The cents used are cyclic cents, as de- 
fined Bupr&, sect. A. art. 24, xiii. p. 4376', that is, 
those intervals found by taking a certain num- 
ber of Fifths and major Thirds up and down 
and reducing the result to the same octave, 
are assumed to have cyclic Fifths and major 
Thirds of 702 and 386 cents respectively. But 
as the actual Fifths and major Thirds have 
701-955 and 386*314 cents respectively, a slight 
error in excess is made in every Fifth up and 
every major Third down, and in defect in every 
Fifth down and major Third up, which, when 
a great many are supposed to be taken for 

gp theoretical purposes, may reach to a sensible 
" amount. These errors are of no consequence 
for ordinary purposes, but a means of correct- 
ing them is given in sect. E., p. 463d, and here 
it has been thought better tq add the result to 
three places of decimals in many cases, and 
this is put in the last column, preceded by the 
letters 'ex.,' meaning * more exact cents '. 

3. Other intervals are given to the nearest 
whole number of cents, determined as in sect. 
C, which therefore belong to the cycle of 1200, 
and hence are rightly caUed cyclic. Here also 
is added the result to three places of decimals, 
when it fy[>peared advisable for theoretical 
purposes. For ordinary purposes cyclic cents 
always suffice. 

4. The interval ratios^ being of historical 



interest, are always given, although they are 
of no assistance to the eye in recognising the 
width of an interval. In these ratios the 
smaUer number is always placed first. In the 
case of tempered intervals an approximate 
ratio, vnth f prefixed, is given in the second 
column, and the ' ex. ' or more exact * ratio ' is 
given in the last column. 

5. The (five place) logarithm of each inter- 
val ratio, considered as a fraction of which the 
larger number is the numerator, is added in 
each case, to enable those who understand 
logarithms to deal with them immediately in 
calculating pitch numbers, Ac. The loga- 
rithms always give the exact intervals. The 
decimal point is omitted. 

6. In the last column is given a variety of 
information. The name of the interval when 
any usual name exists, or the instrument on 
which it is found. The Greek and Arabic in- 
tervals were theoretical, and given in terms of 
lengths of string. As we see from sect. B. 
No. 1, p. 441<i, there is every reason to suppose 
that the real intervals tuned differed from 
them materially. Some further information 
is occasionally added. 

7. If the interval is found in the Duode- 
narium (sect. E., p. 463), then a mode of ob- 
taining it by Fifths up and down with major 
Thirds up and down is annexed. Here 



5 



Vu — one Fifth up 
Vd = one Fifth down 
Tu «= one major Third up 
Td = one major Third down 



702 cents, 2Vu 
498 cents up, ^Vd 
386 cents, 2Tu 
814 cents, 2Td 



2 X 702 cents, &c. 
2 X 498 cents, &c. 
2 X 386 cents, <&c. 
2 X 814 cents, &g. 



When such additions are made, 1200 or mul- 
tiples of 1200 must be subtracted tiU the result 
is less than 1200. That result will be the 



number of cyclic cents in the first column 
course, if we take the value to three pl 
decimals, 



Of 
of 



Vu = 701-955, Vd = 498-045, Tu » 386-314, Td ^ 813*686, 



and then the result will be correct to at least 

two places of decimals. 

S3* 2 

8. If we put Vu — Q, 2Ftt = ^ Ac. Vd = g, 

2* 5 5' 4 

^Vd = 5a, Ac. Tu = j, 2Tu = ^, Ac. Td = ^^ 



8«» 
4« 



4" 



2Td = ^, &c. and multiply instead of adding, 

and finally multiply or divide by 2 until the 

gr result lies between 1 and 2, these formulae give 

^ the exact ratio. Thus 2Vd + 2Tu = cyclically 

2 X 498 + 2 X 386=996 + 772 = 1768-1200 = 668 

cents as in the table. Or to three places of 

decimals, 2 x 498-045 + 2 x 386-314 = 996-090+ 

772-628 = 1763-718 - 1200 = 568-718, which is 

.2«5»4x25 25o25 

correct. Oragain,g5X|5-y ^ 15=35'^ 18' 

the correct result. See Table I. under 568. 

9. In Table II. are given all the unevenly 
numbered harmonics up to the 68rd in order of 
occurrence. The first column gives the number 
of the harmonic in which those marked * will 
be found on the Harmonical as harmonics of 
both C 66 and C 132, and those marked f 
as harmonics of C 132 only. In the second 
column are the pitch numbers of all the har- 
monics of C 66. In the third column * log ' 
are the logarithms of the harmonics of 1, pre- 



ceded by a plus sign + , so that if to each of 
these be added the logarithm of the pitch 
number of the fundamental note, the result is 
the logarithm of the pitch number of the har- 
monic. Thus log 66 = 1-81954, which added 
to 1*36173, the log opposite 23rd harmonic, 
gives 3-18127 - log 1518 the pitch number (in 
the table) of the 23rd harmonic of C 66. The 
column is divided into octaves by cross lines, 
at the b^;inning of which, preceded by a minus 
sign - , is the number to be subtracted from 
the log given in order to find the log of the 
harmonic reduced to one octave as given in 
Table I. Thus for 23rd harmonic 1-86173 - 
1-20412 = -15761, which is the log opposite 
628 cents in Table I. In the fourth column is 
given the cyclic cents in the ratio oi the fanda> 
mental not« to the harmonic reduced to the 
same octave, the same as given in Table I., 
where will be found the more exact number 
of cent. But to each octave is prefixed the 
number of cents, followed by a jAus sign +, 
which have to be added in order to find the 
unreduced interval. Thus for 23rd harmonic it 
is 4800 + 628 » 5428 cents. Finally in the last 
column there is given the nearest equally tem- 
pered tone, supposing the fundamental note is 
(7, and the number of 6ents to be added to or 
subtracted from that note in order to produce 



SBCT. D. 



MUSICAL INTERVALS. 



453 



the harmonic. Thus the 23rd harmonic is 
sharper than Wf'jt by 28 cents. These com- 
parisons are readily made from the column of 
cyclic cents, and can be easily applied to any 
fundamental note. Thus the 28rd harmonic 
of BJif must be 4 Octaves and 6 Semitones 
and 28 cents sharper than B^]^^ and hence 
must be e'" + 28. The marking of the differ- 
ences of the harmonics from equally tempered 
notes is convenient for repeating the experi- 
ments in sect. N. No. 2. 

10. Table III. is constructed to shew how 
often each principal interval, not exceeding a 
Tritone, is contained in the Octave. The first 



column gives the cyclic cents in the interval 
for easy reference to Table I. The second 
column contains the names of the intervals. 
The third contains, up to one place of deci- 
mals, the number of times that the interval is 
contained in the Octave, found by dividing 
log 2 by the logarithm of the interval as given 
in Table I. This is therefore not always the 
same as the number arrived at by dividing 
1200 by the number of cyclic cents, but only 
by the number of precise cents, as given in 
Table I. Thus, taking the skhisma of 2 cyclic 
and 1-958 ex. cents, 1200 -f 2 = 600, too small, 
but 1200 -^ 1*953 = 614*4 as in Table IIL 



J. Table of Intervals not exceeding one Octave, 



H 



Cyclic 
Cents 




1 

2 

7 

18 

20 
22 

24 
27 

28 



86 

42 



44 

45 
46 
47 
49 
50 

53 

55 
57 
70 
76 

85 

89 

90 

92 



Interval Ratios 
Approximative 



1:1 
1730 : 1731 

32768 : 32805 
255 : 256 

95:96 

2025 : 2048 
80:81 

524288 : 531441 
63:64 

3072 : 8125 



48:49 
125 : 128 



39:40 

38:39 
37:88 
36:87 
35:36 
239 : 246 

32:83 

81:32 
30:31 
24:25 
67:70 

20:21 

19:20 

243:256 

128 : 135 



Logs 




00025 

00049 
00170 

00455 

00490 
00540 

00589 
00684 

00743 



00896 
01030 



01100 

01128 
01158 
01190 
01228 
01254 

01336 

01379 
01424 
01773 
01908 

02119 

02228 

02263 

02312 



Name, &c. 



Fundamental note of the open string, assumed as C 66 
Gent, hundredth of an equal Semitone, nearest approxi- 
mate ratio, ex. 1 : 1*0005755 
Skhisma, Q Vti + Tu = C : BJj^ ex. 1*953 

Ex. 6*776, the ratio = ^ • t5» and the result is the 17th 
harmonic oiD^]^, a, diatonic Semitone above C 

Ex. 18-128, the ratio is ^ . ^, or the interval by which 

& 19 

the 19th harmonic is flatter than the minor Third 
Diaskhisma, 4 Fd + 2Td = C : 2)bb = OJi : D% ex. 

19*553 ^ 

Comma of Didymus, which is always meant by Comma 

when no qualification is added, iVu + Td = C : CS ex. 

21*506 
Pythagorean Comma, 12Vu = C : Bjt = Dk : CJL ex. 

23*460 ^ ^ 

Septimal Comma, or interval by which the 7th harmonic, 

969 cents, is flatter than the minor Seventh, 996 cents, 

"^Bk : B\f ex. 27*264 
SmaU biSsis, Vd + 5Tu » C^ : BJL ex. 29-614. In equal 

temperament this last interval would be represented (as 

||B : c) by a Semitone of 100 cents 
Interval of Al Farabl's improved Babab 
Great DiSsis, the defect of 3 major Thirds from an Octave, 

the interval between CJt and D\f in the meantone tem- 
perament, 3rd = CJf : D% ex. 41*059 
First interval on the^ambur of Bagdad, the interval by 

which the 13th harmonic of 840*528 cents is flatter than 

the just major Sixth of 884*359, ex. 43-831 
Second interval on the Tambur of Bagdad 
Third 
Fourth 
Fifth 
Quartertone of Meshaqah, the quarter of an equal Tone, 

ex. ratio = 1 : 1-0293022, \\C : C({ 
33rd harmonic, interval by which the 11th harmonic ex- 

ceeds the just Fourth, F: "F, ex. 53*273 
Qreek Enharmonic Quartertone, supr&, p. 265a 
Another Greek Enharmonic Quartertone, supr^, p. 265a 
Small Semitone, Vd + 2Tu = C : Cj, ex. 70*673 
Meantone Small Semitone, meantone C : Cjtt and hence 

the I of that system, ex. 76*050, ex. ratio 1 : 1*0449 
Subminor Second, Greek interval, supr^, p. 264a; A^ : ^B|^, 

on the harmonical 
Interval from open string to second fret on the Tambur of 

Bagdad 
Pythagorean Limma, the ' defect * of two major Tones, 408 

cents, from a Fourth, 498 cents, 6Vd = C : Dk ex. 

90*225 
Larger Limma, the defect of a Fourth, 498 cents, increased 

by a diatonic Semitone, 112 cents (total 610 cents), from 

a Fifth, 702 cents, and hence the interval by which the 



f» 



it 



If 



»i 



tf 



»» 



it 



M 



>f 



II 



II 



It 



H 



II 



454 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



jLPP. XX. 



Table of Intebvalb hot exceeding one OcTAY^-^arUinued, 



Cyclic 
Cento 



T 



T 



IT 



94 

99 
100 



105 
112 

114 



117 
128 
184 



185 

189 
145 
146 
150 

151 



155 

165 

168 
180 
182 

193 



200 
204 
224 
231 

240 



246 
250 

251 
258 
267 

274 

281 
294 



Intorral Batios 
t AppTOziinative 



18:19 

17:18 
84:89 



16:17 
15:16 

2048 : 2187 



t 100 : 107 
18:14 
25:27 



87:40 

12:18 
149 : 162 
4285 : 4608 
t 221 : 241 

11:12 



82:85 

10:11 

49: 54 
59049 : 65586 
9:10 

t 161 : 180 



400:449 

8:9 
225 : 256 

7:8 

74:85 



125 : 144 
t 200 : 281 

32:87 

108 : 125 

6:7 

64:75 



17:20 
27 :32 




02848 

02480 
02509 



02638 
02808 

02852 



02988 
08219 
08842 



08886 

08476 
08688 
08666 
08768 

08779 



08892 

04189 

04219 
04527 
04576 

04846 



05017 
05115 
05606 
05799 

06021 



06145 
06271 

06805 
06849 
06695 

06888 

07158 
07879 



Name, &c. 



ex. 



on 



Fourth must be sharpened to be a diatonic Semitone i 
below (i.e. the * leading note ' to) the Fifth, and hence 
the interval by which the Fourth is sharpened on modu- 
lating into the dominant, 8Fu + Tu = C : Cjt ^ F : Fjt 
ex. 92*179. This was used as the meaning of | in the 
first English edition, for which in the present 114 cents, 
or the Apotome, has been substituted, to agree with 
Prof. Helmholtz*s notation for just intonation 

Greek interval in Al Farabi, interval between the 18th and 
19th harmonics, d'" : e'"\f on Harmonical 

Arabic interval 

Ex. 100*099, the nearest approximate in small numbers to 
the ratio of the interval of an equal Semitone, ex. ratio 
1 : 1-059461 

17th harmonic « C : "d'"^ on the Harmonical, ex. 104-955 

Diatonic or just Semitone, ex.r 111*731 cents, Fd + Td = 
B:c = E : F 

Pythagorean Apotome, *off.cut,* or what is left of the 
major Tone, 204 cents, after * cutting off * the Limma or 
90 cents, used for jt in this edition, IVu = 0:0^=0^ 
: CA ex. 118-685 ^ i 

Meantone great Semitone, meantone C : D^, ex. 117*108 

Interval between 18th and 14th harmonics, ex. 128-298 

Great Limma, a Comma greater than the diatonic Semi* ■ 
tone, 112 cents, ex. 133-287, SVu + 2Td = C : D%, E^zF 
in the Phrygian tetrachord, 8upr4, p. 26S<2', No. 6 

Interval from open string to the thiid fret of the Tambur 
of Bagdad 

Interval between 12th and 13th harmonics, ex. 188*573 

Persian * near the forefinger ' lute interval 

Arabic * near the forefinger' lute interval 

Meshaqah's 8 Quartertones, imitation of 151 cents, 
ratio 1 : ;B/2S » 1 : 1-0905 

The interval between the 11th and 12th harmonics 
the trumpet scsde, used in Ptolemy's equal diatonic 
mode, supr4, p. 2646, used by Zalzal in Arabic lute scale 
as ' middle fi]:^y(er,' see infri, sect. K., Persia, Arabia, and 
Syria 

The 85th harmonic, septimal or submajor Second, supri, 
p. 212c, ex. 155*140 

A trumpet interval, used in Ptolemy's equal diatonic scale, 
supri, p. 2646 

Zalzal's * near the forefinger ' on Arabic lute 

Abdul^adir's substitute for Zalzal's 168 cents 

The mmor Tone of just intonation, the ' grave Second ' of 
the major scale, 2Vd -^ Tu ^ C : D^, ex. 182-404 

The mean Tone, the Tone of the meantone system, C : D, 
the mean between a major Tone of 204 cents, and a minor 
Tone of 182 cents, ex. ratio 1 : | ^6 = 1: 1*1180340 

An equal Tone, ex. ratio 1 : o/2 = 1-22462 

The 9th harmonic, major Tone 2Vu ^ C : D, ex. 203-910 

Diminished minor Third, 2Vd + 2Td = Bi : D% ex. 223-463 

Supersecond, or septimal Second, "^B)} : c, on the Har- 
monical, ex. 231-174 

The .Pentatone, or fifth part of an Octave, ex. ratio 
1 : ;^ = 1 : 1-1487 in the Salendro scale, see infri, sect. 
K., Java 

Acute diminished minor Third, 2yt* + Srd = Bj : D"b ex. 
244*968 

Five Quartertones, on Meshfiqah's scale, ex. ratio 1 : ^^2* 

= 1 : 1-15535 
The 37th harmonic, ex. 251-344 

Grave augmented Tone, SVd + STu =^ C : DJL ex. 258-076 
Septimal or subminor Third, O : "^B)^ on the Harmonical, 

Poole's minim Third, ex. 266*871 
The 75th harmonic, augmented Tone, Vu + 2Tu = C : DjL 

ex. 274-583 ^ 

Interval on Tambur of Bagdad 
Pythagorean minor Third, ancient 'middle finger' on 

Arabic lute, SVd = C : E\f, ex. 294*135 



8BGT. D. 



MUSICAL INTERVALS. 



455 



Table of Intbbyals not bzcbedinq obe Ootavb — continued. 



Cyclic 
Cento 



298 
800 
808 
316 
886 

842 
845 



850 
855 

384 
886 

400 
408 

428 
429 
485 

450 
454 
456 

471 

476 
480 



498 
500 
508 

512 
520 
550 
551 
568 
588 

590 



Intorral BatiM 
t ApproziinatiTe 



16:19 
87:44 
68:81 
5:6 
14:17 

82:89 
59:72 



t 125 : 158 

22:27 

6561 : 8192 
4:5 

50:63 
64:81 

25:82 

32:41 

7:9 

27:35 
10:18 
96 : 125 

16:21 

243 : 320 
I- 25:33 



8:4 
227:808 
80:107 

32:43 

20:27 

600:687 

8:11 
18:25 

5:7 

32:45 



600 
610 
612 
628 
632 

650 
653 

666 
666 



678 

680 
697 

700 
702 



Logs 



99:140 
45:64 
512 : 729 
16:23 
25:36 

90:131 
24:35 

82 : 47 
49:72 



177147 : 262144 

27:40 
t 109 : 168 

t 289 : 433 
2:3 



Name, &c. 



07468 
07526 
07598 
07918 
08432 

08591 
08648 



08780 

08894 

09642 
09691 

10034 
10231 

10721 
10763 
10914 

11288 

11394 
11464 

11810 

11954 
12041 



12494 
12543 
12629 

12882 
18083 
18797 
18883 
14267 
14613 

14806 



15052 
15297 
15346 
15761 
15836 

16305 
16486 

16695 
16713 



17070 
17474 

17660 
17609 



The 19th harmonic, ex. 297*513 

The equal minor Third, \\A:C 

Peraian ' middle finger * on lute 

Just minor Third, Vu -^ Td = A^iC ^ C : ^b» «^ 815-641 

Wide or superminor Third in the chord of diminished 

Seventh, b"^ : ^"^d"'}^ on Harmonical, ex. 336-129 
The 89th harmonic, ex. 342*483 

Arabic lute open string to string of the mean of the 
lengths for 204 and 498 cents, practical substitute for 
355 cents 
Mesh&qah's 7 Quartertones, tempered form of 355, ex. 

ratio 1 : >^ 2^ = 1 : 1-2241 
ZalzaPs ' middle finger,' or toosta, mean length of strings 

for 308 and 408 cents 
Abdulqadir*s substitute for 355 cents 
The 5th harmonic, just major Third, Tu ^ C : Ey, ex. 

386-814 
Equal major Third, ex. ratio 1 : sj2^1: 1-2599210 
Pythagorean major Third, or Ditone, as it consists of two 

major Tones = 2 x 204, ex. 407-820 
Diminished Fourth, 2Td « E^ : A% ex. 427-842 
The 41st harmonic, ex. 429-062 
Septimal or supermajor Third, Poole's maxim Third, 

"^B^ : d on Harmonical, ex. 485*084 
Meshaqah's 9 Quartertones, ex. ratio ^/ 2* =» 1-297 
One of Prof. Preyer's trial intervals 
Superfluous Third, Vd + STu = C : EJt = A^}^ : CjL ex. 

466-986 ^ ^ 

The 21st harmonic, the Septimal or Subfourth, F : ^B|^ on 

Harmonical, ex. 470*781 
Grave Fourth, bVd + Tu ^ C : F^, ex. 476*539 
Two Pentatones, the representative of the Fourth in the 
Salendro scale, see inM, sect. K., Java, ex. ratio 1:^4 
= 1 : 1-3195 
Just and Pythagorean Fourth, Vd- C:F, ex. 498*045 
Equal Fourth, \\C : F, ex. ratio 1 : ly 2» = 1 : 1-3848 
Meantone Fourth, meantone C : F, ex. 503*492, ex. ratio 

1:| X 4^1^ = 1:1-3375 
The 43rd harmonic, ex. 511-518 

Acute Fourth, 3Vu + Td ^ C : F^ ^ A^: D, ex. 519*552 
Meshaqah*s 11 Quartertones, ex. ratio 1 : »«^ 2" = 1 : 1-374 
The 11th harmonic, ex. 551-318 

Superfluous Fourth, 2Vd + 2Tu » C : FjL ex. 568-718 
Septimal or subminor Fifth, E : "^3]^ <m Harmonical, ex. 

582-512 
The 45th harmonic, Tritone, false, sharp, augmented, or 
pluperfect Fourth, 2Vu -h Tu = F: 3^ = C : FjL ex, 
590-224, the Fourth C : F bb widened for passing into 
the key of the dominant, 498 + 92 = 590 
Equal Tritone, \\F : J5, ex. ratio 1:^2 = 1: 1*4142 
Diminished Fifth, 2F(i + Td = C : G»|^ = J^ : c, ex. 609-777 
Pythagorean Tritone, 6Vu = C : FJt^ F: B, er. 611-731 
The 23rd harmonic, ex. 628*274 
Acute diminished Fifth, 2Vu + 2Td =^ C :0^ ^ A^: e% 

ex. 631*283 
Meshaqah's 18 Quartertones, ex. ratio 1 : SV 2» = 1 : 1-4556 
Septimal, or Subfifth, E^^:'^B\f on Harmonical, ex. 

653-184 
The 47th harmonic, ex. 665*507 

Arabic lute, 2nd string, a Fourth above 168 cents, ex. 
666*258, and hence -751 cents sharper than the last, the 
confusion with the former is due to approximations 
Abdulqadir's substitute for 666 cents, being a Fourth above 

his 180 cents 
Grave Fifth, 3Vd + Tu = C : Gf„ ex. 680*449 
Meantone Fifth, meantone C :0, a quarter of a Comma 

too flat, ex, 696*579, ex. ratio 1 : | x ^Z S^ = 1 : 1*4954 
Equal Fifth, \\C : G 
Just and Pythagorean Fifth, Vu^CiG, ex. 701-965 



1 



f 



466 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



Tablb of Imtebvau mot bxceedimq one Octave — continued. 



Cyclic 
Cente 



f 



f 



720 

724 

788 
760 
772 

792 
794 
800 



807 

814 
841 
850 

858 
874 
882 

884 
900 

906 

919 

926 

983 
988 
947 

950 
954 
960 



969 

976 
996 

999 
1000 

1018 

1030 
1050 
1059 
1067 
1088 

1100 
1110 
1111 
1117 
1129 
1145 
1150 
1158 
1173 
1180 
1200 



Interval Batio« 
t Approximative 



Logs 



95 : 144 

160:243 
82:49 
59:91 
16:25 

81 : 128 

256:405 

63:100 



32:51 
5:8 
8:13 
t 30:49 

11 : 18 

32:53 

19683 : 32768 

3:5 
t 22 : 37 

16:27 

10:17 

75 : 128 

7:12 
32:55 
125 : 216 

t 93 : 161 
72:125 

t 85 : 148 



4:7 

128 : 225 
9:16 

32:67 
t 56:98 

5:9 

16:29 

t 6:11 

32:59 

27:50 

8:15 

89:168 
128 : 243 
10:19 
32:61 
25:48 
16:31 
t 35:68 
64:125 
32:68 
1024 : 2025 
1:2 



18062 

18149 
18505 
18814 
19382 

19873 
19922 
20069 



20242 
20412 
21086 
21323 

21388 
21913 
22136 

22185 
22677 

22724 

23045 

23215 

28406 
28521 
28764 

28831 

23958 
24082 

24804 

24497 
24988 

26072 
25086 

25527 

25828 
26340 
26570 
26761 
27300 

27594 
27840 
27875 
28018 
28830 
28724 
28848 
29073 
29419 
29613 
30103 



Name, Ac 



Three Pentatones, giving an a^ute Fifth, as in Salendio, 

see infriL, sect. K., Java, ex. ratio 1 : ;&/ 8 = 1 : 1*5157 
Acute Piith, 6Vu + Td = C : G», ex. 723*461 
The 49th hannonic, ex. 737-652 

Meshaqah^s 16 Quartertonee, ex. ratio 1 : »/ 2" :=^ 1 : 1-5424 
Grave superfluous Fifth, 2Tu = C : GJL the 25th harmonic, 

ex. 772-627 
Pythagorean minor Sixth, ^Vd =^C:A}f, ex. 792-180 
Extreme sharp Fifth, 4Fu + Ttt = C : OjL ex. 794-134 
Equal superfluous Fifth, \\C : OJL and also equal minor 

Sixth, \\C:A\^t the same notcS differently written, ex. 

ratio 1:6/4 = 1: 1-6874 
The 61st harmonic, ex. 807*304 
Just minor Sixth, Td ^ C : A% ex 813-687 
The 18th harmonic, ex. 840*528 
Meshaqah's 17 Quartertones, his tempered substitute for 

853 cents, ex. ratio 1 : «/ 2" == 1 : 1-6339 
Arabic lute, the Fourth above Zalzal*s 356 cents 
The 53rd harmonic, ex. 873*604 
Abdulqadir's substitute for Zalzal*s 863 cents, being a 

Fourth above 384 cents 
Just major Sixth, Vd + Tu = C\ A^, ex. 884-369 
Equal major Sixth, \\C:A^ and also equal diminished 

Seventh, \\C : B^\^ = A:0^, ex. ratio 1 : */ 8 = 1 : 1-6818 
The 27th harmonic, Pythagorean major Sixth, SVu ^ C :J, 

ex. 905*866 
Ratio of the 10th : 17th harmonic, the harmonic dimin- 
ished Seventh, e^" : "d"' on the Harmonical, ex. 918-641 
Just dimmished Seventh, Vd + 2Td = C : B^\f := A : G^, 

ex. 926-416 
Septimal or supermajor Sixth, ^Bj^ : g, ex. 933-129 
The 65th harmonic, ex. 937*632 
Acute diminished Seventh, 3Fu + STd = C : B^\^== A : 

0% ex. 946*924 
Meshaqah*s 19 Quartertones, ex. ratio 1 : M/2^* » 1 : 1-7811 

Just superfluous Sixth, 3Vd + 9Tu » C : Ajj^ ex. 966'031 
Four Pentatones, the fourth note in the SaJendro scale, 

see infri, sect. K., Java, a close approximation to 969 

cents, ex. ratio 1 : &/ 16 == 1 : 1*7411 
The 7th harmonic, natural, harmonic, or subminor Seventh, 

C : ^jB[^ on the Harmonical, ex. 968*826 
Extreme sharp Sixth, 2Vu + 2Tu = C : AJL ex. 976-637 
Minor Seventh, used in the subdominant, 2Vd zs C : Bjf, 

ex. 996-091 
The 67th harmonic, ex. 999*468 
Equal superfluous, or extreme sharp Sixth, \\C : AJL or 

minor Seventh, \\C : B|> 
Acute minor Seventh, used in descending minor scales, 

2Vu+Td = C: B% ex. 1017-597 
The 29th harmonic, ex. 1029-577 

Meshaqah's 21 Quartertones, ex. ratio 1 : m/2» = 1 : 1*8840 
The 69th harmonic, ex. 1059*172 

Grave major Seventh, SFd + 2Tu ^ C:B^ ex. 1066*762 
Just major Seventh, Vu ■{- Tu — C : B|, the 16th harmonic, 

ex. 1088*269 
Equal major Seventh 

Pythagorean major Seventh, 5Vu = C : B^ ex. 1109*775 
One of Prof. Preyer*s trial intervals 
The 61st harmonic, ex. 1116*884 
Diminished Octave, Vu + 2Td = C : C>^, ex. 1129*827 
The 31st harmonic, ex. 1145*036 

Meshaqah's 23 Quartertones, ex. ratio 1 : m^2>* » 1 : 1*948 
Superfluous Seventh, 3Tu = C : BJL ex. 1158-941 
The 63rd harmonic, ex. 1172-736 

The double Tritone, 4Fw + 2Tu = C : BA ex. 1180-447 
The Octave, C:c 



BBGT. E. 



MUSICAL DUODENES. 



457 



Table II. The Unevenly Numbered Harmonics of C 66 up to the 637d. 



No. 



•5 

•7 



•9 

til 
+18 
•15 



•17 
•19 

21 

28 
•25 

27 
•29 

81 



Pitch 
Noft. 



66 



•198 



880 
462 



594 
726 
858 
990 



1122 
1254 
1386 
1518 
1650 
1782 
1914 
2046 



Log 


Cyclic 
Cents 








-•30108 


1200+ 


+ •47712 


702 


-•60206 


2400 + 


+ •69897 


886 


+ -84510 


969 


-•9(^06 


3600+ 


+0^95424 


204 


+ 1-04139 


551 


+ 1-11394 


841 


+ 1-17609 


1068 


-1-20412 


4800 + 


+ 1-23045 


105 


+ 1-27875 


298 


+ 1-32222 


471 


+ 1-36178 


628 


+ 1-39794 


772 


+ 1-43136 


906 


+ 1-46240 


1080 


+ 1-49136 


1145 



Equal Notes 



9 



+ 2 



e' 


-14 


4 


-81 


d" 


+ 4 


r 


+ 51 


a" 


- 69 


b" 


- 12 


c-J 


+ 5 


d'"« 


- 2 


r 


-29 


r% 


+ 28 


rt 


-27 


a"' 


+ 6 


a-J 


+ 30 


6'" 


+ 45 





Pitch 


No. 

1 


Xos. 


38 


2178 


85 


2310 


87 


2442 


; ^ 


2574 


: 41 


2706 


43 


2888 


45 


2970 


47 


8102 


49 


3234 


51 


8366 


1 53 


8498 


1 55 


8630 


' 57 


8762 


59 


8894 


61 


4026 


63 

1 

1 

\ 


4158 



Log 


Cyclic 
Cents 


- 1-60515 


6000 + 


+ 1-51851 


53 


+ 1-54407 


155 


+ 1-66820 


251 


+ 1-59106 


342 


+ 1-61278 


429 


+ 1-68347 


512 


+ 1-65321 


590 


+ 1-67210 


666 


+ 1-69020 


738 


+ 1-70757 


807 


+ 1-72428 


874 


+ 1-74086 


938 


+ 1-76587 


999 


+ 1-77085 


1069 


+ 1-78588 


1117 


+ 1-79934 


1173 



Equal 


Notes 


c'"J 




47 


d- 


— 


45 


d-Jf 


— 


49 


d-l 


+ 


42 


<•"' 


+ 


29 


r 


+ 


12 


rt 


- 


10 


9'^' 


— 


34 


9'" 


+ 


38 


g'-t 


+ 


7 


a"' 


— 


26 


a'" 


+ 


38 


«"'* 


— 


1 


b"' 


— 


41 


b'^' 


+ 


17 


e' 


— 


27 



Table III. Number of any Interval, not exceeding the Tritone, contained in an 

Octave. 



Cyclic 


- 


Number 


Cyclic 




Number 


Cents in 


Name of Interval 


in an 


Cents in 


Name of Interval 


in an 


Inteiral 




Octave 


Interval 




Octave 


2 


Skhisma .... 


614-8 


200 


Equal Tone 


6-0 


20 


Diaskhisma 


61-4 


204 


Major Tone 




5-9 


22 


Comma .... 


55-8 


281 


Snperseoond 




5-2 


24 


Pyth. Comma . 


51-1 


240 


Pentatone 




5-0 


27 


Septimal Comma 


440 


267 


Subminor Third 




4-5 


28 


Small Dil^Bis . 


40-5 


294 


Pyth. minor Third 




4-1 


42 


Great DiSsis 


29*2 


800 


Equal minor Third 




4-0 


50 


Quartertone 


24-0 


316 


JuBt minor Third 




3-8 


70 


Small Semitone 


17-0 


336 


Superminor Third 




3-6 


76 


Meantone small Semitone 


15-8 


355 


Zalzal's wostd . 




3*4 


85 


Subminor Second 


14-2 


400 


Equal major Third 




4-0 


90 


Limma .... 


13-3 


408 


Pyth. major Third 




2-9 


92 


Larger Limma . 


13-0 


485 


Supermajor Third 




2-8 


100 


Equal Semitone 


12-0 


498 


Just Fourth 




2-4 


112 


Just Diatonic Semitone . 


10-7 


500 


Equal Fourth . 




2-4 


114 


Apotome .... 


10-6 


503 


Meantone Fourth 




2*4 


117 


Meantone great Semitone 


10-3 


590 


Just Tritone 




2-0 


134 


Great Limma . 


9-0 


600 


Equal Tritone . 




2-0 


182 


Minor Tone 


6-6 


612 


Pyth. Tritone . 




2-0 


198 


Mean Tone 


6-2 









T 



If 



SECTION E. 



ON MUSICAL DUODENBS OB THB DBYBLOPMENT OF JUST INTONATION FOB HABUONY. 

(See notes pp. 208, 209, 211, 269, 272, 293, 298, 299, 301, 302, 304, 305, 306, 310, 333, 338. 345, 

346, 852, and 363.) 



Art. 

1. Introduction, p. 458. 

2. Harmonic Elements, p. 458. 

3. Construction of the Schemes, p. 458. 

4. Harmonic Cell or Unit of Concord, p. 458. 

5. Harmonic Heptad or Unit of Chord Rela- 

tionship, p. 458. 



Art. 

6. Harmonic Deoad or Unit of Harmony, 

p. 459. 

7. Chords of the Decad, p. 459. 

8. Intervals of the Decs^, p. 459. 

9. Harmonic Trichordals and Scales, p. 460. 
10. Principal Trichordal Scales, p. 460. 



468 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. 



Art. 

1 1 . Harmonic Duodene or Unit of Modulation , 

p. 461. 

12. Modulation into the Dominant Duodene, 

p. 461. 
18. Modulation into the Subdominant Duo- 
dene, p. 462. 

14. Modulation into the Mediant Duodene, 

p. 462. 

15. Modulation into the Minor Submediant 

Duodene, p. 462. 

16. Modulation into Relative and Correlative, 

p. 462. 

17. Duodenation, p. 462. 



Art 

18. The Duodenarium, p. 468. 

19. Construction of the Duodenarium, p. 463. 

20. Just Intervals reduced to steps of Fifths 

and major Thirds, p. 464. 

21. The column of Fifths, p. 464. 

22. The Limits of the Duodenarium, p. 464. 
28. Introduction of the Seventh and Seven- 
teenth Harmonic, p. 464. 

24. Need of Reduction of the number of Just 

Tones, p. 464. 
26. Omission of the Skhismas. Unequallj 

Just Intonation. The cycle of 58, p. 465. 
26. Duodenals, p. 465. 



1. Introduction, The following sketch is founded on my paper on the same 
subject in the Proceedings of the Boyal Society ioc Nov. 19, 1874, vol. xziiL p. 3. 

H It is an attempt to develop the tricordal principles of 8upr&, pp. 293d and 309d. 
This, of course, is an inversion of what actually occurred. But the introduction 
of the harmonic principle has completely changed the nature of music, and its plan 
consequently requires reconstruction. Harmony alone is considered. Melody is 
made dependent on harmony. The harmony is tertiany that is, it includes pei^ect 
Thirds, major and minor ; but not septimal, that is, it does not include the 7th 
harmonic of the base of a chord. But this may be superadded, see art. 23. The 
plan here pursued also has the advantage of shewing the precise tertian relation of 
the notes of a chord written in the usual notation, by merely superscribing a letter, 
called the dttodencU, without any change whatever in the ordinary notation itself. 
The notes affected by the other harmonies can then be easily indicated (art 26). 

2. The Harmonic Elements are the intervals of a Fifth, major and minor Third, 
with all their extensions, inversions, and extensions of their inversions, that is all 
the forms in p. 1916, c, which are here assumed. Capital letters will therefore 
indicate notes without regard to octave, and even allow of reduplication, or added 
octaves. The notation is otherwise the same as for my variation of Herr A. v. 

IT Oettingen's notation, explained on p. 277o, note *, and used through the rest of 
this work. The notation of intervals is used as in p. 276d, note f, so that + is 
386, - is 316, + is 702, | is 294 cents, and (...) is replaced by the proper 
number of cents in the interval. 

3. In the construction of the schemes notes forming ascending Fifths are 
written over one another vertically ; notes forming ascending major Thirds are 
written to the right horizontally. Against each note is written the number of 
cyclic cents (supr&, p. 452a) in its interval from C or the root, reduced to the same 
octave. A notation in Solfeggio terms (modified from that used by the Tonic 
Solfaists with Italian pronunciation of the vowels) is also supplied, in which Do 
stands for the root whatever the note itself may be. 



4. Harmonic Cell or Unit of Concord, 

Letter Notation, 
E^\f 316 G 702 

GO Ej^ 386 



Solfeggio Notation. 
Mo 316 So 702 

Do Mi 386 



This consists of the three harmonic elements, the Fifth 0+G (or Do±So) and 
major Thirds C + -Er ^ E^\^ + G (or Do + Mi and Mo + So) being placed as already 
explained, so that the minor Thirds C-E^\^ (or Do - Mo) and E^-G (or Mi - So) 
lie obliquely upwards to the left. Such a cell is called the Cell of C (or Do) its 
root. 

The student should construct such ceUs on The cell contains therefore aU forms of the 

any root. C has been adopted simply because major and minor chords, triad or tetrad, gi?en 

it is most usual, and because it is suited to the in Chap. Xn. above. 
Harmonica], on which its effect should be tried. 

5. The Harmonic Heptad or Unit of Chord Relationship, 

Letter Notation. Solfeggio Notation. 

E^\f 316 G 702 Mo 316 So 702 

A^\} 814 CO E^ 386 Lo 814 Do Mi 386 

i^ 498 i4 1 884 Fa 498 La 884 



SECT. S. 



MUSICAL DUODEKES. 



469 



The heptad possesses seven notes, whence its name. It is formed by subjoining 
the cell of F (or Fa) to the cell of C (or Do), so that the Fifth of the lower cell is 
the root of the upper cell. This is called the Heptad of G (or Do) its central note. 
It contains not only the 4 cell triads^ major C + E^- G, F + A^ - C (or Do + 
Mi" So, Fa + La- Do), mmor C - Jg?i(> + G, F - A^\^ ^ G (or Do - Mo + So, 
Fa - Lo -^ Do), but also two union triads, major A^\} + - E^\} (or Lo -h Do - 
Mo), and minor Aj - + J^j (or La-Do + Mi), which result from the union of the 
two cells. It therefore possesses all the six consonant chords which contain the same 
note G (or Do), and can hence pass readily into one another, as should be verified on 
the Harmonical. It possesses also the seven condissonant triads (p. 338, note f ) con- 
taining C, the major Trine A^\} + O+jEr^ {or Lo + Do-^Mi) containing two major 
Thirds, and the minor Trine A^ - G - E^\^ (or La - Do - Mo) containing two 
minor Thirds, the pure quintal Trine F±G±G (or Fa ± Do ± So) containing two 
Fifths, the major quintal Trines ^^b + C ± G {or Lo -k- Do ± So) and F± G -\- E^ 
(or Fa ± Do -^ Mi) consisting of a major Third and a Fifth, and the minor quintal 
Trines A^ - G±G{orLa - Do ± So) and 2?* ± G - E^\^ {or Fa ± Do - Mo) con- T 
sisting of a minpr Third and a Fifth. 

AU of these should be studied on the Har- consonant triad containing the same note C 
monical, and the readiness with which their should be felt, 
dissonance may be removed by passing into a 

6. The Harmonic Decad or Unit of Harmony. 



Letter Notation. 
B^b 1018 D 204 
E^\^ 316 G 702 5i 1088 
A^\, 814 CO ^1 386 
JP' 498 A^ 884 



Solfeggio Notation. 
To 1018 Be 204 
Mo 316 So 702 Ti 1088 
Lo 814 Do Mi 386 
Fa 498 La 884 



The Decad possesses ten notes, whence its name. It consists of the heptad 
of G (or So) superimposed on the heptad of G (or Do). These two heptads have 
a common cell, that of G (or Do). Hence the decad of G (or Do) may also be^ 
considered as three cells, the tonic or that of G (or Do) in the middle ; the domi- 
nant or that of G (or So) above, and the subdominant or that of F (or Fa) below. 
The decad of G (or Do) is the complete development of the cell of G (or Do), for 
the root of the upper cell is the Fifth of the root of the middle cell, while that 
root itself is the Fifth of the root of the lower cell. 

7. The Ghords of the Decad. The vertical axis is the column of Fifths F ± G ± 
G ± D {or Fa ± Do ± So ± Be). Those are two horizontal axes of major Trines. 
The decad contains 3 cell major triads F+A^ - G, C + j&j - G, (r + Bj- D (or 
Fa-k-La- Do, Do + Mi- So, So + Ti - Be) on the right, and 2 union major triads 
il^b + C - E% E^\f + G - B^\^ (or Lo + Do - Mo, Mo -^ So - To) on the left. 
The decad also contains 3 cell minor triads F-'A^\^+G, G-E^\} + G, G-B^\^ + 
D (or Fa - Lo-^ Do, Do - Mo + So, So -To + Be) on the left, and 2 union minor 
triads ill - G + E^,E^- G + B^ (or La-Do+ Mi, Mi- So + Ti) on the right. 
It has also the dissonance of the dominant Seventh, G + B-D \ F {or So + Ti- 
Be I Fa) and minor Ninth G + B-D \ F-A^\^ (or So + Ti-Be | Fa-Lo), and^ 
hence of the diminished Seventh (the same less G or So), and of the added Sixth 
F+A-G 204 D, or F+A 620 D {Fa + La - Do 204 Be, or Fa + La 520 Be), 
but not the minor triad D^-F+Ai {or Ba-Fa-^- La, see Ba in art. 11, p. 461), 
which is confused with it in tempered intonation. And it has also not the chords of 
the extreme sharp Sixth, D^\^+F 204 G + B^, p. 286&, orf + a 590 d^jj^ p. 3086. 

8. The Intervals of the Decad. The relative position of the principal intervals 
should be observed in addition to the vertical Fifths (including Fourths), the hori- 
zontal major Thirds (including minor Sixths), and oblique minor Thirds (including 
major Sixths), on which the scheme is founded. 



Major Tone 204, two Fifths vertically up, 
as C D (or Do Re). 

Minor Tone 182, obliquely down to the right 
in the next line but cme asG Aj (or 8o La). 

Defective Fifth 680, obliquely down to the 
right in the next line but two sa D Ai (or 
Be La). 



Diatonic Semitone 112, obliquely down to 
the left in the next line bs B^C (or Ti Do). 

SmaU Semitone 70, obliquely down to the 
right in the next column but one, and in the 
next line, as B^\f B, (or To Ti). 

This is the smallest interval occurring in a 
Decad. 



460 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



9. Harmonic TrichordaU. A triohordal oonsists of one triad from each of the 
three cells of a deoad. Eight such trichordals may be formed from the three 
major and three minor cell triads. Abbreviate the names ' major triad * and ' minor 
triad ' into their first syllables, ma,y mi. (which however may, if preferred, be read 
more at full as ' major ' and * minor '), and name them in the order of Subdominant, 
Tonic and Dominant triads, then the eight trichordals are ma.ma.97u»., mi.ma.nuL, 
ma.mi.ma.y mi.md.ma., ma.ma.mi., mi.ma.mi.^ ma.mi.mi., mi.mi.mi. The seven 
tones in each trichordal reduced to a single octave constitute an harmonic scale, that 
is a scale in which each note belongs to a triad in the scale. We may begin the 
scale with any one of the notes of any one of the 3 generating triads. These notes 
may be numbered in order of sharpness when reduced to the same octave, as 4, 6, 1 
in the subdominant, 1, 6, 5 in die tonic, and 5, 7, 2 in the dominant. These 
numbers may be simply prefixed to the trichordal they affect, to shew on wb&t 
note the scale begins. We thus obtain 7 x 8 » 56 trichordal scales, of which 8 are 

IT generically different, each genus having 7 species. In some accounts of the modes 
they are all represented in fact as ma.ma.ma., differing only as to the note of the 
scale with which they begin. This is, of course, thoroughly erroneous. The student 
is recommended to make out on the Harmonical every one of these 56 scales. 

10. Principal Trichordal Scales. The following gives a list of the principal 
scales thus generated referring to the places where they have been noted in the 
text, and the scale is noted as beginning with C, 



The figures between two consecutive notes 
indicate the interval between them in cents. 
The number prefixed to the root of the decad 
indicates the note of the chord with which the 
scale begins, reckoned in the way just men- 
tioned. References to the text follow. Where 
any one of these scales cannot be played on 



the Harmonical a form is given which can be 
played. As each note forms part of a oeU 
triad, and mostly also of a union triad, each 
scale can be harmonised, and the stodenl 
should therefore harmonise all of them on the 
Harmonical. See also p. 277, note f. No ex. 
amples of the unusual Vl. Mi.HA.ifi. are given. 



I. Ma.ma.ma. 

f 1 C s C 204 D 182 J7, 112 J^ 204 G 182 A^ 204 B^ 112 c. No. 1 of p. 2746 and note. Major 
Mode of p. 2986. Ordinary C major. 

6 F=ClQ2Di20^Ei 112 ^ 204 G 182 A^ 112 B^ 204 c. No. 5 of p 275a, thei« oaUed the 
mode of the Fourth. This must be played on the Harmonical as 5 C ma.ma.ma., which has 
the same intervals, namely : O 182 A^ 204 B^ 112 c 204 d 182 e^ 112 f20ig. It is No. 5 of 
p. 276a, there called the mode of the Fourth. 

II. Ml.MA.MA. 

1 C = C 204 Z> 182 J^i 112 J^ 204 G 112 A^^ 274 B 112 c. The minor-major mode of 
pp. 8056 and dOdd. 

III. Ma.mt.ma. 

1 C = C 204 D 112 E^\^ 182 ^ 204 G 182 A^^ 204 B^ 112 c, No. 2 of p. 2745. The mode of the 
minor Seventh, with the leading note, or major Seventh, substituted for the minor Seventh, as 
in p. dOQd. An ordinary form of the ascending minor scale, p. 288a. 

IV. Ml.MI.MA. 

1 C = C 204 Z) 112 ^i|> 182 F 204 G 112 A^^ 274 B, 112 c. The * instrumental ' minor scale 
of <p. 2886 ; the * modern * ascending minor scale of p. SOOd. 

^ V. Ma.ma.mi. 

1 =: C 204 D 182 £?! 112 i^ 204 G 182 A^ 134 B^^ 182 c. Although this is called the mode 
of the Fourth on pp. 2986 and S09d, it is a different scale from that called the mode of the 
Fourth on p. 2756, which is 5 ^ ma.ma.ma. above, under I., because the Seventh in this case is 
B^}f and in that JB[^, a comma lower. See p. 277, footnote f, on this and similar confusions. 

5 1^ = O 182 Di 184 E^^ 182 J^ 204 G 182 A^ 112 B\f 204 c. This must be played on the Har- 
monical as 5 C = G 182 ^^ 184 B^^ 182 c 204 (2 182 e^ 112 / 204 gf. This is No. 6 of p. 2756 
and there considered as a variant of the mode of the minor Seventh, which is really the different 
scale, 8 ma.mi.mi., next immediately following. 

VII. Ma. MI. MI. 

1 C = C 204 D 112 E^\f 182 F 204 G 182 A^ 184 B^^ 182 c. This is No. 4 of p 275a taken 
upwards, instead of downwards as there. The mode of the minor Seventh of p 2986 without 
the leading tone of p. S03c. 

VIII. Mi.mi.mi. 

1 C = O 204 B 112 E^\^ 182 i^ 204 G 112 A^\f 204 B^\f 182 c, No. 3 or descending minor scale 
of p. 274c, the mode of the minor Third of p. 294a, No. 4. 

5 F = C 112 B>1, 204 J5;i(, 182 F 204 G 112 A^\f 182 B|, 204 c. This must be played on the 



8BCT. E. 



MUSICAL DUODENES. 



461 



Harmonical as 5 C = G 112 ^ijk 204 B^^ 182 C 204 D 112 E^^ 182 1^ 204 9. It is No. 7 of 
p. 2756, the mode of the minor Sixth of pp. 294a No. 5, 298c No. 5, 305c to 808(2. 

11. The Harmonic Duodena^ or Unit of Modulation. 



Letter Notation. 



Solfeggio Notation. 



^'b 


134 


2^ 620 


A 


906 


•.c,\: 


92 


Ej^\ 


478 


o^\> 


632 

1130 

428 

926 


^b 316 
il^b 814 
Di|^ 112 


D 


204 


E, 
^1 


590 

1038 
386 

884 


^4 


976 


o--b 


Q 
C 


702 



^4 

<^4 
04 


274 
772 


^bb 


F 


498 


70 


^•bb 


224 


G»|> 610 : 


^b 


996 


D^ 


182 


^4 


568 



ru 


fo 


u 


\ ^ 


me 


au 


to 


re 




It 


du 


mo 


\ so 


1 ^i 


m 

r% 


fu 


lo 


\ do 


j mi 


se 


tu 


to 


\fa 


la 


de 


mu 


80 


\ ta 


ra 


fi 



H 



In referring to the figure of the deoad in art. 6 two gaps will be noticed, one to 
the right at the top, the other to the left at the bottom. On filling these up accord- 
ing to the same laws by making FJj^ a Fifth above Bi and a major Third above 
D, and D^\f b, Fifth below A^\^ and a major Third below F, we obtain the scheme 
in the central rectangle of the above figures, which is called a Duodene, because it 
consists of twelve notes bearing to each other the relation of the twelve notes on 
the piano, which, by omitting the marks of commas ^^f may be supposed to be 
represented by the same letters. The Duodene then consists of 3 columns or 
quaternions of Fifths, and four lines or major trines of Thirds, and its root, which 
is that of the corresponding decad, is in the centre of the lowest line but one, so 
that it is easy to construct a duodene on any note as a root. 

The duodene thus completed by these extreme tones possesses two additional 
union Thirds, major D^b + ^ - A^\^ {or Bo + Fa - Lo) and minor B^-D + FJi (or 
Ti - Be + Fi), and consequently besides the 8 genera of scales of the decad contains ^ 

themajorscaleof i4ib(inajorchord8 2)ib + i^-^%^^b + C-E%E^\^ + G -B^\^) 
and the descending minor scale of E^ (minor chords Ai-C + Ey ^j - G+ JBj, B^ - 
D + ^2$)) a^^ ^^ a^^ gives us the chords of the extreme sharp Sixth (976 cents, a 
very near approach to the 7th harmonic of 969 cents) in its three forms, 



a dissonance, 



Italian Sixth A^\^ 386 G 590 FA scarcely 
French Sixth A^\^ 386 C 204 IT 386 F{i 
German Sixth A^\f 386 C 316 E^\^ 274 F^^ 

These three last chords camiot he played on the Harmonical. They arose in the days of 
meantone temperament. The chord of the dominant Seventh omitting the Fifth E^^ 386 
O 610 d^\^ had tnen to he played with tempered notes as E]f 386 O 579 ejj^ because there was no 
d^ on the instrument, and as the 7th harmonic would have been £^|> 386 G 583 ^d^b ^^^ effect 
was so good that the chord wsa adopted in writing and distinguished from the chord of the 
dominant Seventh, by resolving upirar<2« instead of downwards. 

Ifhese new notes have also introduced two new Semitones of 92 cents, F 92 Fjj^^ 
and D^b ^^ ^- ^^^ ^^0 smallest interval between any two notes remains the 
small Semitone of 70 cents, A^\^ 70 A^, E^\^ 70 E^y B^\^ 70 JBj. 



12. ModtUation into the Dominant Duodene, 



It is obvious from the construction of the 
duodene that the transition from any duo- 
dene to an adjacent one is very eas^. Suppose 
(see scheme in art. 11) that we omit the lowest 
line D^^ + ^ + i4. (or i2o + Fa + La) and take 
in the line j^ + ^ + CM at the top, we shall 
have the duodene of G, which has three lines 
in common with that of C The three new 
notes introduce 2 commas F 22 F^, Ai 22 A and 
one diaskhitma Cji 20 D'[>. These minute 
distinctions neglected in tempered music have, 
however, a powerful effect on the harmony of 
justly intoned instruments. The CA is indeed 



one of the extra notes and does not occur in 
the decad of G or its scales. On the other 
hand Fjj^ which was an extra note in the duo- 
dene of C, becomes a substantive note in the 
deoad, as well as duodene, of O, and we find 
then that the F of the C deoad becomes the 
FJ, 92 cents higher in the O decad. This 
difference is so large that it cannot be disre- 
garded in tempered music, and it is, accord- 
ingly, there represented by an interval of 100 
ottits, and forms the distinguishing mark for 
major scales of what is termed the modulcUion 
into the dominant as just explained. 



462 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



13. Modulation into the Subdominant Duodene. 



Omit the top line B^\f + D ■{■ FA (or To 
•\- Re + Ft) of the duodene of C in scheme 
art. 11, and take a new line G'|^ + Bk + -Di (or 
Sa-\-Ta + Ra) at the bottom to obtain the 
duodene of F (or Fa). The chiuiges made are 
the reverse of those for modulations into the 
dominant. The notes B*[>, D are depressed by 
a comma of 22 cents to B^, Dj, and the extra 
note F^jtt of the C duodene is raised by a 



diaskhisma of 20 cents to 0^\f of the F duodene. 
These changes are neglected in tempered in- 
tonation. But the most important changie 
is that Bi (which is in the duodene, but not 
the decad of F) is depressed by a Semitone of 
92 cents from Bi to B]f, and this being noticed 
in tempered music, becomes the distingalsh- 
ing mark in the modulation of the major scale 
of C into that of 'the subdominant F. 



14. Modulation into the Media/nt Duodene^ 



Returning again to the duodene of C, we 
might omit the left column D^^ ± ^*b ± -^'b ± 
B^\} (or ro ± lo ± mo ± to) of the duodene of C 
^ (see scheme in art. 11) and introduce a new 
column on the right CJk ± GA ± DA ± 
A A (or de + « + ri + it), m whicn each new 
note is a great diesis of 42 cents lower than 
the note in the column omitted. This differ- 



ence is ignored in playing tempered mnsic, 
although the distinction is |ireserved in writ- 
ing as D\^ and CJL Ac., but it is of great ina> 
portance in just intonation. This is termed 
modulation from the root C (or Do) into the 
Mediant, E^ (or Mi) as the root of the new 
duodene is the major Third or Mediant of the 
root C (or Do) of the old duodene. 



15. Modulation into the Minor Submediant Duodene. 



Similarly we might omit the right column 
^i± E^±Bi± Fjj^ (or la mi ti ft) of the duo- 
dene of C (see scheme in art. 11) and in- 



troduce a new column B^^\^ ± ^b ± ^1? ± <^^ 
(or ta fu du su) on the left, thus forming the 
duodene oiA^^ (or Lo) or minor aubmsdiant. 



16. Modulation into the Relative and Correlative Duodenes, 



But it is usual to combine these two modu- 
lations with others into the subdominant of 
the mediant (that is the submediant) A^ (or 
La)y generally called the relative on the one 

ijhand, and the dominant of the minor sub- 
mediant, that is £r 'k (or Mo), sometimes called 
the correlative, on the other. In each case the 
root of the new duodene differs by a minor 
Third from the old root. The change for these 
two last modulations is considerable if we take 
the whole duodene into consideration, as may 
be seen by the schemes in art. 11, where the 
dotted lines mark off the new duodenes. Butin 
the cases which occur in practice the changes 
are very small, especially when the difference 
of a comma is neglected as in tempered music. 
The modulation into the relative is generally 
from the major scale of the decad of C or chords 
jP-hi^i - C,C+^i - 0,0 +Bi -DintothewiiK)r 
scale of the relative decad of A^, either consist- 
mgof thechordsDi -F+ Ai^A^-C-h E^,E^ - 
G -J- B, (in which there is only the use of Dj for 
D, to indicate this modulation), or else con- 

fsistingof thechordsDi - F ■\' Ay, A^ - C +J5i, 
^1 + Gj - B^, or even D^-{-FA- A^^, A^ - 
C -h E, El - OA - By, these being the three 
recognised forms of the minor scale. As the 
two latter forms are also acknowledged in 



tempered intonation (which, however, confuses 
FA and fAj, the change of O into GJj^ (or so 
into se, thaS is the sharpening of the Fifth by 
properly 70 cents) has generally been con- 
sidered the mark of modulation from a major 
scale into its relative minor, — one of the com- 
monest in music. 

The modulation into the correlative is in 
the same way generally thought of as the 
change of the tonic major soale chords F -f 
Aj " C,C +E.'' 0,G+ B^-D {or Fa + La 
- Do,Do + Mi - So, So + Ti - Be) into the 
tonic minor scaJe chords F ~ A^\f + C, C ~ 
E^^ -I- G, G - m -h D [or Fa - Lo -^-Do^Do - 
Mo •¥ So, So - To + 22«), in which however the 
chord G + Bi - 1> (or 5o + Ti -Re) may re- 
majn, and sometimes the chord F + Ai — C 
(or Fa La Do), This is not a modulation at 
all in the sense just explained, because there 
is no change of duodene or even decad. It is 
merely a change of scale within the same 
decad, that is, a new trichordaJ scale moving 
froml Cma.ma.ma. tol Cmi.mi.mL,mi.mLma., 
or ma.mi.ma., art. 9. It would, however, be 
more consonant to ancient practice to restrict 
the term modulation to such changes of tri- 
chordal within the same duodene, and to use 
a new term for the more general operation. 



17. Duodenation. 



This is the term I propose to substitute 
for modulation when it means passing from 
one duodene to another which bears a known 
relation to the first. This relation may be very 
close, as in the cases just considered, or so 
remote that the two duodenes have only one 
note in common. Thus the duodene of D^]^ 
and C have only the note B^^ in common. 
The annexed figure, called the Dtiodindrium, 
probably contains all such duodenations which 



occur even in modem music, though it is im- 
possible to be certain how far the ambiguities 
of tempered intonation may mislead the oom- 
poser to consider as relateo, chords and scales 
which are really very fax apart. It contains 
therefore an approximate estimate of 117, 
for the number of tones in an Octave which 
would be required to play in just intonation, 
and axe roughly represented by the 12 tones of 
equal temperament. 



SECT. £. 



MUSICAL DUODENES. 



463 



18. The Diwdendrium, 

The large figures give the cyclic cents in the interval of each note from C See Table 
p. 440. The small figures give the corresponding numbers of the cycle of 58 with the nearest 
whole number of cents. See Table p. 4d9. 



1 
1-26 



47 



-•27 



16 



074 

268 

278 



-•94 



970 D>k 156 

^ 11 168 

G*\^ 654 

33 667 



F* 542 

S8 648 

B^ lOiO 

60 1042 



•28 A*\,\^ 

38 



76€C»|> 1152 



77C 



-•18D*[^b 6iF^\^ 450il«b 



•14 G*\,\f 

80 



-•09C«bb 

61 

-ofiP*bb 

80 



a 



5e2B*\f^ 948 D'l^ 



66( 



+ •05 



OB*bbb 

48 

^bbb 



856D 



86( 



11 



16! 



A 



+ •09 

6671 

+ •14|0*|,l,b 

a 1166 



*^^ 



+ -i8P*bbb ^^^bbb834 



1166 



84 



46S 



46 



•61 



8 

-•63 



A^ 

46 

14 



^1 



^ 



41 

>^ 

10 



888 

340 

886 

838 

184 

138 



4 
•81 



928 

888 

226 

886 



5 




9 
31 



114 

113 

612 

611 



EJi5O0GM886BM 

86 408 

A,1t 998 

906 



36 
6 

F^ 

87 



724 

786 



B 1110 DJt 296 



63 a 1100 



22 
83 

520^ 

681 



E 



106G|£7S|^|^ 246 

1064 16 849 

868 4»1>1^ 744 

364 37 747 

>»bb 42 

6 46 



G^ 

38 
83 



42€ i 



18 

15ikP\f]^ 6iG\B^}^\^ 926pi^ 



28 



643 



65S 0>|^b I0S3 

60 1048 

1150|F'|>b 386 

19 340 



+ -23|C'»bbb 9*6 

46 061 



1-26 

1 



^bbbi32 

16 136 



6d2B>|> 1018 D 



1180 E^^ 



46 



63 

L8( 

1133 

m 

430 

)26 

08f 



48 



1019 
816 
317 

814 

816 

112 

113 



^^bb 224 

14 286 

ii«|,l> 722 



36 



726 



6 



20^[, 

23 



<3^ 

27 



518 

621 



-•94 



-•63 
8 



31 



610 

611 



1108 £7|^ 



63 = 1109 



22 



406 il|^ 



408 



B^bb 

44 



904 

006 



-•31 

4 



44 



408 

408 

906 

906 



IS 



36 



204 

204 

702 

702 





498 

408 



48 



6 
+ •81 






17 804 

38 788 

OJi 92 

8 91 



7 
+ •63 



43 883 

CJtKl84 

18 181 



7 

JgJJttt 



FJEtt682 

34 679 



^41180 

3 im 

EJl 478 

26 476 



AJS 1068 Cjm 254 



^i 



090/1 J 



62 1067^ 



1086 Djt 



OEj 88C G^^ 



'1 

81 



S8( 



^1 884 04 

i 885 7 



47 



16 



38 



976 

974 

274 

878 

772 

770 

70 



996 Di 

996 



17 



38 



294 

284 

792 

798 



182 

12 181 
34 679 



^b 



90 

91 




5 



680 B 



Ci 1178 

3 1!77 



Fi 476 

26 47^ 



S^ 666 46 

, loeeDjf 

61 1064 16 



20 



864 

362 



8 

+ •94 



28 



9 
+ r26 



72DJtt( 456 

68 24 463 

570OJttt 956 

666 40 961 



61 



106 



•WW 

80 



42 



16 



241 



366 F.m 752 

360 87 74fl 

864BJIIK 5C 

88(1 6 *6 



CM 16S EM 548 

11 16f 28 642 

FJU 66C ^JS 1046 

33 667 60 104! 

BS 1168 DM 344 

2 11« 19 

EJi 45% 

24 



463 

954 

061 



241 



A^ 862 

48 860 



+ •81 
6 



+ •68 

7 



37 



747 



'^ 



CM 

10 

252FJff 



38 



34( 

842 + 

838 



-•82 
-•27 

-•28 

-•18 
-•14 

-•09 

-•05 



05 



140+^09 

68e 

03 



+ •14 



750 BJf 1186 + 18 



6 



481:; J 434|+-28 



46 



+ •94 
8 



83 



+ 1-26 
9 



This is the fijst table of modulations adapted to Just Intonation that has been constructed. 
But the table in Gottfried Weber's Versuch Mn&r geordneten Thearie d&r Tofueigkunst (Attempt 
at systematic theory of musical composition, 1880-2, vol. ii., § 180, p. 86), although only 
adapted to equal temperament, was of much assistance to me. 

19. Construction of the Dtwdenarium, The arrangement is that of all the 
previous schemes, proceeding from bottom to top by intervals of a Fifth 702 cents 
(or from top to bottom by intervals of a Fourth 498 cents), and from left to right by 
intervals of a major Third 386 cents (or from right to left by intervals of a minor 
Sixth 814 cents). The number written against any note shews the cyclic intervals 
of the note from C, when all are reduced to the same Octave, see App. XX. sect. A. 
art. 24, xiii. p. 437ft'. 

But as a Fifth is 701*955 cents, and a major Third 886^814, errors of accumulation occur, 
and hence the cyclic numbers require corrections if the precise numbers are wanted; apply 
those given at top or bottom of the column, or at either end of the Une containing the number. 
Thus ^jiji 682 has the column correction + ^68, and the line correction - ^23, and its true dis- 
tance from C is therefore 682^4 cents. On referring to the name of the note in the Table, 
sect. A. art. 28, p. 440, the precise number of cents to one place of decimals, the logarithm and 
pitch of the note will be found in addition. 

The interval between any two notes, reduced to the same Octave, is the dif- 
ference of the number of cyclic cents assigned ; corrected if required. The number 
of the note by which the just note would be represented in Bosanquet's cycle of 
53, is added in smaller figures under the just note, and the nearest whole number 
of cents is annexed. Beferring to that number in the Table in sect. A. art. 27, 



IT 



464 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. 



p. 4396, the name given by Mr. Bosanquet, the precise number of cents, the loga- 
rithm and the pitch will be found. 

20. Just IntervaU Reduced to Steps of Fifths and Major Thirds. On aooount 
of the construction by Fifths and major Thirds, we can proceed from any note to 
any other by taking a certain number of Fifths up or down, and then major 
Thirds up or down, and reducing to the same Octave. See 8upr&, sect. D. arts. 
7 and 9, p. 4526', c, where the process is described. 



21. The Column of Fifths. 



The centnl column of Fifths has no supe- 
rior or inferior indexes. The superior indexes 
^ *, >, * to the left not only serve to distinauish 
the columns, but indicate that the note hear- 
ing it is, 1, 2, 8, 4 commas of 22 cents sha/rper 
^ or higher than the note of the same name in 
the column of Fifths. Thus D\f in the column 
of Fifths has 90 cents, D^l^ has therefore 90 -h 
8 X 22 = 156 cents as there marked. The in- 
ferior indexes it •, st 4 to the right also not 
merely distinguish the columns, but indicate 



that the notes are 1, 2, 3, 4 commas JlaUer or 
lower than a note of the same in the column 
of Fifths. Thus Cjt has 114 cents, but C± has 
114 - 8 X 22 » 48 cents. It is thus qulteeasy 
to continue the line of Fifths up at least to 
DjfiJUf 546 from the table by adding the ap- 
propriate number of commas, thus DJlLjti 
= ^4]tS + ^ ^ 22 = 458-1- 88 » 546 cents and 
down to C\f}^\^ 858 by subtracting the same 
as shewn by C*\f^^ -4x 22 = 946 -88^ 85& 



22. Limits of the Duodenarium. 



These were determined thus: The central 
dark oblong is the duodene of C. Within 
the next dark oblong are aU the duodenes 
which have at least one note in common with 
the duodene of C. The extremes are the duo- 
denes of Ifi\f (with the note B^\^), of A*^\^ 
(with the note D^b), of Ejf (with the note 
FJtj, and of jB, (with the note AX Then the 
outer black oblong contains all the duodenes 
T whose roots are notes in the intermediate 



black oblong. Supposing the original duo- 
dene, then, to be one which had its root in 
the duodene of C (which may always be con- 
sidered as the case), the limits aUow of modu- 
lation into any duodene containing that note, 
and thence into duodenes which have at least 
one note in common with the last named. We 
thus obtain 9 x 18 = 117 notes, forming 7 x 10 
= 70 duodenes. 



23. Introduction of the Seventh and Seventeenth Harmonics. 



If it is desired to proceed beyond tertian 
to sepUmal harmony to introduce the har- 
monic form of the chord of the dominant 
Seventh, with the ratios 4:5:6:7 as Mr. 
Poole has done (see sect. F. No. 7), or even 
to septendedmal harmony to introduce the 
harmonic form of the chord of the minor 
Ninth 8:10:12:14:17 (see p. 346c, note»J, 
the number of the notes will ba nearly tripled. 
TflJdng the root of the chord as C, to each 
minor Seventh B)y we should have to add ^B|^, 
which is 27 cyclic cents flatter than this 
minor Seventh B\f (as shewn in the duo- 
denary arrangement of Mr. Poolers notes, 
7 sect. F. No. 7), and to each minor Ninth as 
D^^ we must add ^^D'^, which is seven cyclic 
cents flatter than this minor Ninth. The cents 
in the tertian chord of the minor Ninth C E^ 
G B\f D^\f are 0, 886, 702, 996, 1200 + 112. 
Hence the cents in the harmonic septimal 
chord of the dominant Seventh, or C E^ O 
^B^, are 0, 886, 702, 969, and the cents in the 
septendecimal chord of the minor Ninth, or 



C EiG '-Bb* "Z)»|> are 0, 386, 702, 969, 1200 
+ 105. This form can be plajred in aU its 
inversions on the Harmonical, see sect, F. 
No. 1. If the root be omitted in the chord 
of the minor Ninth, we obtain the chord of 
the diminished Seventh, which in its har- 
monic form is 10 : 12 : 14 : 17, or JBT^ G ''B\f 
^''D% in cents 0, 316, 583, 919, which can also 
be played on the Harmonical in all its inver- 
sions. In Mr. Bosanquet's cycle of 53, the 
chord of the dominant Seventh is played by 
the degrees 4, 21, 35, 47, or cents 0, 385, 702, 
974, of which the last note is 5 cents too 
sharp, but the effect is good. The chord of 
the diminished Seventh must be played by 
degrees 4, 18, 30, 45, or cents 0, 817, 589, 929, 
the last of which is 10 cents too sharp, and 
the result would not be improved by taldng it 
one degree or 23 cents flatter. Altogether it 
is only a slight improvement on the imitation 
of the tertian form, degrees 4, 18, 31, 45, or 
cents 0, 317, 611, 929. 



24. Need of Reduction of the Number of Just Tones, 



Of course it is quite out of the question 
that any attempt should be made to deal with 
such numbers of tones differing often by only 
2 cents from each other. No ear could appre- 
ciate the multitude of distinctions. No in- 
strument, even if once correctly tuned, would 
keep its intonation sufficiently well to preserve 



such niceties. No keyboard could be invented 
for playing the notes even if they could be 
tuned, although, as will be seen in art. 26, it 
is very easy to mark a piece of ordinary 
music so as to indicate the precise notes to 
be struck. Hence some compromise is needed, 
such as the following. 



BBCT. B. 



MUSICAL DUODENES. 



466 



26. The Omission of the Skhisma. Unequally Jtist Intonation. 

The Cycle of 53. 



The first compromise is to consider ail 
tones differing by 2 cents (a skhisma) as iden- 
tical. The dotted lines in the Duodenarium 
inclose 7 x 8=56 tones which differ from each 
other by more than 2 cents. Any note in the 
line just above the upper dotted Une differs 
only by 2 cents from the note just aboye the 
lower dotted Une in the preceding column. 
We may proceed then by perfect Fifths of 
702 cents up from DA 262, the extreme note 
in the right-nand bottom comer of this oblong, 
to Djtji 866, at |he top, and thence by an im- 
perfect Fifth of 700 cents (the same as in the 
equally tempered scale) to B^ 1066 at the 
bottom of the next column to the left. Then 
again we may go by perfect Fifths to bA 1180, 
and then by another Fifth of 700 cents to O^ 
680 (sll80 + 700 - 1200) and so on till we 
had by these alternating Fifths of 702 and 
700 cents reached the 56th note and 55th 
Fifth F*^ 450. In this way, at the 58rd Fifth 
or 54th note we should have reached E^]^\^ 
246, over which a short line is drawn. Now 
this is lower than the initial note Djt 252 by 
only 6 cents. Hence if on the three Icust occa- 



sions where Fifths of 700 cents were to have 
been used, we had taken the perfect Fifths 
of 702 cents we should have made C^}^ = 1110 
cents, A^\f^ « 726 cents and i^|^|y = 842 cents, 
and consequently E^\f 252 cents. This would 
have become identical with the starting note 
DA 252. This mode of tuning, which if accu- 
ra^ly executed no ear could distinguish from 
just intonation, forms the unequally Just in- 
UmcUion mentioned in sect. A. art. 19, p. 485c. 
It is also the foundation of substituting for 
the perfect Fifth another of 81 x 1200 •^ 58 » 
701*886 cents, so that on repeating it 58 times, 
and deducting 81 Octaves we should come back 
to the starting note. And this gives the cycle ^ 
of 58 already described, sect. A. arts. 22 and 27, 
to which reference is made on the Duoden- 
arium itself, shewing exactly the mode in 
which it can be substituted for Just Intona- 
tion without perceptible injuiy to the har- 
monic effect. For this and other less happy 
but more handy attempts, see sect. A. The 
mode of fingering this cycle is explained infr&, 
sect. F. Nos. 8 and 9, and of tuning it in sect. 
G. arts. 19 and 20. 



26. The Duodenal. The duodenal is the letter name of the root of any 
duodene. By placing it over any note or chord we indicate that that note and all 
which foUow till a new duodenal is given are to have such values only as they 
would have in the duodene of which the tone indicated by the duodenal is the root. 
This prevents all ambiguity by restoring in fact the notation of commas higher or 
lower, which alone is wanting for the representation of tertian harmony in the 
ordinary stafif notation. If the 7th and 17th harmonics have to be introduced they ^ 
YfiW have sloping lines placed before them as in chord 17 below. The examples 
given are not intended as specimens of desirable harmony, but of the means of 
representing differences of just intonation. The first 16 chords are from God save 
the Queen ; the four last are merely examples of notation. 




12 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 



17 18 



19 20 



The chords are numbered for convenience 
of reference, and only the treble is given for 
brevity. When the bass is added, the duo- 
denal should be repeated in the bass or merely 
placed between treble and bass. Observe the 
chords 8, 9, 18, which introduce the ambi- 
guous chord on the second. The duodenal 
C over chord 1 shews that we begin in the 
duodene of c, so that the first choid is e' 816 
^' 498 c'. But O over chord 8 shews that there 
IS a duodenation into the dominant, and that 
the chord is the true minor /i' 886 a' 498 d" and 
not the dissonant chord of the added Sixth 
/ 886 Oi' 620 d''. Thed" must be retained for 
the voice to descend by a perfect minor Third 
to hi in chord 4, and be the true Octave of d' 
in that chord where C shews that the duodene 
of C is again reached. Hence it is not allow- 
able to take chord 8 in the duodene of F as 
/ 886 Oi' 498 d^;'. The following chords 5, 6, 7, 
8 are also in the duodene of C, as there is no 
change of duodenal. But chord 9 is in the 
duodene of JT, because a^ is retained from 



chord 8, and dj", /' must harmonise with it. 
In chord 10 the duodene of C is again reached. 
As purposely written in this example chord 18 
is the dissonant added Sixth / 886 a/ 520 d", If 
which is resolved on chord 14, but the reten- 
tion of a J would make it more natural to take 
the duodene of F, as / 866 a/ 498 d" and then 
return immediately to the duodene of C, In 
chord 16, d' 267 V 281 gf' 886 6,' the method is 
shewn by which the septimal ^ / is indicated. 
The duodenal C would make / without the 
mark before it, to be true Fourth of the root 
c. But this Fourth is 27 cents too sharp for 
the 7 th harmonic of the dominant g, and 
hence the line sloping down to the right in- 
dicates that the Fourth has to be taken 27 
cents flatter in septimal harmony. In ordi- 
nary tertian harmony as indicated by the duo- 
denal only, the Fourth would remain unaltered. 
In chord 17, the duodenal C would shew that 
the a']f must be a^'|^, the minor Sixth of the 
root c, or a diatonic Semitone above the domi- 
nant g. But this is 7 cents too sharp for the 

H H 



466 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



17th harmonic of the dominant, and hence 
the line sloping down to the right indicates 
that it is to he 7 cents flatter. The sloping 
line, therefore, indicates different degrees of 
flattening according as it is applied to the 
Fourth or minor Sixth of the root expressed 
by the duodenal. If, therefore, we wished to 
have the chord e^ 816 g' 267 '6'^ 886 "d»"|^ we 
must write the duodenal as F to get the right 
intonation, as in chord 19. Since the 17th 
harmonic of the dominant is so nearly the 
minor Sixth of the root, and the chord is 
dissonant, much of the effect would be pre- 



served if this minor Sixth were used in place 
of the 17th harmonic provided only the 7th 
harmonic of the dominant were retamed. 

Equal temperament of course not recognis- 
ing the difference of a comma, so far as socmd 
is concerned, retains the same tempered duo- 
dene throughout, although there is a difference 
in writing it, as would be shewn in the Duo- 
denarium (p. 468) if the indices were omitted. 
Such an omission reduces the Duodenaiiuin 
to a table of modulations in any temperament 
which neglects the comma. 



SECTION P. 

1[ EXPBBIMBNTAL IN8TBUMBNT8 FOB XXHIBITD^a THE EFFBCTB OF JUST nCTOKATION. 

(See notes pp. 6, 17, 217, 218, 222, 266, 829, and 846.) 



No. 

Introduction, p. 466. 

1. The Harmonical, p. 466. 

2. The Just Harmonium, p. 470. 

8. The Just English Concertina, p. 470. 
4. Mr. Colin Brown's Voice Harmonium, p. 
470. 



No. 

6. Rev. H. Listen's Oigan, p. 478. 

6. General Thompson's Organ, p. 478. 

7. Mr. H. W. Poole's Organ, p. 474. 

8. Mr. Bosanquet's Generalised Fingerboard 

and Harmonium, p. 479. 

9. Mr. Paul White's Harmon, p. 481. 



Introduction. 

At the present day ordinary musical instruments are intended to be tuned in 
accordanoe with equal temperament (see pp. dl3a, 4326, art. 10 ; 436&, art. 22, L ; 
437(7, art 25 ; sect. G. arts. 11 and following). The English concertina, which has 
14 keys for the Octave, is still usually tuned in the older Meantone temperament 

IT (p. 433(2, art. 16, and sect. G. art. 18). But neither system gives the only intervals 
which will allow chords in the middle part of the s(»le to be played without giving 
rise to beats. In order, then, that the ear may learn what is the meaning of ' just 
intonation,' it is necessary for it to have special instruments, or at least instru- 
ments specially tuned. Prof. Helmholtz has for this purpose invented a tuning 
for an harmonium with two rows of ordinary keys, explained on pp. 3166 to 3200. 
Others, as Colin Brown, Listen, Poole, and Perronet Thompson, have invented 
harmoniums or organs with novel fingerboards ; and others, as Bosanquet and 
J. P. White, have invented means for using the division of the Octave into 53 parts, 
which, as is seen in sect. E., p. 463, is practically almost identical with just intona- 
tion. A brief account of these instruments (with the exception of lSx)£. Helm- 
holtz's, which is fully described in the text) will here be given. But none of them 
meet the wants of the student. They are all too expensive and require so much 
special education to use, that (with the exception of Mr. Colin Brown's) they have 
remained musical curiosities, some of them entirely unique. But there are two 

f instruments which are cheap and which can be tuned so as to illustrate almost 
every point of theory, though they of course remain experimental instruments 
intended only to shew the nature of musical intervals, chords, and scales, and not 
to play pieces of music except especially composed exercises. These two I shall 
take first. They are a specially tuned harmonium and English concertina. Beed 
instruments are far the best for experiments, because they give sustained notes 
possessing a large number of powerful upper partial tones, so that any deviations 
from just intonation are extremely conspicuous, painfully evident indeed on any 
harmonium tuned in equal temperament. 



1. Thb Habmonioal. 

The s(iale of the Harmonicsal and the number of vibrations for every note in the 
first four octaves will be found on p. 17, note. The instrument has been con- 
stantly referred to in the Translator's notes to the preceding pages. It is an 
harmonium with one row of vibrators extending over five octaves. The tuning of 
the fifth octave will be explained further on. 



8£OT. V. 



EXPERIMENTAL JUST INTONATION. 



467 



Any one buying such an haxmonium of 
Measis. Moore & Moore, pianoforte and har- 
monium makers, 104 and 105 Bishopsgate 
Street, London, for 165<. net, may have it 
tuned as an Harmonical, by my forks, and 
provided with an * harmonical bar' as pre* 
sently explained, both without extra chajge. 
I am sure that all musical students, as well 
as myself, must feel greatly indebted to this 
firm, who at the instance of Mr. H. Keatley 
Moore, Mus. B., a student of the first edition 
of this work, have so kindly undertaken to 
furnish this almost indispensable aid to the 
study of music on Helmholtz*s principles at 
such a very moderate cost. 

On the first four octaves this instrument 
contains all the 10 notes of the Decad of C 



(p. 4596), and hence all its chords (p. 459c), 
and allows of playing and harmonising all the 
56 trichordal scales (p. 460) contained in that 
decad. Its 10 notes, C D E^^^EiFG A^^ A^ 
B^'^ Bi, are placed on their usual digitals. 
Hence so far there is no new fingering to 
learn. The remaining two digitals are em- 
ployed to furnish two notes of great theoreti- 
cal importance, the grave second Dj^ which is 
of course placed on the D[y or C^ digital, and 
the natural or harmonic Seventh ^B^, which 
had to be placed, rather out of order, on the 
G\^ or F^ digital, the only one at liberty. 
Hence, using small letters to represent the 
short black keys, the keyboard for each of the 
first four octaves is 



2081 816| 



vib. in two-foot Octave 264 I '297 330 



'6b «'b t'b 

F O A^ B^ C 

402 422| 475^ 

852 396 440 495 528 



and its scheme in the Decad form with the 
two additional notes is 

B^\f D 

E^\f G B^ 

F Ai 

... T^b-D, 



In this form (...) in the second column 
indicates the absence of Bk, and ^Bb forms a 
column by itself. The scheme is seen filled 
up on p. 474c, d. The addition of ^^b gives 
an opportunity of playing the first sixteen 
harmonics of C with the exception of the 
11th and 18th (whence the name Harmonical), 
thus : 



Note 


C 


c 


9 


c' 


^i 


9' 


'6'b 


c" 


d" 


^1 


9" 


'6"b 


h" 


Harmonic 


1 


2 


8 


4 


5 


6 


7 


8 


9 


10 


12 


14 


15 



."' 



16 



By means of the * harmonical bar * pro- 
vided with the instrument, these harmonics, 
except the 7th and 14th, can be pressed down 
at the same time, and then the 7th and 14th, 
being on short keys, can be added with the 
fingers of the hands which press down the bar. 
The pegs which press the notes are arranged 
on different lines, so that the first 8 harmonics 
can be played by themselves, and then the 
effect of adding the higher Octave can be tried. 
It is thus possible to play the harmonics 
simultaneously with or without the 7th and 
14th, and thus to estimate their presumed 
dissonant effect. To my own feelmg these 
harmonics greatly enrich and improve the 
quality of the very compound tone produced. 

It is evident therefore that the effects of 
all the intervals depending on the numbers 
1 to 16 (omitting 11 and 18) can be immedi- 
ately produced, and hence all the intervals on 
p. 2126, c, including the septimal intervals, 
arising from ^jBb, which are of special import- 
ance and interest because they can be so rarely 
heard. 

The existence of higher upper partials of 
the low notes can easily be made evident by 
beats. If we press down one of the digitals 
for the shortest distance that will allow the 
note to sound at all, we flatten it slightly, and 
hence put it out of tune. Keeping then C 
sounding fully,' and slightly flattening its har- 
monics, one by one in this way (indicated bj a 
prefixed grave accent) we easily obtain the 
beats from Cc, Cg, Cc\ Cei\ Cg\ C^b^ 
Cd\ Cd'\ Ct^\ CPg'\ C^b'% Cb", CTc'", 
making evident the existence of 18 out of 16 
of the upper partials of C. In the same way 
by slightly flattening the upper or lower notes 
of any of the consonant intervals, as c : g, we 



can produce the beats which shew that the 
consonance has been disturbed. These aref 
some of the most striking illustrations of 
Helmholtz*s discoveries. 

Beats between the primes of two notes are 
well shewn by DD^, ddj, d'd^', d'^d^", which 
should beat about 9, 18, 87, 78 times in 
10 seconds, the number of b^ts doubling for 
each ascent of an Octave. The very impure 
character of the beats of DD^, arising from 
our hearing at the same time the beats of the 
upper pairs of notes as partials, is instructive. 
We can also hear the beats (all given for 10 
seconds and fractions omitted) m D E^W 60, 

'Bb B'b 88, ^b ^1 88. ^'b ^1 ^, ^'b Bj 50, 
but the higher Octaves of these notes beat too 
rapidly to be counted. 

Combinational tones are easily heard. Any 
two consecutive harmonics of C give C, and 
by sounding two of them strongly and slightly «* 
flattening the C, the beats of this flattened 
'C with the combinational tone may be heard, 
but much care and attention are necessary for 
this purpose. On playing 6^" c'" the rattle of 
the 66 beats in a second may be heard, as 
well as the combinational C of 66 vib. Simi- 
larly for 6/' and b^'y the rattle of the 89-6 
beats in a second, ana also the deep combina- 
tional tone E\^ of 89*6 vib. And if all three 
keys 6^"bf 6i"» and c'" be held down together, 
the low-pitcned beat of the two combinational 
tones may also be heard with proper care and 
attention. If we play d^' f" we have a beat- 
note of 117-3 vib., very nearly J5'b. If we play 
d"f' we have the beat- note ^^ of 110 vib. If we 
play all three together the two beat-notes bc&t 
78'8 times in 10 seconds. This must be care- 
fully listened for, but the beats being so much 
lower in pitch cannot be confused with the 

H H 2 



468 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



higher beats of d^" d'\ although their fre- 
quency is the same. 

All the forms of the major and minor 
triads and tetrads on pp. 2186 to 224a can be 
played and appreciated, and in many cases 
the combinational tones can be played as sub- 
stantive notes with them ; see my footnotes to 
these pages. 

The effect of the analyses of dyads in my 
footnotes on pp. 188 to 191 can all be studied, 
and much of the diagrams on pp. 198 and 388 
can be verified* 

Most of the old Greek tetrachords on 
p. 268d' can be played as there pointed out. 

The analysis of scales on pp. 274-278 can 
be illustrated. 

The discords in Chap. XVII. can be mostly 
^ illustrated, as pointed out in my footnotes. 

As shewn by the table on p. 17, note, the 
intervals 80 : 81, or comma, the minor Tone 
9 : 10, and major Tone 8 : 9, the diatonic 
Semitone 15 : 16, and small Semitone 24 : 25, 
and other important intervals, can all be illus- 
trated. Again, "^B^ : £^1^=85 : 86 is 49 cents, 
and hence almost precisely a quarter of a 
Tone or 50 cents, and A^ : 7£|^=»20 : 21 is 85 
cents, or very nearly the Pythagorean Limma 
of 90 cents. The imperfect Fifth of just in- 
tonation DiAi, or 680 cents, may be con- 
trasted with the perfect Fifth D, : A^, or 702 
cents. The Pythagorean minor Thira D : F, 
or 294 cents, can be contrasted with the just 
minor Third Dj : F, or 816 cents. 

But it is also necessary to note what the 
Harmonical cannot do. It has no Pythagorean 
comma, and no Pythagorean major Thinl, nor 
^can it play a Pythagorean scale. It cannot 
play the chord of the extreme sharp Sixth, 
nor can it modulate into the dominant or sub- 
dominant, or relative minor (except in the 
descending form), but it can distinguish 
/ 886 a^ 520 d, the chord of the added Sixth, 
from the minor chord / 886 o^ 498 d^, and can 
modulate from C major to C minor. 

It is also able to play Mr. Poole's dichordal 
scale FA C, C E O ''B^ D with the peculiar 
minor chord G : ^^l^ :D==6: 7 :9, and the 
full natural chord of the major Ninth. 

Method of Tuning. To be sure about the 
pitches, I tuned c"528, a'440, ai>422-4, 
^6'[y462 on forks with great accuracy, by means 
of my tuning-forks mentioned on p. 4466'. I 
tuned also a second set of forks each two 
beats flatter than the above, which I found 
very useful in determining the accuracy of the 
^tuning by unisons. In fact the note of the 



reed is so much more powerful than that of the 
fork, that the latter was quite drowned when 
near the unison, so that the pitch could not 
be determined within 3 to 5 beats in 10 
seconds, and this difficulty was entirely obTi- 
ated by the flat forks. After these notes then 
had been tuned on the Harmonical, the rest of 
the notes in the two-foot Octave were tuned by 
Fifths or Fourths, namely first a^% to e^'y, 
e^% to 6i>, secondly c" to g', g' to d*^, c" to/, 
thirdly a^' to «i", «/' to ft^', and a^' to d^\ The 
other notes were obtained by Octaves. The 
verification is. by the perfect major chorda 
FAyC, CEfi, QBJ), A^^CE^)^, E^WGB^\ 
the perfect minor chord D^A^ and the per- 
fect chord of the harmonic Seventh CE^G''B% 
all without beats in the two-foot Octave. 

Pitch. The pitch c''528 was chosen to 
agree with the pitch adopted by Prof. Helm- 
holtz in the text; a'440 was the pitch pro- 
posed by Scheibler ; a^' [^442*4 is within -1 vibi 
of the pitch of Handel's own A fork 422-5, now 
in the possession of Bev. G. T. Driffield, Bector 
of Old, near Northampton. In the notes not 
tuned by forks there may be a very slight bat 
not perceptible error, so that the Harmonical 
presents a series of trustworthy pitches. 

Exerd&es, Besides numerous short airs, 
and special exercises, the following pieces 
may be played with full harmonies, and will 
serve to illustrate the meaning of just intona- 
tion, especially if they are contrasted with the 
same airs immediately afterwards played on 
an ordinarily tuned harmonium. 

Qod save the Queen (in C major with its 
minor chord on the Second of the scale, alter- 
nating vrith the chord of the added Sixth). 

The Heavens are telling (C major with the 
modulation into C minor^. 

Olorious Apollo (altermg the brief modula- 
tion into the dominant). 

The Old Hundredth (C major). 

John Anderson (C minor). 

Adeste Ftdeles (avoiding the modulation 
into the dominant). 

Auld Lang Syne (in C major). 

Dies ircSf in part (C minor modulating 
into C major). 

Leise^ leise (the prayer in Der FreysehUts 
in Poole's dichordal scale FAfi, CEfi'B^D, 
altering the harmonies to suit the new scale). 

Crudel perchi {Nosse di Figaro^ in C 
minor, altered, but preserving the burst into 
C inajor). 

Wanderer's Nachilied (Schubert). 

Ths Manly Heart (Zauberfldte). 



So much relates to the lower four Octaves of the Harmonical, which suffice to 
illustrate all the principal peculiarities of just intonation. Advantage has been 
taken of the Fifth or 6-inch Octave to exhibit some of the higher harmonics of 
C 66, and to give a complete series of the first 16 harmonics of C 132, including 
the 11th and 13th. These notes are as follows : 



Harmonics 
Black digitals 
White digitals 



16 



.'" 



17 



18 19 20 



19*'" 



d'" 



b 



rn 



22 



11 f" 



28 



24 25 26 



2»/i'" 



9 



ttt 



a"> 



i«i 



29 30 
6'" 



32 



.r»» 



Pitch numbers 1056 1122 1188 1254 1820 1452 1848 1584 1650 1716 1914 1980 211i 



Of course with such high pitches there has 
been great difficulty in tuning, and there are 
probably several slight errors, but none that 
will interfere with the general effect. I pro- 
ceeded thus. The harmonics 16, 18, 20, 28, 
■24, 80, 82 were the Octaves of harmonics 8, 9, 



10, 14, 12, 15, 16 already tuned for the lower 
Octave. Hence only 17, 19, 22, 25, 26, 29 re- 
mained to be treated, but they were in them- 
selves far too high for me to tune forks for. 
I tuned therefore ^'*d*'^ with 561 vib., the ITUi 
harmonic, to which I had the Octave made bv 



8E0T. F. 



EXPERIMENTAL JUST INTONATION. 



469 



Messrs. Valantine & Carr, music smiths, of 
76 Milton Street, Sheffield. Then I tuned 
"«'W13-6, "/868. »a'|^12-5. "a'429. »6'b478-5 
all harmonics of C„ 16*5 and hence two Octaves 
too low. From these Messrs. Vedantine & Garr 
made me forks giving the Octaves with great 
accuracy, and afterwards the Octaves of these 
forks, which so far as I could test them also 
appeared accurate, but it was very difficult to 
form an accurate judgment of tne pitch of 
these high tuning-forks. From the forks thus 
made the remainder of the fifth octave was 
tuned. But as the tone of the reed drowned 
that of the fork, I had here also a second 
series of flatter forks constructed, beating 
twice in a second with the former. Of course 
I have not been able personally to check the 
tuning of all the Harmonicals, but I worked 
with the tuner at first and saw that he perfectly 
well understood what was to be done, so that I 
confidently hope the Harmonicals he turns out 
will answer their purpose. One of them was 
exhibited in the International Inventions 
Exhibition of 1885, Division II., Music. 

By means of this filth octave the instru- 



ment has now all the first 82 harmonics of 
C66, except 6, namely 11, IS, 21, 23, 27, 81 ; 
and has all the first 16 harmonics of cld2 with- 
out exception. There are additional loose pegs 
to the harmonical bar, which can be inserted, 
in order to play all these 16 harmonics at once, 
with the exception of the 7th and 14th, which, 
being on black digitals, must be struck with 
the finger as before. 

The fifth octave therefore gives the 
trumpet sciale 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 18, 14, 15, 16, 
all, with exception of 14, on the white digitals. 
These give the peculiar intervals 10 : 11 = 165 
cents, 11 : 12 » 151 cents, 12 : 18 = 189 cents, 
18 : 14 = 128 cents. The inharmonic character 
of these intervals is, however, not well brought 
out, owing to the weakness of the upper par- 
tials in this region. Other intervals of interest H 
are the approximations to the tempered Semi- 
tone, 16 : 17 » 105 cents, 17 : 18 « 99 cents. 

The 17th harmonic allows of playing the 
harmonic form of the chord of the diminished 
Seventh in its direct form and all its inver- 
sions as 



10:12:14 

12:14 

14 



17 « 
17:20 

17:20:24 = 
17:20:24:28 



«i" : g" : ''b'% : "<2"'k . 

" >^^i' 



'6 



b : "<« 



tft 



ftf 



9 



III 



til . „in 



^6'"b 



The extreme height of the pitch of these notes, however, will prevent a due appreciation of 
these chords as compared with the usual forms, which can only be played at a lower pitch thus : 

10 : 12 : 14| : 17tV = h^\d'\f\aS\ 
12 : 14 J : 17,V : 20 = d':/ :oJ'^:6/ 
14J:17tV:20:24 = f \a^* y\h{\d!' 

17,V:aO-24:28t = a>'\\h^ \d!' \f' % 

of which only the first shews the full harshness of the chord. 

It is thus seen that the Hannonical is the only instrument yet tuned which 
brings out the full nature of just intonation for the 7th and 17th harmonics. 

The difficulty in tuning the Harmonical without forks may be to a great 
extent avoided by the following means, which will enable any possessor of a cheap 
harmonium which he is willing to sacrifice as an experimental instrument, to get 
it tuned by a professional tuner. It will, however, be necessary to give up the 
peculiar arrangement of the fifth octave, and when it exists on any harmonium 
to have it tuned simply as an Octave higher than the fourth octave. 



First tune the 11 notes C D^ D E^\f E, F 
O A^\f ill ^'b ^1 thus. Take C to the exist- 
ing pitch on the instrument. Tune the Fifths 
c' : g', g' : d'\ f : c" till they leave no trace of 
beats. Then take c'' : 0/' and a^'b : c'' to be 
as perfect major Thirds without beats as the 
tuner can make them, verifying by the major 
chord de{g\ and minor chord fa^'^" which 
should both be without beats. The combina- 
tional tones (which should be C for c" : e" and 
A '1^ for a^'b : c") will also be a guide to the 
ear. But there is very little chance of perfect 
accuracy, the ears of tuners having been spoiled 
by the sharp major Thirds of equal tempera- 
ment. It is best to begin by tuning these 
Thirds decidedly too fiat, beating 10 or 20 
times in 10 seconds, and then gradually to 
sharpen till the beats apparently vanish. The 
Thirds may thus remain very slightly fiat, like 
the skhismic Thirds on p. 281(i', and they 
will give very good results. The point is to 
avoid sharp major Thirds. Then tune the 
Fifths «i' : 6/, a^ : tf,', d/ : a/, and a»'b : «^"b, 
«i'b*^^'bf the necessary Octaves having been 
previously tuned. Verify by the major chords 



fa^c'\ e'e,'g\ g'h^'d" ; a»b cV'b, b^% g'fci'k 
and the minor chords d^fa^\ ck^'c"ei\ e^g'lr ; 
/o'V". cVJ^', gV\fd'\ all of which should 
be perfect without sensible beats. Then only 
^6b remains to be tuned. To this we may ap- 
proximate very closely thus. In the first place U 
it is 49 cents, or say a quarter of a Tone (that 
is, half a tempered Semitone), fiatter than &>b 
which has already been tuned, and many tuners 
can approximate to this interval. Next, in the 
lowest octave B'b ^^^ ^-^b ^^^^ beat. If the 
pitch happens to be c"528, then the beats are 
33 in 10 seconds. For c"MO, which is sharp 
band pitch, the beats would be not quite 84 in 
10 seconds. For c' '618, which may be taken as 
French pitch, the beats would be almost ex- 
actly 32 m 10 seconds. Hence by taking them 
as 83 in 10 seconds for any pitch, the tuner 
will come very near the truth. After tuning 
the Octaves, he will verify with the chord 
c'0/g'^6'b, which should be without any sen- 
sible beats and have merely a slight roughness. 
Even a rough approximation to the true value 
of ^jBb, as on the 53 division of the Octave, 
will gratify most ears. 



470 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



2. The Just Harmonium. 

This I used for some years. The ^Bj^ is sacrificed, as also the D^ ; and the 12 
notes are taken as in the margin, F^ being put on the Fjl digital. F^ 
It therefore contains the duodene of 0, with the exception of Fi% B^\f D 
and with the addition of i^. This was tuned by an ordinary tuner E^\^ G B^ 
in my presence in two hours from the following directions. Make A^\^ C E^ 
the 7 major chords GEfi, GBJ), FAfi, A^\^GW\f, E^\^GB% D^l^ F A 
B^\^DF^, D^\,FA^\f perfect without beats. 

This gives more power of playing, as it contains the decad of G complete, and 
hence G major without the grave second, and G minor in all its forms, with 
all the 56 modes ; E^^ major with the grave second F, and A^\^ major without the 
grave second. But the harmonic Seventh ^5[^, and grave second D^ are much 
missed in major. There is power of modulating from E^\^ major to its sub- 
dominant A^\) major (without the grave second) and also into its relative minor C. 
IT Hence this plan of tuning has many advantages, especially in being easily effected 
by any tuner without forks. 

3. The Just English Concertina. 

For many years I have been in the habit of making my experiments on one of 
these instruments tuned thus : 



a 

^1 



6i 



Gi ! 



Black studs cA d dJt fJt gJl 
White studs G^ D^ El F G 

having the following duodenary arrangement : 

A 

G JBi 

F A^ 

Hence it contains the decad of jE^^ and four additional notes A, F, B\^, X>j, 
This furnished the power of playing in G and G major with the grave seconds A^, 
Di, and in F major without the grave second Gy Also in E^ major without the 
grave second fA. It can modulate perfectly from G major to the dominant G 
major, and from G major to its relative minor E^, Also from E^^ major to its 
tonic minor E^. But it cannot modulate perfectly from G major to its relative 
minor A^, because of the absence of FJj^ occasionally used in the subdominant. It 
can modulate perfectly from G major to its subdominant G major, and thence to 
its subdominant F major, less the grave second G^. A considerable variety of 
harmony and modulation therefore lies open to it, but most pieces require special 
arrangement. 

It has been found advisable to put D^, ^l^ on the white studs and D, A on the 
T black studs, that is D on the Djk stud, and A on the A\^ stud, and then I put Djk 
on the E\} stud. In other respects the fingering is unaltered. 



TuntTig. The tuners of Lachenars concer- 
tina factory (4 Little James Street, Bedford 
Bow, London, W.G.) were able to tune with 
sufficient correctness from the following direc- 
tions. 

Make the 8 major chords CEfi, GB^D, 
DFM;FA,C. B)^D.F; A.CJ^E,, E,G£b,, 
BiDAFJIf perfect without beats. In giving 
these directions I avoided using the inferior 



numbers except for D^ A^, which had to be 
distinguished from D^ A, In writing music 
for it I generally assume the values of D and 
.4 J as in the key of C, and distinguish D^ hj a 
downstroke (as '^b'k in the diagram p. 28c). 
and ^ by an upstroke (as ^^/^ in the same dia- 
gram), but occasionallv to prevent ambiguity 
I also use the up stroke to D, and the down 
stroke to Ai. 



4. Mr. Colin Brown's Voice ELiRMONiUM. 

Mr. Colin Brown, Buing Lecturer on the Science, Theory, and History of 
Music in the Andersonian University at Glasgow (see p. 259dy note |), has invented 
the following keyboard, a full-sized model of which is in the Science Collections at 
the South Kensington Museum, Boom Q. By the kindness of Mr. Brown I am 




He calls his iustru- 



ABRUIOEMEtlT. 



White 


Coloured 


p«« 


DIgitaU 


IMgitals 


DiglUls 


% 


A. 


'M 


B 


•4 


E 


oi 


A 


c,| 


'i 


D 


■Ffl 


•h 


G 


B, 


■^ 


C 


^1 


ffi 


F 


^1 


•^ 


B^ 


Di 


4 




0. 


». 


" c, 


<i 


D\, 


■Fl 


•H 


Ob 


-Bii» 


•!. 


Ch 


SA 


?l 



•S* The notation used by Mr. Colin 
:£&own, u shewn in Hg. 67, is diM] 
'jtSfent from tliat used above. Tho 
'^' ' of Fifths, so fu u it )■ there 



•Dlh A\h £|». Bb, F. C. ' 
A% E', ff. fJt 



i of his natation need not be 
--^^o'eoified, becaase it does not appear 

:ffn flg. 67. 







" ^^athe only duodenation contem- 

J le of B,t» to that of DijL But 

Si^^onsidered as a series of major 

lui^uant, and also into the relative 
coiQma flatter than the tonic 



472 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR 



major ; thus the tonic minor of C major was considered to be the relative minor of 
E\f major, that is Ci minor, which, as shewn by Prof. Helmholtz's theories and the 
annexed duodenary arrangement, has not a single tone in common with C major.* 
The third column was considered merely as containing the major Sevenths and 
major Sixths of the relative minor scale and accounted of subordinate interest 

The arrangement of the keyboard is highly ingenious. Observing that in the 
major scale there are four notes in the column of Fifths, and three in the 
column of Thirds, it became evident that each note of the first would last during four 
successive modulations into the dominant, whereas each of the latter would last only 
through three modulations. Hence the digitals containing the former were made 
four parts long, and those containing the latter three parts long. In going up a 
series of Fifths each digital advanced one part. In the plan the longer digitals -with 
only one note name were four parts long, and were left white. It will be seen 
that F is one part lower than 0, C than G, G than 2>, and so on. Then D stands 
two parts higher than C, E, a major tone above Z>, stands also two parts above 

T D. The long white digitals, read diagonally, give therefore the first column in the 
duodenary arrangement. Immediately below each is a short coloured digital, dis- 
tinguished in the plan by having two names of notes on it. The lower is t^t of the 
note corresponding to the digital, and it is exactly one comma flatter than that of 
the long white digital above it. By this means the diagonal series of coloured 
digitals give the column of Thirds. Any white long digital is separated from the 
white digital next below it by a short coloured digital, and hence it corresponds 
to a rise of seven Fifths from the note of the lower white digital, and this rise 
gives the Pythagorean sharp, or 114 cents. Consequently the coloured digital 
which separates two white ones, being a comma of 22 cents flatter than the upper 
white one, is 92 cents sharper than the lower one. This gives the complete 
order, white C, coloured Gjk above it, and white (M above that; coloured C^ 
below C, and white C\^ below C^. Then each digital on the right begins two 
parts higher, corresponding to a major Second, or two Fifths less an Octave; 
and the fingerboard is complete for the first two columns of the duodenary 

f arrangement. In the fingerboard itself, as shewn in fig. 67, the lower and 
upper digitals are cut through at the dotted line, but they have been continued in 
the plan to shew the arrangement. Beginning then with any white digital as 
C we play the major scale in a horizontal line passing through the letters D, B^ 
on the plan, and giving C, D (both white), E^ (coloured), Fj G (both white), A^, 
Bi (both coloured). The fingering is absolutely the same for all major scales 
whatever note is used as the white digital to commence with. The grave second 
Dj is furnished by the coloured digital below the usual second. 

For the relative minor, suppose the descending form with three minor chords 
is used ; another line not quite horizontal through D^ A^B^ gives A^B^C D^^E^ 
F G Ay To make the dominant chord major, and hence change g into gjj^ touch 
the small peg which rises out of the left-hand comer of the Ai digital, and it gives 
a diatonic Semitone of 112 cents below Ai, that is, the leading note to Ai. This 
peg is immediately to the right of the G digital. In the same way to make the 
subdominant chord major, and hence change/ into/^jL use the peg f^^ immedi- 

f ately to the right of the white digital F, The names of these pegs are written in 
small letters on the plan. We could by introducing the c^ peg next to the C 
digital, play the complete major scale of A^, as Ai B^ cjj^ D^ E^fA gA A^^ and 
all major scales beginning with a coloured digital would be fingerea in the same 
way. Thus we could play the major scale of A^ and modulate into the tonic 
minor scale of A ^^ Similarly we could play the major scale of c^ and modulate 
into the tonic minor scale of c^ But the fingering was not intended for this, 
and hence it is not so convenient. 



* Mr. Brown considers (Music in Common 
ThingSf p. 85) that C major and Cj minor 
have one tone in common, F, This makes his 
descending form of the scale of C^ minor read 
upwards c^ d^ e\f f 9. a\f b\} c^', where I should 
use /j, which is ready to hand on the instru- 
ment, if desired. Mr. Brown asserts (t5u2. p. 85) 
that ' it is impossible to build a major and 
its tonic minor scale in true key relationships 



upon the same tone of absolute pitch V But 
on his own fingerboard we have the major 
scale of ^1, and what is, according to Prof. 
Helmholtz, the relative minor of C, both com- 
mencing with Ai, the one having the three 
minor chords di fOn a^ e « ,, 0| g h^ and the other 
the three corresponding major chords dj fA Oi, 






t-S®! 



^^^ll'S' — *" ^ ^ Si tm am 



the diSereoce of a sktuBtDft 

,^ "dotted lines in the duodenary 

tOpSi^fi^Sers from any other by less 

IfSf at"! f^i. ^1. ■^il'. ^ib Mlow 

nrH.1 g^Si above them, differ from 

— j-» 1 respectively a skhisma 

and the last i 

which notes all lie 

_, _ 'S-'S' ' 

^^^Hil&nSAigemeQt shews, by Fifths and 
' '^'' 'latter the combinatioDal tone 



'iSfiiSi^^aieA from the data furnished by IT 
iH^S'S-^lS. Mr. Listen's Essay on 
(MP following is the duodenary 




but (he Qenetbl printed 



474 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. 



7. Mb. Hbnby Wabd Poole's Oboan. 

See p. 323(2, note f, and App. XYIII. p. 423a, for references to Mr. Poole's 
keyboards. His papers are in SiUiman's American Journal of Arts and Sciences, 
1860, vol. ix. pp. 68-83, 199-216 ; 1867, vol. xliv. pp. 1-22 (which contains the 
diagrams of his keyboard, here reproduced as figs. 68, 69, 70, p. 475, by the photo- 
graphic processes of the Typo-etching Company) ; 1868, vol. zlv. p. 289. The 
first papers contain Mr. Poole*s theory and an account of his Enharmonic Organ, 
constructed by himself and Mr. Joseph Abbey, of Newburyport, Massachusetts, 
having an ordinary fingerboard and a pedal to change the pipes that it affected, and 
playing from the major key of D\^ with 5 flats to that of B with 5 sharps. The 12 
digitals brought into action by each pedal produced the 7 notes of the major scale, 
the leading note of the relative minor scale, the perfect Seventh, and three others 
belonging to adjoining scales, of which only one (the grave Second) is specified. 
IT This arrangement, which was actually used in Boston, was abandoned, because it 
was found advisable to have all the notes under command of the hand with- 
out pedal action, and to use pedals for the bass only. But the new keyboard in 
its complete form does not appear from Mr. Poole's papers to have advanced 
beyond the stage of a cardboard model, although more recent simplifications, 
with 24 and 48 tones to the Octave, have been practically worked out. To these 
reference will be made at the conclusion of this notice. 

In his theory of this keyboard, to which all subsequent remarks refer, Mr. Poole 
recognised 5 series of Fifths, namely those in cols. 5, 6, 7 of the Duodenarium, 
p. 463, and two others interposed which may be numbered as ^5 and ^6, because they 
contain notes which are a septimal comma (63 : 64, or 27 cents) flatter than the 
corresponding notes in cols. 5 and 6. These are given in the following duodenary 
arrangement of his notes. But instead of my superior and inferior numbers he 
used varieties of type, as shewn in the letterpress belpw fig. 70, which was photo- 
graphed from the original at the same time as the fig. itself. 



Duodenary Arrangement of Mr, Poole's 100 Tones, 



Cols. 



4 



622 
1020 
818 
816 
114 
612 
1110 



E 
A 
D 
G 
C 
F 



408 
906 
204 
702 

498 
996 
294 



76 




789 

87 

686 

1083 



No. of tones 






792 
90 

688 

1086 

384 

B\f\f 882 
A>& 160 



22 



^E 
W 

"IF 
^B 



381 
879 
177 
676 
1178 
471 
969 
'^E\t 267 



6 



CM 206 

FM 704 

B^t 2 

EJi 600 

AA 998 

Dlk 296 



\ 



Mk 766 
'Dk 63 
'Gj^ 661 
7Cb 1069 

'l^k 867 
^B^k 866 

Mbb 662 
20 



n 

E, 
^1 



794 
92 
690 
1088 
386 
884 
182 
680 



'6 



T^ijf 473 
MJ 971 
WJt 269 




o 



i 



1178 
476 
974 
272 
770 
68 
666 



'^jf 668 
7JBi 1061 
7^1 369 



'^1 



867 
166 
663 



Ajfjt 1090 
Djm 888 
Om 886 
CjS 184 
FM 682 



BJi 1180 

Ejf 478 



976 
274 
772 
70 
668 
B^ 1066 



A 
D 



JfJk 



21 



'Ci 1161 
^F^ 449 
'Bjb 947 

'£ib 246 
Mik 743 

'Gjk 639 
7Cib 1037 



19 



E, 



864 
862 
160 
668 
1166 



18 



= 100 



Thus col. 6, or ' key notes,' was represented 
by Roman capitals, as G, D, and had white 
digitals ; col. 6, or * Thirds,* by Roman small 
letters, as be, e (this was, in fact, Hauptmann*s 



original plan in 1863, suprA, p. 2766), and had 
black digitals rising 0*4 inch ; col. 7, or * domi- 
nant Thirds, minor,* by italic small letters, 
as djt, and had flat bltie digitals rising O'l inch 




.*. .*. .*. .*. .*. .*. 
■*• "*" **" '*" '*" '*" 



?VV- .' 



the (hitd quftrter (inch) ol the key- 

l 70 gives the solleggio ubidm of the 

cat with peiBpective views above of 

.mng parta of the digitaU iurthest 

player. Underneath the lolfeg^o 

.1 the relative number of vibrationa T 

_jiiote taking do k iS, Below thu 

|ig« the numbere of the notes in Hr. 

"l^ triple diabonio ' or trichordal aoale. 

J^n.tioB at their intorvalB, and also the 

„,-, _, ^*ti^pf the notes in his ' double diatonic ' 

Igg^lS^ClH^ftial scale (see p. 844c, note *). And 

iS^'^'^it'^^^PB three last lines give the namee of 

t«)$§l^& as he writes them, Buppoaing the 

•ZSSSi^i^ digitals to give Q (key of 1$ or one 

•niSaicS^ (natural key, where the mysteiiouB 

.^..jSnay be meant for an u — that is, 

^'jft B ift flfl r but seems to have been reversed by 

* ■ "" ■ "1 engraver), and P (key of 1|> or one 

^ iterpreted into our aytnbols, with the 

\Sa cents from the lowest note in each 

will be : 



ft 9 9^m «5* "^^ ■ft* J. ■ft » «ft» 




476 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



rdl. vib. 

Notes 

in 
fig. 70 

cents 

Solfeggio 

colours 



48 


54 


62i 


60 


64 


72 


76 


80 


84 


90 


96 1 


9 


a 


'«! 


^ 


c' 


d' 


dti 


*,' 


T 


/i* 


/ 


c 


d 


'^1 


«i 


/ 


9 


94 


«i 


'ft, 


f>^ 


c' 


F 


G 


'0, 


^1 


Bb 


e 


<^ 


^ 


'«b 


«i 


/ 


204 


155 


386 


498 


702 


772 


884 


969 


1068 


1200 


Do 


Re 


— _ 


Mi 


Fa 


Sol 


^^ 


La 


Se 


Sf 


Do 


white 


white 


yellow 


black 


white 


white 


bine 


black 


red 


black 


white 



If we took only the black and white digitals, 
the arrangement of the keyboard would be 
like Mr. Colin Brown's ; but this was an acci- 
dent, Mr. Brown having never seen the draw- 
ings of Mr. Poole*s keyboard. Both arrange- 

IT ments arose from the column of Fifths in the 
Decad (p. 4596) containing four, and the column 
of Thirds only three notes. 

The great peculiarity of Mr. Poole's board, 
where Mr. Brown differs from it entirely, is in 
the introduction of the columns ^5 and ^6, 
both containing natural Sevenths, and their 
amalgamation, as it were, with the col. 7 
(which Mr. Brown alone uses) in three short 
nat digitals, placed beside the black, and hence 
of the same length. They exe placed from 
front to back, as red, yellow, blue-^that is, as 
two Sevenths and a Third, which belong to 
three different ke^. Thus in fig. 68, to the 
left of the black digital for B^ (marked e), lie 
three coloured digitals, 1) the red ''E\f (of which 
the name is not marked in the fig.), the natural 
Seventh of the tonic in the key of ^ ; 2) the 
yellow ^2>i (marked d^, the natural Seventh of 

^ the dominant of the relative minor in the key 



of C, which is e. gjj^ b. ''d^ ; 8) the red Djj^ 
(marked d)p, the leading note (or major 
Third of the dominant 6] djj^ fhJ^ ^^ ^^® 
relative minor in the key of G. The situaiicm 
of these digitals is such that the lowest (or 
red) digital gives the natural seventh of the 
white digital immediately adjoining (bdow in 
the figure, compare Ci'^C^Fi ^F), The middle 
(or yellow) digital gives the natiual Seventh of 
the black digital, the right-hand top comer of 
which touches its left-hand bottom comer 
(compare D, : ^D^, printed d d^* The upper- 
most (or blue) digital gives a note which is a 
small Semitone (24 : 26 = 70 cents) sharper 
than the note of the white digital on the left 
(compare D : DJ^ marked D : djfl^ and a 
cUatooic Semitone (15 : 16 or 112 cents) flatter 
than the note of the black digtal on the right 
(compare DJf : JBrj, marked <^ : e). The only 
digital placed out of ascending order from left 
to right is the yellow one, which should have 
come between the two white digitals for so 
and re, but has been displaced from motives 
of convenience. 



Mr. Poole, as Mr. Colin Brown afterwards, provided only for modulations from 
major keys into the dominant major, subdominant major, and relative minor. 
For the modulation into the tonic minor, therefore, he had to flatten by a oomma. 
Thus C minor was considered to be the relative minor of E}^ major instead of E^'r^ 
major. And although, in deference to Mr. Liston and Gen. Ferronet Thompson, 
he also made a provision for temporarily introducing the tonic minor if desired, 
giving col. 4 of the Duodenarium (Sillifnafiy vol. xliv. p. IS, art. 35), he did not 
require it himself. ' In the theory I have advocated,' he says, ' the major keys are 
based on the first series of sounds,' p. 474c, col. 5, ' and the minor keys on the 
Sixths of the major keys,' ibid. col. 6. * That there must be such a relation and 
order is inevitable.' But this does not exclude taking minor keys also upon notes 
of col. 5 as a base, considered, if desired, as the Sixths of major keys on the notes 
of col. 4 of the Duodenarium. Otherwise tonality is destroyed by constant shifts 
of a comma severely felt on justly intoned instruments. 
^ Mr. Foole was also aware of the alteration by a skhisma, and of the consequent 
reduction of the number of pipes. He also refers to the 53 division, but he does 
not seem to adopt either, and is not distinct enough on these points for me to 
state his conclusions with certainty. In the duodenary arrangement, I have by 
dotted lines marked the places where the skhisma comes into play, and by affixing 
the cents to each note have shewn how it acts. 

It will be seen that Mr. Foole had 100 notes to the octave, of which 39 arose 
from the harmonic Sevenths. If the skhisma were neglected there would remain 
only 36 tertian and 20 septimal, or in all 56 tones to the octave. The duodenary 
arrangement has been taken from Mr. Foole's Enharmonic table {Siiliman, xliv. 
p. 13), consisting of 19 lines similar to the 3 at the bottom of fig. 70. He adds 
the following example of the fingering of chords upon his keyboard, the double 
numbers indicating * that the key is touched with one finger and immediately 
changed for another '. The duodenals and mark of the natural Seventh are accord- 
ing to my notation, sect. E. art. 26, p. 465c. The upper figures refer to the Notes 
which follow. 



SECT. P. 



EXPERIMENTAL JUST INTONATION. 



477 



C. 



a 



G3 



A,. 



$ 



s 
1 

+ 



4 
2 

+ 



8 
1 

+ 



3 
2 

+ 



I 



3 

1 

+ 



:g 



3 

+ 1 

+ 



sjg-^^igo I 



4 3 

32 1 

1 + + 



=i^# 



4 
1 

+ 



34 
I 

+ 



34 3 
1 1 

+ + 



Fe 



c 



E 




* Notes. — 1. Subdominant chord /' and a/. 

* 2. Dominant with Seventh/'. 

* 3. Same with Ninth a* [not a^', and hence 
causing a duodenation into the dominant O, 
but fonning the second chord in Poole's di- 
ohoidal scale of C. Of course, y itself is not 
in the duodene of G, but when these natural 
Sevenths are introduced the special marks are 
used. See supri, p. 849a]. 

* 4. Dominant Seventh. 

*5. Dominant of the relative minor, the 
Seventh ^d, may be added [it is added here, 
but to secure the intonation a duodenation 
into the relative is marked]. 

'6. Subdominant with Seventh [duodena- 
tion into Ff therefore]. 

'7. Qrave Second or Sixth of subdomi- 
nant, [as the duodenal gives the root F^ the 
di" is siuficiently marked]. 

The above examples will shew how Mr. 
Poole treats the chord of the dominant Seventh 
and the major Ninth. The three last chords 
are added to shew his treatment of the chord 
of the diminished Seventh (SiUiman, vol. ix. 
pp. 78-80). *He considers the first of these 
chords to be merely the chord of O with the 
dominant Seventh, g' bi d" V', which is of 
course in the major scale of G, but this lies 
within the duodene of E-^^ as I hjekve marked it, 
including the ^F within ttiat duodene, as shewn 



in the duodenary arrangement p. 474c. Then ^ 
he supposes that in order to resolve the chord 
a^' c" Bi" (the last chord), the g' is alter^ in 
the second chord by * a chromatic Semitone * 
(that is, the small Semitone 24 : 25 = 70 cents), 
to gJ^ which is necessarily in the duodene of 
J^i, but this g^'j^ serves merely as ' a passing 
note* to the following a\ and therefore, he 
says, ' must be thrown out when we reckon 
the harmony '. But this will not explain the 
present use of this chord, which is now intro- 
duced without preparation, and as a means of 
modulation. The ratios of the chord Mr. 
Poole Kives are 25:30:36:42, or taking 
the g^% an Octave higher, to compare with 
my form, it becomes 80 : 86 : 42 : 50, that is 
10 : 12 : 14 : 16}, or in cents 0, 816, 588, 884. 
Mr. J. Paul White (see below No. 9) makes the % 
ratios of the chord 80:35:42:50, that is 
10 : 11| : 14 : 16|, or in cents 0, 267, 583, 884. 
The individual intervals in the first are 316, 
267, 301, and in the second 267, 816, 301, so 
that the two first intervals are transposed. 
But in both the interval of the extreme notes 
is 8 : 5=884 cents, so that in neither have we 
a chord of a diminished Seventh at all, which 
must have 919 or 926 cents. It is only equal 
temperament which confuses the major Sixth 
and diminished Seventh together by using 900 
cents for either of them. 



With regard to the double diatonic or dichordal scale, which Mr. Poole always 
solfas as fdh sol la 96 do re mi fah (where <6 is the harmonic Seventh to do\ 
so that do is the dominant, he says that ' the most beautiful, varied, and ornate 
compositions are made from the elements it contains. It has the capacity in cer« ^ 
tain styles of music of using with much grace accidentals, or chromatics as they 
are called ; for example, the si, the regular leading note to do, and the sol^ a 
diatonic Semitone to below la, or the leading note to the relative minor ; these 
chromatics always ascending a diatonic Semitone (15 : 16) to the notes above.' 
In an example given he also admits <& to be raised by 27 cents, that is to be the 
regular Fourth of the triple or trichordal scale, and also'allows the introduction of the 
Sixth of this scale. Hence if we use the duodenary form and represent the dichordal 
scale of F by capitals and these permissive additions by small letters we shall have 

the scheme in the margin. This gives the trichordal 
scale of G major complete with its grave second, and 
gA also one form of its relative A^ minor complete, but 
both without the harmonic Seventh of the dominants, 
which of course he would be ready to add when the 
harmony in his view required it. There is also the complete trichordal scale of F 
major without the grave second. Hence his dichordal scale resolves itself into a 
means of bringing these three scales into close connection, chiefly by help of the 



JD 




G 


bi 


C 


^1 


P 


^i 


b\> 


'B\, d. 



478 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



chord of the Ninth CE^G^B^oD in the above scheme. The example that he gives 
of its use is the accompaniment to Figaro's Numero quindici from Rossini's 
^ar&idre, afterwards sung as the air Ah! che d^amore by Almaviva. This is written 
in G major. He gives the scale thus, using my notation and indicating accidentals 
by small letters : 



* 



DouBLB Diatonic Soalb in G, with Aocn>ENTAi<8. 
G A a4 B^ 7Cfj c cjj^ D E F^^ 

D 1 JE7i 2 



f^ ?^=f= ^^ ^ '^^rL^^ p 



m 




^^m 



The Dnodenals are mine, bnt as the Ninth 
is not in a single duodene, it can be marked 
only by giving the dnodene containing all but 
the natural Seventh and indicating that by a 
sloping line in the usual way. The notes in 
inverted commas are from Mr. Poole, except 
the bracketed portions, which are mine. 

' 1. This may be e^' [in that case the three 
first notes are in the auodene of G]. 

* 2 and 8. These may be c" as well as ^c" 
[in the latter case the whole run would be in 
D, the c" being marked as ^c" ; in the former, 
the run would be in G], 

*4. This mav be e^*' [this will be only if 
I 8 is c", BO that the whole run is in O]. 

* 5. This note is clearly and necessarily e", 
[In this case 8 certainly should be "^c" and 4 
should also be «", but Mr. Poole does not ob- 
ject to g' a' 6i' c" "d" e^" followed by «", saying] 
the enharmonic change from Bi" to^", a nse of 
a comma, is often required, and I have proved 
that it can readily be made, for my smgers, 
who know this change of a comma as well as 
others know the Tone or Semitone, will give 
it, even without accompaniment, with perfect 
accuracy, as proved by the harmony after- 
wards supplied as a test. All this variety 



within the limits of musical laws — which only 
forbid what is disorderly, complicated, or whftK 
the ear will not distinguish — adds to the pleas- 
ure of vocal music, and it is the exact rendw- 
ing of all the melodies and harmonies which 
gives the charm to a good singer. [A little 
difficulty arises as to tonality.] When acutely 
perceptive of such accuracy, I had the good 
fortune to listen to Alboni on all the occasions 
when it was possible to do so. I thought her 
then, am still of opinion, that she was the 
best singer I have ever heard. It is certain 
that she had a wonderful exactness in executing 
whatever she undertook. There was no " tem- 
perament " in hgr scales, and what the strictest 
theory requires in intonation she understood 
and gave. She sang music whose analysis 
would alarm a student with its apparent diffi- 
culties; but the delighted auditors perceived 
only a delicious and "easy** flow of melodv.* 
[This has been quoted at length to add to tlie 
examples supri, p. d26a]. 

6. Mr. Poole says nothing about this e", 
but I presume he would take it regularlv as 
^c". In that case the whole of this would be 
in D major. 



Mr. Poole has also devised an enharmonic keyboard pedal for the bass of his 
organ, but then confines himself entirely to cols. 5 ,^5, 6. The ' keynotes ' cor- 
responding to the white digitals are in front in , 7 7^, 7 p, --p 
order of Fifths from left to right. Behind them ^f^, ^^ . E 
f at a higher elevation, are the major Thirds lying , . . p ^ ^ ^ ^ 
between them. The Sevenths are in a back row 
behind their Fifths. This is indicated by the letters in the margin. 

Mr. n. W. Poole is a native of Salem (afterwards Danvers, now Peabody), 
Massachusetts, U.S., and is now Professor of Public Instruction in the Government 
Institute of the city of Mexico, whence he kindly wrote to me on 9 March, 1885, 
describing one of his new keyboards. From this I take the following summary 
and extracts : — 



* I send you a stereograph of a simple form 
of one of them [his new manuals], which is 
easier to comprehend than a larger one with 
48 levers to the octave. This may be called a 
working model, and suffices for an organ or 
pianoforte for instruction or study in effect 
of chords and fingering. It is solidly con- 
structed in wood, ebony, and ivory, and works 
as freely as a common one. These 24 levers 



are a quarter of an inch wide, and can play 
a pianoforte with hammers half the oommon 
width, with single strings, but larger and tightly 
strained so as to yield the maximum of tone, 
tension nearly to breaking-point giving the best 
tone.* The finger-kevs for each Fifth riae ^ 
inch, so C is <|^ inch above A)y, The white 
digitals have the same shape as in fig. 69, but 
from each projects a narrow black finger-^ey, 



SEOT. F. 



MR. BOSANQUET'S GENERALISED FINGERBOARD 



479 



with a note one comma flatter, giving the 
major Thirds, and fitting into the left-hand 
niok of the next lower white digital. What- 
ever white digital the player begins with, the 
fingering is the same, and for major scales 
much like that for the key of A on the usual 
manual. For the Seventh and Ninth of the 
Dichordal ^tem separate digitals must be 
touched. Ml. Poole can arrange for a minor 
on the same tonic, but thinks it an extrava- 
gance. * The diatonic scales with the broad 
ivory keys (larger than on the common board) 
are of first importance ; next the raised ebony 
digitals for Thirds. The Sevenths are weU 
provided for and convenient. The leading 
notes to major Thirds are introduced as dia- 
tonic Semitones below these black notes, and 
serve them as the black ones do the white. 
On my model an equal space of two measures 



(i ^ ^u ui<^^ each) was allotted.' They fill up 
the space on the left-hand side of the black 
Thirds, and are of the shape of the white ^gi- 
tals in fig. 69, only very much narrower, half 
the thin part being separated, and for ex- 
ample given to AJj^ leading note to Bj^, 
while the rest, including the wide part, is 
given to ^ilj^, harmonic Seventh to B}^, * My 
keyboard admits of equaJ facility in execution 
and in taking the chords, with the common 
one of 12. I think its first utility will be for 
teaching singing, accompanying violin players 
and students of harmony. For this I recom- 
mend the simple form with less outlay of 
money.' This form of Mr. Poole's keyboard 
is therefore equivalent to Mr. Colin Brown's 
(No. 4) with the addition of the natural 
Seventh. 



8. Mb. Bosanqubt's Oenbbalisbd Fingbbboabd and Habmonium. 

Mr. R H. M. Bosanquet's harmonium is partly desoribed in the text, p. 328c, 
and its keyboard is figured and briefly explained in App. XIX., p. 429. In App. XX. 
sect. A. art. 27, the nature of Mr. Bosanquet's cycle of 63 and his notation, and 
the value of every one of his notes are explained. In App. XX. sect. E. art. 18, 
there is an elaborate comparison of this cycle with just intonation giving the 
number and pitch of every note, and, ibid. art. 25, it is shewn how such a cycle 
might have been suggested by just intonation. In sect. G. arts. 16 and 17, the 
methods of tuning the cycle of 53 adopted by Mr. Bosanquet and Mr. White are 
described. In the South Kensington Museum, Science Collections, Boom Q, the 
harmonium itself may be inspected, Mr. Bosanquet having presented it to the 
Museum, as he generally employs for his own use an organ with the same finger- 
board, and two sets of pipes, one set for 48 notes of the temperament advocated 
by Prof. Helmholtz (p. 432a), with perfect major Thirds and Fifths imperceptibly f 
flattened by | Skhisma, answering to the notes written with capital letters on the 
digitals in the following plan ; and the other set for 36 notes of the meantone tem- 
perament, brought into separate action by a stop. The pipes are stopped, with a 
screw plug, so that they are more readily tuned. 

It remains in this place to give the plan of the fingerboard, shewing the dis- 
position of the notes upon it both for the 53 division and meantone temperament, 
and to describe its arrangement, referring especially to App. XIX., p. 429, fig. 66. 

In the present plan of the keyboard, all the digitals are represented as of the 
same length, corresponding to that from tip to tip. This is 3 inches in the original 
and is here only 1 inch. At each side runs a column of figures 1 to 12 con- 
tinually repeated. It will be observed that in the first column the lines terminating 
the oblongs come against 2, and that 2 is at the head of the column. In this case 
the end of each oblong gives a form of c, and in passing from one form to another, 
as c to c\ we have gained a Pythagorean comma, which results from taking 12 
Fifths reduced to the same Octave. In the g column headed 3 the lines are f 
opposite 3 ; in the d column, headed 4, opposite 4 ; and so on ; each Fifth corre- 
sponding to a rise of ^ inch from tip to tip of the digitals, and to a vertical rise 
of y\ inch from level to level. Hence in going from one degree to another, as c 
to c^ or 4 to 5, we go backwards 12 x ^ « 3 inches, and rise 12 x j^ » 1 inch. 
Mr. Bosanquet says {Mus. Int. and Temp. p. 20) : — 

' The most important practical point about t^e keyboard arises from its sym- 
metry ; that is to say, from the fact that every key is surrounded by the same 
definite arrangement of keys, and that a pair of keys in a given relative position 
corresponds always to the same interval. From this it follows that any passage, 
chord, or combination of any kind, has exactly the same form under the fingers 
in whatever key it is played. And more than this, a common chord, for instance, 
has always the same form, no matter what view be taken of its key relationship. 
Some simplification of this kind is a necessity if these complex phenomena are to 
be brought within the reach of persons of average ability ; and with this particular 
simplification, the child or beginner finds the work reduced to the acquirement of 
one thing, where twelve have to be learned on the ordinary keyboard.' 



480 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



PLAN OF MB. BOSANQUET'b aBNEBALIBED KBTBOABD. 



IT 



IT 



S 2 



11 



8 



10 



BLACK 



12 



2 5 



BLACK 




BLACK 





10 




9 




8 




7 




6 




5 




4 


WUITJE 


S 
t 
1 






IS 




11 




10 







C» 


8 




7 




6 


6 


5 




4 


c' 


3 

4 


<« 


1 

12 


11S9 


11 


* 


10 







c 


8 
7 


=sllf 


6 


•4 


5 
4 




S 




1 


c 





12 




11 




10 




9 


^4 


8 
7 


= C, 


C 


s 


5 




4 


Cl 


S 




y 


<tbl» 


1 


41 


12 
U 




10 


BJf 


9 
8 


= C, 


7 
6 


2 


A 




4 


<^ 


3 


WBITE 


1 




12 




11 



BLACK 



f 



7 


12 


. 16 


21 


25 


90 


84 


88 


48 


47 


52 


8 


7 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


to 


1 


6 


10 


15 


19 


24 


28 


82 


87 


41 


46 


50 


1 



The numbers in the oblongs and in the lines at the bottom of the Table are the numbeis 
assigned to the tones of Bosanquet's cycle of 58, in sect. A. art. 27, and sect. E. art. 18, and 
shew their distribution on this keyboard, which was invented for playing them. The smsll 
italic letters under the numbers at the bottom of each oblong are the transcriptions of one of 
Mr. Bosanquet's names, of which all are given in sect. A. art. 27, against the number d 
the note. The stars preceding the numbers shew those which constitute the duodene of C. 
The notes of all other duodenes stand in the same relative position to their root. The capital 
letters are 48 out of the 56 tones between the dotted and thick lines in the Duodenarium, 
sect. E. art. 18, and those following the sign = are other tones differing from them by » 
skhisma, which are purposely identified with them, see sect. E. art. 25. These are the 48 tones 
used by Mr. Bosanquet for his organ, but he names them as at the bottom of each digital Tb^ 
small thick Roman letters at the top of each oblong are 86 tones of the meantone temperament, 
and the numbers below them are the cents in the intervals from c to these notes. 

This keyboard is applicable to any intonation in which all notes, by the neglect 
of the comma or skhisma, are reduced to one set of Fifths, no matter whether per 
feet or imperfect, as the flat Fifths of the meantone temperament. On refenin^ 
to the plan, we see how the 53 division is placed on the notes. Mr. Bosanquet 



8BC1'. F. 



MR. PAUL WHITE'S HARMON. 



481 



finds it oonvenient to use 7 x 12 = 84 digitals, so that there are repetitions as 
shewn by the figures at tl\e bottom of the plan, eaoh of the 12 columns contain- 
ing 7 digitals. The position of the mean tone notes is shewn by a small thick 
Roman letter at the top of the digital. Having 36 digitals at his disposal, Mr. 
Bosanquet has used 36 notes of the meantone scale in place of only 27. They 
are disposed in 12 rows with three digitals in each row. In the plan, thick lines 
limit the three digitals thus placed at the disposal of the meantone notes, and 
under the name of each note is inserted the number of cents in the interval be- 
tween it and c. It will thus be seen that each note differs from the one above it 
in the plan by a Diesis of 41 cents. Thus the first row has bQ 1159, c = 1200, 
d^l:^ 41. Also each digital lies against two to the right and two to the left. The 
upper one to the right is 76 cents or a small meantone Semitone higher, the 
lower is 117 cents or a great meantone Semitone higher. The upper one to the 
left is, on the contrary, 117 cents lower, and the lower one to the left is 76 cents 
lower. The sum of the two Semitones is 193 cents = ^(204 + 182), a Meantone, IT 
and their difiference 41 cents a Diesis. 

The use of this fingerboard is easily acquired by any pianist, the fingering for 
all major keys resembling that for A major on ordinary instruments. 

9. Mr. J. Paul White's Harmon. 

Mr. James Paul White, of Springfield, Massachusetts, U.S. America, a tuner 
by profession, having been much impressed by Mr. Poole's papers in Silliman's 
Journal, cited under No. 7, determined to realise them so far as possible by means 
of the 53 division of the Octave. Now on examining this division by the tables in 
sect. A. art. 27, and sect. D. table 1, we find that the number of degrees by which 
any interval is represented can always be expressed by multiples, or the sums or 
differences of multiples, of 2, 5, 7 (which may therefore be called indices), as in the 
following table : — 



Name of Interval 



Its Gents 



Comma 

Pythagorean CSomma 
Great DiSsis 
Small Semitone . 
Liimma 

Greater Limma . 
Diatonic Semitone 
Minor Tone 
Major Tone 

* Snpennajor Tone 
t Subminor Third 

FythagoEean minor Third 
Just minor Third 
Jast major Third 
Pythagorean major Third 

* Supermajor Third 
Fourth 
Just Tritone 
Pythagorean Tritone . 
Grave Fifth 
Just Fifth . 

Pythagorean minor Sixth 
Extreme Sharp Fifth 
Just minor Sixth 
Just major Sixth 
Just diminished Seventh 

* Supennajor Sixth 
Just superfluous Sixth 

t Subminor Seventh . 
Extreme sharp Sixth 
Minor Seventh . 
AoutQ minor Seventh 
Just major Seventh . 
Pythagorean major Seventh 
Octave .... 



22 \ 

24/ 

42 

70 

90\ 

92 i 

112 

182 

204 

281 

267 

294 

816 

886 

408 

485 

498 

590 

612 

680 

702 

792 \ 

794/ 

814 

884 

926 \ 

938/ 

954 

969\ 

976/ 

996 
1018 
1088 
1110 
1200 



Represented in the 53 division by 



Cents 



28 

45 
68 

91 

118 
181 
204 
226 
272 
294 
817 
885 
408 
480 
498 
589 
611 
679 
702 

798 

815 
888 

928 

951 

974 

996 
1019 
1087 
1109 
1200 



Degrees 



2 
8 



8 ^ 

9 
10 
12 
18 
14 
17 
18 
19 
22 
26 
27 
80 
81 

85 

86 
89 

41 

42 

48 

44 
45 
48 
49 
58 



=2x4-7 

= 2 
=5x2-7 

= 2x2 

= 5 

= 2x4 

=5+2x2 

= 5x2 

= 7 + 5 

=7+2x8 

=7x2 

=7+5x2 

=7x2+2x2 

=7x2+5 

=7+5x8 

=7x8+5 

=7+5x4 

=5x6=7x6-5 

=7x8+5x2 

=7x5 

=7x8+5x8=53-5x2-7 
=7x5+2x2=53-7x2 

= 53-7-5 

= 7x6 

= 53-5x2 

=7x6+2 

= 5x9=58-2x4 

= 58-5 

=7x7=58-2x2 

=7x4+5x5 

■ — ■ — 1 ■ 

1 1 



T 



482 ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. app. rx. 

It is really surprising how accurately the intervals of just intonation are thus 
represented. Only those marked* andf depending on the 7th harmonic are 
5 cents too flat, or sharp respectively, which is barely perceptible. 

Influenced no doubt by such a calculation as the above, Mr. Fbul White con- 
ceived and executed a fingerboard of which the typographical plan below will 
give some conception. And this conception will be much improved by drawing 
pencil lines on the diagram parallel to the rows of figures sloping up (as 49 1 6 
11 16 21 26 31 36 41 46) and down (as 41 48 2 9 16 23 30 37 44) to the right 
These lines will divide the plan into a number of parallelograms or irregular 
lozenges, each of which represents a digital of nearly the same shape, but fitting 
loosely into its place. These are pieces of wood all diamond-shaped and all of 
the same height, variously marked to assist the player, and all bearing upon them 
the numbers printed in the plan. The typographical plan is, of course, only 
approiimatively correct. In reality the vertical lines are not quite vertical, and the 
linesparaneltothenumberBdififeringbyl2as39-51 - 10 - 22 ~ 34 - 46 — 5 at 
Y the top (which may be connected by pencil lines as just shewn) are more neariy 
horizontal or rather slope slightly downwards instead of up. But as the design 
has not been published, it was desirable to give only a conception and not an 
accurate plan of the arrangement with the curious slopes of the actual lines. 



TYPOOBAPHICAL PLAN OF MB. J. PAUL WHITE B FINGEBBOABD. 

51 

II 39 6 

1127 46 12 

II 15 34 53 

22 41 =0 7 

10 29 48 14 

51 tl7 36 2 

5 39 6 24 ♦t43 *t9 

46 12 tSl 50 16 

fSS 19 38 4 

41 =07 ^26 45 11 

48 14 33 ""52 18 

2 *21 *iO 6 

43 *9 28 47 ns 

50 16 ♦35 1 20 

♦4 23 42 8 

45 11 ♦SO ♦*9 15 

52 ♦IS 37 3 

6 25 44 . 

% 47 ♦IS 32 

1 20 39 

8 27 

49 15 

3 

The thick figures represent white digitals and serve as land-marks, forming the 
53c, 9d, 18«, 22/, 27/i 31^, 40a, ^9b. 

The numbers marked ♦ are the same as those in the plan of Mr. Bosanquet's. 
supr&, p. 480, and represent the duodene of note 4. The numbers marked "f , or 
53, 17, 31, 43, 9, represent the chord of the major Ninth c e^ ^ h\^ d. 

In the columns the numbers as they proceed from top to bottom increase 
by 2, of course taken in the reverse direction they decrease by 2. When necessary 
53 is subtracted or added here and elsewhere, as the numbers must not ei^ceed 53. 



SECT. O. 



ON TUNING AND INTONATION. 



483 



In the lines which slope wp to the right the numbers increase upwards by 5, and 
of course decrease downwards by 5. 

In the lines which slope d/ovm to the right the numbers increase downwards 
by 7, and of course decrease upwards by 7. 

It is thus seen that the three indices 2, 5, 7 are represented by nearly vertical 
and sloping lines, and it becomes easy by the preceding table to pick out any interval. 
Thus to take the just minor Sixth from 18 (one of the thick figures) ; we have by 
the table, 36 = 7x3+5x3, so that we go down 3 steps on the line of 7's, and then up 
3 steps on the line of d's, and thus reach 1, the right degree for 18 + 36 » 54 = 53 + 1. 
But in the table we also find 36 »• 53 - 5 x 2 - 7, hence we may also go dxiwn 
2 steps on the line of 5*8 and then wp 1 step on the line of 7's, reaching 1 as before, 
but not the same 1. It is now the Octave below, and if from this new 1, we de- 
scend 4 steps on the line of 7's and then ascend 5 steps on the line of 5's, we reach 
the old 1, for 7 x 4+5 x 5 » 28 + 25 » 53, or the Octave. 

The body of each digital is a block of wood 2^ inches high and not far from f 
1 inch square on the top. The grain of the wood is vertical so as to facilitate the 
action of the key on its two steel guide pins, which are driven firmly into a board 
as wide as the manual. The valve is opened by a pin under the key in the usual 
way. Of course the fingering is entirely different from ordinary fingering, but is 
the same in all possible keys. Contrasting his board with Mr. Bosanquet's, which 
he admits is admirable and would be probably regarded with more favour by 
musicians than his, Mr. Paul White (in a private letter to me) says 1) that his 
board combines the advantages of Mr. Poole's with Mr. Bosanquet's, and has 
digitals of a simpler construction than either, shewing also the Pythagorean tones 
conspicuously for every note, and having the complete cycle of tones. 2) The 
chords are all easy for the fingers, including those depending on the 7th harmonic. 
3) Digitals differing by one comma are far apart, so that there is no danger of 
playing too sharp or too flat by a comma. The fingers can easily make the just 
chords, but to make them false by a comma is difi&cult. 4) This fingerboard can 
be made more compact than any other. The extreme width of the present in- 
strument (the third made) is only 11 inches, or twice the ordinary width. IT 

Mr. Paul White uses only 56 digitals to the Octave, Nos. 15, 27, 39, marked II, 
being the only repeats. He was kind enough to send me two photographs of his 
instrument (which he calls the Harmon, and which he constructed almost entirely 
with his own hands), one giving a bird's-eye view of the digitals, and the other their 
connection with the rods that open the valves. He has as yet not arranged any 
system of notation and does not himself play on his instrument from notes. 



SECTION G. 



ON TUBING AND IHTONATION. 



(See notes pp. 266, 287, 811, 325.) 



AH. 

1. Difficulties of tuning, p. 483. 

2. Specimens of tuning in mean tone tempera- 
ment, p. 484. 

3. The Fifths and major Thirds in the same, 
p. 484. 

4. Specimens of tuning in equal tempera- 
ment, p. 485. 

5. Examination of the Fifths and Fourths in 
four of the same, p. 485. 

6. Violin Intonation according to the observa- 

tions of Gomu and Mercadier, p. 486. 

7. Observations on the same, p. 487. 

8. Scheibler's method Of tuning, p. 488. 

9. The Translator's approximative method 
and counting beats, p. 488. 



Art 

10. The 'Tuning Octave' for harmonium, 
organ, and piano, p. 488. 

11. The Translator's Rule for tuning in equal ^ 
temperament, beginning with c', p. 4€^. 

12. Modification of tne same for banning 
with a\ p. 489. 

18. Proof of the Rule, p. 490. 

14. Bule for checking the tuning of Octaves, 
p. 491. 

15. The Translator's Bule for tuning in meam- 
tone temperament, p. 491. 

16. Mr. Bosanquet's method of tuning of the 
58 division, p. 492. 

17. Mr. J. Paul White's two methods of tuning 
the same, p. 492. 



Art. 1. — We have seen in sect. E. that just tertian harmony requires the dis- 
crimination of 117 different tones within the Octave. They all indeed depend upon 
just Fifths, Fourths, Thirds, and Sixths. But very few ears could be trusted to 
tune a succession of perfect Fifths and Fourths. Herr G. Appunn told me that it 
cost him an immense labour to tune 36 notes forming perfect Fifths and Fourths 

I I 2 



484 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



upon an experimental harmonium, and he had the finest ear for appreciating 
intervals that I have ever heard of. The accumulation of almost insensible into 
intolerable errors besets all attempts to tune by a long series of similar intervals. 
Even Octaves are rarely tuned accurately through the compass of a grand pianoforte. 
But for major Thirds and minor Sixths there is no chance at all (except by a real 
piece of haphazard luck) to get even one interval tuned with absolute correctness 
by mere appreciation of ear. Hence to attempt to tune the Duodenarium of 
sect. E. art. 18, p. 463, merely by Fifths and major Thirds is quite hopeless. 
But if we cannot tune just intervals with sufficient correctness, how can we expect 
to tune all the variously tempered intervals mentioned in sect. A. (and these are 
only a few of the most important) sufficiently well to discriminate their qualities 
and appreciate their merits ? No ear knows h priori what result it has to expect, 
or has any means of judging whether the result obtained is correct. It follows 
that all attempts to tune by ear must have grievously failed, wherever they de- 
pended upon considerable alterations of just intervals, and that even the laborious 
m and careful training of modem tuners for obtaining the very slightly altered Fifths 
and Fourths of equal temperament can only lead them to absolute correctness ' by 
accident '. 

Art. 2. — To ascertain whether these theoretical views were confirmed in prac- 
tice, I have made some observations on the tuning of the old meantone and the 
recent equal temperaments. It is easy (from the data in sect. A.) to determine 
the cents which should be contained in each interval, and (by measuring the actual 
pitch of each note with the forks described on p. 4466') to find what t^e interval 
obtained in any particular case really is. For brevity I give only the names of the 
notes in the octave, and the interval in cents from the lowest note. But eveiy 
such figure is the result of a careful observation. 



Line 1 in the following Table gives the 
theoretical number of cents. 

Line 2 gives the cents observed on a pitch- 
pipe of 1780 belonging to the bellfoundry 
Golbacchini at Padua, blown with the least 
gy force of wind possible to bring out the tone, 
'' on an organ bellows at Mr. T. Hill's, the 
organ-builder's. 

Line 3 gives those observed on another 
pitch-pipe of 1780, belonging to the same and 
similarly blown. The mean value of a' on 
both was 425'2 vib. 



Line 4 gives those observed on accurate 
copies of a set of tuning-forks ih' and c" misB- 
ing) belonging to the bellfoundiy Oavedini ai 
Verona, supposed to be a century old, and pre- 
served with ^reat care, having a* 428*2. 

Line 5 gives the cents from an octave of 
pipes on Green's organ at St. Katherine's, 
Begent's Park, from the ptches determined bj 
me in 1878, up to which time it was one of 
the few organs tuned in meantone tempera- 
ment. Of course in this case the tuning was 
modem. 



Specimens of Tuning in Meantone Temperament. 



Notes 


C 



ct 


D 


^ 


S 


F 


n 


Q 


G« 


A 


Bb 


B 


C 


1 


76 


198 


810 


886 


508 


579 


697 


778 


890 


1007 


1068 


1900 


2 





102 


216 


808 


414 


516 


619 


728 


827 


920 


1081 


1126 


1232 


3 





184 


286 


829 


448 


561 


626 


701 


814 


900 


982 


1075 


1175 


4 





117 


229 


801 


489 


507 


688 


788 


864 


934 


1042 


— 




5 





72 


198 


800 


882 


509 


586 


699 


785 


898 


1020 


1096 


1909 



Art. 8. — Meantone Fifths, if properly tuned, 
should have 696*6 cents, and the major Thirds 
886*8 cents. The old tuners did not use the 
Fourth in tuning, but took, for example, c' to 
g', then g' to d'\ and then the Octave down to 
d\ thence the Fifths d' to a\ a' to «", and the 
Octave down to «', so that c' to b' ought to be 
a just major Third. The Fifths and major 
Thirds actually obtained can be calculated 
from the Table in Art. 2 by subtraction, taking 
care to increase the minuend by 1200 when it 
is less than the subtrahend. We thus find the 
following values. The figures placed between 
the names of any two notes give the cents in 
the interval between them, which, neglecting 
decimals, should be 697 for Fifths, and 386 
for major Thirds. 

Line 2. Old Pitch-pipe. Fifths : E^ 723 B^ 



685 F 684 C 728 G 698 i> 704 ^ 694 £? 712 ^ 
693 2^ 688 CJt 725 (71 

Major Thirds: m415G403£; BbS85D 




£7|^658£|> 

748 ^ 682 B 751 ^708 C%120Q% 

Major Thirds : E^ 872 G 874 B; B^ 454 D 
890^; F 339^1 484 C]t; O 448 £ 471 Gf. 

Line 4. Old Forks. Fifths : E^ 741 B^ 
665 F 698 C 788 G 696 D 705 / 705 E; 
(B missing) ; 1^ 684 CJ 747 0% 

Major Thirds : E^ 482 Q ; (B missing) ; B^ 
d87D404^: F427il 8830^; C489JS 435 Gi 

These old tunings are very imperfect. Both 
Fifths and major Thirds would make dreadful 
harmony. The forks are if anything worse 
than the pitch-pipes^ 



8BCT. O. 



ON TUNING AND INTONATION. 



486 



Line 5, St. Eathexine'8 Organ. Fifths: Eh 
720 £b 689 F 700 C 699 G 699 D 700 ^ 684 ^ 
714 £ 690 py 686 C« 718 0% 

Major Thirds: ^899Gd97B; B^S7SD 
888^; ^889^ 874 Ctt; O 882 Jg7 408 (7^. 

This modem tuning is better, but not good. 



The Fifths, which should be a quarter of a 
comma 6*4 cents flat, are often sharp: the 
major Thirds are unequal. But the errors 
here are not more than might be reasonably 
eicpected from tuning by ear. 



Art 4. — It takes a quick man three years to learn how to tune a piano well 
in equal temperament by estimation of ear, as I learn from Mr. A. J. Hipkins. 
Tuners have not time for any other method. The following are good examples : — 



Line 1. The theoretical intervals, all exact 
hundreds of cents. 

Line 2. My own piano, tuned by one of 
Broadwoods' usual tuners, and let stand un- 
used for a fortnight. 

Lines 8, 4, 5. Three grand pianos by 
Broadwoods* best tuners, prepared for exami- 
nation through the kindness of Mr. A. J. Hip- 
kins, of that house. 

Line 6. An organ tuned a week previously 
by one of Mr. T. Hill's tuners, and used only 



once, examined by the kind permission of Mr. 
G. Hiokson, treasurer of South Place Chapel, 
Finsbury, where the organ stood. 

lane 7. An harmonium tuned by one of 
Messrs. Moore & Moore's tuners, kindly pre- 
pared for my examination. 

Line 8. An harmonium, used as a standard f 
of pitch, tuned a year previously by Mr. D. J. 
Blfdklev (p. 97d), b^ means of accurately 
counted beats, &c., with a constant blast, put 
at my disposal for examination by Mr. Blaikley. 









Specimens 


of Tuning 


in Equal Temperament 


. 






Notes 


C 


ct 


D 


/« 


E 


F 


n 


1 

a 


(J% 


A 


At 


B 


C 


1 





100 


200 


800 


400 


500 


600 


700 


800 


900 


1000 


1100 


1200 


2 





96 


197 


297 


892 


498 


590 


700 


797 


894 


990 


1089 


1201 


8 





99 


200 


805 


411 


497 


602 


707 


805 


902 


1008 


1102 


1206 


4 





100 


200 


800 


895 ' 502 


599 ' 702 


800 


897 


QQQ 


1100 


1200 


5 





101 


199 


299 


399 500 


598 


696 


800 


899 


999 


1100 


1200 


6 





101 


192 


297 


899 502 


601 


702 


806 


898 


1005 


1099 


1201 


7 





98 


200 


296 


896 498 


599- 


702 


800 


898 


999 


1099 


1199 


8 





100 

t 


200 


800 


899 


499 


600 


700 


800 


900 


1001 


1099 


1200 

1 

1 



These were all tuned by the modem way of 
Fifths up and Fourths down, and the object is 
to make the Fifth up 2 cents too close, and 
the Fourth down 2 cents too open. As this 
interval of 2 cents lies on the very boundary of 
perception by ear, the difficulty of tuning thus 
without attending to the beats is enormous. 
The above figures in lines 2, 8, 4, 5 shew how 
veiy close an approximation is now possible in 
pianofortes. 

Art. 5. — The order of tuning differs in dif- 
ferent houses. Messrs. Moore & Moore's tuners 
set c' by a c" fork, and then tune in order : 
c' g d' a e' bff c't gt d'jL Then begin again 
and go on as c' / 6^ e'\^. The proof of the work 
is that «'k and d'f^ are identical. Messrs. 
Broadwoods' timers also set c' from c, but then 

proceed thus : c' ad' ae' bff ^% 9t ^')t otfc\ 
the proof being that the final agrees with the 
initial c'. In this case a^ is taken as h^f 



ot a/f^i^ that is a Fourth down. Observe that 
the tuning in both cases takes place in the 
Octave/ to/', for which the beats of disturbed 
Fifths and even of disturbed Fourths are very 
slow. This arises from the great prominence 
of the second partial tone in this region on 
pianoforte notes. In taking the pitch of each 
note, I found that d\ d'*jfy e' taken as disturbed 
unisons, boEit with my forks much less dis- 
tinctly than /, /](, &c., to c'^ as disturbed 
Octaves. Now the above table enables us to 
calculate the cents in the Fifths and Fourths 
actuallv tuned, which were the intervals esti- 
mated by ear. I take only line 1 as containing 
the theoretical intervals, and lines 2 to 5 as 
being by Broadwoods' tuners, so that the order 
is certain. The numbers of cents placed be- 
tween two notes shews the interval, all the li 
Fourths being taken down and the Fifths up. 



Pianoforte Tuning — Fourths and Fifths, 



1 


c'500 


^700 


d'500 


a 700 


6'500 


6500 


^^ 


c'ft500 ^700 


d4500 oftSOO /700 C 


2 


500 


697 


508 


698 


508 


499 


^99 


"700 


WT 


"497 


708 


8 


498 


698 


498 


709 


509 


506 


697 


594 


708 


502 


506 


709 


4 


498 


698 


508 


698 


495 


501 


701 


500 


700 


501 


497 


698 


5 


504 


708 


500 


700 


500 


502 


703 


501 


700 


501 


498 


700 



These examples must probably be con- 
sidered the best that pianoforte tuning by ear 
can accomplish. But even in line 5, which is 
the best, there are only five intervals abso- 
lutely correct, two others are only an inappre- 
ciable 1 cent in error, two are a just appreciable 
2 cents wrong, two are 3 cents out, and one 



wrong by the very perceptible interval of 4 
cents. Now if this is the work of a clever 
tuner in constant practice for many hours dally 
for many years, m tuning one kind of tem- 
perament only, what are we to expect from 
those who attempt to realise new intervals ? 







rly speaking, tuoe at all. It is with him 
guides t£e muscles to alter the teDsion 



Ij^iD after a pause, throw great impedi- 
1 BiDgers. The habit of choral singing 

-j^^Mnja~- ^^ accompanying instrument is quite 

r^tl9i9A^Wm 69 '^?i i^olie f)- Hence I pass by voioee alto- 
'Iw'<7^&'i8l^SII!&G^lT 'oo'' strings to make three perfect 
'i N lUai 9KHlclflMHiauaib1e combinational tone, which should 
Dtt^9lfi fSJ^Sf^S^ ^^ V''^'^ b^ '^ tuning, and hence a Twelfth 
^S - M**™ ^ bHS, 1 m r* ^^^^ °'^^ '" '^^ compass of his instm- 
...-^u^. iffiig, as much as the pianoforte tuner by 

__^ fi'of bis strings. And according to the 

iV#Ji||jgual temperament. How then does be 

-"^■-"^ usual language, what intonation does he 

Imentioned on p. 325d, note -t-) instituted 

organs by the pbonautograph (CompUa 

..,._ on violins and violoncellos by means of a 

^f was oonnected with a wire that conducted 

Tee Comptes Bendus, 17 July 1871, vol- 

p. 321, vol. Ixxvi. p. 433, I obtained the 

I give the results only for diSerent indi- 

itto. Some of the scales are fragmentaiy. 

1 number of cents for comparison. The 

|*rhe root is omitted as unnecessary. The 




'^!^%IC Major. 



,S?, Not™ 

!Q!! Just QBIltS . 

a: Pyth. „ . 
p_ ^"-^ ■■ • 

■^■j Violin 

ProfeseiotuU 
(M. Ltooarct, 
! Belgian) 



, 200 400 BOO TOO WO UOO 1300 



.jj- .jj[. .jj[. .jj[. .jj[. .^. .^. .jj. • ; - 



SBCT. O. 



ON TUNING AND INTONATION. 



487 



Scale of C Minor. 



Noten 


d 
204 


816498 


9 a\> 
702814 


b 


& 


Notes 


d 
204 


316498 


9 
702 


flb 


6 


c' 


Just cants . 


1088 


1200 


Just cents . 


81411088 1200 


Pyth. „ . 


204 


294 


498 


702 


792 


1110 


1200 


Pyth, „ , 


204 


294 


498 


702 


79211101200 


Equal „ . 


200 


800 
292 


600 


700 
697 


800 


1100 


1200 


Equal f, . 


200800500700800 
199295494700810 


1100 


1200 


VioUn 


1208 


Violin 


Amateon 




281 




708 








Professional 


207 


811 


499701 


798 


1118 








295 




702 






1210 


(M. Ferrand, of 


204 


298 


508698798 


1116 


1201 






295 












the Op^ra 


206 


8064921700 


794 










294 










1196 


Comique) 


204 


298 
















801 




705 






1206 






















298 




702 






1208 




















202 


800 




701 


























196 


80i 


505 




























195 


292 


496 


707 














1 












292 
































808 




































705 


782 
788 












1 
1 
















709 


802 
802 


1118 


1196 








1 
















696 


798 


1111 


1209 


























712 


798 


1118 




























704 


780 


1101 


1197 


























712 


788 


1102 





















Art. 7. — Messrs. Comu and Mercadier oonclade finally {ibid, vol. Ixxvi. p. 434) 
that:— 

' Musical intervals belong to at least two different systems of different values : 

^ 1) The intervals employed in melodies which have no modulations agree 
with those of the Pythagorean scale. T 

^ 2) The intervals between two notes sownded together in chords, the basis of 
harmony, have for their ratios the following numbers : 2 for Octave, | Fifth, 
I Fourth, f major Third, 4 minor Third, | major Sixth, | minor Sixth, and 
\ Seventh, where the Fourth and Sixths were deduced from observation of the 
Fifths and Thirds, and the Seventh from the dominant chord.' 



Thus for unaooompanied harmony of two 
tones ^chords more than two tones were not 
tried) just intonation alons was used. For 
melody the major Thirds, major Sixths, and 
especially the major Sevenths (leading notes) 
were much sharpened, and the minor ThiMs 
and minor Sixths generally much flattened. 
But did this arise from the custom of equal 
temperament? (as M. Gu^roult thinks, ibid. 
9 May 1870, vol. Ixx. p. 1087, to which Messrs. 
Oomu and Mercadier replied, on 80 May 1870, 
vol. Ixx. p. 1170) or really fiom the feeling of 
Fifths ? The latter was impossible for the 1^- 
ing note, which is sometimes much sharper 
than in Pythagorean intonation, and the Fifths 
played were by no means always true. Messrs. 
Gomu and Mercadier say that the divergence 
h!om the mean only reaches ^ of a comma, 
that is, about 7 cents; but as the Pytha- 
gorean major Sixth, major Third, and major 
Seventh differ from the corresponding equed 
tempered intervals by only 6, 8, and 10 cents 
respectively, this uncertainty renders it im- 
possible to decide whether the scale played 
was intentionally equal or Pythagorean, or 
whether even it d^d not vary with the feeling 
of the moment. Taking into consideration 
that the pitches actually shewn in the tables 
vaiy considerably, that they very rarely repeat 
themselves, that the notes are sometimes 
flatter and sometimes sharper than either just 



or Pythagorean intonation, and that this un- 
certainty pervades even such intervals as the 
Fourth, Fifth, and Octave, I am inclined to 
adopt the hypothesis of an intentionally vari- 
able intonation. Whether founded on the 
feeling of Pythagorean or equal temperament, 
it is difficult to decide. But it is certainly not 
founded on any feeling of just intonation for 
harmony. If then these players, as Messrs. 
Gomu and Mercadier assert firom first to last 
in the unmistakable terms already cited, adopt 
just intonation of intervals for harmony, af 
serious question arises as to how they treat 
the relations of tonality. The first part may 
lead and the others may be adapted to it, or 
the bass may determine the intonation of the 
other parts. In either case there would be a 
great variability, through which modulation, 
and even the adjustment of parts without 
much previous combined practice would be- 
come extremely difficult; see pp. 206c and 
note *, 8246, c, d. But how about the return 
to the same key after modulations (p. 8286) ? 
Huyghens (Cosmotheoros^ lib. i. p. 77, as 
cited by Dr. Smith, HannonicSf 2nd ed. 
p. 228) suggests that as * erring from the pitch 
first assumed . . . would greatly offend the 
ear of the musician, he naturally avoids it by 
his memory of pitch, and by tempering the 
intervals of the intermediate sounds, so as to 
return to it again \ But how accurately does 



488 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



he remember the originftl pitch? In some 
cases in the above observations of Oomu and 
Meroadier the Octave (and hence the original 
pitch) will be seen to be sharpened or flattened 
by more than two cents. In the course of a few 
modulations this two cents might easily become 
22 or a comma. Where is the guarantee for 
remembering the original pitch? Would an 
alteration of a whole comma in passing through 



a series of modulations be noticed ? We know 
indeed that unaccompanied singers oanstently 
' flatten * by much more than a comma. The 
Duodenarium simply shews what sotinds oa^t 
to be played in modulations, and would be 
played on instruments with fixed tones pro- 
perly arranged ; not what intervals are ikrt 
played and sung, and mere memory of 
does not suffice. 



Art. 8. — Scheibler's method of tuning instruments was theoretically perfect 
It consisted in tuning by his fork tonometer a series of forks 4 vib. flatter than the 
pitches required. The string, pipe, or reed was then tuned sharper than the fork by 
i beats in a second. (See p. 4466 for Eoenig's forks for this purpose.) This only 
applied to one octave, and perhaps the octave below ; the others were tuned from 
them by estimation of Octave. The errors thus made were a minimum, but 

" there was the obvious disadvantage of having to tune a new set of forks for each 
pitch desired. This Scheibler overcame by tuning auxiliary octaves on organs, and 
counting beats by rather a troublesome rule, entailing the need of an accurate 
metronome. Even then he only taught how to tune in equal temperament. For 
practical purposes we require not only the equal but the meantone temperament 
and also the 53 division of the octave. The only sure way is by calculating the 
pitch number of each note, and thus determining the beats between the note and 
the forks of a tuning-fork tonometer. This method may be dismissed as generally 
impracticable. So may any method which depends upon accurately knowing the 
pitch number of the tuning-not& What is required is a method of tuning at any 
unknown pitch which an organ or piano may happen to possess at the moment 
within the limits of, say c'256 and c' 270, without determining exactly what that 
pitch really is. This would save the great trouble of entirely altering the pitch 
of the piano (never very certain in its results), and the still greater trouble and 
expense of entirely altering the pitch of a^ organ or harmonium. 

Art. 9. — ^For this purpose I invented ah approximative method (given on p. 785 

fof the 1st edition of this translation and subsequently communicated to the 
Muaicai Times), which I here subjoin in an improved form. It is based on the 
result of Prof. Preyer's investigations (supr&, p. 147(2'), that errors of ^ or '2 of a 
vibration cannot be heard in any part of the scale, so that any attempt to tune 
more accurately is labour thrown away. Moreover, even at high pitches *3, -4, and 
'5 vib. are scarcely perceptible in melody and quite inoffensive in harmony. It 
will be found very difficult when the beats are less than 4 in 10 seconds, that is, 
when the error is less than '4 vib., to count them with any approach to accuracy. 
But it is only by beats that we can work effectively. 



Any one who undertakes tuning should 
learn to estimate the meaning of 6, 10, 15, 20, 
so beats in 10 seconds. This is best done by 
short pendulums constructed of a piece of 
thread with one end tied to a curtain rmg, stnd 
the other passed through a slit in a piece of 
cr firewood, round which it is ultimately tied. 
The stick is put under a book by the side of a 
table, so that the pendulum swings freely. 
Measure the length of the string from the 
centre of the ring to the beginning of the 
wood, which allows of an easy alteration of 
the length by drawing the string through the 
slit. Make this length 9} inches. The pendu- 
lum swings backwaids and forwards 120 times 
in 60 seconds, and hence 20 times in 10 
seconds. Adjust it more accurately by a 
seconds watch. Counting the swings one way 



only there are 10 double swings in 10 seconds. 
By watching and counting this, say for half an 
hour, the tuner will learn to feel the rate of 
these two sets of swings. Then make another 
pendulum with a length of string of 4f inches 
measured as before. This vibrates much more 
quickly, making 180 single and hence 90 
double swings in 60 seconds, and consequently 
80 single and 15 double swings in 10 seconds. 
Finally make the length 27]^ inches, always 
from the centre of the ring to the stick, and 
the pendulum will make 6 double and 12 
single vibrations in 10 seconds. Remember 
that if you begin counting with one, you will 
end with seven for 6, eleven for 10, sixteen 
for 15, and so on, so that you will always have 
to throw off one from your count. 



Art. 10. — ^The rule has to be arranged in several forms according to the custom 
of tuning instruments. Harmoniums are best tuned from c' to c'\ that is, in the 
two-foot octave. Organs are generally tuned in the principal stop, so that on 
touching the keys from c' to c", the sounds are from c" to c", in the one-foot 
octave, and hence the beats are twice as fast. But for pianos it is the custom to 
tune from/ to/' (see art. 5). Most tuners in England begin with c", from which 



SECT. G. 



ON TUNING AND INTONATION. 



489 



c' is 'set/ and then the tuning commences. Some timers in England and all 
abroad begin with a\ This makes no difference in the rule, provided the tuning 
octave remains the same. 



Absolutely the beats arising from imper- 
fect Fifths and Sixths vary for every difference 
of pitch of the lower note. As the Fifth is 
always too close and the Fourth too open, the 
reader can find the beats from the numbers in 
the table, p. 487c, d, by subtracting twice the 
larger from three times the smaller pitch 
number for Fifths (thus c* : g' in col. ii. of the 
table is 258*6 : 387-6, whence 8 x 258*6 - 2 x 
387-6 = 775-8 - 776-2 =-6, giving 6 beats in 10 



seconds), and four times the smaller pitch 
from thjree times the larger for Fourths (thus 
g': d' = 887-6 : 290-8, whence 8 x 887-6 - 4 x 
274=1162-8 - 1161-2 = 1-6 or 16 in 10 seconds). 
But for the purposes of the rule all the beats 
of Fifths are supposed to be the same through- 
out the tuning octave, and similarly all the 
beats of Fourths are assumed to be the same. 
The errors will be found to correct each other, 
and in no case to exceed the permissible limits. 



Art. 11. — Bulefor timing in equal temperament at any pitch between & 256 and 
& 270-4. 

Tune in the following order, making the Fifths closer and the Fourths wider f 
than perfect. The numbers between the names of the notes indicate the beats 
in 10 seconds. 

For harmoniums : 

d 10 ^ 16 d' 10 a' 15 e 10 h' 15 /j^ 15 c'jj: 10 ^| 15 d'| 10 a| 15/ 

For organs, using the metal principal, soxmding thus an Octave higher than 
the digitals shew : 

c" 20 g" 30 d" 20 a" 30 e" 20 h" 30/'| 30 c"^ 20 fi/^ 30 d'| 20 a'| 30/' 
For pianofortes : 

c' 10 ^6 d' 10 a 6 e' 10 h lO/jj: 6 c| 10 ^ 6 d'^ lOaj^ 10/ 



On the piano the beats can often be heard 
for only 5 seconds, and then the beats will be 
8 and 5 in 5 seconds, in place of 6 and 10 in 
10 seconds. 

In the two first cases the intervals beating 
10 in 10 seconds are all Fifths up, those beat- 
ing 15 in 10 seconds are Fourths down ; in the 
last case the Fifths up beat only 6 times in 10 
seconds, and the Fourths down beat 10 times 
in 10 seconds. 

Tune each Fifth as accurately just^ or 
without beats, as possible, and then make the 
interval closer hy flattening the upper note 
very slightly indeed till 10 beats are heard in 
10 seconds. Then from the Fifth thus reached 
tune a Fourth down as accurately justt or 
without beats, as possible, and then make the 
interval opener by fl^ittening the lower note 



very slightly till 15 beats are heard in 10 
seconds. From the note thus gained proceed 
to the next until / is reached. The Fourth / T 
to e' is not tuned, as both notes have been 
determined. It never beats faster than 15 in 
10 seconds. 

If the Fifths and Fourths are not brought 
to be as nearly as possible just in the first in- 
stance the tuner can never be sure whether 
the second note of the interval is too sharp or 
too flat, because the error itself is too small 
to be judged of with accuracy on merely 
sounding the notes in succession, and the 
same number of beats would result whether 
we had sharpened or flattened the note, but 
the whole scheme would be entirely frustrated 
if the interval were rendered opener instead of 
closer or conversely. 



Art. 12. — If it is preferred to commence on a\ set a' to fork and proceed to e, 
V up to/, &c., as in the regular scheme. Stop at / and begin again at a\ and 
tune the Fifth a to d' down^ first making the interval just, and then making it % 
closer by sharpening the lower note till 10 beats in 10 seconds result. Next take 
d' io g' 9i, just Fourth down, and then make the interval opener by flattening the 
lower note till 15 beats are heard in a second. Lastly, from this g' take c' a Fifth 
lower, and after making it just, render the interval closer by sharpening the lower 
note till 10 beats in 10 seconds are heard. This modification is merely an adapta- 
tion of the general principle that Fifths are to be closer than just, and Fourths 
opener than just. 



The tuner should carefully familiarise him- 
self with tuning just Fifths and Fourths, with 
recognising them as just by their total absence 
of beats in this 2-foot Octave, and by feeling 
how beats arise by altering either of the notes 
either way. On the heurmonium this is easy, 
when the just interval has been tuned. It is 
only necessary to press down the digital of the 
upper note slightly, so as just to hear the 



note ; this process flattens it and renders the 
interval closer; or to do the same with the 
lower note, which renders the interval opener. 
In either case beats ensue. As many just 
Fourths and Fifths exist on the Harmonica), 
this experiment is ready to hand. 

Art. 18. — The proof of my rule consists in 
shewing that for c'256, a'485, a'440. c'270-4, it 
leads to results which no ear could distinguish 



490 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



Arp. XX. 



from perfectfy correct tuning, or which are 
equal at least to the very best in art. 4. For 
it is clear that if it holds for all these pitches, 
of which one is practically the lowest and one 
practically the highest in use, and the other 
two are as nearly as may be halfway between 
them, it must hold for all intermediate pitches. 
Now the results obtained by the rule are easily 
calculated for a given c' or a\ Using c\ c's, 
d\ &c., for the pitch numbers of these notes, 
and remembering that the rule gives 1 beat in 
a second for flat Fifths and 1*5 beats in a 
second for sharp Fourths, we have, for har- 
moniums or organs, supposing c' Imown, and 
the above rule accurately followed, 

^ = 3c' - 1 
4d' = 3^ - 1*5 
2a' = 3d' - 1 



44^ s3a' 
26' s8d' 
4/'« = 3fc' 



1*5 

1 

1-5 

1*5 

1 

1-5 



8/'J 
2g'8 = 3c^ 
4d'J = 3sr1f 
2a'Jf = 8d'J - 1 
4/ = 3a'J - 1*5 

If we begin with a', then the three first equa- 
tions will give 

3d'=2a' + l, 8^'=4d'+l-6. 3c'=2/+l. 



In the case of the pianoforte, using the Octave 
/ to r, the equations for calculating the pitches 
of the notes from beats will be, if we 
with c', 

4^ =3c' - 1 

2d »Sj7 ~ -6 

4a » 8d - 1 



- -6 

- 1 

- 1 



- -6 



20' =Sa 

46 » 30' 

4/J = {J6 

2cTf = 3/f - -6 

4^J=8cf - 1 

4aS= &i'8- 1 
4/ =3aJ-l. 

But if we begin with a, the first three equa- 
tions will give 

3d»4a + l, 39«2d+ -6, 36^=4^ + 1. 

In the following calculations the rule is 
necessarily supposed to be carried out with 
perfect accuracy. Of course in practice, spe- 
cially when the beats are estimated instead of 
being accurately counted, this is impofisil^ 
But the results will be found much more accu- 
rate than in the ordinary way of tuning en- 
tirely by estimations of ear, and the rule much 
more easy to manipulate than the ordinary 
method of tuning. 



"Proof of Bute for Tuning in Equal Temperament. 



Fob Habmoniums and Oboanb. 



T 



Notes 


c' 


c% 


d* 

287-4 
287-3 


dt 

304*4 
804*8 

307-6 
307-4 

811-1 
311-1 

321-6 
321-5 


«' 


r 


ft 


9' 

383-6 
383*5 


9'S 


o' 


456*1 
455-9 


6' 


€" 


c'256 
Equal 
By Rule . 


256-0 
2560 

258-7 
258-7 

261-6 
261-6 

270-4 
270*4 


271-2 
271*1 

274*0 
273*9 


322-6 
822-4 


341*7 
341-5 


862-0 
362-0 

365-8 
366-8 

870-0 
370-1 


406*4 
406*1 


430-5 
430-4 


483-3 
483-1 


512 
612-0 


a'435 
Equal 
By Rule . 


290-3 
290-8 


825-9 
325*9 


845-8 
345-0 


387*6 
387-6 

392-0 
391*9 


410-6 
410-3 


435-0 
435-0 


4609 
460-6 


488-3 
488*1 


517-3 
517-3 


a'440 
Equal 
By Rule . 


277*2 
277*2 

286*5 
286-5 


293*7 
293-6 


329-6 
329-6 

340-7 
340-6 


349*2 
349-2 

360*9 
361*0 


4158 
415-2 

429-2 
429*2 


440-0 
4400 

454-8 
454-7 


466*2 
466*1 


498^ 
493-9 


523-3 
52S-3 


c'270-4 
Equal 
By Rule . 


303-5 
303-5 


382-4 
382-5 


405-2 
405*1 


481-8 
481-8 


610-4 
610-1 


640-S 
540^ 



Fob Pianos. 



Notes 


/ 


ft 


9 


9t 


a 


«» 


b 


& 


Ct 


d' 


d't 


e' 


/ 


Equal 
By Rule . 


170-9 
170*9 

180-5 
180-6 


181-0 
181-0 


191-8 
191-8 


503*2 
208-2 


215-3 
215-2 


228*1 
228-2 


241-7 
241-7 


256 
256 


271-2 
271-2 

286-5 
286*6 


287-4 
287-3 

803-5 
303-5 


304*4 
304-6 


322-6 
322-6 


341-7 
841*7 


Equal 
By Rule . 


191-2 
191-8 


202-6 
202-6 


214-6 
214-7 


227-4 
227-4 


240-9 
2411 


255-2 
255-4 


270-4 
270-4 


321-6 
321*8 


3407 
340-8 


361-0 
361-2 



Hence it is apparent that the rule never 
makes an error exceeding -3 vib., and generally 
keeps below this limit. Now at 256 an error 
of '3 vib. amounts to 2 cents, and at 540 to 



less than 1 cent. The rule, therefore, properly 
handled will give results equal if not superior 
to the specimens in art. 4. 



ABCT. Q. 



ON TUNING AND INTONATION. 



491 



Art. 14. — The rule applies only to one octave and gives what are known as 
*the bearings/ whence the other notes must be derived by taking Octaves in the 
usual way. 



Tuners so frequently get out in taking the 
Ootaves that it is convenient to have a oneok 
on the estimation of ear. 'This is furnished 
by the fact that any note will beat the same 
number of times in a second with an imperfect 
Fourth below and its Octave (that is, an im- 
perfect Fifth) above. Thus if the note have 
401 vib., its imperfect Fourth below SCO, and 
the Octave above that Fourth below 600, the 
beats of the Fourth are8x401-4x800 = 8, 
and the beats of the Fifth are 8 x 401 -2 xGOO 
=8 also. Now the imperfect Fourths are fur- 
nished by the bearings themselves. Thus, 
going upwards, we have c' f c", c'J/'Jt c'% d' 
g' d", &c. Going downwaros, the tuner takes 
a Fifth and then a Fourth, as b' e' 6, 6> e'^ 6[^, 
a' d' a, and so on from octave to octave. Mr. 
Hermann Smith prefers to insert the octaves 
above when tuning the original bearings. Thus, 
if the bearings were taken in the two-foot oc- 
tave c' c" as a' 10 d' 16 g' 10 c' 16 f 16 a'f 10 d'J 
16 g% 10 c% 16 /J 16 b' 10 e\ he would intro- 
duce the octaves in this order, a a' d' d" g' g 
cie-fS 0$ a% d't d"t g'$ gi c'Jf c"irt /f 
bb' e' e" a\ But the method I have proposed 
seems simpler. 

The, principle of the check applies to the 
inversidns of other imperfect intervals, and 



may serve as additional verifications. Thus 
a note beats equally with an imperfect minor 
Sixth below and its Octave the imperfect major 
Third above. Thus 600 : 801 beat 6 x 801 
- 8!k 600 = 8, and 801 : 1000 beat 6x801-4 
X 1000 s 8 also. Again, a note beats equally 
with an imperfect minor Third below and its 
Octave the major Sixth above. Thus 600 : 601 
beat 6 X 601 - 6 X 600 » 6, and 601 : 1000 beat 
6 X 601 - 8 X 1000 = 6 also. If in each case we 
inverted the order, we should double the beats. 
Thus for the Fifth, 200 : 801 will beat 2 x 801 
-8x200»2; but 801 : 400 will beat 4 x 801 - 8 
X 400=4. For the major Third, 400 : 601 will at 
beat 4 X 601 - 6 x 400 = 4; but 601 : 800 will ^ 
beats X 601 -6x800=8. For the major Sixth, 
800: 601 will beat 8 x 601 - 6 x 800 = 8; but 
601 : 600 wiU beat 6 x 601-6x600=6. The 
reason is obvious. The fractions expressing 
the minor intervals f , f , % have odd denomi- 
nators and even numerators, and hence their 
inversions reduce by dividing by 2, but this is 
not the case for the major intervals, }, |, f . 

So much of the beauty of tuning pianos, 
harmoniums, and organs depends on the per- 
fection of the Octave, that tuners would do 
well to apply the first test with the Fourth 
below and Fifth above, as a matter of course. 



Art. 15. — Bule for tuning in meantone temperament from c' 252*7, HandeVs 
pitch, to c' 283*6, Father Smithes pitch for the Durham organ. 



As will be seen by the table p. 4846, c'264 
or Helmholtz*8 pitch is a small meantone 
Semitone, and the Durham pitch is a mean- 
tone Tone, sharper than HandePs. The great 
flatness of the Fifths in the meantone intona- 
tion makes it necessary to divide the tunings 
into three classes, sufficiently ascertainable by 
a fork in Helmholtz's or even in French pitch. 
The first is from rather less than a Semitone 
to about a Quartertone flatter than French 
pitch ; the second is French pitch and from a 
Quartertone flatter to a Quartertone sharper ; 



the third is from a Quartertone to a Semitone T 
sharper than French. 

The rule would extend to 27 notes, but on 
the proof it will be carried out only for 14 
notes, as on the English concertina, for which 
this intonation is still used. And for this in- 
strument the * tuning octave * may be taken as 
c' to c". For the few organs that still use this 
intonation the same Octave must be tuned, 
and hence, when taken on the * principal,* the 
digitals must be fingered from c to c', because 
the beats would be otherwise too rapid to count. 



Tune in the following order the numbers 25-6-7 and 40-1-2, meaning that 
the beats are to be 25 and 40 for the low, 26 and 41 for the medium, and 27 and 42 
for the high pitch in 10 sec, according to the three grades already laid down. 

c' 25-6-7 ^'40-1-2 d' 25-6-7 a'40-l-2e' 25-6-7 b' 40-1-2 
/i 40 - 1 - 2 c'# 25 - 6 - 7 ^'Jf 40 - 1 - 2. 
"^ c' 40- 1 -2/' 40 - 1 - 2 6'b 25 - 6- 7 e'b 40- 1 - 2 ay 



The tuning is conducted in the same way 
as before, only in two series, from c' to g'f^ and 
from c' to a'b, making the Fifths and Fourths 
at first perfect, and then the Fifths closer and 
the Fourths wider. Butin twocases c' f^fb*^ 
the Fourth is taken upwards, and then the 
upper note ha« to be sharpened. And there is 
an additional verification after tuning to e\ for 
the major Thirds c'«', g'b\ d'/'J, a'c'!j^ e'g'tt 
and also fa* and minor Sixths d'by c'a'\^ 
should be all sensibly perfect. Octaves can 
be verified by imperfect Fourths more easily 
than in equal temperament. 

The equations for determining the pitch 
from the beats are 



2^ =8c' 
4d' = 8g' 
2a' = &2 
40' =8a' 
26' =8tf' 
^f%^ 36 
4c'i;=8/j 
2^5= 8c'; 
4d'Jf = Sgr'Jf 



2-6.-6--7 

4-0--1--2 

2-5--6- 

4'0--l- 

2-6--6. 

4-ai. 

4-0-1- 
2-5--6- 
4-0.-1- 



7 
2 
7 
2 
2 
7 
2 



8/ =4c' +4-0-1.-2 
36'[, = 4/ +4-0--1--2 
3«'L=26't + 2-5.-6.-7 
8a>=4<?'b-«-4'0.-l--2 



492 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR 



AFP. XX. 



^roof of the Bule for Tuning in Meantone Temperament. 



Notes 



Handel . 
By Rule . 



Helmholtz 
By Rule . 



Durham 
By Rule 



262-7 
262-7 



288- 
288- 



«'» 



264-1 
264-1 



264-0 276-9 
264-0 276-8 



6296- 
6296' 



6 
282-4 



296-2 



317-1 
817-0 



d'S 



296-2 
296-1 



808-4 



296-0806-8 



881-8 
881-6 



e'b 



802-8 
802-4 



816-8 
816-9 



889 
889-2 



816-9 
816-9 



2864 



6 
864*6 



888-0 
888-8 



880-0868-1 
829-9 868-4 



879 
879-6 



ft 



868-2 
868-4 



869-0 
869-1 



2896 



8 
896-9 



877-9 
877-8 



894 
894-7 



424-1 



4 



894-9 
894-8 



8412 



6 
412-6 



424-0 448-l|468-7 
468-7 



448-6 



«'b 



404-8 



462-1 
404-6422-6462-3 



422-4 
422-6 



a' 



422-6 



441-4 
441-2 



474-1 
474-2 



ft'b 



b' 



•»' 



472*4 5C6-4 
472-5 505-4 



472-3 493-5 528-0 
472-6 493-6 5fi8-0 



607-3 
507-4 



680-1 6e7-S 
590-6567-2! 



i 



The results are seen to be nearly as good place of 896-8, an error of -6 vib. and S-6 centfi, 
as before, only the Durham /]( is 896*9 in which is scarcely perceptible. 

Art. 16. — In the Proceedings of the Musical Association for 1874-5, voL L 
f pp. 141-145, Mr. Bosanquet gives the process that he followed in tuning his 
cycle of 53 (see sect. F., p. 479), hut it is too complicated to be abstracted with 
a reasonable hope of its being understood. It depended mainly on taking the 
beats of the differential tones in the major chord, with the major Third either 
in the middle or highest. In this case the Fifth was presumed to be accurately 
tuned to begin with. Taking the numbers in sect. A. art. 27, but doubling them 
for the Octave higher and supposing the Fourth to be perfect, we have 

c" 528, /"704, a"879-32 in the cycle. 
Differentials 176 175-32 

Beats per second *68 , that is, beats per minute 40*8 

and the beats were apparently counted for a minute. Mr. Bosanquet, however, 
does not recommend the process for his harmonium because the dififerential tones 
were not distinct enough. 

Art. 17. — Mr. Paul White has two methods of tuning the cycle of 53 by means 
f of beats. We may suppose that for the given pitch of the initial c, all the pitch 
numbers have been calculated, as in sect. A. art. 27, for No. 4, Mr. Bosanquet's 
initial G » 264 vib. Two places of decimals are required for this purpose, as in 
both methods it is necessary to rely upon the slow beats of the Thirds and Sixths 
and check the result at every few steps. 

First method. Tune 5 minor Thirds of the cycle up, alternating with major 
Sixths down, to keep within the same octave. Since a minor Third has 14 degrees 
this gives 5 x ^ = 1^, or an Octave and 17 degrees, that is an Octave above the 
major Third of the cycle, which will beat slowly with the note on which we 
started. Thus beginning with 264 and taking first 3 cyclic minor Thirds up, and 
then a cyclic major Sixth down, followed by a cyclic minor Third up, we have 



vib 264 

beats in 10 sec. 



up up up down up 

317-05 38075 45725 274-56 329-73 

12 14-5 17-5 10-5 12-9 



and as 264 : 329*73 is a cyclic and not a just major Third, which would be 264 : 330, 
f it will beat 10*8 times in 10 seconds, and this will be the verification of the work 
Observe that the interval of the minor Third must be too wide, and hence of the 
major Sixth too close, so that when we tune up, the upper note must be made sharp, 
and when we tune down, the lower note must be made sharp. Also that as the 
5th and 6th partials are involved in the beats, the method will suit only qualities 
of tone, like reed-tones, with strong upper partials. Observe also that in equal 
temperament 5 equal minor Thirds are an Octave and an equal minor (not a major) 
Third. Having completed one set proceed with the next set of 5 minor Thirds (or 
major Sixths) until the whole cycle is complete for one octave and then tune by 
Octaves. 

Second method, which Mr. Paul White prefers. Tune 7 cyclic major Thirds 
down (alternating with minor Sixths up to keep within the same octave). The 
result will be a cyclic Pythagorean minor Third of 13 degrees down, or 40 degrees 
up, for3-7xi^ = 3--V/ = 3-2fJ-l-^ = ||. And this can be verified by 
3 cyclic Fifths up, for 3 x f ^ = |^ « i|§, such Fifths being practically perfect. Thus 
beginning at 528 vib. we obtain, taking major Thirds down, and minor Sixths up : 



SBCT. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



403 



down down down np down down up 

vib. . . . 528 422-74 338-47 271-00 433-95 347-44 278-18 44545 
beats in 10 sec. 17 13-9 11-2 17-5 14 114 179 



vib. 



a Fourtli down another Fonrth down 

528 396 297 



a Fifth up 

445-5 



The Fourths and Fifths are taken just, and the result agrees to -05 vib. It must 
be remembered that the cyclic major Thirds are too close, hence in tuning down 
the lower note must be sharpened. On the contrary the cyclic minor Sixths will 
be too wide, and hence in tuning up, the upper note has to be sharpened. Having 
completed this set of 7 proceed to another, till the cycle is complete. This method 
also only suits qualities of tone, like reed-tones, with powerful 5th and 8th partials. 

The process thus carried out would of course be tedious, and Mr. Paul White 
seems to assume a tolerably uniform beat, perhaps of 15 in 10 seconds, for he says : 
' The beats cannot of course be made, or be made to remain uniform, but if they 
are nearly so, or if a few do not beat at all, the temperament is still good. I T 
have found that the Fifths can be kept almost entirely free from beats by taking good 
care of the very slow beats of the Thirds: I have long been convinced that beats 
in the middle octave do much more good than harm in a musical cycle, for it would 
be impossible to tune a musical cycle of any sLse correctly without them. The least 
scratch on a reed will change a beat, while it often takes quite a scrape to cause 
a beat where none existed.' The processes Mr. Paul White has worked out with 
the ingenious system of checks, show that he is a thorough master of the whole 
art of tuning, and, a rare thing to be met with among professional tuners or even 
musicians, perfectly understands its rationale. 

Art. 18. — A succession of just Fifths, as mentioned in art. 1, is very difficult to 
tune ; and one of just major Thirds is still more difficult. Hence an auxiliary stop 
on an organ or an auxiliary harmonium is required when just intervals have to be 
tuned. 



It is not difficult to ascertain by ear whether 
a Fifth or major Third is considerably too flat. 
Suppose we start with c\ then tune an auxiliary 
g' (indicated by a reman letter) decidedly flat, 
beating 40 times in 10 seconds with c'. Then 
3c' - 2g' = 4, so that ic' = g' + 2, but |c' is the 
perfect Fifth to c\ hence we must tune the re- 
quired Fifth g'^g' + 2, that is, sharper than g' 
by 2 beats in a second. For the next Fifth in 
order to remain in the same octave we should 
take the Fourth down. Tune the auxiliary d' 
so that it should be too flat, and beat 4 times 
in a second with the correct g'. Then 3g' 
.4d'B4, andf^'=d' + l. But {g is the correct 
d\ or Fourth below g'. Hence it must be 



tuned 1 beat in a second sharper than the 
auxiliary d'. And in this way by a laborious f 
double process the succession of Fifths could 
be tuned with great accuraoy. For the major 
Thirds, tune an auxiliary e' decidedly flat and 
beating 4inasecond withe'. Then 5c' - 4e' = 4, 
and true «}' » |c' = e' + 1. In the same way we 
could get ^,'J and 6,'Jp. But for aJi^tf^f d^jif 
we must tune auxiliazy minor Sixths, which is 
troublesome and not feasible except on reed 
instruments. Tune an auxiliary tk'\} flat, so as 
to beat 5 times in a second with e'. Then 
8c'-5a'b:»6,andtrueai'|^->K»ft'2» + l. And 
so on. 



It appears, then, that tempered intervals which present beats of their own are 
more easy to tune than just intervals for which an auxiliary beating tone has to be 
supplied. The only satisfactory way, however, of tuning perfect and tempered 
intervals is by a fork tonometer, one of which suffices for every possible case that 
can arise, when once the pitch numbers of the notes have been calculated as in IT 
sect. A. 

SECTION H. 

THE HI8T0BT OF MUSICAL PITCH IM EUBOPE. 

(See note p. 16.) 



Arl 

1. Pitch of a Note, p. 494. 

2. Musical Pitch, p. 494. 

3. Early Pitch, p. 494. 

4. Materials and Authorities, p. 494. 
6. Description of the Tables, p. 494. 

Table I. Historical Pitches in order from the 
Lowest to the Highest, p. 495. 

1. Church Pitch, lowest, p. 495. 

2. Church Pitch, low, p. 495. 
8. Chamber Pitch, low, p. 496. 



Table l-^continued, 

4. Mean Pitch of Europe for Two Cen- 

turies, p. 495. 

5. The Compromise Pitch, p. 497. 

6. Modem Orchestral Pitch and 

* Church Pitch Medium, p. 499. 

7. Church Pitch, high, p. 508. 

8. Church Pitch, highest, p. 508. 

9. Chamber Pitch, highest and Church 

Pitch, extreme, p. 504. 



494 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APT. XX. 



Table II. Classified Index to Table I., 
p. d04. 

I. Austro-Hungary, p. 504. 
II. Belgium, p. 501. 

III. England, Scotland and Ireland, 
p. 505. 

IV. Prance, p. 608. 
V. Germany, p. 509. 

VI. Holland, p. 510. 
VII. Italy, p. 510. 
VIII. Russia, p. 510. 
IX. Spain, p. 511. 
X. United States of America, p. 511. 

GOKCLUBIONB, p. 511. 



Art. 



6. The Histoiy of Musical Pitch in Europe 
for 500 years, p. 511. 
^ 7. Original Motives for determination of 
Church Pitch, p. 511. 



Art 

8. Effect of the foot measure of different 

countries on the pitch 61 organs, p. 511. 

9. Origin of Chamber Pitch, p. 513. 

10. Evolution of the Mean Pitch, its great 

extent geographically and chronologi- 
cally, p. 512. 

11. Difficulties arising from singing at high 

pitch classical music written for mean 

pitch, p. 512. 
How the rise in pitch commenced and 

spread, p. 512. 
The compiomisePitch in France, England, 

and Germany, p. 512. 

14. Variations in JSnglish Oigan Pitch, p. 513. 

15. Rise in Pitch connected with wind inatru- 

ments, p. 618. 

16. What must be done, p. 513. 



12. 



13. 



Art. 1. —The pitch number of a note has been alrei^y defined as the number of 
double vibrations which the sonorous body producing it makes and communicates 
in one second (p. 11a). 

Art. 2. — ^The pitch number of a musical instrument^ or briefly its musical 
pitchy is taken to be the pitch number of the tuning note at a temperature of 
59T. « 15°C. - 12°R 



The tuning note is here assumed to be the 
a' of the violin, from which the pitch number 
of all the other notes in the scale must be cal- 
culated, or determined approximatively by ear 
from the temperament (sect. A.) and system 



of tuning (sect. Q.) in use. By taking a' as 
the tuning note, the inquiry is practic^Jly 
limited to European music within the last 500 
years. 



Art. 3. — The following passage from Syntagmatis musici Michaelis PB^roBn 
C, Tomus Secundus, de Organographia^ 1619, p. 14, explains the condition of 
f early pitch. 



' In the first place it must be known that 
the pitch, both of organs and other musical 
instruments, varies greatly. Since the ancients 
were not accustomed to play in concert vnth 
all kinds of instruments at the same time, 
wind instruments were very differently made 
and intoned by instrument makers, some high 
and some low. For the higher an instrument 
is intoned in its own kind and manner, as 



trumpets, shawms, and treble viols, the more 
freshly it sounds and resounds. On the con- 
trary, the deeper trombones, bassoons, bassa- 
neldi, bombards, and bass viols are tuned, the 
more majestic and magnificent is their stately 
march. Hence when the organs, poaitlTes, 
olavicymbals, and other wind instruments are 
not in the same pitch with each other the 
musician is much plagued.* 



Art. 4. — ^The authorities on whom I rely are minutely specified in my * History 
of Musical Pitch ' in the Journal of the Society of Arts for 5 March and 2 April 
1880, and 7 Jan. 1881. The two last papers contained indispensable corrections 
and additions. In the privately printed copies there was an addendum on U.S. 
America from Messrs. C. E. Cross and W. T. MOler, American Journal of Otology, 
Oct. 1880. 



^ Here it must suffice to say that after learn- 
ing to determine pitch to ^ vib. (p. 444) I 
obtained the loan of authentic forks from the 
Society of Arts, Mr. A. J. Hipkins, Rev. G. T. 
Driffield (Hfinders), Frau Naeke of Dresden, 
Prof. Rossetti of Padua, Mr. Blaikley, and Dr. 
W. H. Stone. I procured compared copies of 
forks in the CJonservatoire at Paris, and others 
tuned at known temperatures to remarkable 
organs at Vienna, Dresden, Hamburg, Stras- 
burgi and Seville. Then, with the assistance 
of many orgamsts, I measured numerous 
organs in England of which the pitch had not 
been changed, or with the kind help of several 
organ-builders, obtained untouched pipes of 
altered organs. When these failed I had 
models made of pipes of which the dimensions 
were given by Schlick 1511, Pnetorius 1619, 
Mersenne 1636, Tomkins 16G8, B^dos 1766, 



and others, which were obligingly presented to 
me by Mr. T. Hill, the oigan-builder, on whose 
bellows I measured them. These constituted 
my own materials. Then I had recoarae to 
the measurements and lists of Gagniard de la 
Tour, Cavaill^Goll, de la Fage, Delesenne, de 
Prony, Euler, Fischer, French Commission on 
Pitch, Koenig, Lissajous, McLeod, Maipaig, 
Naeke, Sauveur, Scheibler, Schmi^, Dr. R 
Smith and others. From these I constructed 
the lists which follow. In my original papeit 
each pitch is accompanied with full details. 
Here I give the smallest possible account. 

Art. 5.— The pitch given is always that of 
a', where possible at 59** F. But thu was not 
always the note measured. When it was not, 
a' was calculated on the assumption of either 
meantone or equal temperament. Assuming 
a lowest ideal pitch of a'370, which has never 



SECT. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



496 



yet been found, I give the cents by which any 
other pitch exceeds this, so that the interval 
between any two pitches is immediately deter- 
mined by subtracting the cents. I give also 
the date, adding occasionally a for ante, before, 
p for postt after, and c for circa, about ; and 
the authority, or observer, where E. means 
that I am responsible for the measurement, 
directly or indirectly. Finally, I add a list, 



classified by countries, stating the kind of 
pitch. I have not thought it necessary to give 
absolutely every fork and pitch entered in my 
* History,' but have reported a large number 
of these entries, and especially all the most 
interesting of them. A complete Qerman 
translation of my paper is in preparation, and 
will be published at Vienna. 



Table I. — Historical Pitches in Order from Lowest to Highest. 



Cents 



a' 



Date 



Obeerver 



Place and other particnlan 



000 


370 


— - 


16 1 878-1 




17 


878-7 


1648 


19 


874-2 


1700a 


81 


876-6 


1766 


88 


877 


1611 



199 



E. 
Delesenne 

E. 

Delezenne 
E. . 
E. 



66 

69 

100 


384-8 
384-6 
892-2 


1700c 

1861 

1789 


Deleasenne . 

»t • 
Euler . 


104 
114 


898-2 
896-2 


1718 
1769 


Stockhausen & 
Dr. R. Smith 


117 


396-8 


1720 
1789 


McLeod & E. 


119 


396-4 


1616 


E. 


129 


398-7 


1864a 


Delezeime . 



148 


402-9 


1648 


162 


403*9 


1780 


168 
166 
169 


406-6 
407-8 
407-9 


1704 
1864 
1762 


174 


409 


1783 


178 


410 


— 


184 


411*4 


1688 


191 
196 


413-8 
414-4 


1776 



E. • • 

£. • • 

Sauveur 
Delezenne . 
Schmahl & E. 



Lissajous . 



t* 



Schmahl & E. 

Naeke . 
Marpurg 



1. Church Pitch, Lowest. 

Ideal lowest pitch or zero point 

Calculated nom D.'s measurements of an open 

wooden pipe 1*3 metres long, taken as c 
Paris, from a model after Mersenne 
Lille, organ of THospice Comtesse 
Paris, from a model after B^os 
Heidelberg, from a model after Arnold Schlick 

(see 686 cents) 

2. Church Pitch, Low, 

Lille, old fork found 1864a by M. Mazingue 

Lille, organ of St. Sauveur, rebuilt, with old pitch 

St. Petersburg, a clavichord according to Marpurg, 

but Euler gives no particulars 
E. Strassburg Minster, great organ by A. Silbermann 
Cambridge, Bernhardt Schmidt's organ at Trinity 

College, 1708, after being new voiced and 

* shifted ' in 1769 
Rome, pitch-pipes observed by Dr. R. Smith 
France, Versailles, copy of fork No. 410 at the 

Musee du Conservatoire, Paris, compared with 

the original by •Cavaille-Coll 
Palatinate of the Rhine, from a model of pipe de< 

scribed by Salomon de Cans 
Lille, old organ of La Madeleine restored 

3. Chamber Pitch, Low, 

Paris, Mersenne's Spinet, from his statement that 
Bh s B6do8*s 4-foot c (see 81 cents) 

Padua, from copy sent by Prof. Rossetti of the old 
lower/'' fork of the beUfoundry of Colbacchini 

Paris, result of several experiments on an e pipe 

Lille, organ of St. Maurice repaired, old pitch kept 

Hamburg, organ of St. Michaelis Kirche, built 
by Hildebrand of Dresden, under the direction 
of Handel's friend, J. Mattheson (1681-1764), 
in the chamber pitch of the period, still pre- 
served ; now, and probably always, in equal 
temperament 

Paris, Court clavecins, fork of Pascal Taskin, 
their tuner 

Paris, 18th century pitch-pipe found in the cabinet 
of the Faculty of Sciences 

Hamburg, chamber pitch on the former 8-foot 
Oedact of the St. Jacobi organ (see 484 cents) 

* Schneider's Oboe,* date and place unknown 

Breslau, clavichords 



4. Mean Pitch of Europe for Two Centuries, 



416 



1764 



E. 



Dresden, organ of the Roman Catholic Church bv 
Gottfried Silbermann, pitch of the chained fork 
placed there by King August der Grechte, 
1763-1827, who would not allow the pitch to be 
changed; the fork was lent me by Frau Naeke 



496 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Table I. — Histobical Pitches in obdeb fbou Lowest to Hiqhbst — continued. 



Cents 



Date 



Obsenrer 



Place and other partlcolan 



4. Mean PUeh of Europe for Ttoo Centuries^-caaianvied. 



201 

211 
212 

215 

217 
218 



219 



220 



224 



226 
226 



229 



If 



230 



? 



II 



t( 



If 



It 



11 



II 

231 
282 

238 

II 

II 



416-6 

418 
418-1 

419 

419-5 
419-6 

II 



419-9 



420-1 



421*2 

421-8 

421-6 

422-3 
II 



422-6 



II 



M 



II 



422-6 



II 



II 



1722 

1780 
1878 

1700c 

1714 

1868 
1785 



1716c 



1780 



1860 

1780 

1780 

1780 
1780c 



1751 



Naeke . 

Euler . 

E. . • 

E« . . 

Naeke . 

de la Fage . 

E« . . 



E. 



1820a 



1838 



E. 



E. 

Naeke. 
Naeke & E. 

Naeke. 

E. 



E. 



422-7 
423 



428-2 



II 



423-8 



E. 



E, 



1877p 


E. 


1790a 


E. 


1754c 


Delezenne 


1780c 


E. 


1800c 


E. 



1820 



1778 



1815- 
1821 

1818 



McLeod and E. 



E. 



E. 



E. 



Dresden, oigan of St. Sophie, built by G. Silber- 

mann 
St. Petersburg, organs ; no particulars 
Dresden, present pitch of the organ of the Roman 
Catholic Church, from a fork tuned for me there 
London, Benatus Harris's organ at St. John's. 

Clerkenwell 
Freiberg, Saxony, G. Silbermann's organ 
Madrid, ton de chapelle, calculated 
Seville, Spain, pitch of the old organ of Totje 
Bosch, from a fork said by the oiganist Don 
Yiiiguez to be in exact unison with its a' at a 
mean temperature 
England, rude tenor a fork, belonging to Rev. G. T. 
Driffield, who held it to have been made by John 
Shore, the inventor of tuning-forlm 
Winchester College organ, from one of the pipes 
added by Green when repairing B. Harris's 
organ of 1681 
Bussian Imperial Court church band from fork 

lent by Fnu Naeke 
Vienna, fork of the Saxon organ-builder Scholze, 

who lived at Vienna in Mozart's time 
Vienna, copy of fork of Stein, who made Mozart's 
clavichords and pianos, lent me by Frau Naeke 
Dresden, fork of former Court organist Kirsten 
Verona, from a copy of a c' fork believed to be the 
Boman pitch of 1780, preserved at the bell- 
foundry of Cavedini, procured by Prof. Boeaetti 
of Padua 
England, Handel's fork belonging to Bev. G. T. 
Driffield. The organ at Cannons in the private 
chapel of the Duke of Chandos, built by Jordans, 
and afterwards bought by Trinity Church, Gos- 
port, has been recently (in 1884) examined by 
the organist, Mr. Hewlett, and found to have 
had in Handel's time, when he used to play on 
it, a B|;| (now B|^) pipe of 12-8 inches long, 
and 1 inch in diameter ; this shews that its jntch 
was then ^428-6, or practically the same as 
Handel's fork 
Westminster Abbey, as originally tuned by 
Schreider and Jordans, from indications by Mr. 
T. Hill, who retuned it to a'441*7. It had been 
altered by Greatorez to a'488-2, Smart's pitch 
Bath Abbey Church, as rebuilt by Smith of Bristol, 

from indications by Mr. T. Hill 
England, Mr. J. Curwen's Tonic Solfa standard 

c"507, using the just a' only 

Eew Parish Church, Green's organ, untouched 

and in meantone temperament when measured 

in 1878, built as a chamber organ for George III. 

Lille, veiy old fork found in workshops of M. 

Francois, musical instrument maker there 
Padua, from copy of the higher/' fork of the bell- 
foundry of Colbacchini (see 152 cents) 
England, from old fork, c"605*7, belonging to 

Messrs. Broadwoods 
Paris, Th^&tre Feydeau, Op^ra Comique, from oopy 
of fork at the Conservatoire, Paris, compared 
with the original by Cavaill^Coll 
London, Green's organ at St. Katherine's, Begent's 
Park, still (when I measured it) in meantone 
temperament (see sect. G., p. 484c^ 
Dresden, band of the Opera while C. M. von 
Weber (1786-1826) was conductor {KapeU- 
meister) 
London, second oopy of Peppercorn's fork by 
which the pianofortes of the Philharmonic 



BBCT. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



497 



Tabus I. — Hibtobioal Pitcbbs in obdbb fbom Lowest to BiQBXBv—oonUnued, 



Genu 



a' 



Date 



Observer 



Place and other particnlari 



235 


428-7 


236 


424-1 


287 


424-2 


»i 


»i 


" . 


424-8 


ff 


f* 


238 


424-4 


239 


424-6 


240 


424-9 


241 


426-2 


242 


425-5 


fi 


425-6 


f» 


»» 


243 


425-8 


♦f 


If 


244 


425-9 


246 
248 
249 


426-5 

427 

427-2 


250 
250 
251 


427-5 
427-6 

427-7 


t» 


427-8 


255 


428-7 



260 
262 



1813 



430 
430-4 



1740- 
1812 

1619 



1828 



1749 



1833 
1800c 



1805 



1800c 
1730c 
-1780c 

1829 

1740- 

1780 

1764 

1824 



1839 

1740 

1843 
1811 
1878a 

1877a 

1823 

1696 

1788 
1670 



E. 



Naeke. 



E. 



Fischer 



1750ai E. 
E. 



4. Mean PUch of Europe for Two Centuries — contiDued. 

Society were originally tuned; this copy was 
prepared for the Society of Arts in 1860, and is 
now in the possession of Messrs. Broadwoods 

London, first copy of Peppercorn's fork made be- 
fore 1860, beloi^ging to Mr. Hipkins; see last 
entry, the original is lost, and it is impossible to 
say which was correct. The difference, 2 cents, 
is utterly insignificant 

Eutin (18 miles N. of LUbeok), fork of Franz 
Anton von Weber, father of Carl Maria von 
Weber 

Brunswick, from a model made from Prsetorius's 
drawing of an organ pipe at a * suitable * church 
pitch 

Paris, Italian Opera, mean of twenty measure- 
ments of a fork given by Spontini 

London, old forks formerly belonging to Prof. 
Faonaday, lent me by Mr. D. J. Blaikley 

London, organ at All Hallows the Great and Less, 
Upper Thames Street, built by Glyn & Parker, 
by whom .Handel's, Foundling Hospitai organ 
was built 

Weimar, from a model of Topfer's wide principal 
c"-pipe 

England, old fork said to have been used in Ply- 
mouth Theatre, lent me by Dr. Stainer 

London, old D fork of Elliott's, by which he tuned 
the organ built for the Ancient Concerts at the 
Hanover Square Booms, lent me by his suc- 
cessor, Mr. T. Hill 

(Germany, fork of the bassoonist Kummer 

Padua, mean of two ancient pitch-pipes belonging 
to the bellfoundry of Colbacohini, lent ' me at 
the request of ProL F. Bossetti there 

Paris, pitch of opera piano as distinct from the 
orchestra, verified by Monneron for de la Fage 

England, Schnetzler's organ at the Qerman Chapel 
Boyal, St. James's Palace 

Hali^, Schnetzler's organ, from indications by 
Mr. T. Hill 

Paris, pitch of opera, suddenly lowered on 31 
March for Mme. Branchu, whose voice was fail- 
ing. The piano for rehearsals was also lowered, 
and was not raised immediately when the or- 
chestra was raised ; this ¥ras called opera pitch 

Bologna, Italy, pitch of fork of Tadolini, the best 
tuner in the town 

Great Yarmouth, St. George's Chapel, by Byfield, 
Jordan & Bridge 

Wimbledon Church, organ built by Messrs. Walker 

Paris, Grand Opera 

Norwich Cathedral organ before it was altered by 
Biyceson, supposed to be by R. Harris 

Tonic Solfa pitch to 1877, afterwards 422-5 

Paris, Th6&tre Feydeau, fork given by Spontini 

London, old organ built by B. Harris, a pipe of St. 
Andrew Undeishaft, from Green's Organ, pre- 
served by Mr. T. Hill 

St. George's Chapel, Windsor, measured in Feb. 
1880, while still in meantone temperament 

Newoastle-on-Tyne, St. Nicholas Church organ 
built by Benatus Harris, frequently altered ex- 
cept in pitch 



1810c 
1701 



E. 
E. 



E. 



Naeke 
E. 



Lissajous 

E. 

£• • 

Lissajous 



de la Fage . 

Tunbridge & E. 

Jii. . 

Scheibler . 

E. • . 

£• . . 

Fischer 

£. . ■ 

E. . • 
Ions . 



Lissajous 
E. 



5. The Compromiae PUeh, 



Paris, Fork of M. Lemoine, a celebrated amateur 
FuUham Parish Church organ, built by Jordans. 
This pitch was officially adopted in Italy in 1884 

K K 



IT 



498 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Table I.— Hibtobioal Pitches in obdbb fbom Lowest to Highbsv — continued. 




Obflerver 



Place and oCher particaUn 



% 



5. The Compromise Pitoh-HK>ntinued. 



264 


481-8 


267 
269 
270 


431-7 
482-2 
482-3 


272 


438 


278 


488-2 


276 


488*6 


276 


488-9 
484 


278 


484-8 


279 


484-5 
484-7 


280 


485 


»i 


»» 


282 


485-2 


>i 


485-4 


288 
284 


485*9 
486 


f» 


*t 


«f 


ft 


285 


4861 


286 
287 

ft 


486-5 
486-7 
486-8 


288 


436-9 







1625 

1826 

1854a 

1846c 



1820c 



1828 



1847 



1884 

1829 



1884c 
1818 



1869 



1826 



1859 
18d4a 



1859 



1868 
1802 
1846p 



1878 

1878 

1834c 

1845 

1740- 

1780 

1869 



Lewis . 

Fischer 
Delezenne 



E. 



E. 



• • f 



Byolin & E. 



Scheibler • 
Cagniard de la 
Tour 

Scheibler . 
McLeod & E. 



E« 
E. 



Naeke . 



Fr. Com. . 
Scheibler . 
Eoenig & E. 



Gross & Miller . 

Sarti . 

E. . . • 



E* • 

E. 

Scheibler 

Delezenne 

E. 



as the pitch of the Italian army brafls bands, 
giving £^456, the nearest whole number to 
equal B|^456-18, which would correspond to the 
* arithmetical ' pitch C512 

Lavenham (16^ miles W.N.W. of Ipswich), from a 
famous old tenor bell sounding (2268-4 

Paris, Grand Opera, fork given tr^ Spontini 

Lille, oxgan of St. Andr6 repaired 

England, old fork which belonged to the father of 
Messrs. Bryoeson, organ-builders, and had not 
been tuned since 1848, when it had been 
sharpened slightly 

London, fork approved of by Sir George Smajt, 
conductor of the Philharmonic Concerts, in 
session of Mr. HipMns, ftom c" 518 using 
tone temperament; if equal temperament 
used it would give a'4d5-4 and be a 80 
anticipation of French pitch. Used in this way 
it is Broadwoods' lowest pitch. Long sold in 
shops as * London Philharmonio * 

London, Sir G. Smart's own Philharmonic fork. 
Sir G. Smart considered this a' fork of his to 
agree with c"518 (see last entry). This shews 
that he used mesntone temperament 

Shrewsbury, St. Mary*s, built 1729, by John Harris 
and John Byfield, pitch altered in 1847 by Gray 
& Davison 

Vienna, fork I., Delezenne*s Vienna minimum 

Paris, opera, verified by M. Montal, after the opera 
had recovered its pitch, the opera piano remain- 
ing at a'425*5, which see, and also a'425'8 

Paris Opera, fork by Petitbout, luthier de Topdra 

Paris, Chapelle des Tuileries, from a copy com- 
pared by Cavaill6-Coll of fork No. 493 in the 
Conservatoire 

Baden, fork sent officially to Society of Arts 

London, from a model of pipe representing 6'486-l, 
one foot long and one inch diameter, on Benatiis 
Harris's organ at All Hallows, Barking 

Dresden, opera, fork of Kapellmeister Reissiger, 
successor to C. M. von Weber. Naeke considers 
this to have been Dresden pitch from 1825 to 1880 

Carlsruhe, opera, the fork which determined the 
French Diapaeon Normal 

Paris, Conservatoire, fork made by Gand, luthier 
du Conservatoire 

Paris, the Diapason Norm{U in the Conservatoire, 
used extensively in Germany, officially adopted 
for the Belgian army in 1885. The various im- 
perieot copies used are not cited 

U.S. America, E. S. Bitchie^s standard pitch 

St. Petersburg, five-foot organ pipes 

London 'Philharmonic,' from Mr. Hipkins's 
vocal pitch, c' '518-5, which for equal tempera- 
ment gives a' 436, but on meantone temperament, 
for which it was first used, gave a'483*5 ; the fork 
with which Mr. E. J. Hopkins compared the jdtch 
of the organs at L^beck, Hamburg, and Strass- 
burg, see his The Organ, ed. 1870, art. 791, p. 189 

London, Messrs. Bishop's standard for church 
organs 

London, fork to which Messrs. Bryceson tuned the 
organ at Her Majesty's Theatre > 

Vienna, opera, fork II. 

Florence, fork lent by M. Marloye ; 

Dublin, Green's organ in the Refectory of Trinity 
College, probably sharpened 

Wiirtemberg, fork sent officially to the Society of 
Arts 



SECT. B. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



499 



Tabu I. — Histobioaii Pitghxs in obdbb fbom Lowsst to Highist — continued. 



Cents 



a' 



Date 



Obeerver 



Plaoe and other particulars 



288 
289 

*t 
>f 
t> 

291 

295 

297 

» 

298 



299 
300 



801 



♦» 



II 
802 

808 
804 



II 



II 



•» 



11 



806 



If 



807 



II 



I* 



487 
487-1 

487*8 

487-4 

ft 
487-8 

488-9 
489-4 

ft 
tf 

489-5 
II 



439-9 
440 



440-2 



440-8 
440-6 
440-9 

441-0 



II 



II 



ti 



44110 



441-2 
441-8 

441-7 

II 
II 



6. Mod&m OrchMiral Piich, amd * Church V\ich Medium, 



1859 
1666 

1872 



1744 



1862 



1696 



1884c 
1878 



1812 



1855 



1846 
1829 

1878 
1834 



1879 
1834c 
1878 
1884c 

1886- 
1889 

1886 

1859 

1879 

1884 



Fr. Com. 
E. 

Fischer 



1854a Delezenne . 



1878 
1842 

1690 

1660 

1878 



Streatfield & E. . 



E. 



£• • • 

Delezenne . 

Scheibler . 
E. . • 



McLeod & E. 



Delezenne 
Lissajous 

E. 
Scheibler 



E. 

Scheibler 
E. 
Scheibler 

Delezenne 



Cagniaid de la 
Tour 
Fr. Com. 

E. ... 

Scheibler . 



E. 
E. 

E. 

E. 
E. 



Toulouse, Conservatoire 

* Worcester, cathedral organ built by Thomas and 

Benatus Harris, from a pipe at Mr. T. Hill's 
Berlin, from a fork furnished by Piohler, who 

tuned the piano of the opera 
Paris, opera, from four forks purchased before 

1854, and found to be in unison 

* Maidstone, Old Parish Church, built by Jordans, 

altered, but not in pitch, in 1878 in meantone 
temperament 
Dresden, fork given by the direction of the Court 
Theatre to its librarian, Herr Moritz Ftirstenau, 
after the conference on pitch held there, by whom 
it was lent me to measure, meant for a'440 

* Boston, England, organ built by Christian Smith, 

from a pipe preserved by Mr. T. Hill 

Lille, old fork formerly belonging to the Marquis 
d'Aligre 

Vienna, opera, fork III. 

Dresden, opera pitch at date, from a fork specially 
prepared for me by the Court organ-builder, 
Jehmlich, and sent by Herr Moritz FUrstenau, 
librarian of the theatre 

Paris, Conservatoire, from copy of a fork preserved 
there, verified by Cavaill^-Coll 

England, Barking, Essex, Parish Church organ 
(probably originally a'474-1), built by Byfield & 
Green, 1770, after alterations by Messrs. Walker 

Turin, fork lent bv Marloye 

Paris, opera orchestra, verified by Monneron for 
de la Fage 

London, Messrs. Qray and Davison's standard pipe 

Stuttgart pitch, =440 at 69° F., LiBsajous meas- 
ured it, as 440«d to French Diapcaon Normal^ 
reckoned as 485, which then when corrected to 
435*4 gives 440-7 

London, Messrs. Walker & Sons' standard pipe 

Vieima Opera, fork IV. 

London, Messrs. Bevington's standard pipe 

Paris Conservatoire, not trusted so much 
Scheibler as 485*2 

Paris Opera, fork of M. Leibner, who kept 
pianos to pitch of orchestra, verified 
Meyerbeer 

Paris, Op^ra Comique 



by 

the 

by 



Dresden, fork sent to Fr. Com. by the Kapell- 
meister Beissiger 

London, church organ pitch of Messrs. Lewis & 
Co. 

Vienna Opera, fork V., given by Prof. Blahetka as 
trustworthy; in 1879 this fork was found and 
lent to me, and then from rust and ill-treatment 
measured only 489*9, the greatest loss of pitch 
I have found in any fork. 

London, Covent Garden Opera, fork for Messrs. 
Bryceson, to tune the organ to 

London, the equal a' corresponding to the late 
Dr. John Hullah's standard fork, c' '524-8, pur- 
porting to be c"512 ; J. H. Griesbach measured 
it as 521-6 

Hampton Court Palace, Bernhardt Schmidt's 
organ from an original pipe, 12 inches long and 
1*2 inch in diameter, giving 6'|^472'6 

Whitehall, Chapel Boyal, organ by Bernhardt 
Schmidt, according to indications by Mr. T. Hill 

London, standard pipe of Messrs. Hill & Sons, 
fromc"525*3 

K K 2 



500 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Table I.— Historical Pitohbs in ordbb from Lowbst to Highbbt — coniinuBd, 



Cents 



IF 



ir 



a' 



307 
810 

•311 



312 

tf 
ft 



If 
813 

ff 

ft 

ft 
314 

315 

ff 
316 

317 

ft 



318 



ft 



ft 



319 

It 
It 
It 

820 

If 
321 



ft 



322 



It 



It 



323 



Date 



Obseirer 



Place and other particiilan 



6. Modem Orehestral Pitchy and* Church Pitch Mcdium^-contimiedi, 



441*8 
442*5 

442-7 



443-0 
443-1 



It 
443-2 

443-3 

443-4 
443-5 
443-9 

444 

444-2 

444-3 

If 



444*5 



444-6 



444-7 

444-8 
ft 

444-9 
445*0 
445*1 
445-2 



445-4 
445-5 

445-6 



ft 



445-8 



18d4c 
1859 

1878 



1859 
18150 

1869 

1878 

1836 
1859 
1878 
1859 
1880 

1860 

1880 

1840 

1880 



1858 



1877 



1879 

1859 
If 

1867 
1880 
1862 

1834c 

1878 



Scheibler 
Ft. Com. 



E. 



II 



Pr. Com. 
If 

£■ ■ . 

£j. • • 

W61£el . 
Fr. Com. 
£j. • • 
Pr. Com. . 
Gross & Miller 



ft 



ft 



Gavaille-GoU 
ill* • . 



1845 
1879 



It 



ft 



1867 



1856 



Lissajous . 



E. 



E. 

Pr. Oom. 
ti 

ft 
Lissajous 

Hipkins 

Naeke. 

Schmahl 

Scheibler 

E. 



Delezenne . 
Hipkins & E. 

ill. ■ • 



E. 



Lissajous 



Berlin opera 

Toulouse opera 

Brussels, opera under direction of Bender 

*Vieimai small Franciscan organ kept at modem, 

pitchp from a fork tuned for me by the oigaii- 

builder UUmann 
Bordeaux opera 
Stuttgart opera 

* Durham organ, as altered by shifting from a' 4741 ; 
a'444*7, the present pitch of new oi«an, is bj 
Willis 

Bologna, Italy, Liceo MusicaJe, from fork sent 
officially to Soc. of Arts 

* Vienna, St. Stefan cathedral organ, from a fork 

tuned for me by organ-builder UUmann j 

Paris, Wdlfel's pianos j 

Gotha, opera 

London, from Messrs. Bryceson's standard pipe 
Brunswick, opera 
U.S. America, Boston, organ of Ghurch of the 

Immaculate Gonception 
Intended but unexecuted standard of Society of 

Arts to c"528 
U.S. America, from c"528, the *low organ pitch' 

of Hutchlngs, Plaisted & Go. 

* Prance, St. Denis Cathedral, organ built br 

Gavaim-Goll 

* London, Temple Ghurch organ after rebuilding 

by Messrs. Porster and Andrews, who retained 
the pitch which they found, which was Bobon's, 
originally built by Bernhardt Schmidt, with 
both EH and DjL and both A}^ and Of keys, 
and perhaps then naving a' 441-7 

Madrid, Theatre Boyal, fork sent to de la Pa^e by 
the Maitre de Ohapelle. French pitch was 
adopted on 18 March 1879 

•London, St. Paul's, after rebuilding by WilliB, 
from a fork belonging to Mr. Hipkins aX 
57*>-5 

* Durham Gathedral organ, rebuilt by Willis ; for 
its original state, see a' 474-1 

Turin opera 

Weimar opera 

Wiirtemberg concerts 

Naples, San Garlo opera, Guillaume's fork 

London, Her Majesty's opera, fork of the theatre 

Vienna, piano of Kapellmeister Proch 

Hamburg ' old pitch,' date unknown 

Vienna opera, fork VI., *a monstrous growth' 
{Auswuchs) in Scheibler's opinion 

•London (from c" 529-4), Mr. H. Willis's church 
pitch, to which he tuned the organs of the 
cathedrals of St. Paul's [London), Durham, 
Salisbury, Glasgow (established), St. Maiy*' 
(Edinburgh) 

Vienna Gonservatorium, fork lent by Marloye 

London, Her Majesty's opera during perfonD- 
ance 

London, Govent Ghuden opera, fork in possessioD 
of Mr. Pitman, organist, and Sljg. Vianea, con- 
ductor. Mr. Pitman said the pitch was thus is 
1878 because oboe, bassoon, and flute would not 
play lower 

London, Exeter Hall, both organs as originall; 
built, from a pipe at the makers', Messxa. 
Walker ; since sharpened to a'447'3 

Paris opera, from the fork of M. Bodin, professor 
of the piano and music 



SECT. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



501 



Table I. — Histobioaii Pitches in obdeb fbom Lowest to Highest — continued. 



Gents 



Date 



ObierTer 



Place and other paiticQUtn 



6. Modem Orchestral Pitch, and * Church Pitch Ifedium— Ksontinued. 



823 



824 

826 
827 

It 



It 

828 



829 

It 
880 



881 
II 



ti 
832 



888 
It 

11 

884 
886 

336 
887 

838 



It 
339 

340 

It 



341 



342 
345 



345 



It 



ti 



346 



If 



445*9 



446 
446-2 

446-6 
446*8 

ft 



447-0 
447-3 

447*4 
447-5 
447-7 



448 
It 

448-1 
448-2 

448-4 
ti 

448-5 

448-8 
449 

449*2 
449*4 

449*7 

449*8 
449*9 
450*8 
450*5 



450-6 



450-9 
451*5 



451*7 



II 



tt 



451*9 



452 



1849- 
1854 



1859 
1856 
1859 
1845 
1851 
1878 



1859 
1879 

1856 
1878 
1877 



1854 

1839- 

1840 

1859 

1869 

1857 
1860 

1880 

1859 
1855 

1877 
1860 

1879 

1859 
1877 
1856 
1848 
&1854 

1877 



1880 
1858 



1874 



1867 
1880 

1878 

1885 



E. 



Fr. Com. 
Lissajous 
Fr. Com. 
Delezenne 



E. 



It 



Fr. Com. 
E. 

Lissajous 

Hipkins 

E. 



Lissajous 
Schmahl 

Fr. Com. 
B. 

Lissajous 
E. 



Cross & Miller 



Fr. Com. 
Lissajous 

Hipkins 
£j. • 

Hipkins 

Fr. Com. 
E. 

Lissajous 
Delezenne 



E. 



Cross & Miller 
Fr. Com. . 



Lissajous . 
Cross & Miller 

£j« . • 



London, from Broadwoods* original medium pitch 
of c"530*6, fork of the tuner Finlayson; since 
1854 Messrs. Broadwoods use a'446*2 as their me- 
dium pitch. This pitch was chosen empirically 

Pesth, opera 

Paris, opera and Conservatoire 

Holland, the Hague at the Conservatoire 

Milan, fork lent by Marloye 

Lille, festival organ, fork of the tuner Mazingue 

Vienna opera, from a fork sent me by the oigan- 
builder, UUmann, who had chaige of the organ 
there 

Marseilles Conservatoire 

London, Exeter Hall organ, from a pipe of the 
makers, Messrs. Walker, see 445*8 

Paris, Italian opera, Bodin's fork 

London, Covent Garden opera harmonium 

Gloucester Festival oigan, built by Messrs. Walker ; 
from the fork to which it was tuned at 64** F., 
the temperature of the pipe being reduced to 59*^ 

Paris Grand Opera — also at Lyons and Li^ge 

Hamburg, opera, under Krebs 

Munich, opera 

Leipzig, Gewandhaus Concerts, from fork sent offi- 
cially to the Society of Arts 

Berlin, opera, fork of the conductor Taubert. 

London, from Cramer's, c' '588*3, purporting to be 
the Society of Arts' pitch, intended for c''528 

Boston, NichoPs fork of Germania Orchestra, as 
corrected to 59'' F. 

Leipzig Conservatoire 

Pans opera, experiments by Lissajous and Fer- 
rand, the first violin 

Covent Garden Opera, pitch of the harmonium 

London, from Griesbach's c' '584-5, tuned for the 
Society of Arts as c"528 ; he tuned a' as 445*7 

London, Covent Garden opera, taken from organ 
a' during performance 

Prague, opera 

London, ^rom copy of CoUard's standard fork 

Milan, opera 

Lille, from forks tuned by the oboist Colin, during 
the performances of Robert le Diable, 27 April 
1854, between the acts, and carefully verified 

Glasgow Public Halls organ, from fork settled by 
the organist W. T. Best and the late H. Smart, 
lent me by the builder Lewis 

U.S. America, Boston Music Hall, reduced from 
pipe C271-2 at 70° F. 

Russian opera, from a c" fork, probably miscalcu- 
lated, as the a' from. Broadwo(>ds* c" forks were 

Belgian army pitch, reduced from Koenig's 451 
vib. by his old standard, and also measured 
from copy sent by Mahillon. On 19 March 1885 
the Belgian Government adopted French pitch, 

Milan, Scala Theatre 

U.S. America, New York, from Chickering's c268-5 
standard fork 

British army regulation, from fork lent by Dr. 
W. H. Stone 

The International Inventions and Music Exhibi- 
tion of 1885 adopted this as the pitch of all 
instruments for the Exhibition, being the near- 
est whole number to the next preceding and 
next following. The fork was verified by myself 



IT 



502 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. 



TA.BLB I. — HlSTOBICAL PITGB8S IB OBDBB FBOM L0WB8T TO HlGHBBT — OOfUinUSeL 



Cents 



Date 



Observer 



Place and other particiilars 



ir 



6. Modem OrchMtral PitcH, and * Chwreh Pittih Mtdium — oontinued. 



849 


452-5 


1862- 
1874 


tt 


II 


1880 


850 


452*9 


1878 


If 


453 


1645 


854 


458*9 


1878 


f» 


454 


1862 


855 


454*1 


1877 


»» 


454*2 


1715c 


857 


454*7 


1874 


If 


II 
II 


1879 
1878 


358 


455*1 


1877 


859 


455*2 


1749 


II 
II 


455*8 
455*5 


1879 
1859 


362 


455*9 


1877 


II 


456*1 


1880 


II 


II 


1859a 


366 


467-2 


1879 


869 


458*0 


1880 


880 


460*8 


II 



E. 



E. 



E. 



E. 



B. 
E. 



Hipkins & E. 

Schmahl & E. 

£j« • • 
Pr. Com. . 

E. • • 
Gross & Miller 

E. • ■ 



E. 



Gross & Miller 



i> 



II 



Ghambers & E. . 

E. . . 

Schmahl 

E. . • . 



Naeke. 



London, mean of the pitch of the PhilharmGoic 
Band under the direction of Sir Michael Costa 
1846-54, tuned during that period by Mr. J. 
Black of Broadwoods*, approved by Sir Michael 
Gosta, and recorded by Mr. Hiplons, who lent 
me the fork. Used as Broadwoods* highest till 
1874, No. 8 of French Gommission 

Newcastle-on-Tyne, Schulze's Tynedock organ, 
from a fork tuned by Mr. Gh. Ghambers, Mus. B. 

Kneller Hall Training School for Military Music, 
from a fork lent by Dr. W. H. Stone 

*Holstein, Gliickstadt organ, built 1645, improved 
by Schnitger 1665, measured 1879 

London, Willis's concert organ pitch, to which he 
tuned the large organs in the Albert Hall and 
Alexandra Palace, from pipe c" 543*2 at 65° F., 
and 641*2 at 61*5° F. 

Vienna, piano of Kapellmeister Esser, while the 
orchestra was at a'466, the regular fork at 
a* 456*1, and the piano of the other Kapellmeister 
Proch at a'445 

Grystal Palace, from a fork e"540 lent by Mr. 
Hipkins, to which the piano for concerts was 
tuned 

London, very old fork found at Brixton 1878 of 
the same maJce as Bev. G. T. Driffield's tenor, o, 
see a' 419*9 

London, from c" 540*8, a fork representing the 
highest pitch of the London Philharmonic ob- 
served by Mr. Hipkins since 1874; at the sug- 
gestion of Mr. Gharles Hall^, used as Broad- 
woods' highest pitch. 

London, Messrs. Steinway's London pitch 

London, Messrs. Bryoeson's band pitch, to which 
they tuned their organ in St. Michael's, Oom- 
hill, London 

London, Wagner Festival at Albert Hall, tempera- 
ture probably 61*5° F., see above a'453-9 

Hamburg, old posUiv or chamber organ, built by 
Lehnert, in possession of Herr Schmahl 

London, Erard's concert pitch, from their fork 

Belgium, band of Guides; probably no snoh foik 
existed. M. Bender used to give the ptch on a 
small clarinet, from which M. Mahillon has a 
fork of at least a'456 

London, fork used by one of Ghapi)ell's tuners, 
lent me by Dr. Stone 

U.S. America, Gincinnati, pitch used in Thomas's 
orchestra. [This is said by de la Fage to have 
been the pitch sent by Bettini in 1867 for the 
London Italian opera — evidently an error] 

Vienna, fork tuned for me by the pianoforte 
makers Streicher in Vienna from a fork in 
their possession, giving the celebrated * sharp 
Vienna pitch ' before the introduction of the 
French Diapason Normal, Naeke says he heard 
a'466 in the actual playing of the orchestra 

U.S. A.merica» New York, ^m a fork obtained for 
me by Messrs. Steinway as representing their 
American pitch 

U.S. America, New York, from a fork furnished 
by B. Spice as Steinway's pitch 

U.S. America, highest New York pitch, from a 
fork furnished by B. Spice; these two last are 
sharper than the next, but they are put first 
because they belong to modem orchestral or 
pianoforte pitch 



SBCT. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



503 



Table. I. — Histobigaii Pitches m obdes fbom Lowest to Highest — continued. 



Gents 



a' 



Date 



Obserrer 



PlAce and other partloulara 



368 



429 



It 



*» 



467-6 



474-1 



>f 



K 



454 



»i 



1640c 



1668 



1683 



1708 



E. 



E. 



Armes & E. 



i» 



480*8 



465 



484 



484-1 



1748 



1879 



489-2 



1878 



E. 



E. 



Degenhardt & E. 



Jimmerthal 



1688 



Schmahl <fe E. 



7. Church Pitch, High. 



Vienna, Great Franciscan organ, stated b^ organ- 
builder UUmann to be 240 years old in 1878, 
and to possess its original pitch ; only used for 
leading the ecclesiastical chants 

England, in the Pars Organica of Tomkins's 
Muiiea Deo Sacra as quoted in Sir F. A. Gore 
Ou8eley*s Collection of the Compositions of 
Orlando Gibbons, 1878, makes the / pipe 
2} feet long 

Durham, Bernhardt Schmidt's original organ at 
Durham, which had both a]^ and gjf. The 
pipe I measured in Feb. 1879 as a' 443*1 had been 
shifted, and was originally g'jL which gives the 
above pitch. This results from an examina- 
tion of the original pipes by Dr. Armes, the 
oiganist 

Ghapel Royal, St. James's, Bernhardt Schmidt's 
organ, now in Mercers* Hall, which I found on 
examination had had the pipes shifted a great 
Semitone. Handel played on this oigan, and 
hence his note ordering the voice parts of an 
anthem written for the Ohapel Royal to be 
transposed one Tone, and the organ part two 
Tones, referred to this organ 

The Jordans' organ, Botolph Lane, from indica- 
tions by Mr. T. Hill 

Hamburg, St. Oatherine Kirche, built by Hans 
Stellwagen in 1543, and frequently repaired. 
Herr Degenhardt, the organist, declares that 
even at the last repairing, 1867-9, the pitch was 
not altered. The original pitch, however, is 
doubtful, and Herr Schmahl thinks it was 
altered formerly 

Liibeck Cathedral, small organ, which according 
to the organist Jimmerthal has its g' in unison 
with the pipe on Schulze's new great organ 
there, which gives French a* in summer at 68^ F. ; 
whence the above was calculated at 59° F. 

Hamburg, St. Jacob! Kirche, built by Schnitger 
of Harburg originally in equal temperament, 
played on and approved by J. Sebastian Bach; 
pitch determined from an old pipe preserved in 
the organ case. Herr Schmahl the oiganist is 
accustomed to transpose all music at sight one 
Tone lower, which brings it to French pitch 



8. Church PUch, Highest. 



502 



506 
534 



535 



494*5 



495-5 
503-7 



504-2 



541 



1879 



1700 
1636 



1511 



Schmahl & E. 



Schmahl 



E. 



E. 



505*8 



1361 



E. 



Hamburg, St. Jacobi Kirche, present pitch, used 
since 1866 in order to agree with Scheibler's 
forks, taking his a' 440 for g' 

Holstein, Rendsburg, a large organ recently broken 
up 

Paris, Mersenne'a ton de chapelle with G 112*6 on 
the French four- foot pipe, this being the lowest 
note of his own voice 

Heidelberg, from a model after Arnold Schlick, 
who recommends that his 6) foot Rhenish pipe, 
having 301*6 vib., should give F or c. If it gives 
Fvre have a'377, if it gives c we have the pro- 
sent pitch. 

Halberstadt organ, built 1361, ropaired 1495, de- 
scribed by Fteetorius, who gives the dimensions 
of the largest pipe B ,,, whence constructing a 
model I arrived at the above pitch, confirmed 
by the four preceding pitches 



504 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR 



APP. II, 



Table I.— Hibtobical Pitches ih obdbb fbom Highest to Lowest— amitrnfftfii. 



Cents 



Date 



Obierver 



Place and other particnlan 



9. Chamber Pitch, Highest, and Church Pitch, Extreme. 



726 



740 



568-1 



567-3 



1686 



1619 



E. 



E. 



Paris, Mersenne's chamber pitch calculated from 
F being the pipe of 4 French feet giving 112^61 
vib. See Harmonie Universelle, liv. 3, p. 143, 
but from faulty measurements Mersenne makeg 
this pipe to have only 96 vib. But even with 
that assumption the pitch would be a'480*l, as 
at Hamburg, St. Catherine Kirche ; but oompue 
the next entry 

North German church pitch, called by Pnetorins 
chamber pitch, taken as a meantone Fourth 
(508 cents) above Prsstorius^s * suitable pitch' 
a'424-2, which see 



Table II. — Glabsifibd Index to Table I. 

The countries are arranged in alphabetical order: I. Austro-Hungary ; II. Belgium: 
III. England, including Scotland and Ireland; IV. France; V. Germany; VI. Holland; VII. 
Italy; VIII. Russia; IX. Spain; X. United States of America, which for musical purposes 
are included In Europe. 

Under each country the pitches are classified as : 1. Standards ; 2. Old Forks ; 3. Church 
Organs; 4. Concert Organs; 5. Operas; 6. Concerts, including Conservatoriums ; 7. Piaiii>> 
fortes ; 8. Military Music ; 9. Other instruments. 

The cents and pitch are as in the former table, to which, therefore, immediate referanoe can 
be made. 

Within each division the pitches are arranged first geographically and then chronologically, 
but for England the organs by the same makers are generally put together. 

The mark „ means that the number or date above is to be repeated, and — that the date 
or place is unknown. 
IT The pitches are cited with the greatest brevity which will allow of identification. 



Date 



Place 



Pitch 



Cents 



a' 



1640c 

1780 

1878 



»t 



Vienna 



ti 



1834a 



1878 
1859 



I* 



1845 



1780 
1862 



Pesth 
Prague 



Vienna 



it 
»» 
If 



1879 



Brussels 



I. AuSTBO-HUNaABY. 

8. Church Organs. 



Large Franciscan organ 
Organ-builder Schulz 
St. Stefan 
Small Franciscan organ 



5. Opera. 



Scheibler, fork I. 

II. 
III. 



»» 
It 
ti 
ft 
I* 



IV 

V. (Blahetka) 

VI. ('monstrosity') 
Vienna Old Sharp Pitch 

UUmann 

Fr. Com 



»f 



>» 



6. Concerts. 
Marloye (Conservatoire) 

7. Pianofortes. 



Stein, for Mozart 
Esser, per Naeke 
Proch, 



tf 



II. Bbloiuh. 

1. Standards. 
Mahillon's Army Standard . 



368 


457-6 


225 


421-3 


313 


443-8 


311 


442-7 


276 


433-9 


286 


436-5 


298 


439-4 


301 


440-3 


304 


441-1 


821 


445-1 


862 


456-1 


327 


4468 


323 


446-0 


338 


449-8 



321 



226 
354 
320 



345 



445*4 



4216 
454-0 
445-0 



451-7 



SECT. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



505 



Tablb II. — OLABsnTED Indez TO Tablb I. — contmued. 



Date 



Place 



Pitch 



Cents 



1859 



»» 



»» 



1842 
1860 



f> 



1* 



lefjTa 

1877p 



1715c 

ff 
1761 

1800c 
1846c 



1625 
1668a 

1660 

1688 
1815p 
1879a 
1690 

17(58 
1759 
1688 
1879 

1666 

1670 
1696 
1700 
1878a 

1778 
1780 
1788 
1790 

I — 

1696 

1749 

1780 
1820a 



Brussels 



Li^ge 



Brussels 



London 



i» 
f» 
I* 
ft 



ft 

If 
«» 
»» 



Plymouth 
London 



Lavenham 
London 



It 



tf 
Durham 



tf 



ff 



Hampton Court 



f f 



London 

Cambridge 

Temple 



tt 



Worcester 

Newcastle 
London 

tf 
Norwich 

London 

Winchester 

Windsor 

Kew 
Dublin 

Boston Line. 

London 

Westminster 
ft 



II. BEiiGiUM — oofUmued. 
5. Opera. 

Bender's pitch 

6. Concerts. 

Conservatoire 

8. MUUary Instruments, 

Band of Guides (Fr. Com.) .... 

III. Enoland, Scotland, and Ibelakd. 

1. Standards. 

HuUah's c'' 512, reaUy 524-8 .... 
Society of Arts intended c" 528 ... 
Griesbaoh's attempt at c" 528 = 534*5 . 

Griesbach*B a' to his c" 

Cramer's a' and c" 

Tonic Solfa College 

tt ft ft ..... I 

2. Old Forks. 

Faraday's 

Bev. G. T. Driffield's a 

Fork found buried at Brixton, a . . . . 

Handel's own fork 

Broadwoods' c" 

Dr. Stainer's a' 

Bryceson's c" 

8. Church Organs and BeUs, and Organ-builders^ 

Church Standards. 

Church BeU d' 288-4 

Tomkin's Rule 

Bernhardt Schmidt : 

Whitehall, original 

„ altered 

Original 

(Altered) 

(New, by Willis) 

Chapel 

Old pipe of original 

St. James's Chapel Royal, original . 

Trinity College, after shifting . . . . 

Original 

Altered 

T. d R. Harris : 

Cathedral 

Benatus Harris : 

St. Nicholaa 

St. Andrew Undershaft 

St. John's, Clerkenwell 

(?) Cathedral 

Green : 

St. Katharine's, Regent's Park 

Restoration of College organ . . . . 

St. George's Chapel 

Parish Church 

Trinity College (altered ?) . . . . 
Christian Smith : 

Parish Church (restored ?).... 
Olyn (t Parker : 

All Hallows the Great and Less 
Schreider d Jordans : 

Original 

(Altered) 



810 



381 



359 



265 

429 



308 
429 
312 
318 
308 
807 
429 
114 

317 

280 

255 
251 

215 
249 

233 
220 
251 
230 
287 

295 
237 



230 



442-5 



448-0 



456-5 



805 


441-3 


310 


444-0 


387 


449-5 


322 


445-7 


333 


448*4 


260 


427-5 


230 


422-5 


237 


4243 


219 


419-9 


355 


454-2 


230 


422-5 


231 


422-7 


238 


424-6 


270 


432-3 



431-3 

474-1 



441-7 
474-1 
443-1 
444-7 
442-0 
441-7 
474-1 
395-2 

444-3 

437-1 

428-7 
427-7 
419-0 
427-2 

423-2 
420-1 
427-8 
422*6 
436«8 

438-9 

424-3 

422-5 



506 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Tablb n.— ^iiABSinBD iNDSx TO Tablb I.—ootUinued, 



Date 



Plaoe 



Pitch 



Grata 



f 



f 



1740p 


London 


1764 


Halifax 


— 


Barking 


1855 


f* 


— 


Shrewsbury 


1826 


fi 


1847 


>f 


1740 


Gt. Yarmouth 


1744 


Maidstone 


1748 


London 


— 


Fulham 


1888 


Bath 


1848 


Wimbledon 


1878 


London 


— 


Newcastle 


1879a 


Salisbury 


fi 


Glasgow 


♦» 


Edinburgh 


i« 


London 


1878 


»» 




t» 




It 




»♦ 




»» 




II 




II 




If 



ir 



m. Enolakd, Scotland, and IbbiiAND— ooti/tntisd. 



3. Ohurch Organs, <fe.— continued. 

SchnetMler : 

German Chapel Royal .... 

Parish Ghuroh 

ByfiM d Oreen : 

Original probably 

(Restored by Walker) .... 
J. By field d J, Harris : 

Original 

(Altered by Blythe) 

(Altered by Gray & Davison) 
ByfiM, Jordan, d Bridge : 

St. George*s Chapel 

Jordans : 

Old Parish Church 

St. George's, Botolph Lane 

Parish Church (altered ?) . 
8mUh of Bristol : 

Abbey Church 

Walker : 

Parish Church 

Bryeeson: 

St. Michael's, Comhill .... 
SchidMe : 

T3rnedock 

H. Willis : 

Cathedral 

Established Church Cathedral 

Episcopalian Cathedral .... 

St. Paul's, present state (like the other three 
at 59*» P.. but) at 57''-6 P. . 



Organ-builders* Standard Pipe, 

Bishop, c" 518-6 

Gray & Davison, c" 528-2 

Walker, c" 523-6 

Bevington, c" 523*7 

Lewis, c" 524*4 

HUl,c" 525-8 

Bryeeson, c" 527*3 

H. WiUis (church), c" 529-4 . 



Experimental English l-foot Pipes, 

Diam. 1*2 inch ; wind 2\ inch. ; vib. 477-0 
taken as c" gives'^ 

in meantone temperament 



I* 

ti 
f» 



ft 



If 



b' 
a' 



ff 



ff 



Sflune diam. ; wind 3^ inch. ; vib. 478*7 
taken as c" gives 
b' 



ff 



II 



If 



fi 



ff 



ti 



6'1, 
o' 



ff 
ff 
II 



in meantone temperament 



Bernhardt Schmidt's, same dimensions ; wind 2^ 
inch. ; vib. 472*9 
taken as c" gives' 

- in meantone temperament 



II 



If 



II 



fi 



b' 
a' 



If 



II 



II 



Diam. '95 inch ; wind 9\ inch. ; vib. 488*7 
taken as c" gives ^ 
6' 



11 

II 
If 



ff 
If 
ff 



6'b 

a' 



ff 
ff 
ft 



- in meantone temperament 



{ 
( 



Diam. -75 inch. ; wind 3^ inch. ; vib. 498*6 
taken as c" gives \ 

ff If ^ ft I 11 

b% 
II II ^^ I? ff 

a' 



f» 



»f 



f) 



J 



in meantone temperament 



242 
t» 

429 
298 



275 

244 

289 
424 
262 

230 

246 

357 

350 

320 
tf 
f» 

318 



425*6 



ft 



474-J 
439*5 



433*6 

425-9 

437-4 
4741 
430-4 

422*5 

426*5 

454*7 

452*8 

445-2 

ff 

II 

444-6 



284 


436 


300 


440 


301 


440-2 


302 


440-5 


304 


441-0 


307 


441-7 


313 


443*4 


320 


445*2 


133 


398*7 


247 


426-6 


323 


445-8 


440 


477*0 


136 


400-2 


253 


428-2 


329 


447*4 


446 


478-7 


115 


^5-3 


231 


423-0 


308 


442-0 


425 


472*9 


171 


408*5 


289 


437-1 


365 


456*7 


482 


488*7 


206 


416*8 


323 


4460 


400 


466-0 


516 


498*6 



BJ5CI. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



607 



Table II. — Classifibd Indbx to Table I. — eontinvsd. 



Date 



Place 



Pitch 



Cento a' 



HI. England, Scotland and Ibbland— con^tmMil. 



1806 

1867 
1879 
1877 

It 
1877a 

1877 

»i 



1867 

1877 
1878 

1879 

»i 

1880 

1878 
1879 
1880 



1818- 
2S 
1826 
1846- 
1864 
1874 
1877 



If 



1826 

1849- 

1864 

1864p 

1860 

1862- 

1874 

lB74p 

1846a 

1846p 

1877 

1879 

»♦ 
1877 



1878 



If 



London 



*> 



t» 



Gloucester 
Glasgow 
London 



»f 



Sydenham 
London 



>* 



fi 
«f 
*« 
ft 

tf 



Sydenham 
London 



ft 
If 



4. Concert Organs, 
SUioU : 

Ancient Concerts from d" 668*8 
Walker: 

Exeter Hall, original 

„ „ sharpened 

Festival organ 

Lewis: 

Public Halls 

H.Wims: 

Concert Standard at Albert Hall and Alex- 
andra Palace 

Albert Hall observed at 61-6'' F. . 
Ch-ay A Da'oieotk : 

Crjrstal Palace 

Bryceeon : 

Band pitch 



6. O^ge/ra, 

Opera, Bettini's fork (correct ?) 
ConenA Garden: 

Harmonium 

Organ (Bryceson's fork) . 

Harmonium . 

Organ (heard) . 

Band (performing) . 

Theatre fork (season 1880) 
Ket Majesty* s : 

Organ .... 

Ba^d (performing) . 

Theatre fork . 



6. Concerts. 

PhUharmonic : 

Copy of original fork 

Another oopy 

Approved by Sir.G. Smart .... 

Mean pitch while the concerts were mider the 

direction of Sir M. Costa .... 

Highest 

Crystal Palace band 

Wagner Festival at Albert Hall 

7. Pianofortes, 

Broadwoods' lowest, London No. 1 of Fr. Com. 
medium, London No. 2 of Fr. Com. 

copy now used 

copy made for Society of Arts 

highest, London No. 8 of Fr. Com. (which 
calculated all these forks wrongly) 

present highest 

Hipkins*s Vocal pitch (meantone) .... 

ff f« (equal) .... 

Collard 

Erard ......... 

Steinway (in England) 

Chappell 

8. Military Music. 



British Army regulation 
Kneller Hall Training School 



289 


429*9 


323 
328 
329 


446*8 
447*3 
447*7 


841 


460*6 


864 
868 


468-9 
466*1 


866 


464*1 


867 


464*7 


862 


466*1 


386 
806 
829 
822 
388 
282 


449*2 
441*2 
447*6 
446-6 
449-7 
436-4 


286 
820 
819 


436*1 
446-6 
444*9 


286 
288 
272 


423*7 
428*3 
433*0 


849 
867 
866 
868 


462*6 
464*7 
464*1 
4661 


272 
328 


488-0 
446-9 


324 
321 


446-2 
446-6 


349 
367 
274 
284 
339 
369 
867 
862 


462-6 
464-7 
488-6 
486-0 
449-9 
466*8 
464*7 
466*9 


846 
360 


461*9 
462*9 



T 



T 



608 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. IX. 



Tablb II.— Glassifibd Index to Table I.— continued. 



Date 



T 



Place 



Pitch 



Cents 



1648 


Paris 


1766 




1854 




1700p 




1882 




1884 




1858 




*» 




1869 




1700c 


Lille 


1754 


»» 


18000 


i» 


1864a 


*t 


1859a 


*• 


18100 


Paris 


1636 


»i 


1700a 


Lille 


1789 


Versailles 


1818 


Paris 


1840 


f* 


1851a 


Lille 


fi 


11 


i» 


fi 



f 



1851 



1811 
1819 
1822 
1824 
1829 

18840 

1886- 

1889 

1854a 

1855 

1856 

1858 

1823 
1856 

1820 
1823 
1836 

1859 
1838- 

54 
1859 



1836 
1812 



If 



Paris 



»i 
»» 
tf 

»t 
i> 
»i 
»i 

19 

ft 
ft 

If 
ft 

•f 
ft 
It 



Bordeaux 
Lille 

Lyons 
Toulouse 



Paris 



ft 



IV. Fbancb. 

1. Standards, 
One French foot pipe : 

Mersenne, c" 447 . 

Dom B^OB, c" 450*5 

Delezenne, c" 446*4 . 
Pitch-pipe at Faculty of Scienoes . 
de Prony's proposal 
Marloye's „ ... 

GavailU-Goirs proposal . 

iPr. Com 

Diapason Normal, at Conservatoire 

2. Old Forks, 

Mazingue's 

Francis's 

Cohen's 

Delezenne's 

Marc[uis d'Aligre's .... 
Lemoine's 

8. Church Organs, 

Mersenne's ton de chapelle 
L'Hospice Comtesse 
Palace Chapel, fork at Conservatoire 
Tuileries Chapel .... 
St. Denis (Cavaill6-CoU) 

St. Sauveur 

La Madeleine (restored) 

St. Andr6 

4. Concert Organ, 
Festival organ .... 

5. Opera, 
errand Opera : 

Scheibler .... 
Cagniard de la Tour 

Fischer 

lowered for Bianchu 
recovered pitch 
orchestral pitch 
Scheibler*s Petitbout 
Delezenne's Leibner 

„ forks . 

Lissajous and Ferrand . 

Bodin 

Fr. Com 

Italian Opera : 

Fischer 

Bodin 

Op^a Comique^ or Feydeau : 

fork at Conservatoire 

Fischer 

Cagniard de la Tour 
Provincial Opera : 

Fr. Com 

Delezenne .... 

Fr. Com 

ft ..... 

6. Concerts, 

Mersenne's ton de chambre 
Conservatoire, fork there 



17 


378*7 


31 


876*6 


16 


873*1 ! 


178 


410 i 


307 


441-7 


262 


430*5 1 


316 


4440 


280 


4350 


282 


435-4 


66 


384*3 


230 


422-6 , 


255 


428*7 , 


272 


432-9 


297 


489*4 


260 


430O 


534 


603*7 


19 


374*2 


117 


395*8 


278 


484*3 


317 


444*3 


69 


384*6 1 


129 


898*7 


269 


432-2 


327 


1 

446*8 


248 


4270 


276 


4340 


267 


431-7 


248 


425*8 


276 


4340 


300 


440O 


276 


4340 


804 


4410 


289 


437-4 , 


336 


4490 


328 


445-8 


831 


4480 


287 


424-2 


329 


447*4 


232 


4230 


250 


427-6 


304 


4410 


312 


443*6 


340 


450-5 


381 


4480 


310 


442-5 


726 


663*1 


298 


439*5 



9scrr. H. 



THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



509 



Table II. — CliASBinsD Index to Table I.— continued. 



Date 



Plaoo 



Pitch 



Cents 



IV. VnASCVr—cowUmied. 



18d4a 



>f 



1856 
1859 



f» 



1648 
1713 
1783 
1829 
1886 



1619 
1834 



1740- 
1812 
1780 
1800 



1861 
1511 

1548 
1615 
1645 
1688 

1700c 

1714 

1713- 

1716 

1722 

1749 

1754- 

1824 

1762 

1833 

1878 

1879 



1822 

1834 

1815- 

1821 

1859 

1878 

1869 

t» 
}f 
*f 



Paris 



f» 



ft 



It 



Toulouse 
Marseilles 



Paris 

It 
It 
It 
II 



Brunswick 
Stuttgard 



Eutin 
Dresden 



N. Qermany 

Saxony 
Heidelberg 

It 

Hamburg 

Palatinate 

Holstein 

Hamburg 

It 
Holstein 

Saxony 

Strassburg 

Saxony 
Hamburg 
Dresden 

Hamburg 
Weimar 

Dresden 
Lubeok 

Hamburg 



Berlin 

tt 
Dresden 



tt 

II 
Brunswick 

Garlsruhe 

Gotba 

Weimar 

Stuttgard 



6. Concerts — continued. 

Conservatoire, Scheibler I. . 

II. . 

III. (Gand) 
de la Fage 
Pr. Com. 



It 
II 
It 
It 



tt 

It 



It 



ti 



7. Pianofortes, Spinets, Ac, 



Mersenne's spinet 
Sau?eur . 
Pascal Taskin 
Piano of opera 
Wolfel's . 



v. Gbbmany. 

1. Standards, 

PrsBtorius's suitable pitch 

Scbeibler's pitch (reduced to 59^ F.) adopted at the 
Congress of Physicists 

2. Old Forks. 

F. Anton von Weber's 



Kirsten*8 
Kummer's 



S. Church Organs (in order of date). 

PrsBtorius (called by him chamber pitch) highest 

recorded 

Halberstadt 

Schlick, high pitch 

„ low pitch 

St. Catherine (in 1879) 

Salomon de Cans 

Giackstadt 

St. Jacobi, low stop, old pitch .... 
„ high stops, „ .... 

Rendsburg 

Freiberg Cathedral, Silbermann .... 
Minster, A. Silbermann 



Dresden, St. Sophie 

Lehnert's jxm^tv 

Chained fork of the Roman Catholic Church 



Mattheson's St. Michaelis 
Tdpfer*s pipe . 
Roman Catholic Church 
Cathedral, old organ 
St. Jacobi, modem pitch 



5. Opera (arranged by towns). 



Fischer's Pichler's fork . 
Scheibler, * trustworthy' 
Naeke's fork of WebePs time 



Fr. Com. 
Jehmlich's fork 
Fr. Com. 



It 
II 
II 
II 



282 
808 
282 
324 
288 
327 



148 
163 
174 
242 
318 



287 
301 

236 

229 
239 



740 
541 
535 
33 
454 
119 
350 
184 
484 
506 
217 
104 

201 
351 
199 

169 
237 
212 
465 
500 



289 
307 
233 



435-8 
440-9 
435-2 
446-2 
487-0 
447 



402-9 
406-6 
409-0 
425-5 
443-3 



424-2 
440-2 

424-1 

422-3 
424-9 



667-3 
505-8 
504-2 
377-0 
480-8 
396-4 
4530 
411-4 
489-2 
495-5 
419-5 
393-2 

415-5 
455-2 
4150 

407-9 
424-4 
418-1 
484-1 
494-5 



487-3 
441-8 
423-2 



304 


441-0 


297 


439-4 


278 


443-5 


280 


435-0 


313 


443-8 


819 


444-8 


312 


443 



510 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Tabcb II. — OLABBinBD Imdbz TO Tablk 'L—contmued. 



Date 



Place 



Pitch 



Gente 



1869 
1869 



tt 



1879 



1859 
1869 



1776 



1859 



f 



1720 

17900 

1780c 



17S0C 

17800 



1845 
»> 

1856 
1857 

1859 



1869 



1839 



1781 
1860 



1802 

1858 



Mnnioh 

Baden 

Wurtembexg 



Hamburg 



•> 



Leipzig 

Wurtembeig 

Leipeig 



Breslau 



The Hague 



} 



Borne 
Padua 



{ 






Florenoe 
Milan 
Turin 
Milui 

>t 
Naples 
Turin 



Bologna 



tf 



St. Petersburg 



t» 



V. OvBMAKZ— continued. 

Opera (arranged by towns)— <)ontinued. 

Fr. Oom 

Sent to Society of Arts 



tf 



If 



Similar forks sent from Berlin and Munidh, which 

had adopted French pitch 
Opera under Ezebe 

6. Concerts. 

Old orchestral pitch 

Conservatoire Fr. Com. 

Fr. Com 

Gewandhaus, sent to Society of Arts . 

9. Instrumente, 

liarpurg 

Naeke*s Schneider's oboe 



882 
278 
288 



381 



820 
334 
319 
332 



196 
191 



VI. HOLLAXID. 

3. Church Organe. 

The old celebrated Church organs had all been 
altered, and I have not succeeded in recovering 
their ancient pitch 



6. Concerts, 



Fr. Com. 



VIL ITAI.Y. 

1. Stamdards. 

Pitch-pipes of Dr. B. Smith 

Mean of pitch-pipes of the bell-foundry of Col- 
bacchini 

2. Old Forks, 



334 



From Colbacchini's low /' 

high/' 



5. OpercL, 



Marloye 

,y . . . . . 

Fr. Com. .... 
La Scala (de la Fage) . 
San Carlo (Guillaume) . 
Fr. Com 

6. Concerts, 
Liceo Musicale (Society of Arts) 

7. Pianofortes, 
Tadolini's fork 



114 
241 



152 
230 



287 
326 
299 
349 
345 
319 
319 



312 



243 



VIII. Russia. 

3. Church Organs, 



Euler 

Court Church 



5. Opera. 



Sarti 

Fr. Com. (French pitch was afterwards adopted) 



211 
224 



284 
345 



448-1 
434-5 
436-9 



448*0 



445-0 

448-8 
444-8 
448-2 



414-4 
413-3 



446-2 



395-2 > 
425-2 



403-9 
422-6 



486-7 
446-6 
439-4 
450-3 
451-7 
444-9 
444-8 



4431 I 



425-8 I 



418-0 
421-2 



436'0 
451-5 



SECT. U. 



THE mSTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 



511 



TabiiX II. — OtiASSiFiBD ISDVx. TO TabiiB L — oontmued. 



Date 



Place 



Pitch 



GentB 



1786 
1858 



»i 



SeyiUe 
Madrid 



M 



1868 


New York 


1880 
It 


Boston 
New York 


f» 
tf 


ft 
Boston 


1879 


Cincinnati 
New Xork 


1880 


11 


It 


It 



IX. Spain. 

8. Church Org<vM, 

T. Bosch's organ 

Ton de Chapdle 

6. Opera 
Theatre (French pitch adopted in 1879) 

X. United Statbb of Aksbiga. 

E. S. Ritchie's standard, and Mason & Hamlin's 

French pitch •.».... 
Church of Immaculate Conception 
Hutchings, Plaisted & Co., * low organ pitch ' 
Nichors Fork, Germania orchestra 
Music Hall organ (from 1868 to 1871 at French 

pitch) 

Organ tuned to Thomas's orchestra 

Steinway's American pitch, from a fork furnished 

b^ Steinway 

Steinway's, from a fork furnished by R. Spice 
Highest New York pitch, from a fork furnished 

by R. Spice 



218 
218 



818 



288 
815 
816 
838 

842 
862 

866 
869 

880 



419*6 
419-6 



444-5 



485-9 
448-9 
444-2 
448-5 

450-9 
456-1 

457-2 
458-0 

460-8 



OONOIiUfilONS. 

Art. 6. — The two preceding tables oontain the faots of the history of musical 
pitch in Europe since 1361, the date of the Halberstadt organ, that is for 500 years, 
so far as I have been able to collect information, and I have been fortunate enough 
to bring together such an amount of historical evidence that probably no new IT 
facts could be ascertained which would materially change the conclusions to which 
I have been led. These are very briefly as follows. 

Art. 7. — ^The organ was originally a mere collection of pitch-pipes, each with a 
fixed tone, to steady the voice of the singers of ecclesiastical chants, replacing the 
single pitch-pipe with a movable piston or some instrument like the flageolet 
(whistle) and oboe, which subsequently gave rise to the two distinct series of flue and 
reed-pipes. But when thus collected it was necessaiy to fix a pitch. The guiding 
principles were the compass of the male voice, the rules of ecclesiastical song, the 
ease of the performer, to avoid introducing chromatics as much as possible (Schlick), 
and the standard measure or foot rule of the country. The latter suggested a 
whole number of feet for the length of the standard pipe, generaUy four feet, about 
the lowest note of the tenor voice, and the question thus rose what note should 
this tone represent? Here the answer came from ecclesiastical use, — either F or 
c. Schlick recommends both, thus giving pitches for any given note a whole 
Fourth apart. Schlick's high pitch, arising from giving a 6^-foot Ehenish pipe f 
to Cy made a'504-2. (All pitches named should be referred to in Table I.) His 
low pitch arising from giving the same pipe to JP, made a'377. These are a Mean- 
tone Fourth apart. 



Art. 8. — ^The foot had very different lengths 
in different countries. If we suppose the *8oiEde' 
(or ratio of diameter to length of pipe) and the 
force of wind to remain the same (both in fact 
varied mnoh), then the influence of the length 
of the foot on the pitch of the organ, suppos- 
ing the foor-foot or one-foot pipe to be given 
to the same note, may be appreciated from 
the table on p. 512a. In this we see a differ- 
ence of more than a Tone, nearly a minor 
Third, between the pitch of a 1-foot pipe in 
France and in Saxony. The difference be- 
tween the pitches of pipes of the lengths of 



the English foot and French foot is more than 
an equal Semitone. Hence probably it hap- 
pened that the lowest French pitch measured, 
a'874'2, is a Semitone flatter tnan the lowest 
English pitch measured a'895'2. Length of 
foot alone would therefore account for great 
variety of organ-pitch, to which we must add 
force of wind (see the notes on experimental 
English 1-foot pipes, p. 506c^ and different 
methods of voicing. The low pitches were (and 
still are on old oigans) prevalent in France 
and Spain, the high pitches were at home in 
North Germany (eee Table II.). 



612 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



>iames of Feet 



LoDg old French foot, or pied de roi . 
Long Austrian foot .... 
Long German, or Benish foot . 

English foot 

Old Niimberg foot .... 
Old Augsburg foot .... 
Old Boman foot (medieval) 

Bavarian foot 

Short Hamburg and Danish foot 
Short Brunswick and Frankfurt foot 
Short Saxon foot .... 



Length 



Interval 



mm. 


cents 


825 





816 


49 


814 


60 


806 


109 


804 


116 


296 


162 


295 


168 


292 


185 


286 


221 


285 


227 


288 


289 



Art. 9. — The solo instruments were tuned very variously. But it became the 
IT custom to have a band to play with the organ, and the princes and petty dukes used 
the same bands to play in their private apartments or ' chamber.' llie very high 
and very low pitch were generally found unsuitable for non-ecclesiastical music. 
Hence the instruments usually adopted a pitch lower than the high and higher than 
the low, and this was called ' chamber pitch/ the other being distingmshed as 
* church pitch.' But the same instruments had also to play with the oig&n. 
Hence the difference had to be a definite number of degrees of the scale, a Semi- 
tone, a Tone, or a minor Third. See a'407'9, and especially a'411'4, which com- 
pare with a'480-8, and a'484 1 respectively. This was, however, not always the 
case, for the very high church pitch, a'd03'7 had a still higher chamber pitch 
a'563-1. 

Art. 10. — ^But this great variety occasioned much trouble, and the chamber 
pitch below the high and above the low church pitch seems to have suggested 
PrsBtorius's 'suitable pitch ' of a'424'2 in 1619. This was in fact a ' mean pitch,' 
and as such rapidly found such favour that it spread over all Europe and, with 
T insignificant varieties (from a'415 to a'428'7 at the extremes, an interval of 54 
cents, or a quarter of a Tone), prevailed for two centuries. Handel's own fork, 
a'422*5 in 1751, quite a common pitch at the time, and the London Philbarmonic 
fork, a'423*3 from its foundation to 1820, are conspicuous examples, but an inspec- 
tion of the numerous pitches cited in Table I. sect. 4 (pp. 495^7), will prove the 
fact beyond doubt. 

Art. 11. — As this was the period of the great musical masters, and as their 
music is still sung, and sung frequently, it is a great pity that the pitch should 
have been raised, and that Handel, Haydn, Mozart, Beethoven, and Weber, for 
example, should be sung at a pitch more than a Semitone higher than they in- 
tended. The high pitch strains the voices and hence deteriorates from the efife<^ 
of the music, when applied to compositions not intended for it. Of course for 
music written for a high pitch the compass of the human voice is properly studied 
(see App. XX. sect. N. No. 1), and so much music has in the last fifty years been 
written for a high pitch, that to perform both properly two sets of instruments 
would be required. Two sets are actually in use at Dresden, one for the theatre 
f a'439'4, and one for the Boman Catholic Church having a'415, difference 98 cents, 
or about a Semitone. 

Art. 12. — ^The rise in pitch began at the great Congress of Vienna, 1814, when 
the Emperor of Russia presented new and sharper wind instruments to an Austrian 
regiment of which he was colonel. The band of this regiment became noted for 
the brilliancy of its tones. In 1820 another Austrian regiment received even 
sharper instruments, and as the theatres were greatly dependent upon the bands 
of the home regiments, they were obliged to adopt their pitch. Gradually at 
Vienna, pitch rose from a'42L'6 (Mozart's pitch) to a'456'1, that is, 136 cents» or 
nearly three-quarters of a Tone. The mania spread throughout Europe, but at 
very different rates. The pitch reached a'448 at the Paris Opera in 1858, and the 
musical world took fright. 

Art. 13. — The Emperor of the French appointed a commission to select a pitch, 
and this determined on a'435, but made a fork called Diapason normal^ now 
found to be a'435'4, which is preserved at the Mus6e du Conservatoire, and is the 
only standard pitch in the world. This pitch was widely adopted, but it is 56 cents, 



8*!CT. H. THE HISTORY OF MUSICAL PITCH IN EUROPE. 613 

or over a quarter of a Tone, sharper than Mozart's pitch, although it was 80 cents, 
fully three-quarters of a Semitone, flatter than the old Vienna sharp pitch a'466-1, 
and 49 cents, or a quarter of a Tone, flatter than the then French opera pitch 
a' 448. This pitch had heen reached independently in many places, and the French 
commission had been twitted at taking a Garlsruhe pitch. But it is not generally 
known that Sir George Smart's pitch a'433, adopted with much hesitation for the 
London Philharmonic Society about 1820, and extensively sold in London as the 
* London Philharmonic ' for many years before the French Commission of 1859, 
was in fact an anticipation of the French pitch. Both were compromises, a partial 
yielding to the new without entirely disregarding the old. The pitches a'430 to 
a'436*9, therefore (interval 28 cents, or about | Tone), forming Table I. Sect. 5, 
pp. 497-8, are termed the 'compromise pitch.' As instruments exist for this 
pitch it is the only one that has a chance of being used beside the present 
sharp pitch of England. Several attempts have been made to restore it, notably 
at Covent Garden Opera in 1880. But the expense of new instruments for a 
band, about lOOOZ., renders any alteration extremely difficult to carry out. The^ 
tendency in England has been to sharpen, and our orchestral and pianoforte pitch 
is now from a'449'7 to a'454'7, a difference of only 19 cents, not quite a comma. 
In the United States, however, the pitch has reached a'460*8, that is 23 cents, or 
about a comma more. In Germany the compromise pitch adopted was a'440'2 
as proposed by Scheibler, and it is curious that the standard pipes of the English 
church organ-builders vary from a'436 to a'445'2, 36 cents, but are mostly 
between 440 and 441*7, an interval of only 7 cents. The concert organs, of course, 
follow orchestral pitch. (See Postscript, p. 555.) 

Art. 14. — In England the pitch of organs varied with the note on which the 
four-foot or one-foot pipe was placed. We have only one record that the one- 
foot pipe was placed on c" giving a'395'2, whereas the same pipe made to give V 
produced a'423, the mean pitch, which so long prevailed. Put on b'\} it produced 
a'442, which as a'441'7 was Bernard Schmidt's low pitch, and is still the pitch 
of Mr. T. Hill, the organ-builder. Placed on a' it gave a'472-9, which as a'474-1 
was the highest church pitch used in England, just a Tone above mean pitch. 
(See p. 505c, III. 3, for details.) % 

Art. 15. — ^If we look into the secrets of the rise of pitch we find it always con- 
pected with wind instruments. The first rise was from a military band, and the wind 
and the brass have constantly rebelled against a low pitch. The singers have not 
prevailed against them except for a very short time. The great violin school of 
Cremona in Italy lived in the time of mean pitch with a higher chamber pitch, 
and the resonance of the boxes of their violins seems to shew traces of the action 
of both pitches (supr^, p. 87, note'"'), but their great object was to insure tolerable 
uniformity of reinforcement, and hence they are a treasure for all time. 

Art. 16. — The only possible conclusion seems to be that to sing music written 
for pitches different from our own, we must either transpose a Semitone (always a 
difficulty, and for some instruments an impossibility) or adopt a new compromise 
pitch, the French, already once firmly rooted in England as Sir George Smart's, and 
standing half-way between the extremes. On the continent, as formerly shewn in 
France, and quite recently in Belgium and Italy, the government has a certain 
power in fixing musical pitch, by refusing to subsidise conservatories and theatres 
which do not adopt the pitch ordered, and commanding the regimental bands to IT 
make the change. But beyond this their power does not extend, and the various 
regulations which have been made in the two countries last named shew the 
great difficulties that have to be overcome in introducing a new pitch even within 
the area under government control. In England, however, there are no subsidised 
operas or musical conservatories, and even the instruments of the military bands 
are not provided by government. Hence the change must be left to the gradual 
action of musical feeling. We have already changed in England almost imper- 
ceptibly. The raising of English pitch from Sir George Smart's a'433 was to a 
great extent due to the individual action of the late Sir Michael Costa while con- 
ductor of the Philharmonic concerts 1845-46 (mean a'452'5, extreme a'454*7), 
to whose insistence is also due the high pitch of the Albert Hall concert organ, 
a'453'9. Perhaps a similar energetic conductor will arise to turn the tide of 
musical opinion in the opposite direction. 

L L 



514 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. 



SECTION K. 



NON-HABHONIC BCALB8. 



(See NoteB, pp. 71, 95, 287, 258, 255, 257, 258, 264, 272«) 



Art. 
I. Introduction, p. 514. 
II. Table of Non-Harmonic Scales, p. 514. 
III. Annotations to the Table, p. 519. 



Art. 
IV. How these Divisions of the Octave may 

have arisen, p. 522. 
V. Results of the inquiiy, p. 524. 



I. Intboduction. 

For particulars of my researches into non-harmonic scales, see my two papers, 
first : ' Tonometrical observations on soipe existing non-harmonic Scales ' (Proe. 
of the R, Society for Nov. 20, 1884, vol. xxxvii. p. 368) and second ' On the Musical 
Scales of Various Nations ' {Journal of the Society of Arts for March 27, 1885, 
IT vol. xxxiiL p. 485], in both of which I was most materially assisted by Mr. Alfred 
James Hipkins of Messrs. J. Broadwood and Sons'. 

Properly speaking there is only one harmonic scale, that is, a scale which 
allows the musician to produce chords without beats, and therefore has notes with 
pitch numbers composed of products and multiples of the powers of 2, 3, 5, 7, 17, 
as shewn in Sect. E. But the term harmonic may be extended to all tempered 
imitations of such scales as are not worse than equal intonation. If we did not 
extend the use of the term thus far, we should find absolutely no harmonic scale in 
practical use, except by the Tonic Sol-faists when unaccompanied (App. XVIIT.]. 
Even with this extension of meaning, non-harmonic scales are greatly more 
numerous than harmonia Harmony was a European discovery of a few centuries 
back, and it has not penetrated beyond Europe and its colonies. 



In order to obtain a bird's-eye glcknce over 
the scales given theoretically by ancient Greek 
writers (as interpreted in the text), by ancient 
IT and medieval Arabic writers (as interpreted 
by Professor Land) ; by modem Arabic 
theorists (as reported by Eli Smith) ; by 
Indian musicians (as reported by Ilajah 
Sourindro Mohun Tagore) ; and those which 
I have deduced from Javese, Ohinese, and 
Japanese instruments, with those of other 
countries, examined by Mr. Hipkins and my- 
self, I have constructed the following table. 
The scale is represented by the numbers 
of cents in the interval by which any one 
of its notes is sharper than the lowest note, 
and is generally confined to one octave. 
The interval between any two notes in the 



scale is then found by subtraction. The 
number of the note in the scale is usaally 
placed at the top, so that the eye can, nJL a 
glance, compare the different usages. The 
ratios represented by these cents may gene- 
rally be found from the table in Sect. D. 
Each scale is numbered, and in the annota- 
tions immediately following the table, several 
particulars are fliven. It was not, however; 
possible to include every case in this arrange- 
ment. The complete ancient and medieval 
Arabian lute, Rab4b, and Tambour scales, skod 
the complete Indian scales both in the old and 
modem form, and some others are therefore 
differently ordered, preserving, however, the 
expression of notes by cents as above ex- 
plained. See Nos. 66 to 75. 



II. Tablb of Non-Harmonic Soalbs. 



T 



Old Greek Tetrachords, 



1. Olympos 

2. Old Chromatic 
8. Diatonic 

4. Didymus 

5. Doric .... 

6. Phrygian 

7. Lydian 

8. Helmholtz . 

9. Soft Diatonic 

10. Ptolemy's equal diatonic 

11. Enharmonic 



I. 


II. 





112 





112 





112 





112 





90 





182 





182 





112 





86 





151 


. 


55 



. in. 


IV. 


— . 


498 


182 


498 


316 


498 


294 


498 


294 


498 


816 


498 


886 


498 


386 


498 


267 


498 


316 


498 


112 


498 



Greek Tetrachords after A I Farabi reported by Prof. Land, 

I. Genus molht ordinatum. 
a. continuum : — 

12. laxum 

13. mediocre 

14. acre 



1 


386 


441 


498 





316 


405 


498 





267 


386 


498 



rm 



p^^m^ 



SECT. K. 



NON-HARMOISnC SCALES. 



515 



II. Tabub of Non-Habhokic Scalbs — conUnued. 



Greek Tetrachords after Al Farabi reporied by Prof, Land— GonWmx&di, 



I. Qenus moUe, ordinatum — oont. 
b, non oontinuum : — 

15. laxum (enharmonic) . 

16. mediocre (soft chromatic) . 

17. acre (syntonically chromatic) . 

II. Genus forte, 

a. duplicatum : — 

18. primum 

19. secundum 

20. tertium . . 

b. conjunctum: — 

21. primum (entonically diatonic) . 

22. secundum (syntonically diatonic) 
28. tertium (equally diatonic) . 

b, disjunctum: — 
24. primum (soft diatonic) 



Most Ancient Form of Oreek Scales with 7 Tones and Octave, 



I-. 


IL 


III. 


IV. 





386 


460 


498 





316 


435 


498 





267 


418 


498 





281 


462 


498 





204 


408 


498 





182 


365 


498 





281 


485 


498 





204 


386 


498 





182 


347 


498 





281 


413 


498 



% 



25. Lydian 

26. Phrygian . 

27. Done 

28. Hypolydian 

29. Hypophi^'gian (Ionic) 

30. Hypodonc (Eolic) 

31. Mixolydian 



I. 


II. 

182 


III. 


IV. 

498 


V. 


VI. 


VII. 





386 


702 


884 


1088 





182 


316 


498 


702 


884 


1018 





90 


294 


498 


702 


792 


996 





204 


386 


590 


702 


884 


1088 





204 


386 


498 


702 


884 


1018 





204 


294 


498 


702 


792 


996 





112 


294 


498 


610 


814 


996 



VIII. 



1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 



Later Greek Scales with Pythagorean Intonation. 



32. Lydian 

33. Hypophiygian (Ionic) 

34. Phrygian . 

35. Eolic .... 

36. Doric (same as No. 27) 

37. Mixolydian 

38. Syntonolydian . 






204 


408 


498 


702 


906 


1110 





204 


406 


498 


702 


906 


996 





204 


294 


498 


702 


906 


996 





204 


294 


498 


702 


792 


996 





90 


294 


498 


702 


792 


996 





90 


294 


498 


588 


792 


996 





204 


408 


612 


702 


906 


1110 



1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 



H 



Al Farabi's Greek Scales as reported by Prof, Land, 



39. Genus conjunctum medium 

40. Genus duplicatum medium, or dito 

num (same as No. 38) . 

41. Genus conjunctum primum 

42. Genus forte duplicatum primum 

43. Genus conjunctum tertium, or forte 

SBquatum .... 

44. Genus forte disjunctum primum 

45. Genus non continuum acre 

46. Genus non continuum mediocre 

47. Genus non continuum lazum . 

48. Genus chromaticum forte . 

49. Genus chromaticum moUissimum 

50. Genus moUissimum ordinantium 



Arabic and Persian Scales as reported by Prof. Land, 

51. Zalzal, see No. 66 . . . . | | 204 ) 355 | 498 | 702 | 853 | 996 








204 


408 


590 


702 


906 


1088 


• 





204 


408 


612 


702 


906 


1110 







204 


435 


639 


702 


983 


1137 







204 


435 


666 


702 


933 


1164 


e 





204 


386 


551 


702 


884 


1049 







204 


485 


617 


702 


933 


1115 







204 


471 


622 


702 


969 


1120 







204 


520 


639 


702 


1018 


1137 







204 


590 


664 


702 


1088 


1162 







204 


471 


690 


702 


969 


1088 







204 


520 


613 


702 


1018 


1111 







204 


590 


647 


702 


1088 


1146 



1200 

1200 
1200 
1200 

1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 



IF 



1200 



Highland Bagpipe made by Macdonald of Edinburgh, 

52. Observed I | 197 | 841 | 495 | 703 I 853 | 1009 | 1200 

Modern Arabic Scale as reported by EU Smith, 

53. Meshaqah, theoretical . . . | | 200 | 350 | 500. | 700 ( 850 | 1000 | 1200 

1^1/2 



516 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



II. Table of Non-Habmonic Scales — continued. 



V 



Arabic Medieval Scales as reported by Prof. Land with 7 Tones and Octave. 



54. 'Ochaq (same as No. 33) 

55. Nawa (same as No. 84) 

56. Boasilik (same as No. 37) 

57. Bast . 

58. Zenkouleh 

59. Bahawi 

60. Hhosaini 

61. Hhidjazi 



Arabic Medieval Scales with 8 Tones and Octave. 



62. 'Iraq . 

63. iQfahan 
6i. Zirafkend 
65. Bouzoark 



I. 


II. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 


VII. 


Vlll. 





ao4 


408 


498 


702 


906 


996 


1200 





204 


294 


498 


702 


906 


996 


1200 





90 


294 


496 


588 


792 


996 


1200 





204 


384 


498 


702 


882 


996 


1200 





204 


380 


498 


678 


882 


996 


1200 





180 


384 


498 


678 


792 


996 


1200 





180 


294 


498 


678 


906 


996 


1200 





180 


294 


498 


678 


882 


996 


1200 



I. 


II. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 


VII. 


VIII. 


IX. 

1200 





160 


384 


498 


678 


882 


996 


1176 





180 


384 


498 


702 


882 


996 


1176 1200 





180 


294 


498 


678 


792 


882 


1086 1200 





180 


384 


498 


678 


702 


906 


1086 1200 



66. Earlier Notes on the Arabic Lute as reported by Prof. Land. 

*«* FiBST, Second, <&c., refer to the strings. The notes are named from the fingers — ^iodex, 
middle, ring, little — by which they were played. 



1[ 



Notes 



C 



First Octave 



D 



E 



F 



a 



Bb\> 
A 



Bb 

Cb 



Fibst: open 
ancient near index 

Persian near index 

Zalzal's near index 
index . 

ancient middle 
Persian middle 
ZalzaVs middle 



nng 



Second Octave 



Thibd: index 
ancient middle 
Persian middle 



little = Second : open 
Second : ancient near index 



Persian near index 

ZalzaPs near index 
index . 

ancient middle 
Persian middle 
ZalzaFs middle 



nng 



little = Third : open 
Third : ancient near index 



Persian near index 

Zalzal's near index 
index . 



Zalzal*s middle 



nng . 

little = Fourth 



open 



Fourth : ancient near index 



Persian near index 
Zalzal's near index 
index . 

ancient middle 
Persian middle 



Zalzal's middle 



ring . 

little == Fifth : 



open 



Fifth : ancient near 



Persian near index 
Zalzal's near index 



Fifth : ancient middle 
Persian middle 



Zalzal's middle 



nng 



ndex 



Cents 



Oct 1 




90 

145 

168 
204 
294 
308 
355 

408 



498 
588 

643 

666 
702 
792 
801 
853 

906 



996 
1086 

1141 

1164 
1200 



Oct. -2 
1200 




90 
99 

161 

204 

294 



384 

439 
462 
498 

597 

649 

702 

792 



882 

937 
960 

1086 
1095 

1147 

1200 



8ECT. K. 



NON-HARMONIC SCALES. 



617 



II. Table of Nom-Habmonio Scales — continued. 



• * 



67. Medieval Arabic Scales as reported by Prof. Land, 
Names of strings as in No. 66, names of notes as altered by the Arabic medieval writers. 



No. 



1 
2 
S 
4 
5 
6 
7 

8 
9 
10 
11 
12 
13 
14 

15 

16 

17 

1' 



Notes 



C 

D 

E 
F 
A,, 

A 



First Octave 



Second Octave 



Fibst: open . 
remnant 
near . 
index . 
Persian 
Zalzal . 
ring . 

little . 
Second: remnant 
near . 
index . 
Persian 
Zalzal . 
ring . 

little . 
Thibd: remnant 
near 
index . 



Tkibd: index 
Persian 
Zalzal . 



nng 
little . 
Fo€BTh: remnant 



near ( = G?|>W 
index . 
Persian 
Zalzal . 



nng . 
little . 
Fifth: remnant 



near (= Cl>W 
index . 
Persian 
Zalzal . 
ring . 



Cents 



Oct. 1 




90 
180 
204 
294 
884 
408 

498 
588 
678 
702 
792 
882 
906 

996 
1086 
1176 
1200 



Oct. 2 
1200 + 




90 
180 
204 
294 
884 

474 
498 
588 
678 
702 
792 
882 

972 

996 

1086 

1176 

1200 



68. Northern Tambottr, or that of EJiorassan, as reported by Prof, Land, 

C 0, D\f 90, E\f\f 180. *D 204, E\f 294, F\^ 884, E 408, *F 498, Q\f 588, F$ 612, •G 702, 
t^ 1^792, G$816, A 906, J3|> 996, t'^|tl020, £1110, *c 1200, 6$ 1224, C$1814, *(2 1404 
cents. 

* Fixed Tones. f Aazilla ry Tones. 



Babdb or 2'Stringed viol, after Prof, Land. 



69. first 

70. second . 

71. third . 






204 


316 


408 


520 


590 


682 


724 





204 


816 


408 


590 


612 


724 


816 





204 


816 


408 


590 


794 


906 


998 



906 

998 

1180 



Southern Tambour, or that of Bagdad, as reported by Prof. Land. 

72. theoretical | | 44 | 89 | 185 | 182 | 231 | 275 | 820 | 366 | 413 | 462 

Indian Chromatic Scale, 



• * 
* 



Degrees 


1 


2 


3 


4 


5 


6 


7 


8 


9 


10 


11 


12 


13 


14 


15 


16 


17 


18 


19 


20 


21 


Notes . 


C 


Db\} 


Dh 


— 


D 


E\}}y 


925h 


E 


Et 


F 




^ 







A\^y 


Ab 




A 


^>b 


Bb 


B 


73. Old . 





51 


102 


158 


204 


264 


386 


442 


498 


549 


600 


702 


753 


804 


855 


906 


9661 


1027* 


1088 


74. New . 





49 


99 


151 


204 


259 


316 


374 


4a^. 


498 


543 


589 


637 


685 


736 


787 


841 


896 


952 


1011 


1070 



.n 



75. First Octave . 
Second Octave 



I 01 89| 178 
11991 1280 1376 



269 
1466 



373 
1567 



4751 596 
168111776 



684 
1891 



7811 879 
1984 2090 



996 
2187 



1081 
2298 



1199 
2398 



♦ » 



The Indian partial scales enumerated by Bajah S. M. Tagore, as made up from the 19 
notes in Nos. 73 or 74, 32 of them with 7 notes, 112 with 6 notes, and 160 with 5 notes each, 
are not given because he does not distinguish the minor variations of one degree. 



Indian Partial Scales as played by Rajah Edm Pdl Singh, 



76. First 

77. Fourth 

78. Second 

79. Third 

80. Fifth , 



I. 


II. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 


VII. 





183 


842 


588 


685 


871 


1074 





174 


350 


477 


697 


908 


1070 





183 


271 


534 


686 


b72 


983 





111 


314 


534 


686 


828 


1017 





90 


366 


493 


707 


781 


1080 



VIII. 

■ 

1230 
1181 
1232 
1198 
1087 



H 



Arranged according to the older and more modem division as inferred from indications 
by Rajah Sourindro Mohun Tagore. 

22 

1144 
1135 

Indian Semitonic Scale as inferred from Measu/rement of a Madras Vina, 



518 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



II. Tabljd ov Noh-Habmonic Scales — continued. 



Various Wood Harmonicons, 



81. Balafong from Patna 

82. Balafong from Singapore . 
88. Patala from Bunnah 

84. Balafong from the same . 

85. Ranafc from Siam. See p. 666 

86. Balafong from Western Africa 

87. Gen. Htt.RiyerB*s Balafong 

the same 



from 



L 


II. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 


VU. 


VIIL 





187 


a56 


526 


672 


856 


985 


1222 





169 


850 


548 


709 


894 


1040 


1206 





176 


850 


588 


707 


899 


1058 


1246 . 





114 


850 


550 


687 


838 


1032 


1196 ! 





129 


277 


508 


726 


771 


1029 


1254 1 





162 


287 


588 


724 


890 


1039 


1200* 





195 


289 


513 


686 


796 


1006 


1209 



Pentatonic Scales. 



88. beginning with 

89. 

90. 

91. 

92. 



It 
*> 



»t 



The Black Digitals of a Pianoforte, 



»i 



I. 


11. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 


VL . 





200 


600 


700 


900 


1200 = 





800 


600 


700 


1000 


1200 





200 


400 


700 


900 


1200 





200 


500 


700 


1000 


1200 





300 


500 


800 


1000 


! 1200 



98. Balafong 



South Pacific. 

. I I 202 I 370 I 685 I 903 I 



1200 



Javese ScaleSf as observed from Instruments and Musicians. 



94. Salendro, observed 

95. ,. assumed 



If 








228 
240 



484 
480 



728 
720 



960 
960 



1200 
1200 



Javese Pelog, Chromatic Scale, from which the others are selected. 



96. The seyen notes 



I. 


II. 


ni. 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 


VII. 


vin. 





137 


446 


675 


687 


820 


1098 


1200 : 



The Five-Note Scales Selected. 



If 



97. Pelog 

98. Dangsoe {oe as in sho^) 

99. Bem .... 

100. Barang 

101. Miring 

102. Menjoera {joe = English you) 






— 


446 


576 


687 


— i 1098 ' 





137 




— 


687 


820 ' 1098 





137 


— 


575 


687 


— 1098 





137 


~— 


676 


687 


820 — 1 





-_ 


446 


576 




820 1098 





187 


446 


676 


— 


. — 1 1098 



1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 



Chinese mixed Pentatonic and Heptatonic Scales, as observed. 



^«* Notes marked * introduced for heptatonic playing. 



103. Flute (Ti-tsu) . 

104. Oboe (So-na) . 
106. Mouth-organ (Sh^ng) 

106. Gong-chime (Yiin-lo) 

107. Dulcimer (Yang-chin) 

108. Tamboura (Sien-tsu) 

109. Balloon Guitar (pM-p*a) 













178 
146 
210 
169 
169 
189 
146 



•339 
297 
338 
867 

•274 
386 
351 



448 
440 
498 
586 
491 



662 
637 
716 
674 
661 
702 
647 



888 
813 
908 
775 
878 
893 
874 



•1103 


1196 


1014 


1216 


1040 


1199 


1062 


1206 


•996 


1198 


— 


1200 




1195 



SKOT. K. 



NON-HARMONIC SCALES. 



519 



II. Table of Non-Habiconic Qcauss— continued. 



Pantatonic Qcllbb— continued. 



Japanese, chiefly Pentatonic, but with extra notes marked*. 

Koto Tuning, Popular Scales. 



110. 
111. 
112. 
118. 
114. 
116. 
116. 
117. 
118. 
119. 
120. 
121. 
122. 
123. 



124. 
125. 
126. 
127. 
126. 
129. 



»» 



II 



Hiradioshi, theoretical . 
female player 
musio-master 

Akebono I., theoretical . 

Akebono II., 

Kumoi I., 

Kumoi II., 

Han-Kumoi 

Kata-Eumoi 

Sakura 

Iwato 

Han-Iwato 

Kata-Iwato 

Kumoi 



ti 
II 
II 
II 
II 
II 
II 
II 
II 





I. 


II. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 







204 


316 


702 


814 







193 


857 


719 


801 







185 


887 


688 


790 







200 


800 


700 


900 







100 


500 


700 


800 







100 


500 


700 


800 







100 


500 


700 


800 







200 


500 


700 


800 







200 


800 


700 


800 







100 


500 


700 


800 







100 


500 


600 


1000 







100 


500 


700 


1000 







100 


500 


600 


1000 







100 


500 


700 


800 



Koto Tuning, Classical Scales. 



Ichikotsu-Ghio, theoretical 

Hio-Dio 

Sou-Dio 

Wanfliki-Ghio 

Sui-Dio 

Bausiki'Chio 



II 
II 
II 
II 



II 



Heptatonic Scales. 



VI. 








200 


500 


700 


900 







200 


500 


700 


900 







200 


500 


700 


900 







200 


500 


700 


900 







200 


500 


700 


1000 







800 


500 


700 


1000 



1200 
1199 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 



1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 
1200 



180. Classical riosen, theoretical . 

181. „ ritsusen 
Idf. Popular I. 
183. Popular II. 



II 



II 



II 



I. 


II. 


III. 


IV. 





200 


400 


•600 





200 


300 


•500 





100 


800 


500 





100 


300 


500 



V. VI. VIL VIII. 



700 
700 
700 
600 



900 
900 
800 
800 



•1100 1200 

•1000 1200 

1000 1200 



1000 



1200 



Japanese Biwa, Classical Instrument, Tetrachords observed on different Strings, 

I. II. III. IV. V. 



184. Lowest string . 
135. Seooud lowest 

186. Second highest 

187. Highest string 

188. Mean 

189. Theoretically assumed as 












225 
223 
195 
212 
214 
200 



382 
338 
820 
821 
828 
800 



416 
429 
407 
414 
416 
400 



512 
500 
496 
508 
508 
500 



IIL Annotations to the Tablb. 



Nob. 1 to 11 are those given in the text, 
pp. 262-5, but No. 8 was merely suggested 
by Prof. Helmholtz. 

Nos. 12 to 24 are from App. III. to Prof. Land's 
paper, Over de Toontadders der Arabische 
Mustek (on the Arabic musical scales), and 
contain his corrections of the very faulty 
MS. of Al Farabi; the numbers are also 
given by Kosegarten, p. 55. After 24, the 
numbers suddenly cease in the MS. 

Nob. 25 to 81 are the old theoretical form of 
the Greek scales with the old tetrachords, 
see supr4, p. 268 c, d'. 

Nos. 82 to 88 are taken from supri, p. 269 a. 

Nob. 39 to 50 are from Prof. Land, ibid. p. 88, 
corrected from the MS. at Leyden; for 
No. 45 the copyist had repeated No. 44, and 
Prof. Land has supplied the numbers by 
analogy. 



No. 51 is inferred from the complete set of IT 
notes used on the Arabic lute at different 
times as shewn in No. 66. 

No. 52. The Highland bagpipe representing 
that scale has been inserted immediatehr 
afterwards to shew its practical identity. It 
was played to Mr. Hipkins and myself by 
Mr. C. Keene, the artist. 

No. 53. The very modem survival of the 
same scale has been put next. It is de- 
scribed, supr&, p. 264 note^*. In practice 
each note might be sharpened by one or 
more quartertones. 

Nos. 54 to 65 are the twelve scales given, 
supril, p. 284, from Prof. Land, but the four 
which employ 8 notes are now placed last. 
No. 61, Hhidjagi, is, in fact, more harmonic 
than the usual equal temperament. If we 
begin on the note vii., and reckon the 



520 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



intervals from it through an octave, after- 
wards subtracting 996, it gives the scale 

204 884 498 702 882 1066 1200, and if 
884 882 1086 were each increased by 2 
cents, this would be our just major scale. 
The difference is not felt even in ohoids, as 

1 have ascertained by actually playing them 
on a properly tuned concertina. 

No. 66 is the complete collection of the notes 
on the old Arabic lute, as used at different 
times, reported by Prof. Land. Of course 
the Persian and Zalzal's notes could not be 
used together, and when Zalzal's 855 and 
858 were used, both 294 and 408, and also 
both 792 and 906 had to be discontinued, 
producing No. 51. 
No. 67 gives the complete 17 medieval Arabic 

^ notes as determined by Prof. Land, with the 

^ 2 extra ones which appear in the second 
Octave. Villoteau (op. cit. supr4, p. 257, 
note Xf ed. 1809, folio, vol. i.) declued, as 
is well known, that the most generally re- 
ceived Arabic division of the Octave is into 
thirds of a Tone (op. cit. p. 618). Prof. 
Land has demonstrated (Qamme Arabe, 
p. 62) that this is not the case. Villoteau, 
an excellent musician, sent to Egypt by 
the French Government to study the native 
music, had every facility given to him, and 
had native musicians at his beck and call. 
How did he arrive at this opinion? After 
an attentive study of his book I consider 
the following hypothesis probable. The 
greater number of theorists gave 17 notes 
to the Octave. This was the medieval 
Arabic scale. No. 67. Villoteau was not 
used to just intervals, and he was a very 

T poor arithmetician (see the remarkable note 
op. cit. p. 668). He was used to the * musi- 
cians* cycle * of 65 d^rees (suprii, p. 486d, 
viii.), in which the Tone contained 9, the 
major Semitone 5, and the minor 4 degrees 
(op. cit. pp. 667, 678). When he heard the 
scale of Hast played (see p. 284 and No. 57, 
for the medieval form 204 384 498 702 
882 996 1200 cents), which was the principal 
Egyptian scale, he tried to sing it as ^ B 
Cf^ &c., in his 55 degrees, but was imme- 
diately told that his Cf » 892 cents was 
too sharp. This would hardly have been 
the case if the true medieval 384 had been 
played to him. He next tried A B 0=305 
cents, but then C was too flat. Now the 
interval C to C](=87 cents was his minor 
Semitone of 4 degrees. Hence he concluded 
that 3 degrees =65 cents in his tempera- 

u ment would be right, and that satisfied the 
natives (op. cit. p. 679). This, however, was 
one thii^d of his Tone. But he found also 
17 tabaqat or transpositions of each scale, 
proceeding by Fourths, called by him per- 
fect, but as he really considered 17 of these 
Fourths to make up 7 Octaves, he arrived at 
a cycle of 17 degrees, each having 71 cents 
(ex. 70*588288) or being almost precisely a 
small Semitone 24 : 25 ( = ex. 70*678 cents). 
To the nearest cent, using his symbols, 
where x means increased by one third, and 
t increased by two thirds of a Tone, and 
^, ^ mean diminished by the same amount, 
the notes of this cycle in cents were, 1^0, 
2 Ax =B(, 71, 3 ^Jf=-B[> 141, 4 B 212, 
6 C 282, 6 Cx =i)(, 353, 7 C3f=D(, 424, 
8 D 494, 9 Dx =£f» 565, 10 Dt=E^ 635, 
. 11 E 706, 12 F 776; 1% Fx=- Q\^ 847, 14 



if|=G|> 918, 15 G 988. 16 Gx^A'^ 1056. 
17 6f9 = ilk 1129, 1' A 1200. Then he 
writes the Hast as he heard it, as ^i B C x 
D E F X G A^ which therefore gave the 
cents 212 858 494 706 847 988 1200. Now 
it is difficult to conceive that he ooald have 
heard the medieval Rast in this way, even 
though the intervals were determined purely 
by estimation of ear, apparently his only 
method of estimation. But the probability 
is that medieval Rast, like the other me- 
dieval scales, had become a thing of the 
past, and that what Villoteau heard in 
Efflrpt in 1800 was what Eli Smith in 1849 
tells us Mesh&qah (suprA, p. 2646| laid down 
at Damascus, namely No. 58, that is, the 
normal scale 200 850 500 700 850 1000 
1200 cents, a survival of Zabsars with the 
neutral Third and Sixth, and this is very 
accurately represented by the above scale of 
Bast, as Villoteau notes it At the very 
outset Villoteau says that some divide the 
Octave into Tones, Semitones, and Quarter- 
tones (op. cit. p. 618). This shews that the 
24 division was even acknowledged. But 
Villoteau was perfectly ignorant of equal 
temperament, and hence paid no attention 
to this. On the other hand he found the 17 
divisions in the theorists, and made them 
equal, because he thus seemed to reconcile 
theory and practice. But he only obtained 
an outline thus, as is evidently shewn by 
his speaking (op. cit. p. 612) of 'les divi- 
sions et subdivisions des tons de la musique 
arabe en intervalles si petits et si peu na- 
turels, que Touie ne pent jamais les saisir 
avec une prteision exacte, ni la voix les 
entonner avec une parfaite justesse.* It 
was evident there were many other Tones 
(the Quartertones) not in his list of 17. 
Indeed he says (op. cit. p. 678) : * lis savent 
aussi qu*il y a d'autres degi^ interm^iaires 
aux pr^c^dents, et ils en font usage meme 
assez fr^uemment, mais ils ne sauraient 
dire au juste quelle est la nature et T^tendue 
de I'intervalle qui s^pare ces deerte les 
uns des autres.* These were possibly the 
Quartertones (veiy uncertainly produced) by 
which we learn from Eli Smith that the 
Arabs, like the Indians, continually varied 
their scale. If the 17 thirds of tones of 
ViUoteau, just given in his notation, be 
read as 1 C, 2 i)|^, 8 E^k, 4 D, 5 E^, 6JF^, 
1 E, 8 F, 9 G|^, 10 il^k 11 G, 12 AK 
13 Bff^, 14 A, 15 B|^, 16 C|y, 17 D|>|y. as in 
No. 67, his 12 scales will be found to cor- 
respond precisely in names of the notes 
with those given by Prof. Land (supra, 
p. 284), but the whole of the intervals^ 
which were originally of 90 or 24 cents^ are 
now equalised as 71 cents by this confused 
temperament of Villoteau *s in which medi- 
eval Arabic music seems to have been in- 
tended, but the modem form was really 
misrepresented. To shut up 24 Quarter- 
tones into 17 thirds of Tones, at least two 
must be given to one note on seven ooca- 
sions. Thus (in cents) Villoteau's 71 was 
50 or 100, his 282 was 250 or 800, his 424 
was 400 or 450, his 565 was 550 or 600, 
his 776 was 750 or 800, his 918 was 900 or 
950, and his 1129 was 1100 or 1150. ThU 
. would fully account for the indistinctness 
complained of. 
No. 68 is a complete Arabic medieval scale 



SECTC. K. 



NON-HARMONIC SCALES. 



521 



with julditional intervals, 612, 816, 1110, 
1200 + 24, 1200+ lU, played on a tambour. 
These very long-necked guitars allow of 
minute subdivision of the string. 
Nos. 69 to 71 are the various notes produced 
by the Babdb, according to the three methods 
of tuning the second string as 316, 406, or 
590 cents, the intervals between pairs of 
notes on both strings being identical. In 
No. 69 the note 520 cents is played on the 
second string, but is here inserted in order 
of pitch. 
No. 72 gives the most extraordinary and most 
limited scaJe known, produced by using only 
the open string and S9, 88, 87, 86, and 85 
fortieths of it ; the open second string being 
tuned in unison with the sharpest note of 
the first string. It is valuable as showing 
a primitive method of obtaining scales and 
a division of one-eighth of the keyboard 
into 5 equal parts. 
Nos. 78 and 74 are an attempt to represent 
the Indian Chromatic Scale from indications 
in Rajah Sourindro Mohun Tagore's Musical 
Scales of tfis Hindus ^ Calcutta, 1884, And 
the Annuaire du Conservatoire de Bruxelles^ 
1878, pp. 161-169, the latter having been 
drawn up by Mons. V. Mahillon from in- 
formation furnished by the Rajah. As 
regards the 7 fixed notes {prakrita) of the C 
scale [sharja grdma), C, D, E, F, O, A (a 
comma snarper than our A^, B, there 
seems to be no doubt of the theoretical 
values. As to the 12 changing notes 
{vikrita)t the values given can be con- 
sidered only as approximative. The divi- 
sion of the intervals of a major Tone of 204 
cents into 4 degrees {s'rutis) ; of a minor 
Tone of 182 cents into 8 degrees; and of 
a Semitone of 112 cents into 2 degrees, as 
indicated by the superscribed numbers, is 
also certain. But whether the 4 parts of a 
whole Tone were equal and each 51 cents, 
and the three parts of a minor Tone were 
also equal and each equal to 60} cents, and 
the two parts of a Semitone were also equal 
and each therefore 56 cents, is quite un- 
certain. This, however, was assumed to be 
the case in calculating No. 78, and the 
results are probably not much out. Nor is 
it likely that the alterations by degrees 
(produced on increasing the tension of the 
string by pressing behind high frets, or 
deflecting the string along low frets, or by 
arranging the movable frets) were even 
approximately constant. In No. 74 we 
have the modem Bengali division of the 
finger-board referred to in the above books. 
It seems that the string is first divided into 
half and a quarter, giving the Octave and 
Fourth (theoretically). Then the distance 
from the First to the Fourth on the finger- 
board is divided into 9 equal parts, and that 
from the Fourth to the Octave into 13 equal 
parts, and each distance represents the 
interval of a degree (s'ruti). From these 
data the values ot No. 74 have been calcu- 
lated. It will be seen by subtraction that 
the first 9 degrees thus found vary from 49 
to 63 cents, and the last 18 from 45 to 64 
cents. The cents found, however, from the 
inverse ratio of the lengths will differ 
slightly from those used practically. The 
j( and \y (tibra and koniaia) are used in this 
scale for deviations of two degrees when a 



- major Tone is divided, and for deviations of 
one desree when a minor Tone or Semitone 
is divided. This is done by the Rajah in 

- his translations into ordinary notation. In 
addition I have taken the liberty to use \f |^ 
to represent only one degree fiatter than the 
single |y, and wish it to be read * very flat ' 
(ati-komala) ; similarly $ ft is one degree 
sharper than % and should be read *very 
sharp' (ati'tibra). The Rajah not having 
distinguished the very fiat and very sharp 
notes from the simply fiat and sharp ones 
in his 904 scales, I have avoided citing them 
at length. Similarly I have not been able 
satisfactorily to find the cents for the F 
scale or mad^hyama grdma (usually repre- 
sented as our just major scale in which 
A should be one comma instead of one«r 
degree fiatter than in the C scale, as it^' 
would appear to be), or for the E scale or 
ganifhdra grdma (in which D and A appear 
to be one degree flatter, and B one degree 
sharper than in the normal C scale or 
sJiarja grdtna), and hence I have not given 
them in the table. But, using numbers 
before the notes for degrees, they may 
possibly be for the F scale, IC, 5Z), 8i?, 
lOF, 140, 17il, 21J5, which would use 
degree 17, and the corresponding note may 
be called grave A, and written A\ For the 
E scale we may possibly have IC, 4D, 8^, 
lOF, 14G, llA, 22B, where 4D is now 
utilised, and becomes grave D\ But these 
A\ D\ are not our Ai, D], and hence the 
scales are different from ours. This is, 
however, pure conjecture. 

No. 75, for the old national Indian instru- 
' ment, a Vina from Madras, in the South IT 
Kensington Museum, gives the value of 
24 notes by measurins vibrating lengths of 
string from fret to bridge, and is, of course, 
very uncertain. It will be found, however, 
that the notes agree with No. 74 better than 
with No. 78, for the scale C D\f D E[f E 
F F% Q A^ k B^c. The other degrees 
could be easily produced by pressing the 
string behind the frets, which were about 
one inch in height. 

Nos. 76 to 80 are five observations of scales 
played by Rajah Rim P4l Singh, and ob- 
served with forks. These were set by alter- 
ing the movable frets of a sit&r. The first 
and fourth are placed together in the table, 
as they are believed to have been meant for 
the same scale, and differed only because 
they were set on different days. They seem 
to be meant for Rajah Sourindro Mohun IT 
Tagore*s first scale. The second setting 
seems meant for his 13th, the third for his 
29th, and the fifth for his 9th. 

No. 81. A wood harmonicon in the South Ken- 
sington Museum, stated to have come from 
Patna, but probably arrived from some hill 
tribes. Its scale resembles one which I 
deduced by measurements of strings from 
a T4r of Cashmere, which was 175 354 
512 720 896 1062 1237, but I thought this 
scale too uncertain to put in the table. 

No. 82. A wood harmonicon sent direct from 
Singapore to Mr. A. J. Hipkins, taking the 
central Octave. 

Nos. 83 to 87. Wood harmonicons in South 
Kensington Museum, of which the last be- 
longed to General Pitt- Rivers. 

Nos. 88 to 92 are inserted because they are the 



522 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



examples of pentatonic scales asually given. 
They are at' any rate now used for penta- 
tonic Scotch music. See supi&, p. 2d9<2. They 
are not, however, by any means usual forms. 

No. 98. A balaf ong from the South Pacific be- 
longing to General Pitt- Rivers, seems to be 
intended for No. 90, but 870, 685 cents for 
400 and 700 cents are both rather flat. 

Nos. 94 to 102. Javese instruments examined 
at the Aquarium, London, in 1882, and pitch 
of notes determined by forks. In Nos. 96 
to 100 the order of these notes settled by 
Mr. W. Stephen Mitchell, and the order 
confirmed by information received through 
Prof. Land of Leyden. Nos. 101 and 102 were 
inferred from information of missionaries 
obtained by Prof. Land. The assumption 
in No. 96 of a division of the Octave into 
five equal parts was confirmed by other 
measurements communicated by Prof. Land. 

Nos. 108 to 109. These seven scales were taken 
from the playing of Chinese musicians at 
the International Health Exhibition, 1885, 
during four private interviews. No. 106 had 
two additional tones of 497 and 797 cents 
above the lowest note ; these were omitted 
in playing by the musician. There was a 
second yiln-lo at the South Kensington Mu- 
seum, also with 10 tones, which gave 52 
240 266 418 487 586 589 712 738, but these 
form no scale. They may be a fund out of 
which scales are constructed. The four fol- 
lowing may be among such: — To a sharp 
Fifth, 240 418 589 712 ; to a fiat Fifth, 
188 866 584 686 ; to a flat Fifth again, 
214 885 587 686 ; to a fourth, 197 349 
498. The last is a Meshaqah tetrachord, 
see No. 58. A chime of four small bells, be- 
longing to Mr. Hermann Smith, gave 312 
480 724. 

Nos. 110 to 189. Japanese scales. Accepting 
the statement of native musicians that the 
intervals are those of equal temperament, 
or at least so near them that Japanese ears 
do not perceive the difference, then the 
theory gives No. 110 and Nos. 113 to 128 
for * popular ' koto tunings. There are 13 
strings to the koto, but only 5 give the scale, 



the rest being Octaves or unisons. Nob. Ill 
and 112, heard at the 'Japanese Village,* 
Knight8bridge,shew how practice sometimes 
overrides theoiy. Several of the scales seem 
to be identical, but they are at different 
pitches, and hence no more identical than 
our major scales for different keys. 

Nos. 124 to 129 are * classical ' koto tunings of 
which 124 126 128 are classed as riosen or 
analogous to our major scales, and 125 127 
129 as ritstuen or analogous to our minor 
scales. This must have been effected by 
sharpening some of the notes by pressure 
on the string behind the bridges which limit 
their vibrating length. 

Nos. 180 and 131 are both ' classical * hepta- 
tonic scales, owing to the introduction of 
the notes marked *. 

Nos. 132 and 183 are both ' popular * hepta- 
tonic scales, in which however the intro- 
duced notes are not pointed out in Mr. 
Isawa's Report on Japanese music at the 
Health Exhibition of 1885, Educational 
Division, from which the scales No. 110 and 
Nos. 113 to 133 have been taken. 

Nos. 184 to 139 result from an examination of 
the Biwa, a classical instrument, closely re- 
sembling the Arabic lute, fretted only as far 
as the Fourth. The strings are toned to 
one another in six different ways, and henoe 
produce a great variety of notes. By touch- 
ing the strings on the frets (taking care not 
to press behind them) and determining the 
pitch of the notes sounded, Mr. Hipkins and 
I found that the tetrachord produced dif- 
fered according to the string employed, as 
shewn in Nos. 134 to 137. The mean of the 
intervals thus determined is given in No. 138, 
and accepting equal temperament, as in the 
whole of .Mr. Isawa*s report, the correspond- 
ing divisions are given in No. 139. These 
divisions were in so far assumed to be cor- 
rect that the three Semitones, though ma- 
terially differing (having the mean values of 
114, 89, and 86 cents), are, in Mr. Isawa's 
account of the notes, considered as alike, 
and exactly half of the value of first Tone, 
which had a mean value of 214 cents. 



IV. How THB8B DlYIBIONS OF THE OCTAVE MAY HAVE ABISEN. 



It is impossible to trace such scales to their germs. Singing and playing on 
pipes were probably the first music. Striking of bone, wooden, and metal bars was 
^ probably also a very early form, and as their notes are tolerably persistent they are 
valuable for determining scales (See Nos. 81 to 87 and 93 to 102). But scales them- 
selves are a great development, and two or three notes, varied rh3rthmically, pro- 
bably long preceded them. We must be content to commence with strings, certainly 
a very late form of musical instrument, on which, however, the chief work of the 
older theorists was expended. After the examples in the latter part of the Table 
we have no right to assume an accurate musical 'ear,' or appreciation of just 
intervals. Even in Europe it requires much practice for the majority to sing 
accurately in tune or to appreciate small errors. (See supra, p. 147(2.) We now 
know that on any stringed instrument such as the violoncello or guitar, where, to 
prevent jarring, the string has to rise further and further from the finger-board 
as the finger proceeds from the nut towards the bridge, the pressure of the finger 
in * stopping ' the string either on the board or fret increases the tension of the 
string, and hence makes the note sharper than it would be if the string could be 
stopped at its natural height, though even then, as we have seen (p. 442a), the 
results are not absolutely trustworthy. The law that the number of vibrations is 



8B0T. K. 



NON-HARMONIC SCALES. 



523 



inversely proportional to the length of the string holds but very roughly for such 
instruments. Thus stopping a violoncello string exactly at its middle gives a note 
sharper than the Octave, hence the finger has to be placed sensibly nearer the nut. 
Moreover, the amount of error depends on the nature of the string. The examples 
Nos. 134 to 137 in the table are very instructive. The determination with which 
those differences are overlooked (see Annotations to these Nos.) is equally in- 
structive. It is evident that Euclid in his Canon for the Pythagorean notes No. 
32, and Abdulqadir in giving his rule for obtaining the 17 notes of his scale No. 
67, considered the division to be perfect, and Prof. Land in calculating the value 
of the notes had, of course, to assimie that it was so. The old intervals were, 
therefore, not so accurately tuned as was supposed, and hence when we take them 
to be accurately tuned we are ourselves inaccurate. 



The fact was strongly impressed on me in 
making an instrument on which I oould play 
any scale expressed in cents. I had a Diohord, 
that is, a double monoohord, constructed with 
wires 1,200 mi Uimdtres long, diameter *3 mm., 
height of nut 7 mm., of bridge 24 mm., from 
sound boatd. Then having a number of laths 
5 nmi. thick, I used them as movable finger- 
boards, and marked on one the place of the 
notes of the just scale as determined by the 
theory of inverse ratios. Trying, by my Har- 
monical, I found every place much too shajrp, 
and it was only by marking the places whion 
gave unisons that I was able to correct the 
error. If any one constructs such an instru- 
ment, I recommend his setting ofi the place 
where he should stop for each semitone for 
two octaves, by a well-tuned pianoforte, and 
then dividing each distance representing a 
semitone into 10 parts. Each ox these parts 
will represent 10 cents with quite sufficient ac- 
curacy, and can be subdivided by the eye. Thus 
a geometrical scale can be constructed by 
means of which the places to touch the string 
can be marked ofi on a new lath, and the scale 
played. This geometrical scale was placed 
under one string and the finger-board to be 
played from under the other. I found it best 
lor accuracy to stop the string with the side 
of my thumb-nail. All the principal scales 
above given were thns realised. 

Now assuming the usual law of division, 
suppose a string, divided in half, giving the 
Octave, and each half subdivided in half , giving 
the Fourth and double Octave. This division 
being the simplest possible would naturally 
give a preponderance to the Fourth, whence 
would arise the tetrachords, the foundation of 
Greek, and hence of European, and of Persian 
and Arabic music. The Fourth is also recog- 
nised in India ; but in pentatonic regions, 
especially in Java, where the string is not in 
use (the rab4b they use is Arabic in name and 
origin, Nos. 69 to 71), the Fourth is not cor- 
rect. It is clearly, therefore, not a primitive 
interval, and the quartering of the string may 
really have much to do with its adoption. 

The interval was, however, too wide, and it 
was necessary to subdivide it. The most ob- 
vious plan was again to quarter it. Thus, the 
additional distances of i^nV^ Ki'v of the string 
from the nut would be obtained, giving the 
vibrating lengths Ht i* H> ^^^ ratio. The first 
gives the diatonic Semitone of 112 cents, and 
its defect from the Fourth 498 cents, the major 
Third of 886 cents, see No. 1.' This H of the 
strings 112 cents is conspicuous in Nos. 1 to 
4, some of the oldest forms. The I = 231 cents, 
we find in No. 72. The ||=d60 cents did not 



come into use, but it is practically Zalzal*s 
855 cents, No. 51. 

Continuing this simplest of aU subdivisions % 
by two, we have half of ^^-i^ot the string 
from the nut, giving the vibrating length |^ of 
the strings: 55 cents. Hence we obtain the 
enharmonic division No. 11. At the same 
time my observations on p. 265, note *, hold 
good, for the errors in coming so near the nut 
as ^V ^^ ^^6 string would be too great to ob- 
tain anything like accurate results by measure- 
ment. On my dichord I found it impossible 
to take less than a semitone of 100 cents with 
any degree of certainty. It is interesting to 
observe that this || of the string gives very 
nearly 50 cents or the Quartertone, and still 
more nearly 54,\, the 22nd part of an Octave, 
correspondmg to the Indian degree (Nos. 78 
and 74 Annotation), and is reaUy the com- 
mencement of the variation of notes by about 
a Quartertone. 

Then the divisions attempted in the South- i| 
em Tambour No. 72, and also in forming the 
Persian middle-finger note, 803 cents (see No. 
66), by taking a place half-way between that 
for 294 cents and 408 cents, and again for Zal- 
zaL's middle-finger note of 355 cents, by taking 
a place half-way between 808 and 408 cents, 
and finally the modem Bengali division of the 
distance occupied by a Fourth on the finger- 
board into nine parts (see No. 74) and that for 
the following Fifth into 18 parts, suggest that 
the attempts were made to divide the ^ of the 
string from the nut to the Fourth, by other 
simple numbers beside 2. The division into 
three parts would be more difficult, but might 
be done very fairly by guess. Now the dis- 
tances of the stopping-place from the nut ^, 
,^=| of the string or the vibrating lengths H 
and ^ of the string corresponding to 151 cents % 
and 816 cents, the first, the Threequartertone, 
which is the real parent of all the neutral 
intervals to be considered presently, and the 
second the minor Third. Both occur in No. 
10, and the minor Third occurs also in Nos. 8 
and 6. 

The division of the whole string into thirds 
could hardly have taken place, but | of the 
string from nut gives the vibrating length | of 
the string =702 cents, the Fifth, which, as 
exceeding the Fourth of 498 cents, would not 
be regarded till the tetrachord had been ex- 
tended to the Octave. The defect of a Fourth 
from a Fifth gave the major Tone, one of the 
most important intervals, also obtained di- 
rectly by taking } of |, or ^ of the string from 
the nut, giving | of the string as the vibrating 
length = 204 cents. This interval finally ab- 
sorbed all the others, except the Fourth, 



524 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX- 



especially after the observation that it was 
also the defect of two Fourths from an Octave. 
Its direct use is apparent in No. 19, where 204 
cents corresponds to I string from nut, and 
408 cents to ^ of the vibrating length of the 
204 cents from the stop for 2(M cents. Thus 
if the nut be called A^ and the stopping-places 
for 204, 408, and 496 be B, C, D, and the 
bridge be Z^ we shall have AD^^j^ AZ^ whence 
DZ=\ AZ ; also AB^l AZ, whence BZ^ 
\ AZ ; also BC=f BZ, whence CZ=l BZ= 
f f AZ. If we suppose the whole length AZ 
divided into 324 parts, thenilJB=:=36, BC=82, 
CD— IS. But the whole division is obtained 
by taking halves and thirds. No. 5 is the 
reverse of No. 19. Let the stopping-places 
for 90 and 294 be E and F, Then DZ^^AZ, 
FZ=^ DZ^DZ+^ DZ, so that F is found 

IT from DZ by adding | DZ, which is obtained 
by continual halving. Again EZ—% FZ=: 
FZ^-\ FZ, so that E is found from ^^ by 
adding I FZ, which is again obtained by con- 
tinual halving. This made it easier to produce 
No. 5 than No. 19. The complicated value of 
AE= ^f AZ would be thus altogether avoided. 
Nevertheless it is most probable that Nos. 5 
and 19 were both obtained simply ' by ear,' 
and that they were never exactly * in tune.' 

The next division of the Fourth to be ex- 
pected is by 5, as in No. 7'2, and this is there- 
fore advanced by Prof. Land as a probable 
means of obtaining the Arabic tetrachord. 
This gives the lengths of the string from the 
nut,,V.A=iV» A. A=i»A = li and *it® vibrat- 
ing lengths ^1^, ^jf, i J, 1,1 of the string giving in- 
tervals of 69, 182, 281, 886, 489 cents. Of these 

IF 89 is a fair representative of 90 in No. 5, 



which has just been otherwise obtained. The 
minor Tone, 182 cents, occurs direct in Nos. 6 
and 7, and also possibly in No. 2, where it 
would be simpler to obtain it from the open 
string as ^ its length than as |f of the vibratixig 
length of 112 cents, that is, eus H^ of ^| of the 
string. The 281 cents appears not to have 
been used, but it approximates to 294 cents, 
which may have been introduced from Greece 
in place of it. This is, however, mere ood- 
jecture. The 386, or major Third, is in No. 7 
only (for No. 8 is not ancient), and there is 
very little probability that it was tuned direct 
It might have been got as 182 + 204 or as 
498-112. Both the 182 and 386 cents were 
certainly lost at an early time in 204 and 408 
cents, so that it is difficult to suppose that 
386 at least was ever obtained directly. K 
was indirectly produced in Nos. 1 and 2, 
where, judging from Japanese habits, the 
tuner tried to get the Semitone by * feeling,' 
and left the major Third to arise as the defect 
of the Semitone from the Fourth. 

The division into 7 parts belongs to a much 
more advanced stskge, and never seems to have 
come into use. But we may understand No. 9 
thus. Stopping at f the string, we obtain a 
vibrating length of f = 267 cents. Then taking 
I of f , or ^ the length for the stopping-place, 
we obtain a vibrating length of |f string =85 
cents, and thus find both intervals in No. 9. 
Of course when the ball had been set rolling, 
and there was no harmony to check the 
fancies of dividers or musicians, such forms as 
Nos. 12 to 24 could be produced. But the 
ancient Nos. 1 to 7 and 9 to 11 (No. 8 was not 
ancient) are sufficient to have traced. 



V. Results op the Inquiry. 

The chief points of interest which the exhibition of these' scales affords appear 
to be the following : 

1. The predominance of the Fourth, and mere evolution of the Fifth, in Greece, 
Arabia, India, and Japan. 



These may be only different forms of some 
original system. The Chinese may have 
imported the principle, but on this the ex- 
treme uncertainty pervading all exhibitions of 
Chinese scales hitherto made (including Van 
Aalst's treatise on Chinese Af2i.sic, 1884), renders 
it difficult to judge. The Fourths actually 
heard are uncertain, see Nos. 108 to 109. But 
they seem at home in Japan, where they are 
^ used in tuning, but may have been imported, 
and they are occasionally absent. In the im- 
portant Javese scales, Nos. 94 to 102, they are 
never in tune. Even in Arabia and India they 
are apt to be altered. The specimens of ruder 



music, Nos. 81 to 87, are not favourable to the 
Fourth. The Fifth never had the same pre- 
dominance. It is constantly too sharp or too 
flat. In modern India generally it is too flat. 
In one set of scales in Java it is too sharp 
(No. 94) ; in the other set as flat, as in India 
(Nos. 74 to 79). These differences probably 
pervaded also the scales of other countries as 
actually used, but we know Greece and Arabia 
frum theory only. That the Fifth is true on 
the bagpipe (No. 52) depends apparently on 
the use of the drone, which would produce 
frightful beats if it were as much out of tune 
as in the other cases cited. 



2. The use of Tones and Semitones of about 200 and 100 cents depends upon 
the Greek tetrachordal system as modified by Pythagorean intonation. 



In Zalzal's scale (No. 51) and even in the 
medieval Arabic scales, Nos. 57 to 65 (that is, 
omitting the three Nos. 54 to 56, which are 
identical with the Greek, and the exceptional 
scales, Nos. 68 to 72), they do not both exist. 
In the Indian scales they are overridden by 
the system of 22 degrees, and only un- 
designedly come close to our equal intonation. 
In the ruder scales Nos. 82 to 87 they cannot 
be traced. In Java they do not exist actually. 



In China great difficulty was felt by the native 
musicians of the Healtn Exhibition of 1884 in 
respect to the Semitones. The Tones were 
variable, and in some cases there seemed to 
be a liking for the minor Tone as in tuning 
the Tamboura, No. 108. In Japan Semitones 
and Tones play a great part theoretically, but 
in the only practical cases I have been able to 
observe, Nos. Ill and 112 both were very un- 
certain, and the Fourth was absent. 



SECT. K. 



NON-HARMONIC SCALES. 



525 



3. Neutral intervals, each lying between two European intervals, and having 
the character of neither, but serving for either, abound. 



The earliest instance is 151 cents in No. 10, 
which is the Threequartertone between the 
Semitone of 90 or 112 cents and the tone of 
182 or 204 cents; thus J x (90 + 204) = 147= 
J X (112+182). In ZalzaVs No. 51, it was 
855-204 = 151, and 498-355=143 cents; in 
the bagpipe observed, No. 52, it was 341- 
197 = 144, and 495-341 = 154,858-703 = 160, 
1009-853 = 146 cents, merely variants of 
tuning; Meshaqah's theory gave 150 cents. 
In bagpipe music it serves indifferently for 
what would be a Tone or a Semitone in music 
for another instrument. In the Japanese 
oases, No. Ill represents the two theoretical 
Semitones by 357 -198 » 164, and 801-719 = 
82 cents, and No. 112 by 337 -185=152, and 
790-683=107 cents. 

Zalzal's neutral Third of 355 cents. No. 51, 
is so truly neutral between the just minor and 



major Thirds, 316 and 386 cents, that Mr. 
Hipkins was quite unable to determine to 
which it most nearly approached in character, 
but for 845 and 365 cents, as tried on my 
dichord (p. 5226), the minor and major 
characters were slightly but decidedly felt. 
In the observed bagpipe this interval was 341 
cents. In Meshaqah's Quartertone tempera- 
ment it was 850 cents, which may be taken as 
its usual tempered form. It is the 874 of the 
New Indian, No. 74, as shewn in Nob. 76, 77, 
and 80. Compare also Nos. 81 to 84, 103, 
105, 106, and 109. The correlative neutral 
Sixth arises similarly. 

The neutral Tritone, 550 cents, is alsolj 
sometimes found, but it is rare, and as the 
Tritone, 600 cents, is itself rare, this neutral 
form is not easily observed. See Nos. 73, 74, 
76, 78, 79, 82, 83, 84, and perhaps 96. 



4. Modern Arabic and Indian scales have changing or alternative intervals, 
produced by varying the pitch of one or more of the regular notes in any one scale, 
by a Quartertone or Degree. 



To a smaller extent alternative tones are 
known in Europe. Thus the just major scale 
borrows its occasional grave second from the 
subdominant key, where the difference is only 
a comma of 22 cents. Nos. 62, 63, 65 have 
each two tones which differ by only a conmia 
of 24 cents, namely 1176 and 1200 in Nos. 62 
and 63, and 678 and 702 in No. 65. The 
scales consequently have 8 tones, as our just 
major scale of C would have if we inserted 
both D and Dy This, however, disappears in 
tempered intonation. Again our just ascend- 
ing minor scale of Ai has two alternative 
notes, Fjt and OJL^ ^ well &s F and G, and 
these remain in tempered intonation. If we 
inserted these, we might say that our minor 
scale had 9 tones. Similarly No. 64 has 
8 tones, with three intervals of 114 cents 
between 180 and 294, 678 and 792, 1086 and 
1200, and one interval of 90 cents between 
792 and 882. We might suppose that 792 and 
882 are alternative notes, and that we might 
play either 

180 294 498 678 882 1086 1200, or else 
180 294 498 678 792 1086 1200, 

the three final intervals in the first case being 
204 204 114, and in the second 114 294 114. 
This, however, is only an illustration, and is 
not the point raised. Meshaqah's complete 
scale consists of 24 Quartertones to the Octave, 
for two Octaves, each tone having its own 
individual name. Of these, only 7 are selected 
to form the normal scale, namely No. 53. But 
anyone of these 7 notes maybe raised (or also 
probably depressed) by one or two Quarter- 
tones. And so freely is this variation of the 



scale employed, that of the 95 snatches of 
melodies which Eli Smith reports from Mesha- 
qah, there are only 7 in which some change is 
not occasionally made. Sometimes the change 
is in ascending and not in descending or con- 
versely. Thus in the air called Bemelt I find 
9 notes, the alternatives 950 and 1100 being 
introduced so that the scale, instead of ending 
700 850 1000 1200 ends as 700 850 950 1000 m 
1100 1200. Something of the kind occurs in ^' 
bagpipe-playing at the present day, owing to 
the system known as * crossfingering,' which 
gives nominally two ways of fingering the 
same g", but actually produces two slightly 
different notes, the sharper being used in 
ascending passages. This was ol^rved by 
Mr. Bosanquet at a bagpipe competition, and 
has been confirmed on inquiry by Messrs. 
Glen, the great bagpipe makers of Edinbuigh. 
A similar thing apparently occurs in Indian 
scales, where some of the notes may be de- 
pressed one, two, or three degrees, and others 
raised by similar amounts as shown in Nos. 73 
and 74. And there seem to be other altera- 
tions of the kind not written, but conditioned 
by the rdgirU or modelet in which the 
musician is playing. This is a point which 
greatly requires elucidation. U 

These tones changing by a degree are made 
by pressing the string behind the fret or de- 
flecting it along the fret A similar thing 
occurs in playing the Japanese koto. The 
player is constantly pressing slightly or heavily 
on the string beyond the bridge, or pulling 
the string towards the bridge, and thus more 
or less sharpening or flattening the pitch of 
the note. 



5. Scales of five tones may be formed by omission from scales of seven tones, 
but on the other hand many scales of five tones seem to be entirely independent of 
tones of seven tones, neither generating them nor being generated by them. 



Though some of Chinese pentatonic scales, pentatonic scales are thoroughly independent 
as Nos. 103 and 107, seem to be derived from of any heptatonic form. No. 94 and Nos. 97 
heptatonio or conversely, yet all the Javese to 102 could not be expressed as parts of even 



526 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XI. 



oar chromatic scale of 12 semitones. Euro- 
pean musicians, indeed, persist in hearing and 
writing the SalSndro scales, 

properly 240 480 720 960 1200, 
as 200 500 700 900 1200, 
or 300 600 700 1000 1200 

but this must arise from their not appreciating 
240 cents, which is almost a neutnJ interval 
between a Tone, 200, and a minor Third, 300, 
and is hence mistaken by European ears some- 
times for one and sometimes for the other. 
As for the Pelog scales, I cannot find that 
any one has ventured to put their airs into a 
European dress, the intervals No. 96 are so 
strange. I have however tried to appreciate 
them by having a concertina tuned with the 
white studs in Sal^ndro (tuning E and F and 
m also B and as unisons), and the black studs 
in Pelog, and writing them with the notes 



which would belong to the stud uaed in the 
ordinaiy tuning. For the Saltodro I need the 
airs in Raffles's Java, and in Gravrford's paper 
in the Tagore collection. For the Pelog I had 
to invent airs myself. The characters of the 
two sets are quite unlike. But peotatonic 
Scotch airs played with the Saldndro scale are 
quite recognisable. Whether this scale is the 
primitive pentatonic scale it is quite impos- 
sible to say. 

In Japan the koto tunings are all penta- 
tonic, and according to theoiy the ' popular ' 
have intervals of a Semitone, a Tone, and a 
major Third, whereas the 'classical' have 
intervals only of a Tone and a minor Thirds 
just as on the commonly received black digi- 
tals of a piano; but the classical is said to 
come from China. In practice probably th 
intervals are varied as in Nos. Ill and 112. 



6. Pentatonic sccJes do not necessarily arise from inability to appreciate 
Semitones. 



This is shewn by the Javese Pelog notes, 
which contain intervals of 137, 129, 112, 133, 
and 102 cents, and by the Japanese popular 
koto tunings. No. 110 and Nos. 113 to 123, all 
pentatonic, and theoretically founded on the 



diatonic Semitone. If in practice the diat<Hiic 
Semitone sometimes grows to a Threequarter- 
tone, it also sinks to a small Semitone, see Nos. 
Ill and 112. 



8. There is an entire absence of tonality in our sense of the term and of any 
attempt at harmony. 



There is regard to the final cadence, at 
least in Meshaqah's scales, and probably in 
all. There is in the Indian a ruler note (vhdi), 

f see p. 248c', and mifmier notes (mmvddi), 
which function as our tonic, dominant and 
subdominant in certain respects, and Prof. 
Helmholtz thinks he discovers a reference to a 
tonic in Aristotle (p. 241). But the European 
feeling of tonality is one of very late growth, 
and in non-harmonic scales must have been 
something quite different, and if we refer it to 
the same feeling as our own, it is from want of 
power to appreciate the feeling of those who 
use non-harmonic scales. This is parallel to 
what constantly happens in appreciating the 
intervals of these scales. 

There is plenty of ensemble playing with 
notes of very different qualities of tone, but 
they regularly proceed in unisons and Oc- 
taves. In the Indian instruments there are 
sympathetic and secondary strings. The for- 
mer have their partials evoked' by the notes 
played. The latter, generally tuned in rela- 

^ tions of an Octave Fourth or Fifth, are occa- 
sionally thrummed. But there is nothing like 
a chord, or a tissue of harmony. It would not 
be possible with the notes at command. There 
is ^^odiacojnt playing as in the old polyphony 
before harmony proper was invented. Prof. 
Land, speaking of the Gamelan, or band of 
Javese musicians sent by the independent 
prince of Solo to the Amheim Industrial Ex- 
hibition in 1879, says : ' The (musical treat- 
ment is this. The rabdb plays the tune in the 
character of leader' [at the Aquarium, the 
player of the gambang (wooden bar harmo- 
nium) seemed to be leader] ; ' the others play 
the same tune, but figured, and each for him- 
self and in his own way ; the s&ron (metal bar 
harmonium) resumes the motive or tune. All 
this is accompanied by a sort of hcaao osti- 
natOf and a rhythmical movement of the drum, 



and the whole is divided into regular sections 
and subsections by the periodical strokes of 
the gongs and kenongs pcettles]. The varia- 
tions of the same tune by the different instru- 
ments produce a sort of barbarous harmony, 
which has, however, its lucid moments, 
when the beautiful tone of the instruments 
yields a wonderful effect. But the principal 
charm is in the quality of the sound, and the 
rhythmical accuracy of the playing. The 
players know by heart a couple of hundred 
pieces, so as lo be able to take any of the 
instruments in turn.* 

In his report on Japanese music, Hr. S. 
Isawa, director of the Musical Institute at 
Tokio, distinctly claims a species of harmony 
for Japan, and gives an arrangement of the 
Greek *Hymn to Apollo* (Ghappell, p. 174), 
which he had directed ' a Gourt musician, 
and a member of the [Musical] Institute, to 
harmonise purely accoiding to the principles 
of Japanese classical music* It was set for 
five instruments, the Riuteki (fuye), Hichiriki, 
She, Koto, and Biwa. I possess tiie copy of 
the music in European notation, sent to the 
Educational Section of the Health EixhlMtaon 
in 1884. Though much was in Octaves, the 
koto played a ^^red form, with dissonances, 
followed by consonances. A non-professional 
Japanese gentleman, a student of physics, ac- 
quainted vrith European music, in answering 
my questions, says : ' Anything like European 
[harmony] cannot be heard in Japan. If it 
exist, it is of the rudest possible description. 
We have certainly ensemble playing with many 
instruments of different sorts ; but it seems 
to me that we have no idea of such things 
as chords. . . . We so generally parallel in 
Octaves and in Fifths, rarely in Fourths, 
but there are cases where two cufferent tones, 
not belonging to the three consonances, am 
sounded, but they are not hairmomc^ but what 



SECT. L. RECENT WORK ON BEATS AND COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



527 



HelmhoHz calls polyphonic. We have many 
figures for accompaniment. ... In popular 
music, we meet with oases where two instru- 
ments play Octaves or Fifths. With singing 
this would also hold, but it is veiy rare that 
X>eople ever sing chorus/ 

At the same time, as the Japanese use a 
system of twelve notes to the Octave, which 



they do not seem to distinguish from Euro- 
pean equally tempered notes, and which will 
probably be soon reduced to that form by the 
labour of Mr. Isawa, there seems to be no 
reason why harmony should not be naturakl- 
ised, like so many European customs, in the 
wonderfully progressive country of Japan. 



It may be added, although it cannot appear from the table of the scales, that in 
listening to native Javese, Chinese, and Japanese performers, there seemed to be 
a total absence of what we term expression. There was no piano and forte, no 
shading or nuance^ merely a hard playing of the notes, as on street mechanical 
pianos. They appeared to depend principally on gongs, clacks, or accumulation 
of various instruments to give rhythm and spirit to the music. But so far as I 
could judge by the very little Indian music I heard from Eajah 'Rim P41 Singh, it 
seems to have some expression, as it certainly has an extremely varied rhythm, 
sounding very strange to European ears. (See Siamese scales, Postscript, p. 556.) H 

■ 

SECTION L. 



BBCBNT WOBS ON BBATB AND COMBINATIONAL TONES. 

(See notes throughout part II., pp. 152-238, and especially pp. 48, 55, 126, 151, 152, 155, 156, 
157, 159, 167, 199, 202, 204, 205, 226, 229, 281, and 420. The reader is particularly re- 
quested to defer any reference to this Section L until he has studied Part II., and become 
familiar with the whole phenomenon of beats and combinational tones, and with Prof. 
Helmholtz's theories respecting their origin. Until such familiarity has been gained, much 
of what follows will be unintelligible. 



Art. 

1. Papers considered, p. 527. 

i.-v. Eoenig ; vi. Bosanquet ; vii. and 
viii. Preyer. 

2. Koenig's Simple Tones, p. 528. 

(a) Simple tones of forks, p. 528. 
• (6) Simple tones of the wave-sirens, 
p. 529. 

3. The Phenomena which arise when Two 

Tones Gire Sounded together, p. 529. 
(a) The facts as distinct from theory, 

p. 529. 
(6) Upper and lower beats and beat- 
notes, p. 529. 

(c) Limits within which either one or 

both beat notes are heard, p. 529. 

(d) Beat-notes and differential tones, 

p. 580. 
(«) Bosanquet's summary of the phe- 
nomena, p. 530. 

4. Objective Beats and Subjective Beats, Beat- 

Notes, and Differential Tones, p. 581. 
(a) Objective beats, p. 581. 

!b) Subjective beats and notes, p. 581. 
c) Preyer*8 experiments to shew the 
subjectivity of differential tones, 
p. 581. 

Art. 1. Papers considered. 
The papers here considered are 

i. R. EoENia. Ueber den Zusammenklcmg Zweler Time (on the sounding of 
two tones at the same time). Fogg. Annal, Feb. 1876, vol. 167, pp. 177-287. 



Art. 

(d) Subjectivity of Summational Tones, 
p. 582. 

5. Theory of Beats, Beat-Notes, and Combina- 
tional Tones, p. 582. 

(a) Origin of beats, p. 582. 
(6) Can beats generate tones? First, 
beats of intermittence, p. 538. ^ 

(c) Can beats generate tones ? Secondly, 
beats of interference, p. 588. 

(d) Would a tone generated by beats be 
louder than its primaries ? p. 534. 

{e) Experiments with the wave- siren, 
p. 584. 

(f) Beats and beat-notes heard together, 
p. 535. 

ig) Beat -notes and beat- tones, p. 585. 

(h) Koenig's explanation of summational 
tones, p. 586. 

(i) Koenig's theory of the origin of 
beat-notes, p. 586. 

{k) Lecture-room demonstration of beat- 
notes, p. 586. 

6. Influence of Difference of Phase on Quality 
of Tone, p. 587. Tl 

7. Influence of Combinational Tones on the 
Consonance of Simple Tones, p. 587. 



This paper appeared a year before the 4th 
German edition of Helmholtz's Tonempfln- 
dungen, and is cursorily referred to, supri&, p. 
1596. The other papers of Koenig here men- 
tioned appeared subsequent to Prof. Helm- 
holtz*s 4th German edition. But this paper 
is placed first because it commenced the new 
investigations. A translation appeared in the 
PhilosSphiodL Magassme, June 1876, and sup- 
plement of the same date, pp. 417-446, 511- 



525, under the title 'On the Simultaneous 
Sounding of Two Notes,* and communicated 
by the late W. Spottiswoode, President R. S., 
who also read a paper on ' Beats and Combi- 
nation Tones ' before the Musical Association 
on May 5, 1879 (Proceedings of Mu». A,, 
1878-9, pp. 118-180), when he exhibited K.'s 
apparatus and repeated several of his experi- 
ments. 



528 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



A pp. XI. 



ii. B. EoENiG. Ueber die Erregung harmonischer Obertone durch Schwingtmgm 
eines Grundtones (On the excitement of harmonic upper partials by the vibrations 
of a fundamental tone). Wiedemann, Annal. 1880, vol. xi., pp. 857-870. 

This treats of a subject incidentally mentioned, suprii, 169a, in reference to combinational 
tones. 

iii. R. EoENiQ. Ueber den Ursprung der Stosse und Stosstdne bei harmonischen 
Intervallen (On the origin of beats and beat-tones for harmonic intervals), 
Wiedemann, Annal. 1881, vol. xii. pp. 335-349, introducing an entirely new 
method of experimenting by means of the wave-siren. 

iv. R. EoENiG. Beschreibung eines Stosstoneapparates fur Vorlesungsversuche 
(Description of a beat tone apparatus for lecture-room experiments), Wiedem., 1881, 
immediately after the last paper, vol. xii. pp. 350-353. 

V. R. KoBNiG. Bemerkungen ilber die Klangfarbe (Remarks on quality of tone), 
T Wied., 1881, vol. xiv., pp. 369-393, more fully describing the wave-siren of No. iil 



In drawing up this notice I made use solely 
of the original German papers just cited. But 
I find that Dr. Koenig has republished the 
whole of his 16 acoustical papers, of which 
those just cited form the 9th, 14th, 10th, 11th, 
and 16th, respectively, in<the French language, 
in one volume, with beautifully printed wood- 
engravings, under the title of Quelques Ex- 



p^iences d^Acoustique, 1882, to be had at his 
present establishment, 27 Quai d*Anjou, Paris, 
and I have made some use of the additional 
notes then added. I cordially recommend 
this collection as a valuable and almost indis- 
pensable supplement to Prof. Helm.holtz*s 
work. 



vi. R. H. M. BosANQUET. On the Beats of Consonances of the Form h : 1. 
Proceedings of the Physical Society of London, vol. iv., Aug. 1880 to Dec, 1881, 
pp. 221-256. This was written before B. had seen No. iii. and iv. above. 

vii. W. Pbeyer. Ueber die Grenzen der Tonwahrnehmung (On the limits 
of the perception of tone) containing the sections. I. The Lower Tones. II. The 
Highest Tones. III. Sensitiveness for Difference of Pitch. IV. Sensitiven^s 
for the Sensation of Interval. Y. Sensation of Silence. Forming the first part 
IT of the first series of Physiologische Abhandlungen (Physiological Essays) edited 
by W. Preyer, M.D. and Ph.I)., Prof, of Physiology and Director of the Physio- 
logical Institute at Jena, 1876, the year before the publication of the 4th German 
edition of Helmholtz, who quotes it several times. It is here inserted for com- 
pleteness. 

viii. W. Pbeyeb. Akustische Untersuchungen {AoouQticaA Investigations) in the 
same collection, second series, fourth part, containing I. Deepest Tones without 
upper partial Tones (supri, see footnote, pp. 176-7). II. Combinational Tones and 
upper partial Tones of Tuning Forks. III. Contributions to the Theory of Con- 
sonance. IV. Notice on the Perception of the smallest differences of Pitch, 
Jena, 1879. 

These will be cited by the initial of the editions of vii. and viii. Prof. Helmholts will 

author, K. or B. or P. followed by the number be cited as H., generally followed by the page 

of the paper, and generally by the page, which of this edition, 
in the case of P. will refer to the separate 

f Art. 2. Koenig*s Simple Tones, 

(a) Simple Tones of Forks. The tones dealt with by K. are as simple as 
E. could make them. 'The forks that I used with resonators/ says K. iiL 337, 
' had no recognisable harmonic upper partials at all. The occurrence of harmonic 
upper partials in tuning-forks depends not so much on the lowness of their pitch 
and the amplitude of their vibrations as on the relation of the amplitude to the 
thickness of the prongs.' 



From a c fork (128 d. v.) with prongs 
7 mm. (= *28 inch) thick, K. obtained as many 
as 4 partials. From another c fork with 
prongs 15 mm. (= '59 inch) thick and 20 mm. 
(~ '79 inch) wide, only two partials were gen- 
erally obtained, but extremely violent blows 
brought out a 3rd partial. With prongs 
29 mm. (1*14 inch) thick and 40 mm. (= 1*57 
inch) wide, it was not possible to hear even a 
faint Octave, and a Twelfth, except when the 



opening of the resonator tuned to them, almost 
touched the prongs of the fork. The pitch of 
forks varies directly as the thickness, and in- 
versely as the square of the length, of their 
prongs (E. iii. 888). K. proceeds to mention 
that the forks he used, even the laigest, wh&i 
placed before properly tuned resonators,had no 
detectable upper partials. Subsequently B. 
repeated E.'s observations in part with the 
stopped organ-pipes of B.'s experimental 



SECT. L. RECENT WORK ON BEATS & COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



529 



organ, in which only the Twelfth or 8rd par- 
tial was perceptible and could be allowed for. 
Also, afterwards, E. iii. 342, used stopped 
organ-pipes and tuning-forks. B. used tones 

(b) Simple Tones of the Wave Siren, 
however, E. invented the wave siren. 

An harmonic curve constructed on a large 
scale and reduced by photography was out on 
the edge of a wheel. The wheel revolved 
under a narrow slit, placed exactly in the 
position of a radius of the wheel, through 
which wind was driven as the wheel rotated. 
The curve alternately cut ofi and let pass the 
stream of air, and produced a perfectly simple 
tone, the pitch of which depended on the ra- 
pidity of rotation. Forms of this wave siren 
are figured in K. iii. 346, 347, and K. v. 386. 
The last shews 16 harmonic curves which 
may be made to act in any groups, producing 
all the combinations of perfectly simple tones, 



of moderate force, and K. also used weak tones 
with the pipe, and not the strong tones of his 
tuning-forks mentioned in K. i. 



To avoid the suspicion of upper partials, 



of which the ratio numbers lie between 1 and 
16. Hence, although upper partials are found 
on most tuning-forks, and especially on cer- 
tain of K.*s forks, it would be wrong to assume 
(as P. ii. 38 apparently assumes) that in all 
K.*B cases, at least the Octave was audible. 
This was not the case with stopped organ- 
pipes used by both K. and B., and still less so 
with the tones of the wave siren. K.*s results 
therefore cannot be explained by upper partial 
tones. But when we are dealing with com- 
pound tones ecich pair of partials forms af 
combination of simple tones to which K.^b 
observations apply. 



Art. 3. — The Phenomena which arise when two notes are sounded together^ ac* 
cording to Koendg and Bosanquet. 

(a) The facts as distinct from theory. We must distinguish the phenomena from 
any theoretical explanation of them that may be proposed. The phenomena de- 
scribed by such an acoustician as E., so careful in experiments, so amply provided 
with the most exact instruments, will, I presume, be generally accepted. The 
theory by which he seeks to account for them is a matter for discussion. The 
following relates* to two simple tones only, and this must be carefully borne in 
mind, because H. 1596 apparently imagined that the tones used really had upper 
partials. 

(b) Upper amd Lower Beats amd Beat-Notes, 

If two simple tones of either very slightly or greatly different pitches, called 
generators, be sounded together, then the upper pitch number necessaidly liesT 
between two multiples of the lower pitch number, one smaller and the other 
greater, and the differences between these multiples of the pitch number of the 
lower generator and the pitch number of the upper generator give two numbers 
which either determine the frequency of the two sets of beats which may be heard 
or the pitch of the two beat-notes which may be heard in their place. The term 
' beat-notes ' is here used toithout any theory as the origin of such tones, but only 
to shew that they are tones having the same frequency as the beats, which are 
sometimes heard simultaneously. 



Referring to the tables in the Translator's 
footnote to p. 191 supr&, which relate to com- 
pound tones, and therefore contain multiples 
of the pitch numbers (or of the numbers which 
give the interval ratios) of two generators, we 
see from the minor Tenth 5 : 12, that the 
prime 12 of the upper generator lies between 
10 and 16, the 2Dd and 3rd multiples of the 
lower generator, and hence the beat or beat- 
note frequencies would be 12 - 10 = 2, and 
15 - 12 = 8. If, then, the two generators are 
low enough, say, having the pitch-numbers 
5 X 6 =: 80 and 12 x 6 = 72, the beats heard 
would be 2 X 6 a 12 and 3 x 6 =: 18, which 
would be plainly distinguishable as beats. 



But if they were higher, as 5 x 20 a 100 and 
12 X 20 =a 240, the beats would be 2 x 20 » 40, 
and 3 x 20 == 60, which, though far too rapid 
to be counted, would be clearly heard as beats, 
and at ths same time the beat-notes of 40 and 
60 vib. would also be audible. If, however, 
they were much higher, as 5 x 100 = 500 and 
12 X 100 s 1200, then only the beat-notes of 
2 X 100 » 200 and 3 X 100 = 800 vib. would f 
be heard. The beats heard are then the same 
05 if the upper generator were simple and the 
lower generator compound ; but it must be 
remembered that both generators are really 
simple. 



The frequency arising from the lower multiple of the lower generator is called 
the frequency of the lower beat or lower beat-note, that arising from the higher 
multiple is called the frequency of the higher beat or beat-note, without at all 
implying that one set of beats should be greater or less than the other, or that 
one beat-note should be sharper or flatter than the other. They are in recJity 
sometimes one way and sometimes the other. 

(c) Limits within which either one or both Beat-Notes are heard. Both sets of 
beats, or both beat-notes, are not usually heard at the name time. If we divide the 
intervals examined into groups (1) from 1 : 1 to 1 : 2, (2) from 1 : 2 to 1 : 3, 
(3) from 1 : 3 to 1 : 4, (4) from 1 : 4 to 1 : 5, ~attd so on, the lower beats and 

M M 



630 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



beat-tones extend over little more than the lower half of each group, and the 
upper beats and beat-tones over little more than the upper half. For a short 
distance in the middle of each period both sets of beats, or both beat-notes, are 
audible, and these beat-notes beat with each other, forming secondary beats, or are 
replaced by new or secondary beat-notes. 

(d) Beat-Notes and Differential Tones, The lower beats, as long as they are 
distinctly audible, and refer to an interval less than 5 : 6, or a minor Third, agree 
with the beats of H. 171a, and when they have a greater frequency than from 16 
to 20 there is also heard the beat-note, which then coincides in pitch with the 
differential tone of H. 153a. Above a minor Third, H. 171d says the beats are 
practically inaudible. E. however hears them — and B. vi. 235-237 also heard 
them — ^passing over into a roll and a confused rattle, as far as the major Sixth 
{C : A^ for the lower beats. 



In other respects K.'s beat-notes are differ- 
^ ent from H.'s differential tones. Thas for the 
minor Tenth 5 : 12, our first example, the 
beat-notes are 2 and 8, as just shewn, but the 
differential tone is 12 * 5 » 7, which is not 
obtained by K. i. 216, who says : * These inter- 
vals, which are formed by high tones, allow 
the beat-notes to be heard quite loudly, but 
give no trace of differential tones. Thus 
(f" : b'" (8 : 15) gives only 1 and no trace of 7, 
c'" :dr' (4:9) gives only 1 and nothing of 
e'" (6) ; d"\jr' (8 : 8) only / and /' and no 
a"' (5) at all, hence the differential tones must 
be extraordinarily weaker than the beat-notes. 
But I was able to establish the actual exist- 
ence of these differential tones with certainty 
by forming the above intervals with deeper 
notes, which, lasting longer, allowed me by 
means of auxiliary forks to get a definite 
number of beats with the differential tones in 
IT question.* This experiment I have repeated 
several times. I made the tone of the generat- 
ing forks as loud as possible by holding them 
over resonance jars. The auxiliary fork had 
to be held at a considerable distance from its 
jar in order to reduce its loudness to about 
that of the differential tone, to allow the beats 
to be counted. Thus the mistuned minor 
Tenth 228*77 : 589*18 gave the differential 
tone 815*41, which, although inaudible, beat 
wilh the fork 819*59 audibly 4*18, which was 
counted as 4*2. And so on in other cases. 

In the case of a mistuned Octave, it appears 
to me that the lower fork acts as this auxiliary 
fork to catch the differential tone. Thus the 
mistuned Octave 223*77 : 451*14 gives the dif- 
ferential tone 227*87, which would possibly 
have been quite inaudible if it had not been 
caught by the lower fork, with which it made 
5T 8*6 beats in a second, as I myself counted. In 
this case I had to hold the higher fork far 
above the resonance jar. The beats were heard 
as low beats at the pitch of the lower fork. Also 
in this case, on continuing to hold the high 
fork over the resonance jar of the upper fork 
to weaken its sound, but bringing the low fork 
over the higher resonance jar as closely as 
possible, the higher Octave of that fork, or 
447*54, was produced, which beat with the 
higher fork also 8*6 times ; but now the beat 
was clearly and distinctly at the pitch of the 
upper fork. This was a beat of the 2nd par- 
tial of the lower fork with the upper fork, and 
was altogether distinct in character from the 
lower beat. Hence the beats could not be 



confused when heard separately, although the 
frequency was the same. K., so far as I can 
see, does not anywhere mention the pitch of 
the beats he heard, but B., vi. 287-9, saji 
that in all cases he has observed, when the 
required partials have been removed, 'the 
beats . . . consist entirely of variations of in- 
tensity of the lower note,* and adds that, * as 
he (K.) does not analyse the beats, we oaniiot 
tell whether the variations of the lower note 
were produced in his experiments *. Mr. Blaik- 
ley (Ptoc. Mus. Assn. 1881-2, p. 25) relates, 
however, that when K. exhibited the beats to 
him in Paris, K. said : * You hear distinctly — 
there can be no doubt about it — that the beat- 
ing note is the lower one*. This gives K.'s 
opinion, which Mr. Blaikley did not share. 

Observe that K. does not deny the exist- 
tenoe of tones having the pitch of differential 
(or summational) tones, but, as in this case, 
he shews their existence, and that they are 
distinct from his beat-notes, having frequently 
a different, and only occasionally the same, 
pitch. When, therefore, B., vi. 289, talks of 
second, third, and fourth combinational tones 
having been demonstrated directly by K., he 
seems to have identified beat-notes and differ- 
ential tones, which, however, K. distinguishes. 

The above observations of K. on differential 
tones are taken from the German edition of 
K.*s paper in 1876. In the French republica- 
tion in 1882 they still appear, but in paren- 
theses, and with a long note (ibid. p. 190), in 
which he states that subsequent investigations 
have induced him to change bis opinion, as he 
finds that even very wide harmonic intervals 
between extremely weak tones may produce 
distinct beats. Hence (for the case where an 
auxiliary fork produced beats with two forks 
having the ratio 8 : 15, shewing a yery weak 
tone 7, that might have arisen from * the tone 
of the lower beats of 8 and 15 *), in his Ger- 
man summary of results K. i. 236, paragraph 
III. 6, admitted the actual existence of differ- 
ential tones, though ' extraordinarily weaker 
than beat-notes * *, but in his French republica- 
tion (p. 147) he has altered this parsgraph to : 
* No experiment has yet proved with certainty 
the existence of differential and summational 
tones*. Observe that the existence of tones 
with the pitch of differential tones is not dis- 
puted. It is only the theoretical origin of such 
tones that is called in question. At present it 
seems impossible to decide that point. 



{e) BosomqvsCs sumvuiry of the phenomena, B. vi. 228. ' As two notes of 
equal amplitudes separate from unison, they are at firat received by the ear in the 



SECT. L. RECENT WORK ON BEATS & COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



ftSl 



manner of resultant displacements, consisting of the beats of a note whose fre- 
quency is midway between the primaries. When the interval reaches about two 
commas [say 43 or 50 cents], the ear begins to resolve the resultant displacements, 
and the primary notes step in beside the beats. When the interval reaches a 
minor Third in the ordinary parts of the scale, neither the beats nor the inter- 
mediate pitch of the resultant note are any longer audible, at least as matter of 
ordinary perception ; but the resultant displacement which reaches the ear is 
decomposed, and produces the sensation of the two primary notes, perfectly distinct 
from each other : that is to say, Ohm's law has set in, and is true, for ordinary 
perceptions and in the ordinary regions of the scale, for the minor Third and all 
greater intervals.' These phenomena are not mentioned by Koenig, and in my 
own observations I feel a difficulty in appreciating them. 

Art. 4. — Objective Beats and Subjective Beats, Beat-Notes and Differential 
Tones. 

(a) Objective Beats. Beats of a disturbed unison exist objectively as disturb- T 
ances in the air before it reaches the ear. They are reinforced by resonators, they 
disturb sand, &c. In the case of the beats of harmonium reeds in Appunn's 
tonometer, they strongly shook the box containing the reeds. Other beats, beat- 
notes, and combinational tones appear not to exist externally to the ear. 

(b) Subjective Beats and Notes, K. i. 221 says : ' Neither these combinational 
tones nor the beat-notes already described are reinforced by resonators '. B. vi. 
233-4, after describing his improved resonator, by means of which he can effec- 
tually block up both ears against any sound but that coming from a resonance 
jar (see p. 43^', note I), says : ' By means of these arrangements I sometime ago 
examined the nature of the ordinary first difference-tone, and convinced myself 
that it is not capable of exciting a resonator. In short, the difference-tone of H., 
or first flower] beat-note of K., as ordinarily heard, is not objective in its character. 
. . . When the nipples of the resonator-attistchment fitted tightly into the ears, no- 
thing reached the ear but the uniform vibrations of the resonator sounding C But 
if there was the slightest looseness between the nipple and the passage of either ear, 
the second note (c) of the combination got in, and gave rise to the subjective 
difference-tone (first [lower] beat-note of K.), by the interference of which with the IT 
C I explain the beats on that note. These beats are therefore subjective,' 



This expression is not meant to imply that 
they are the product of the imagination, but 
that they do not exist externaUy to the ear. 
Henoe, when H. 157c says that they are at 
least partly objective, although he admits that 
the greater part of the strength of combina- 
tional tones arises only within the ear, and 



again says, H. 216a, that he has * always been 
able to hear the deeper combinational tones of 
the second order, when the tones have been 
played on the harmonium and the ear was 
assisted by proper resonators,' he had possibly 
not succeeded in blocking both ears properly 
against the outer air. 



(c) Preyer's eocperirrients to shew the subjectivity of Differential Tones, P. viii. 
II. had seven tuning-forks of extraordinary dehcacy constructed, giving / 170§, 
c' 256, / 341 J, a' 426§, c" 512, /' 682|, g" 768 vibrations, and hence having the 
ratios 2:3:4:5:6:8:9, which were so ready to vibrate on the sHghtest ex- 
citement that they could be experimented on at night only. The three lowest 
forks had the following partials. 

Fork /had the 2nd/' strong, the 3rd c" strong, and the 4th/'' weak. 

Fork c' had the 2nd c" strong and the 3rd g" strong. 

Fork/ had the 2nd/" strong. 

Sounding these forks in pairs to get the differential tones, 

c" &/gave/' or 6-2-4; /" &/gavec" or8-2 = 6; ^f" & c' gave c" or 9-3 = 6 ; 

and that these tones were objective enough was shewn by their making the forks 
/', c" vibrate sympathetically. But we see that/' and c" are partials of /and c', 
which existed already strongly on those forks, and if the forks / and c' were 
sounded separately, they also made the forks /', c" vibrate sympathetically. 
Hence these results did not prove the objective existence of their differential dupli- 
cates. On the other hand, the pairs of forks giving the audible differential tones — 

/"_ c"=/ or 8 - 6 =» 2, a'-c'^f or 5 - 3 = 2, c"-/'-/ or 6 - 4 = 2, 
g"- c"-c' or 9 -6=3, a'-/=c' or 5 - 2 =3,/"- a'= c' or 8 - 5 = 3, 
^"-.a'=/'or9 - 5 = 4,^^" -/' = a' or 9 - 4 = 5,/"- c'=a'or8 -3=5, 

utterly failed to produce the slightest effect on the forks having the same pitch. 

MM 2 



r 



532 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



(d) Subjectivity of Summational Tones, Again, for summational tones the 
combined forks 

/+/ = c"or2 + 4=6,/+ c" = /"or 2 + 6 = 8, c' +c"«^"or 3 + 6 = 9 

gave tones perfectly objective, but then these tones c" f g" already existed as 
partials of one of the two forks excited. On the other hand, 

/ + c'- a' or 2 + 3 = 6, c'+ a'^f or 3 + 6 = 8,/'+ a'= gr" or 4 + 5 = 9 

were inaudible, that is, neither existed without nor within the ear. * Perhaps,' 
says P., 'they might be made audible after properly arming the forks by means of 
resonance boxes while sounding. But the observation would not be easy.' Just 
as H. could hear the cases he cites (Pogg. Ann, vol. xc. 1856, p. 519) 'only with 
great difficulty \ But the forks tried by him each possessed the Octave, as he 
states {ibid, pp. 506, 510). 



Now, when Octaves exist, and in oase of 
«[ the siren other partials are strongly developed, 
these summational tones — as G. Appunn 
pointed out to P. — could be conceived as ^fier- 
ential tones of the second order — ^that is, 
differential tones arising from the first differ- 
ential acting on the putial, if such action is 
admitted. Thus H. f ound & ^-Z' = <{ or 2 + 8 = 5, 
but then h and/' included the Octaves b' and/' 
or 4 and 6, and we had, the first differential 
f-ft^B orS -2=1, and the second /"-B=<i" 
or 6 - 1 a= 5, or, without using B in the formula, 
/'_(^i-6)=d"or6-(8-2)=6. In this way 
P. proceeds to shew that all the cases recorded 
can be explained. Hence he concludes that 
the summational tone, if not existing as a 
partial on one of the tones, is entirely gener- 
ated within the ear. Thus, according to 
K. i. 220, from e' : ^'==2 : 8 he heard clearly 
6=d", 7=«"+c', H:=e"+g\ 9=4'", 10=«"' 
ff and 11, the last by auxiliary forks which beat 
with the required tones. But there were in 
this case the partials 2, 4, 6, 8=^c\ d\ g", e!'\ 
and 8, 6, 9, 12=^;', g'\ d'", g"\ Hence from 
the summational tones we have 8 and 9 as 
partials, while 6=8-3, 7 = 9-2, 10=12-2, 
11 = 12 - (8 - 2), and so on. * Therefore,* adds 



P., * even the comprehensive investigations <A 
Koenig do not make the [external objective] 
existence of summational tones probable.* 
Hence, like the differential tones, they mnst 
be generated within the ear. 

K., in the French edition of his papeza 
(note, p. 127), says : * This explanation is not 
admissible, because it assumes that two sounds 
always generate a differential tone, which is 
not correct. For example, take two tones cor- 
responding to the fundamental tones c' and #,' 
[my notation], or 256 : 820 = 4:5. They give 
the beat-note c' = 1 ; but this sound 1 does not 
form the sound 7 with the Octave of c', that is, 
with c''=8 ; nor does it form the sound 9 with 
the Octave of ^j' or «i"=10, as we can be con- 
vinced by sounding at the same time the 
primary sounds O and c"—l : 8, or C and e^' 
= 1 : 10, even when these latter are mack 
stronger than the beat-note in question and 
than the two Octaves of the primary sounds 
c' and 0^'.* The explanation by differentials of 
the second order given by P. is an adoption of 
a theory of Appunn ; and, of course, until the 
reality of the differentials assumed can be 
proved, remains a merely theoretical explana- 
tion. 



Art. 5. — Theory of Beats^ Beat-Notes, and Combinational Tones. 

(a) Origin of Beats. * How do the heats of mistuned oonsonanoes arise ? ' asks 
B. vi. 228, and replies : * They may be regarded as springing from interference of 
new notes, which arise by transformation, in the passage of the resultant forms 
through the transmitting mechanism of the ear, before the analysis of the aen- 
sorium '. 

The theory of beats of a disturbed unison on the hypothesis of interference is 
given in H. 164. The theory of differential and summational tones is given in 
H. 159a and App. XII. pp. 411-413. This, however, extends only to the first 
differential and first summational tone. But H. 1586, c, gives a theory for the 
f generation of such tones within the ear owing to the non-symmetrical structure ci 
its drumskin and the looseness of the joint between the hammer and anvil within 
the drum. And B. vi. 242-8, by means of some perhaps rather hazardous assump- 
tions, succeeds in shewing that the asymmetry of the drmnskin acting upon 
the waves of air coming to them would, as he terms it in the above extract, 
'transform' the result into one for which the displacement is not relatively 
infinitesimal, but in which its higher terms must be taken in consideration. Then 
proceeding to the fourth order of displacement, he ultimately obtains six summa- 
tional and six differential tones * produced by direct transformation of the prima- 
ries ' (B. vi. 246), so that he avoids the introduction of numerous differential tones 
of various orders (H. 200-203, B. vi. 241), which H. seems to have borrowed from 
Scheibler, who, although he did great things with the beats of tuning-forks, was 
not a physical authority. Calculation based on the introduction of these entirely 
hypothetical, because always inaudible, tones leads, as E. i. 200 shews, to the right 
number of beats ; but, as he says, ' we are compelled continually to assume the 
existence of tones which have not only not been heard themselves, but which are 



^nB«p 



m^ 



MS 



SECT. L. RECENT WORK ON BEATS & COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



533 



supposed actually to generate and be generated by other likewise inaudible tones '. 
We have an example in the first differential of a tone which, when it does not 
coincide with the lower beat-note, is appreciable only by beats with an auxiliary 
tone, and is hence very faint indeed in respect to the generators ; and yet these are 
supposed to be the progenitors of others relatively weaker, till at last ^ey produce 
one strong enough to be well heard (K i. 186). The difSculty is surmounted by B., 
so far as the existence of the ultimate tone, without assuming the action of hypo- 
thetical intermediate generators. But we know nothing of the strength of these 
ultimate tones as determined by the formula, and we are constrained to believe 
that what depends upon the higher powers of the displacement, when the latter is 
not infinitesimal in respect to the length of the wave, must be extremely small, 
not at all comparable with the beat-notes actually heard, and hence must be in- 
sufficient to explain them. That is, we may admit all the differential and summa- 
tional tones of H. and B. without having approached a satisfactory explanation of 
the main phenomenon, the beat-note. 

(6) Can Beats generate Tones ? First, Beats of Interrmttence. Now, the obvious ^ 
hypothesis is that the beats coming within the frequency of musical notes are 
heard as tones. H. 156c, in mentioning this, states three objections, of which 
P. viii. 27 says that not one is at present tenable. They are : (1) that this hy- 
pothesis does not explain summational but only differential tones. On which P. 
remarks that summational tones, which have been heard only when at least the 
second partial of the generators was audible, can be explained as differential tones of 
the second order, as noted supr&, p. 5326. (2) That * under certain conditions the 
combinational tones exist objectively,' which is against art. 4, p. 531 ; and P. viii. 25 
especially observes that the only experiment which H. has cited (Pogg. AnnaL 
vol. xcix. p. 539) to prove the objective existence of summational tones by sand 
strewed on a membrane cannot be critically examined because the two generators 
are not specified. (3) That ' the only tones which the ear hears correspond to 
pendular vibrations of the air \ P. considers this to be disproved by the inter- 
mittence' tones obtained by K., who rotated a disc perforated with 128 holes before 
tuning forks of different pitches, and obtained the same tone of intermittence what- 
ever was the pitch of the fork. This tone was accompanied by two variant tones ^ 
having pitch numbers equal to the sum and difference of the frequencies of the 
fork and intermittences. 



K. i. 280, varied the experiment by con- 
structing a disc * with three circles, each with 
96 equidistant holes, the diameters of which 
increased and diminished on the first circle 16 
times from 1 to 6 mm. (=-04 to '24 inch), on 
the second 12, and on the third 8 times. On 
blowing through a tube 6 mm. (=:'24 inch) in 
diameter, and revolving the disc slowly, the 
separate periods of holes on each circle gave 
separate beats. On revolving continually more 



quickly, the 16 periods of the first, then the 
12 of the second, and finally the 8 of the third 
circle, passed over into a musical tone. Finally, 
when the high tone of the 96 holes on revolv- 
ing 8 times in a second had reached g*' with 
768 d. vib., the deep tones c, G, C — answering 
to the numbers of the periods 128, 96, 64 d. 
vib.— could be heard loudly and powerfully at 
the same time as g".' 



(c) Can Beats generate Tones ? Secondly, Beats of Interference. Now, in 
reference to these tones of intermittence, K. L 231 remarks that although they shew 
great similarity to beating combinations, as proving the possibility of separate 
toazima of intensity passing over into a continuous tone, they were in reality very f 
different from such combinations, because in the case of beats there was a change 
of sign, a maximum of condensation being followed by a maximum of rarefaction. 



This was precisely the objection made by 
Lord Bayleigh when Mr. Spottiswoode gave 
his account of Koenig's experiments (Proc, 
Mua. Ass. 1678-9, p. 128), and he in conse- 
quence could not understand how beats could 
generate tone. B. Ubid. p. 129) raised the 
same objection, which he developed in B. vi. 
223-6. He there shews that in the case of 
two tones of equal strength, lees than two 
commas from a unison, *the resultant dis- 
placement ' would produce a tone ' whose fre- 
quency is the arithmetical mean between the 
frequencies of the two primaries, and having 
oscillations of intensity whose frequency is 
defined by a pendulum vibration of frequency 



equal to half the difference of the frequencies 
of the primaries '. Then B. says that if the 
law held for widely separated notes, as for the 
'Fifth (4: 6), the note heard would be the 
major Third, which would beat rapidly . . . 
but as a matter of fact the note 5 is not heard 
at all in the above case '. Farther, ' supposing 
that in some unexplained way the beats whose 
speed is ' half the difference of the frequencies 
ox the primaries, as just stated, * gave rise to a 
note as supposed by K., then the speed of that 
note does not agree with that required for K.'8 
first [lower] beat-note, which has the same 
speed as H.'8 difference-tone,' or the whole in- 
stead of half the difference of the frequencies. 



534 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



A pp. XJL 



Now this objection was fully realised by K. 
i. 232-3, which paper was before B. when he 
wrote the passage just cited, but was possibly 
overlooked by him. E. i. 282 says: 'If two 
tones of 80 and 96 d. vib. are sounded together, 
they generate a tone of J . (80+96) » 88 vibra- 
tions with an intensity increasing and di- 
minishing 16 times, and at each passage from 
one beat to another there is a change of sign, 
so that the maximum of compression of the 
first- vibration of the following beat is half 
a vibration behind the maximum of compres- 
sion of the last vibration of the preceding 
beat '. To meet this case he made two experi- 
ments. In the first he divided a circle into 
176 parts, and in the five points 1, 3, 5, 7, 9 he 

H drilled five hol6s,gradually increasing and then 
diminishing in size. Similarly in the points 
12, 14, 16, 18, 20, and then in the points 
23, 25, 27, 29, and 30, and so on. * When such 
a disc was blown upon through a pipe with the 
diameter of the largest opening, in addition to 
the tone 88 and the very powerful tone of the 
period 16 both of the tones 80 and 96 could 
be heard, but they were very weak, and, on 
account of the roughness of the deep tone, 
difiicult to observe.' In this case the phase 
was the same throughout. To imitate the 
change of phase, K. i. 283 divided each of 
two concentric circles, running parallel to each 
other, into 88 parts, and < disposed the holes 
which were to represent the successive beats 
alternately on each. As 88 holes and 16 
periods give 5J holes to each period, K. took 
two periods together, and pierced on the first 

^ circle the divisional points 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 
on the second 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, then again on 
the first 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, and on the 
second 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, and so forth.* 



The sizes of the holes were alternately in- 
creasing and diminishing to represent beate. 

* When these circles of holes were blown upon 
at the same time through two pipes of Uie 
diameter of the laigest opening, and placed on 
the same radius, one circle from above and the 
other from below, then at each revelation of 
the disc there were created 88 isochronous 
impulses, varying 16 times in intensity, which 
changed sign on each transition from one period 
of intensity to the other. In this experiment 
the two tones 80 ajid 96 were more distinct 
than in the first experiment, where the circles 
of holes were blown upon from one side only." 

On B.*8 objections just quoted (supri, p. 
533), K. observes (French edition, p. 143lrQote) : 

* The change of phase of the separate vibra- 
tions of a variable amplitude, forming the 
beats, does not cause these maxima of in- 
tensity to be produced in contrary directions. 
Besides, these maxima remain isochronoua 
and consequently fulfil the conditions under 
which primary impulses are combined to form 
sounds. The only infiuence which the chan$^ 
of phase in question exerts on the disposition 
of the waves consists in these maxima of in- 
tensity not standing apart by a whole number 
of complete vibrations, but by an odd number 
of half-vibrations. The disc of the siren in 
which the resultant compressions of all the 
successive vibrations of the complex sound are 
represented by holes of a proper size, and, still 
better, the disc that has its rim cat oat 
according to the curve of a series of successive 
beats [art. 5 (e) below], render this mechanism 
readily apprehensible, and allow of shewing 
that, notwithstanding the change of phase, 
the beat-note must always have the same fre- 
quency as the beats.* 



{d) Would a Tone generated by Beats be louder than the Primaries ? K. i. 234 
then proceeded to meet Tyndall*s objection {On Sound, 3rd. ed. p. 350) that if the 
resultant tones (as he calls them) were formed from the beats of the primaries 
they would be heard when the primaries were weak, which is not the case. K 
observes that beats would always be more powerful than their primary tones, 
'provided that equal amplitudes of vibration produced equal intensities for all 
tones,' and proceeds to shew by experiment that this is not the case, and that ' deep 
tones must have much larger amplitudes of vibration than high tones in order to 
exhibit the same intensity '. 

(e) Experiments with the Wave Siren. Thus the question was left till 1881, 
when K. applied his Wave Siren, originally exhibited in the London Internationa] 
Exhibition of 1872, already partly described in art. 2 {b), p. 529, to solve the ques- 
tion experimentally. The complete form (K. v. 386) was of course applicable to 
^ any pairs of tones with ratios expressible by numbers not exceeding 16. But the 
simplest method was to draw out the two harmonic curves, and the result of their 
combination, as is done above (H. 30 6, c) on a very large scale, and then reduce 
the drawing by photography to the required dimensions. Then the compound curve 
thus drawn was inverted, so that the high parts became low and the low high, cut, 
and affixed to the rim of the wave siren. The reason for inversion in this case was 
that the heights on the curve represented greater intensities, but on the siren 
would give less intensities. 



K. iii. 345 then says : ' When a disc with 
such a rim is rotated before a slit fixed over it 
in the direction of the radius, and of a length 
at least equal to the greatest height of the curve, 
the slit will be periodically shortened and 
lengthened according to the law of the curve ; 
and if wind is blown through the slit, a motion 
in the air must be generated corresponding to 
the same law. And this motion must be pre- 



cisely the same as that produced by the simul- 
taneous sounding of two really simple tones 
without any admixture of upper partials.' The 
beauty of this arrangement thus consists in our 
knowing precisely what tones act, and that 
they are undoubtedly simple. The result is 
thus described : * The discs for different inter- 
vals, when the rotation was slow, gave beats, 
and when it was more rapid, beat-notes, exactly 



SECT. L. 



RECENT WORK ON BEATS & COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



535 



corresponding to those observed when two 
tuning-forks were sounded together. Thus the 
major Second 8 : 9 produced the lower beat- 
note 1 ; the major Seventh 8 : 15, the upper 
beat-note 1 ; the disturbed Twelfth 8 : 28, the 
upper beat-note of the second period, which is 



agatn:=l, loudly and distinctly. In the same 
way the ratios 8 : 11 and 8 : 13 gave quite 
distinctly and at the same time the iipper and 
lower beat-notes 8 and 5 for the first, and 5 
and 3 for the second : * 11 - 8 = 3, 2 x 8 - 11 = 6, 
and 18 - 8=6, 2 X 8-18=3. 



(/) Beats and Beat-Notes heard together. The preceding experiment shews the 
gradual passage of beats into tones, the transitional part being where both beats 
and tones are heard together. This occurs where the rotation is sufficiently quick 
to generate a tone (see H. 174-9, and especially footnote f to p. 176), but not so 
fast as to destroy the distinct perceptions of beat. 



To this I drew attention in a footnote to 
p. 231 of the 1st edition of this translation, 
now reproduced in a modified form (supri, p. 
153c',note). This hearing of the two phenomena 
K. i. 227 explains by a theory of H. (contained 
on pp. 217-8 of the 1st English ed., but 
omitted in this 2nd English ed., because it was 
struck out in the 4th German ed., H. having 
altered his opinion) that tones are heard in 
the cochlea and noises in other parts of the 
ear. In the additions to the 4th German ed. 
(suprii, pp. 1506 to 151(2) H.attributes the hear- 
ing of both musical tone and noise to the 
cochlea, and reserves the labyrinth for the 
sensation of revolution of the head, thus 
agreeing with Ezner. P. viii. 29-33, thinks 
there are many reasons why we should not 
accept the theory that all perceptions of noise 
are due to the cochlea. If so,he says, 'animals 
without a cochlea would be deaf. Fishes cer- 
tainly are mostly dumb, and do not hear 
acutely, as anglers well know, but they are 
not deaf.^ On examining Exner's paper 
(supr&, p. 151(2, note*), and especially Anna 
Tomaszewicz's * Contributions to the Physi- 
ology of the Labyrinth of the l&a,T,'{Beitriige zur 
Physioloffie des Ohrlabyrinihs, Medic. In- 
augural Dissertation, Zurich, 1877), with other 
phenomena, be comes to the conclusion that 
the cochlea hears only musical tones with a 
pitch-number not less than about 16 (the 
lowest audible musical tone as usually pro- 
duced), and that separate noises are heard by 
other parts of the ear — if not in the vestibule, 
then in the sacculus. He considers it probable, 
as others have also thought, that the function 
of the semicircular canals is rather to give a 
sensation of the direction whence sound comes. 
The point is, however, still undecided. 

K., in the French republication of his 
paper (p. 137), says : * At all events the 
simultaneous perception of separate beats and 
the sound which results from their succes- 
sion is no more in contradiction with the new 



hypothesis than with the old, for we can very 
well suppose that, beside the general excite- 
ment of the basilar membrane due to each 
separate beat, the particular parts of this ' 
membrane, whose proper tones correspond to H 
the period of the impulses, are more strongly 
shaken, and execute lasting vibrations giving 
the perception of sound \ 

Lord Rayleigh, in his Presidential Address 
to the BritishAssociation meeting at Montreal, 
Canada, in Aug. 1884, says : ' Every day we 
are in the habit of recognising, without much 
difficulty, the quarter from which a sound 
proceeds, but by what step we attain that end 
has not yet been satis^ctoirily explained. It 
has been proved that, when proper precautions 
are taken,we are unable to distinguish whether 
a pure tone (as from a vibrating tuning-fork 
held over a suitable resonator) comes to us 
from in front or from behind* This is what 
might have been expected from an d priori 
point of view ; but what would not have been 
expected is, that with almost any other sort ^ 
of sound the discrimination is not only pos- 
sible, but easy and instinctive. In these cases 
it does not appear how the possession of two 
ears helps us, tbough there is some evidence 
that it does ; and even when sounds come to 
us from the right or left, the explanation of 
the r6ady discrimination which is then pos- 
sible with pure tones is not so easy as might 
at first appear. We should be inclined to 
think that the sound was heard much more 
loudly with the ear that is turned towards 
than with the ear which is turned from it, and 
that in this way the direction was recognised. 
But if we try the experiment we find that — at 
any rate with notes near the middle of the 
musical scale— the difference of loudness is by 
no means so very great. The wave-lengths of 
such notes are long enough, in relation to the 
dimensions of the head, to forbid the forma- 
tion of anything like a sound-shadow in which ^ 
the averted ear might be sheltered.* 



(g) Beat-Notes and Beat-Tones. After K's final experiment (p. 632d') on the 
passage of beats into tones, we might perhaps disuse the interim term ' beat-note,' 
which implied no theory as to its origin, but only a statement as to its frequency, 
and use K's term *beat-tone,' implying that the tone is generated by beats. But 
just because * beat-note ' does not imply a theory, and because no theory has been 
at present generally accepted, nor is sufficiently supported by proofs to be so, it 
will be convenient to 'continue the use of the word * beat-note,' which simply 
states that the frequency of the beat is identical with that of the note. At the 
same time we must not disuse the terms * differential and summational tones, of 
various orders,' because if they really exist they are a decidedly different pheno- 
menon from beat-notes, and only in the most frequently observed case coincide 
in pitch (but not in intensity) with beat-notes. P. viii. 29, however, decides to 
identify the two. K., on the other hand, considers the existence of differential and 
summational tones not proved. 



536 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR 



APP. XX. 



' 



Measn. Preeoe and Stroh, referring to their 
maohines for the synthesis of vowels, noticed 
infr^f seot. M. art. 2, p. 6^2d, say (Proc. JR. 
S. 27 Feb. 1879, vol. xxviii. p. 366) : * The 
carves arrived at synthetically do not differ 
materially from those arrived at analytically 
by H. They principally differ in the promi- 
nence of the prime. But the prime can be 
dispensed with altogether. Curves produced 
by the synthetic machine, compounded of the 
different partials without their prime, shew 
that there exist heats or resultant sounds. A 
vowel sound of the pitch of the prime may 
be produced by certain partials alone, with- 
out sounding the prime at all. The beat, in 
fact, becomes the prime. This point is clearly 
illustrated by the automatic phonograph, and 



graphically by the sketch drawn by the syn- 
thetic curve "machine. In fact, every tvo 
partials of numbers indivisible by any conmiOD 
multiple [divisor ?], if sounded alone,reprodDoe 
by their beats the prime itself. Tfaos, the 
3rd and 6th partiids, or the 2Dd and 3id, 
&o,t will result in the reproduction of the 
prime.* Observe that this gives the beat-note, 
not the differential tone. The differentiAl 
tone of 3 and 5 is 2, but the beat-note is 
2x3-5=1. *In fact, the figure illastrates not 
only this, but it shews that when the namber 
of partials introduced is increased, the beats 
become more and more pronounced.* Mr. 
Stroh from his own experience considers the 
beat-notes thus produced to be generated in 
the same way as K. supposes. 



IT (h) Koenig*8 explanation of Summational Tones, In the mafcter of summa- 
tional tones, P. (see p. 5326) explains them as differential tones of the second 
order. K. i. 217-8 thinks that they arise as beat-notes from upper partials. But 
P. viii. 24 notes that this explanation fails when very high partials would be 
required. 



Thus, to get the summational tone 64 from 
31 : 33 we should require the 32nd partial, 
which is not heard. So, from the reed tones 
496 and 528, P. heard 1024. The 32nd par- 
tials would be 16896 and 15872, difference 
1024. But such partials are inaudible, * where- 
as every term of the acoustical equations 

2x628- (528 - 496) » 1056- 32«1024 
3 X 528 -(2-528 -496) = 1584 -560 =1024 

is easily proved *. The tones mentioned cer- 
tainly exist; the question is only, are they 
IT powerful enough to produce the result ? 

To the above remarks K. replies in the 
French edition, p. 127, note, cofitinuing the 
passage already quoted (p. 5325') : * M.f^^er 
cites in favour of his views that on soundmg 
together free reeds of 496 and 528 d. vib. 
=31 : 33, he heard the sound 1024 d. vib. = 64, 
and he thinks that we cannot assume that the 
reeds had the 32nd partial, 16896 and 15872 
d. vib. If the sound really observed was 64, 
and not the Octave of 31 or 33, we might be 
really astonished that the 32nd partials were 
sufficiently strong in these tones to produce it ; 



but the explanation proposed by M. Preyer is 
absolutely inadmissible, for 496 and 528 <L vib., 
even when they have considerable force, give 32 
beats, which do not as yet allow the deep tone 
C, to be heard, so that at any rate such tone 
must be extremely weak. Now the Octave of 
528 (or 1056) is the 33rd harmonic of this 
excessively weak sound. But two primary 
sounds of 32' and 1056 d. vib., even when 
extremely powerful, never produce a sound of 
1024 d. vib. The second manner in which M. 
Preyer thinks the sound might have been pro- 
duced is equally opposed to all that has been 
directly oiMerved when two primary tones 
sound together. Thus he makes the Octave of 
528 (i.e. 1056) produce with 496 d. vib. a dif- 
ferential tone of 560 d. vib., and then makes 
this tone 560 produce with the Twelfth of 528 
(i.e. 1584) a new differential of 1024. But 
these two sounds of 496 and 1056 (=2 x 496-1- 
64) give the beat-note 64, and not 560 ; and if 
the sound 560 really existed it would give with 
1584 (=2 x560-h464=3x 560-96) the beat- 
note 96, and also more faintly 464, but not 
1024.* 



(i) Koenig*s theory for the origin of Boat-Notes, K. i. 186 gives the following 
theory for the origin of tones from beats. He says that ' the beats of the harmonic 
intervals, as well as of the unison, should be deduced directly from the composition 
of waves of sound, and we should assume that they arise from the periodically 
alternating coincidences of similar maxima of the generating tones, and of the 
^ maxima with opposite signs. The similar maxima for these harmonic intervals, as 
in the case of unisons, will either exactly coincide, or else there will be maxima of 
condensation in the higher tone lying between two successive vibrations of the 
fundamental tone, slightly preceding one and slightly following the other ; but in 
both cases the effect on the ear will be the same, for a beat (fluctuation) is no 
instantaneous phenomenon, but arises from a gradual increase and diminution 
of the intensity of tone.* Then he adds some drawings of the compounded vibra- 
tions of two tuning-forks, one of which bore a piece of smoked glass and the other 
a style. These are almost precisely the same as the curves drawn by means of 
Donkin's harmonograph, and inserted at the end of B. vi., opposite p. 256. That 
is, both E. and B., who are strongly opposed in opinion, refer to practically 
identical curves in support of their own views. This serves to shew the extremely 
difficult and delicate nature of the investigation. 

(A;) Lecture Demonstration of Beat-Notes, In the beat-notes produced by the 
wave siren, E. had the great advantage of producing tones which could be continued 



SECT. L. RECENT WORK ON BEATS & COMBINATIONAL TONES. 



637 



for any length of time, whereas those from tuning-forks vanished so rapidly that 
they could be with difficulty recognised. But this did not suffice for lecture 
demonstrations. Hence E. invented a machine which produces beat-tones audible 
over a whole lecture room. 



This consists (K. iv.) of pairs of glass tubes 
adjusted so as to give notes with definite inter- 
vals by longitudinal vibrations. These are held 
at the node by two clamps against the surface 
of a wheel bearing a thick cloth tire, which con- 
tinually dips into a trough of water, and thus 
rubs the tubes sufficiently to produce loud 



tones and either one or both of the beat-notes 
continuously, and loud enough to be appre- 
ciated by the whole audience. A piece of 
paper wrapped round the node and bearing the 
number of the relative pitch enables the glass 
tubes to be selected and changed with the 
greatest rapidity. 



Art. 6. — Influence of difference of Phase on Quality of Tone, 

H. p. 126a finds that difference of phase has no effect on quality of tone. But, 
on p. 127c, n. points out ' an apparent exception,' on whidi K. v. 376 remarks 
that if quality depends on the relative intensity of the harmonic upper partials, T 
and this relative intensity is really altered by difference of phase, the influence of 
this difference is ' actual, and not merely apparent '. Then observing on the 
difficulties attendant on H.'s rule for finding the differences of phase (supr&, 
p. 124c), he proceeds to describe his new experiments with the wave siren (for 
which reason they are mentioned in this place), which certainly admit of very 
much more precision. They were conducted thus : E. compounded harmonic 
curves of various pitches, and with various assumptions of amplitudes, under four 
varieties of phase : (1) the beginning of all the waves coinciding ; (2) the first 
quarter, (3) the halves, and (4) the tbird quarter of each wave coinciding ; briefly 
said to have a difference of phase of, 0, J, J, |. These were reduced by photo- 
graphy, inverted, and placed on the rim of the disc of a wave siren, and then 
made to speak. He gives the remarkable curves which resulted in a few cases, 
and instructions for repeating the experiments. The following are his conclu- 
sions (K. V. 391) :— 

' The composition of a number of harmonic tones, including both the evenly 
and unevenly numbered partials, generates in all cases, quite independently of the IT 
relative intensity of these tones, the strongest and acutest quality tone for the 
^ difference of phase, and the weakest and softest for | difference of phase, while 
the differences and ^ lie between the others, both as regards intensity and 
acuteness. 

' When unevenly numbered partials only are compounded, the differences of 
phase i and | give the same quality of tone, as do also the differences and ^ ; 
but the former is stronger and acuter than the latter. 

* Hence, although the quality of tone principally depends on the number and 
relative intensity of the harmonic tones compounded, the influence of difference of 
tone is not by any means so insignificant as to be entirely negligible. We may 
say, in general terms, that the differences in the number and relative intensity of 
the harmonic tones compounded produces those differences in the quality of tone 
which are remarked in musical instruments of different families, or in the human 
voice uttering different vowels. But the alteration of phase between these har- 
monic tones can excite at least such differences of quality of tone as are observed 
in musical instruments of the same family, or in different voices singing the same ^ 
vowel.* 

Of course, as K. v. 392 observes, the complete wave siren figured on K. v. 386 
is applicable to numerous other investigations. 

Art. 7. — Influence of Combinational Tones on the consonance of Simple Tones, 

This is a brief notice of P. viii. III. It would appear from H.'s theory of con- 
sonance (see specially supri, pp. 200d and 2056) that, if there were no upper 
partial or combinational tones, dissonance and consonance could not be distin- 
guished — in the Thirds for example. P.'s experiments rendered this doubtful. 
He had a series of 11 forks made, very accurately tuned to — 

Vib. 1000 1100 1200 1300 1400 1500 1600 1700 1800 1900 2000 
Cents 165 151 138 129 119 112 105 99 93 89 
Sums 165 316 454 583 702 814 919 1018 1111 1200 



where the upper line gives the numbers of vibrations, the second the cents in the 



538 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



A pp. XX. 



intervals between two successive forks, and the bottom the sums of those cents, 
or the cents in the intervals between any fork and the lowest, from which the 
cents in the intervals between any two forks can be immediately deduced by sub- 
traction ; and by a reference to the table in Sec. D. the names of such intervals cftn 
be found. P. selected the difiference of 100 vib. because it was small enough to allow 
of a sensation of roughness when two successive forks were sounded together. 
And he selected the pitches 1000 and 2000 because they precluded hearing upper 
partials, while the frequency 1000 to 2000 not being sufficient to have any effect 
on distinguishing consonance, the absence of power to distinguish it could not be 
ascribed to the high pitch. 



Both practised and unpractised ears imme- 
diately recognised on them that suocessive forks 
were dissonant to each other; this was due 
to the small difference of 100 vib. Almost all 
other intervals of these 11 forks, when the forks 
IT were not too loud, were frequently considered 
consonant, especially by musicians — such as 
10 : 13, 11 : 18, 12 : 19, 17 : 20, & •. Also the 
ratios expressible by small numbers (except 
8 : 9 and 9 : 10), namely, 6 : 7, 6 : 9. 6 : 7, 
7 : 8, 7 : 9, 7 : 10, often passed as consonances ; 
and though the 1 : 2, 2 : 8, 8 : 4, 8 : 5, 4 : 6, 
5:6, 5:8 were generally preferred, some 
observers found 6:7, 15 : 19, 11 : 13, &c., 
more harmonious than the pure Thirds and 
Sixths, 4 : 6, 5 :,6, 5:8, 8:5, especially than 
the minor Sixth 5 : 8. The listener was 
always kept in ignorance of the numerical 
ratios, and only one person was tried at a 
time. The sum of the different judgments 
was therefore: 

* After all upper partials and combinational 
tones have been eliminated from a dissonant 



pair of sounds, it loses the disagreeable effect 
of dissonance *. 

The Octave and Fifth were generally re- 
cognised with certainty, probably from long 
practice. This appears to be an excellent 
proof of H.'s theory. And the less care there 
was taken to exclude upper partials and com- 
binational tones, the more unpleasant became 
the dissonance, and the easier it was for the 
ear alone to determine the interval immedi- 
ately. But this is not all. H.'s theory thai 
dissonances should be recognised only by beats 
of the partials or combinational tones implies 
that, if these were too far distant in pitch to 
produce beats, there would be no roughness, 
and hence no beats. This did not prove to be 
the case. The pair 1400 : 1600 vib. formed a 
dissonance, although all partials and combi- 
national tones differed by 200. The ratio 
8 : 9 was universally callea a cutting disso- 
nance, even in the 4 times and 8 times accented 
Octave. 



^ The explanation of the above phenomena seemed to require a remodelling of 
H.'s theory, and P.'s conclusions are stated thus (P. viii. 58) : — 

* (1) The larger the least two numbers required to express the ratio between 
two tones, the greater the number of combinational tones, which always form an 
arithmetical series, and arise, whether upper partials be present or not (H. 155c). 

' (2) The greater the number of simple tones which affect the ear simultaneously, 
the less distinct is each single tone. 

' (3) The more coincidences there are between the tones which might be and 
are gener&ted by any interval, the more pleasing is the sensation ; and the fewer 
the coincidences the more confusing, and hence unpleasant, the impression.' 

And as these conclusions hold for tones which, on account of their own dis- 
tance from each other and the distance of their partials and combinational tones, 
cannot generate sensible beats, P. considers that this is both a formal and an 
actual extension of H.'s theory of consonance. But if, with K , we consider 
these differential tones absolutely insensible, it would be difficult to see how 
they would affect the result, and the facts noted would still require explanation. 
% The whole subject of combinational tones and beats evidently requires much more 
examination. 



SECTION M. 



ANALYSIS AND SYNTHESIS OF VOWBL SOUNDS. 



(See Notes, pp. 75, 118, 124.) 

Art. Art. 

1. Analysis of Vowel Sounds by means of the 2. Synthetical Production of Vowel Sounds, 
Phonograph, p. 588. p. 542. 

Art. 1. — Analysis of Vowel Sounds by means of the Phonograph. The follow- 
ing is a brief account of a paper by Prof. Fleeming Jenkin, F.R.SS. L. and E., 
and Mr. J. A. Ewing, B.Sc, F.R.S.E., On the Harmmiic Analysis of certain 
Vowel Sounds, ' Transactions of the Eoyal Society of Edinburgh,' vol. xxviii< 



SECT. M. 



ANALYSIS AND SYNTHESIS OF VOWEL SOUNDS. 



539 



pp. 745-777, plates 34-40, communicated June 3 and July 1, 1878, and published 
with additions to July 19, 1878 — that is, subsequently to the appearance of the 4th 
German ed. of this work. 

Messrs. Jenkin and Ewing make use of a variety of Mr. T. A. Edison's phono- 
graph which, by means of a style affixed to a vibrating disc against which words 
are spoken or sung, impresses the amplitude of vibration at any time on a piece 
of tinfoil passed beneath it by machinery. On repassing the style over these 
indentations the vibrations are recommunicated to the disc, and the sounds re- 
produced sufficiently, on the form of the instrument used by these gentlemen, for 
listeners to understand sentences impressed during their absence. Then the 
indented foil was passed under another style in communication with a system of 
delicate levers, ending in one of Sir W. Thomson's electrical squirting recorder 
tubes, which magnified the depth of the indentations 400 times, and squirted their 
form, without friction, on to a telegraph-paper band wound round a cylinder re- 
volving at such a speed as to magnify the length of the indentations 7 times. ^| 
Perfect records of the vibrations registered by the phonograph were thus obtained, 
of sufficient size to be measured. The amplitudes of the compoimd vibrations of 
the curves were measured to the 200th part of an inch (005 inch). Then, as the 
apparatus could not properly determine high partials, the curves were assumed to 
be compounded of six partials, and the ordinates or amplitudes had to be deter- 
mined by Fourier's formula — 



y = Aq + Ai Bin x + A.^ sin 2x + 
-»- Bi cos x-hBn cos 2x + 



+ A„ sin nx -h 
-j- B» cos nx + 



The period was taken as the length between two minima of ordinates, and 
divided into 12 equal parts for successive values of x, and then the corresponding 
values of y were measured. The 12 resulting simultaneous equations, giving the 
values Aq to Aq and B^ to ^5, were then solved by Professor Tait's formulaB (given 
in the paper), and thus the amplitudes of the six partials for any length of the 
ordinate were determined. The Authors say : — H 

*The experiments were chiefly directed to the two sounds o and u (the vowels in oh I 
and food). Several different voices were employed. Voice No. 1 was a powerful bari- 
tone with a considerable range and good musical training. No. 2 was a high set and 
somewhat harsh voice of limited range and without musical training. No. 8 was a rich 
and well-trained bass voice of a man of eighty. Nos. 4 and 5 were somewhat alike, being 
voices of moderate range and power and with some musical training. No. 6 was a 
powerful bass. Generally the vowels were sung in tune with notes given by a piano,* 
the pitch of which was supposed to be c' 256, but was probably much higher. 

Photo-lithographs of the records of the vibratory curves are given in the paper, 
and ingeniously arranged tables are added shewing the maximum amplitudes of 
the partials for each pitch of the prime. Of these, the following is Table VII. p. 761, 
slightly re-arranged, with the names of the upper partials inserted : — 



Vowel Sound (* oh '). 



f 



Voice 



No. 



1 
5 



1 
2 
3 
4 
5 



I. 



ft 
44 



f 
121 

58 

e' 

105 
61 
53 
55 
52 



Pitches and Amplitudes of the First Six Partials 



II. 

rt 

32 



71 
19 



// 





69 

30 

18 

34 

58 



III. 



c'"Jf 
6 



IV. 



rt 




V. 



4 



c'" 


r 




7 


1 




6 


2 




6" 


e'" 




7 


3 




5 


2 




8 


1 


7 


2 ; 


5 


6 


1 



.'// 



5 
3 



VI. 



c""J 
2 



4 

1 



rt 


b'" 


2 


3 


1 


1 


2 


1 


2 





5 


2 



540 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



Vowel Sound o {* oh ')'-oorUinued, 





Voice 


Pitches and 


Amplitudes 


1 

OF THE FiBST SiZ PABTTArj) i 




No. 


I. 


II. 


IIL 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 






d' 


d" 


a" 


d"' 


f'% 


a" 




1 


119 


76 


5 


1 


3* 


2 




2 


66 


40 


4 





3 


2 




5 


27 


42 


6 


4 


2 


1 






c' 


c" 


g*' 


«"' 


/" 




1 


110 


160 


15 


10 


10 


7 




3 


87 


80 


1 


4 


1 


1 




4 


54 


25 





8 


2 


1 


n 


6 


47 


41 


5 


8 


3 


2 






b 


b' 


ft 


b" 


d"| 


/"» 




1 


70 


126 


15 


14 


6 


1 




2 


45 


66 


7 


4 


6 


2 : 




8 


36 


31 


2 


4 


1 







4 


45 


43 


4 


2 


3 







5 


47 


61 


2 


14 


8 


2 






^b 


h'b 


r 


ft'> 


d'" 


/" 




1 


75 


185 


13 


8 


11 


1 




2 


49 


104 


18 


6 


4 


2 




4 


25 


82 


5 


7 


1 


2 




5 


48 


70 


13 


7 


1 


8 






a 


a' 


e" 


o" 


c-J 


«'" 




1 


125 


190 


25 


22 


5 


2 


f 


2 


82 


58 


6 


8 


6 


2 


3 


40 


36 


4 


4 


3 


2 




4 


16 


54 


4 


4 


1 


1 




5 


40 


66 


10 


8 


3 









g 


U' 


d" 


^' 


6" 


d'" 




1 


69 


103 


27 


6 


2 


2 




2 


23 


51 


u 


3 


2 


2 




3 


46 


29 


2 


2 


2 


1 




4 


38 


44 


7 


2 


1 


2 




5 


32 


50 


3 


6 


1 


2 




2 


18 


{! 


15 


'1 


"7 


0* 




4 


28 


62 


10 


2 


8 


2 






/ 


/ 


c" 


/' 


a" 


c"' 




1 


55 


140 


45 


4 


8 


1 


u 


8 


25 


37 


11 


3 


4 


2 


5 


70 


109 


58 


13 


12 


5 






e 


6' 


6' 


e" 


i'"* 


6" 




1 


72 


131 


78 


7 


10^ 


4 




3 


40 


67 


U5 


5 


5 


2 




4 


25 


49 


21 


6 


6 







5 


41 


88 


64 


18 


5 


2 






d 


d' 


a' 


d" 


/| 


a" 




1 


44 


134 


82 


16 


2/ 


10 




8 


27 


61 


88 


19 


4 


2 




4 


20 


46 


21 


8 


4 


1 




5 


33 


72 


56 


5 


7 


2 






c 


c' 


a' 


c" 


e" 


jT' 




1 


18 


95 


61 


33 


3 







3 


19 


48 


33 


18 


2 


4 1 



J 



SECT. H. 



ANALYSIS AND SYNTHESIS OF VOWEL SOUNDS. 



541 



Vowel Sound o (*oh*) — continued. 



Voice 


Pitches and Amplitudes of the First Six Pabtials. 


No. 


I. 


II. 


III. 


IV. 


V. 


VI. 


1 
3 
4 
5 


B 
25 
21 
12 
6 


6 

15 
46 
34 
38 


1? 

29 
28 
23 


6' 
31 
28 
10 
25 


'7 

10 
4 
6 




1 

3 


1 
3 
5 
6 


37 

28 
18 
18 


&b 

58 
41 
26 
22 


f 
61 

25 

15 

32 


47 
36 
15 
75 


d" 

11 

9 

2 

9 




2 
2 


1 
3 
5 
6 


A 
15 
26 
15 

9 


a 
15 
41 
8 
46 


18 
35 
22 
44 


a' 
29 
39 
21 
80 


6^ 
18 

4 
12 


e" 
3 
2 

4 


1 
6 


a 

18 
34 


9 


30 


15 
8 


9' 
40 
45 


h' 
8 
9 


d" 

4 

7 

c" 
1 


6 


F 
22 


/ 
10 


15 


8 


a' 
84 



The following is a table of the results for u for voices 1 and 5 only, where, for 
brevity, I give only the pitches of the primes, for the pitches of the partials are 
given in the preceding table, and the numbering of the partials is sufficient to 
shew the great peculiarity of the jump from one reinforced partial to two, the' IT 
second being then by far the most prominent, and the dififerent pitches at which 
different voices make the change. Voice 5 could not get out a clear u at the pitch a. 
To these are added the results obtained from voice 5 for the vowels d^ ('awe') and 
d(*ah'). 



Pitch 
OP Prime 


Vowel u ('oo'), Voice 5 
Amplitudes of Partiaub 


Pitch 
OF Prime 


Vowel i* (• oo *), Voice 1 
Amplitudes of Partiaia 


I. 


u. 


III. 


IV. 

4 

3 
3 
1 

4 
10 
7 
4 
4 
3 


V. 


VI. 


I. 


n. 


III. 



12 

12 

6 

7 

12 


IV. 

2 

38 
12 
16 
13 
14 


V. 

3 

2 
4 
8 
6 
2 


VI. 

2 

8 

1 
2 
2 


c' 
b 

} 
e 

d 

C 

B 


186 

85 
287 
250 

38 
28 
34 
33 
31 
18 


6 

8 
26 

8 

128 
135 
148 
107 
74 
50 


2 


12 
11 

9 
5 

18 
14 
41 
28 


3 

2 

8 

1 

10 
3 
6 
3 
6 
5 


1 

2 

2 

11 
5 
8 

3 
1 


a 
9 

f 
e 


94 

22 
18 
22 
21 
27 


7 

189 
120 
136 
108 
127 


Vowel a» (*awb'), Voice 5 


Vowel a (*ah'), Voice 5 


a 

9 

f 
e 

d 


41 
24 
14 
28 
19 


48 
44 
18 
39 
26 


48 
32 
14 
82 
20 


3 
15 
23 
40 
30 


6 
8 
2 
6 

7 

1 


2 


2 
3 


c' 
b 
a 

9 

f 
e 


9 
20 
20 
37 
23 
24 
12 


22 
46 
51 
62 
35 
29 
28 


14 
58 
56 
46 
24 
12 
11 


8 
15 

8 
20 
25 
24 
15 


2 

10 

3 

4 
6 
1 
9 


2 

2 
8 

1 
8 



T 



542 ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. app. xx. 

On the first table the authors remark : — 

' At the pitches ordinarily used in speech, the vowel consists almost wholly of the 
two constituents — ^a prime and its Octave — the ratio of whose amplitudes may vary 
widely. But when the range is extended so as to reach lower pitches, higher partials 
successively appear in such a way as to allow the highest strongly reinforced partial to 
remain in the neighbourhood of 6'b' • • • Generally we may say, . . . that there is a 
wide range of reinforcement, extendinff over about two Octaves (from foTgtof)^ within 
which all tones are more or less strongly reinforced, and that there is a specially strong 
reinforcement at the pitch b'\^.* 

But this last did not appear for the artificial o's produced by Prof. Gram 
Brown's instrument (described in the paper), and recognised by the ear as o's. 
They also draw attention to the sudden alteration of amplitude of the 4ih partial 
with voice 6, and also of the 5th partial, for pitches B\^y A, G, as compared with 
F ; and to similar sudden alterations in the 3rd and also 4th partial with voices 
ir 1, 3, 5. 

After discussing the results condensed in these tables, the authors review former 
vowel theories and give their own conclusions, of which the following may be 
noted ; but the whole paper requires careful examination, as a most original and 
laborious study of a very difficult subject. 

* In distinguishing vowels the ear is guided by two factors, one depending on the har- 
mony or group of relative partiab, and the other on the absolute pitch of the reinforced 
constituents. It seems not a little singular that the ear should attach so distinct a unity 
to sounds made up of such very various groups of constituents as we have obtained from 
different voices and at different pitches, so as to recognise all these sounds as aome one 
particular vowel. We are forced to the conclusion . . . that the ear recognises the kind of 
m'al cavity by which the reinforcement is produced. . . . The vowel-producing resonance 
cavities are clearly distinguished in virtue of two properties — first, tne absolute pitch at 
which they produce a maximum reinforcement ; and, second, the area of pitch over which 
reinforcement acts. The latter property, when it is extensive, is very probably due to 
^ the existence of subordinate proper tones not far from each other in pitch. . . . We 
^' should . . . describe the u cavity as an adjustable cavity, with a very limited range of 
resonance, whose effect is to reinforce strongly only one partial above the pitch of a. ... 
If we assume that the o cavity is absolutely constant, we must describe it as a cavity re- 
inforcing tones throughout nearly two Octaves, or from gtof, . . . We are disposed to 
regard it as more probable, that in human voices the 6 cavity is slightly tuned or modi- 
fied according to the pitch on which the vowel is sung ; . . • the genuine character of d ift 
given by a cavity remforcing tones over rather more than one Octave, with an upper 
proper tone never far from 6'|^. . . . It is very satisfactory to find that the o's given by 
the human voices which we have experimented with are marked by the strong resonance 
on &'[> which Helmholtz has noticed by quite different methods of observation. It tends 
to shew that our was essentially the same vowel sound as his, and to give us confidence 
in the mode of experiment we have adopted.' {Ibid. pp. 772-775.) 

Art. 2. — Synthetical Production of Vowel Sounds. A most ingenious method of 
producing artificial vowels was invented, and is explained by Messrs. W. H. Preece 
and A. Stroh in their paper entitled Studies in Acoustics : On the Synthetic Ex- 
amination of Vowel Sounds, * Proceedings of the Royal Society,' Feb. 27, 1879, vol 
IT xxviii. No. 193, pp. 358-67. Mr. Stroh, to whom all the machinery is due, was 
kind enough, on May 29, 1884, for the purposes of this Appendix, to shew me the 
machines in action, and to reproduce the results many times over in order that I 
should be able to judge of them. Essentially there are four machines. First, one 
to produce the curve resulting from compounding 8 harmonic curves, representing 
partials, with maximum amplitudes decreasing inversely as the nxmiber of the 
partial increased, but with arrangements for altering the amplitudes and phases 
of composition. The resulting figures are extremely beautiful Secondly, a 
machine for cutting the curve thus produced, but on a reduced scale, on the edge of 
a brass disc, so that 30 periods were included in one circumference of this disc, the 
curves being automatically transferred from the first machine. Third, a machine 
by which an axis on which 8 of the discs thus cut were placed, representing 8 par- 
tials. These discs by springs could be brought into action in any combinations, and 
could convey the resulting vibration to a style working against a sensitive disc like 
that of the telephone. The sensitive disc on vibrating produced the corresponding 
sound audibly. Not being satisfied with these results, Mr. Stroh took the combina- 



8ECT. M. ANALYSIS AND SYNTHESIS OF VOWEL SOUNDS. 543 

tions and amplitudes which these experiments shewed were likely to succeed hest, 
made the corresponding compound curves by the synthetic machine, cut them by 
the second machine, mounted them as in the third, and then in a fourth or vowel 
machine conducted the vibrations from each compound curve to a disc, which spoke 
them. The details and drawings of the first and fourth machine, the speaking 
disc, and various compound curves are given in the paper. The curves are also 
compared with those resulting from my table of Prof. Helmholtz's results (suprfi., p. 
124c, d, footnote), which had also appeared in the 1st edition of this translation, p. 181. 
The table of the intensities of the j)artials given in the paper (on its p. 365) — though 
I am not quite sure that they agreed with those I heard — are as follows, the pitch of 
the prime being B\) : — 

8 16 



Vowels 1 


2 


3 


4 


6 6 


u ff 


mf 


PP 






mf 


f 


mf 


P 




A p 


P 


P 


mf 


mf p 


E mf 




mf 




ff 


I mf 


P 






p 



p 

fl 

mf 

The eflfect of these vowels on my ear was not like that of human vowels, hence 
I found it extremely difficult to place them anywhere in the human vowel 
scale. Roughly, I felt that — 

U was a sort of oOj tending towards oh ! 

was more like the word awe than oh t 

A was a very high ah, tending to the long sound of English a in fat 
E was very imperfect, and had the efifect of a hollow low French ^ mixed 
with English u in hut. 

1 was the worst vowel. It had none of the character of ai in air, but was 

far from ee. The sound * tootled \ 

When taken in rapid succession, the ear at once recognised that these sounds 
were meant for oo, oh, ah, and perhaps ay, ee ; but on prolonging the sound of 
any one, the character of the vowel became lost, as indeed is frequently the case 
in singing. Curious effects resulted from raising and lowering the pitch. The H 
flattened became a very decent oo (in hoot), and the A flattened almost a good oh. 
The effect of taking all an Octave higher was not so successful. 

The synthesis of Prof. Helmholtz and that of Messrs. Preece and Stroh, 
together with the analysis of Messrs. Fleeming Jenkin and Ewing, in art. 1, prove ' 
distinctly that difference in the quality of tone, taking only harmonic partials, is ■ 
the foundation of vowels, and also that difference of phase has^so Ux as they could ; 
obser ve, ncL P.ffftfit on the ear. (But see supr^, App. XX. Sect. L. art. vi. p. 536.) i 
Both, however, also prove that there is much more yet to be learned before we 
can satisfactorily imitate spoken vowels. Each of these methods of synthesis 
necessarily relates to sung vowels, which are quite distinct from spoken vowels, and 
indeed never satisfactorily imitate them. It appears to me that the mode of vibra- 
tion of the vocal chords is a most important element of vowel character, and that 
the resulting effect is modified by the resonance in the ventricles of Morgagni, in 
the cartilagenous larynx more or less covered by the epiglottis (acting, possibly, 
like the cup mouthpiece of brass instruments, see supra, p. 98^2, note), in the II 
pharynx, and between the pillars of the velum, before it reaches the larger re- 
sonance cavities of nose and mouth, with which we are almost solely able to deal 
By the original mode of vibration of the vocal chords for spoken vowels many 
inharmonic proper tones are probably produced, which are overcome in singing, 
and this is possibly one of the many differences between speaking and singing. 
Also, we should bear in mind that each speaker has his personal quality of ' voice ' 
(that is, mainly, of vowel sotmd), by which he would be recognised in the dark, and 
that in each individual the feeling of the moment varies the pitch and the charac- 
teristic quality of his vowels ; so that there are really millions of diffierent qualities 
of tone sJl recognised generically as the same vowel. And yet in the artificial vowels 
just considered I could not recognise any exact form of human vowel with which 
I was acquainted, althou^ I have made speech sounds an especial study for more 
than forty years. We have an analogy in the multiform presentment of the 
human countenance, which is nevertheless unhesitatingly recognised as distinct 
from that of the anthropoid ape. 



544 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



A pp. XX, 



SECTION N. 



MISCELLAlTBOnS M0TE8. 



(See pp. 78, 179.) 



No. 

1. Oompass of the Human Voice, p. 544. 

2. Harmonica and Partials of a Pianoforte 

String, struck at one* eighth of its 
length, p. 545. 
8. Histoiy of Mean Tone Temperament, p. 546. 

4. History of Equal Temperament, p. 548. 

5. Prof. May er*8 Analysis of Compound Sounds 

and Harmonic Curves, p. 549. 



No. 

6. Presumed different characters of Keys, both 

Major and Minor, p. 550. 

7. Dr. W. H. Stone's Restoration of 16-foot C) 

to the Orchestra, p. 552. 

8. On the Action of Beeas, from notes by Mr. 

Hermann Smith, p. 558. 

9. Postscript, p. 555. 



f 



1. Compass of the Human Voice, 



Instruments can be tuned or manufactured 
at almost any required pitch. The human 
voice is bom, not manufactured. Although by 
skilful training its compass can generally be 
somewhat extended, both upwards and down- 
wards yet it must in general be considered to 
be an instrument beyond human control. The 
usages of Europe have, however, made it the 
principal instrument, and, when it is present, 
have reduced all others to an accompaniment. 
Hence it is necessary that these other instru- 
ments should have their compass and pitch 
regulated by that of the human voice. Now 
the voice, like the viol family, represents at 
least four different instruments— soprano, alto, 
tenor, and bass, with two intermediate ones, 

f mezzo-soprano, between soprano and alto, and 
barytone, between tenor and bass. It is there- 
fore as necessary to determine the average and 
exceptional compass of these species of voice 
as it is to know the compass of any other 
instrument, in order that composers may be 
certain as to what sounds can be reproduced, 
and not demand any other. To do this, the 
precise acoustic meaning of each written musi- 
cal note should be ascertained. The difficulty 
of determining it has been shewn by the pre- 
ceding history of musical pitch (pp. 494-518), 
from which, combined with the tables of mean- 
tone and equal intonation (pp. 484 and 437), it 
is evident that HandePs sustained a" in the 
Hallelujah chorus had 845 vib., but would 
now be sung to 904 vib. ; and that Mozart's 
f" in the Zauherflbie would have meant 1349 

f vib., but would now have to be sung at 1455 
vib. The strain that this would put upon 
voices is evident, and no composer who wished 
his music to be well represented would think 
of making such demands on his singers. It 
appeared, therefore, necessary to ascertain 
more precisely than had been hitherto done, 
and to express in numbers of vibrations, the 
limits of the different kinds of voices. If the 
composer will then only translate his written 
notes into xlumbers of vibrations, by the table 
on p. 437, according to the pitch he employs, 
he will avoid all danger of straining singers. 

Through the kindness and liberality of the 
choir conductors, Messrs. Henry Leslie, W. 
Q. McNaught, J. Proudman, Ebenezer Prout, 
L. C. &. G. J. Venables, and 542 members of 
th§ choirs they conducted, I was able to 
examine a sufficient number of singers, in 
January, 1880, to arrive at something like a 



trustworthy account of the coifipass of the 
voice. I gave each singer a paper with the 
words do rs mi fa sol la ti do' printed on them 
in four columns up and down to the requisite 
extent, and then started them on do in 4 
different pitches, 507, 522-5, 528, 640-7 vib. 
(representing the just d' corresponding to a' 
422-5 Handel's pitch, a' 435*4 the French 
pitch, a' 440 Scheibler's pitch, and the equal 
c" of a' 454*7, the highest Philharmonic pilch 
of 1874, respectively). I got them to sing up 
and down in chorus under the direction of 
the conductor, and to mark with a pencil the 
highest and lowest note each one could reach, 
first etmly^ or secondly by a% effort (falsetto 
of male voices being excluded in the first 
case, but not in the last). From these papers 
I determined by calculation, on the assump- 
tion of just intonation (as being most prob- 
able for unaccompanied singers), the numbers 
of vibrations in the limiting notes. These are 
contained in the following table, together with 
the mean height and depth of all the voices. 
The extreme highest limit for male voices, as 
it included falsetto, is a mere curiosity. • For 
writing music, the mean should not be as- 
sumed as the limit, for perhaps half the chorus 
could not reach it. But it would be perfectly 
safe to write from the highest low easy limit 
to the lowest high easy limit. Thus, for so- 
pranos it would not do to write up to h" 998 
and down to / 180, but it would be quite safe 
to write up to f 704 and down to 6 253. 
Viewed in this way, my results agree more 
nearly with Randegger's, which I add for com- 
parison. These last are given in a staff- 
notation form in hid primer on Singing (No- 
vello, 1879) ; and as he politely informed me 
that he assumed Broadwood*s medium pitch 
a' 446-2, 1 was able to calculate the vibrations. 
All the numbers of vibrations are given to the 
nearest integer only, and it is to these numbers 
that attention should be especially paid, the 
names of the notes being merely guides. Those 
letters preceded by a turned period relate to 
high pitch in the column ' Actual,* and those 
not so preceded relate to a medium pitch, 
as French or German. But in the column 
* Mean * no precise system at all could be 
selected. In Bandegger*s, of course. Broad- 
wood's medium pitch is intended. If, how- 
ever, the notes be played on any ordinary piano, 
they will seldom be in error to the extent of 
a quarter of a Tone. 



SBOI. N. 



MISCELLANEOUS NOTES. 



545 



Mean and Actual CoiiPASs op the Human Voice. 



VoiCBs Orakrvkd 


Easy Lower Limit 


VOIOES Obaervbd 


Extreme Lower Limit 


Mean 


Actual 


Mean 


Actual 


146 Sopranos 

91 Altos . 

107 Tenors . 

125 Basses . 


/ 180 
e\^ 161 
G 98 
E 81 


•6 258 to 
•c 186 
a\^ 211 to 
c 182 
e 163 to 
•D 76 
A\f 106 to 
C 66 


173 Sopranos 
108 Altos . 
114 Tenors . 
140 Basses . 


e\^ 162 
d 147 
E 85 

Cjf 72 


-g 208 to 
c 130 
g 198 to 
JB 124 
•B 127 to 
C 66 
•F 90 to 
'A, 56 




East Hiqhsr Limit 


Voices Observed 


Extreme Higher Limit 


VoicBs Observed 


MeaD 


Actual 


Mean Actual 

1 


145 Sopranos 
83 Altos . 
114 Tenors . 
120 Basses . 


6" 993 
g"$ 836 
c'f 521 
ft 376 


/"' 1408 to 
ff 704 
'd'" 1216 to 
-e" 676 
d" 608 to 
'e'\f 317 
•c" 641 to 
d' 294 


173 Sopranos 
106 Altos . 
112 Tenors . 
139 Basses . 


c"% 1124 

d" 617 

b'^ 483 

1 
1 


•o"'|^ 1690 to 
-g" 811 
g" 1684 to 
•/" 721 
•g" 811 to 
g' 896 
•c'" 1081 to 
e' 330 


Bandeogbb's Statekekt of Limitino Tones. 


Voices 


Regular 


Voices 


EXCEPnONAL 

1 


Lower Limit 


Upper Limit 


Lower Limit 


Upper Limit 


Soprano 

Mezzo Soprano . 
Alto . 
Tenor . 
Barytone . 
Bass . 


b\f 236 
g 199 
e 167 
c 133 
A\fl05 
F 89 


c'" 1061 
6"k 945 
/" 708 
6'k 473 
/' 364 
e'\f 316 


Soprano 

Mezzo Soprano ' 
Alto . 
Tenor . 
Barytone . 
Bass . 


b\f 236 
g 199 
e 167 
c 133 
F 87 
D 75 


/'" 1417 
c'" 1061 
g" 795 
c't 562 
g' 898 
/' 854 



T 



f 



2. Ha/rmonics and Partiah of a Pianoforte String struck at one-eighth 

of its length. 



On p. 77, note *, will be found Mr. tiipkins's 
observations on the striking-point of piano- 
forte strings, shewing that one-seventh of the 
length, which seemed to be assumed as usual 
by Prof. Helmholtz, was not in use generally, 
or (p. 76d') at Steinways*. Prof. Helmholtz 
conceived that the origin of this presumed 
custom was to get rid of the 7th partial, 
which he also considered likely to injure the 
quality of tone. Mr. Hipkins's experiments 
were therefore made with the object of deter- 
mining whether when the striking-place was 
one of the nodes the corresponding partial 
disappeared, as results from the mathematical 
formula (12a) supr&, p. 3836. 

Mr. Hipjdns's first experiments are de- 
tailed in his paper entitled * Observations on 
the Harmonics of a String, struck at one-eighth 
its length ' (Proc. Royal Society, 20 Nov. 1884, 
vol. xxxvii. p. 363). The main facts are given 
supr&, p. 78d. The results were all witnessed 
by Dr. Huggins, F.R.S., and myself. The 
string was exactly 45 inches long, and was 
struck at precisely one-eighth its length from 
the wre8tplank-bridge(that nearest the player). 
When it wsa touched with a piece of felt at 
5-63, 16*88, and 28-13 inches from the belly- 
bridge (that farthest from the player), which 



are three positions of the nodes for the 8th 
partial or third Octave higher, selected to avoid 
errors (as not being positions of the nodes of 
the 2nd or 4th partials), in each case the 8th 
harmonic was well heard. It was not so 
strong as the 4th, 5th, 6th, 7th, and 9th, all 
of which were heard, but quite unmistakable, 
and was heard better on removing the felt 
immediately after the note had been pro- % 
duced. The 16th partial was also heard when 
the siring was touched at its nodes 2*81 and 
6*44 inches from the belly-bridge, which are 
nodes of the 16th but not of the 8th partial. 

What was heard was the harmonic^ not the 
simple partial tone, and it was suggested, that 
perhaps touching the string at the node coerced 
the string and obliged it to vibrate with these 
nodes, notwithstanding that it was struck in 
one of the series of such nodes. Mr. Hipkins, 
therefore, at my suggestion made a new series 
of experiments, detailed in his paper entitled 
* Observations on the Upper Partial Tones of 
a Pianoforte String, struck at one-eighth its 
length ' (Proc. of the Royal Society, 16 Jan. 
1885, vol. xxxviii. p. 83). These experiments 
I also witnessed. The object was to leave the 
string perfectly uncoerced, and to avoid the 
use of resonators, on which some suspicion had 

N N 



546 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR 



▲PP. XX. 



been (wrongly, as I believe) cast by at least 
one observer. Calculating tbe pitch of the 
partials, which would be the same as that of 
the harmonics, and the interval which the 
tempered notes of the piano would make with 
them (as in Table II., 8upr&, p. 457), a string 
of the corresponding note was slackened (or 
tightened, as convenient ; sometimes both al- 
ternately), while the other unison strings were 
damped with the usual tuners' wedges ; and in 
the same way only one of the three lower 
strings was allowed to vibrate. Then the low 
note and the high note were struck simul- 
taneously. It is evident that the high note 
being slightly out of unison with the upper 
partial of the lower note, beats would ensue if 
such a partial existed. Now, for the 5th, 6th, 

IT 7th, 8th, 9th, 10th, and 11th partial such beats 
were perfectly audible, but their duration for 
the 11th partial with 1487 vib. was so short 
that higher ones were not tried. For the 8th 
partial the beats were quite distinct, and, on 
removing the wedges that damped the unison 
strings for the high note, and striking the three 
high strings without the lower note, it was 
evident that the beats heard were the same in 
rapidity and character as when the single 
string was sounded with the low one. 

The fact, therefore, that the 8th partial 
existed was conclusively proved. Various 
causes have been assigned. On p. 888d, note *, 
I have suggested that if terms omitted by the 
hypothesis named were introduced, perhaps 
there would be a residuum which would ac- 
count for hearing the 8th partial. This partial 

^ was really much weaker than the 7th. The 
last, indeed, was quite clear and ringing, so 
that it did not seem affected by striking the 
string BO near its node. 

It is curious that when the nodes do not 
He very close the harmonic could be brought 
out by touching the string somewhat near the 
proper place. Thus for the 2nd harmonic, 
node at 22-5 inches from the beily-bridge ; the 
next nodes were 1*2 inch nearer and 1*2 inch 
farther from that spot, and on trial the 2nd 
harmonic or Octave came out when the string 
was touched between 22*1 and 22*95 inches 



from the belly-bridge, but not at 22-05 and 23-0, 
so there was a ' play ' of *85 inch. For the 
drd harmonic there was similarly a ' play * of 
-65 inch. A very remarkable fact was that by 
stopping within 1-5 inch of the belly-bzidge, 
the simple prime or lowest partial came out 
unaccompanied by any other audible parfeials. 
This was tested by beats of forks, shewing that 
the 2nd and 4th partials did not exist. 

Various causes for the sounding of the 8th 
harmonic have been suggested. One of these 
was that the hammer of the pianoforte, being 
round and soft, did not strike at one point, and 
so excited the string on each side of the node. 
To avoid this action the much harder hammer 
of the highest note (A in the 3-inch octave) was 
used in supplementary experiments made on 
2 April 1885. The width of the part of the 
hammer that came in contact vrith the string 
did not exceed ^ inch. And again, an ivorr 
edge, not more than ^V ^^^^ ^^ width, was osed 
instead of the felt covering of the hammer. 
The 8th partial, tried by beats, in both cases 
came out much stronger than before, and the 
beats could be distinctly heard 10 or 12 feet off. 
Again, it was supposed that the string might 
not be uniform, and that if the striking-place 
were slightly moved from the theoreticaii node, 
an actual node would be reached, and the par- 
tial quenched. Hence the ivory head of the 
hammer was shifted so as to strike up to 3I3 
inch away from the node on either side. The 
partial was heeurd strongly, but the sound ol 
the note was not so pleasant as when the string 
was struck at the actual node. 

It has been also suggested that the string 
moved the points of support, but that we had 
no means of testing. The phenomenon, there- 
fore, remains unexplained ; but thanks to Mr. 
Hipkins, who had the resources of Broadwoods' 
establishment and the assistance of expe- 
rienced tuners at command, there is no doubt 
whatever of the fact, that a pianoforte string 
when struck at a node by a hard or soft ham- 
mer does not lose the corresponding partial, 
and does not materially enfeeble the partials 
with adjacent nodes. 



3. History of Meantone Teniperanie7iL 



This is the temperament usually, but 
wrongly, known as * unequal ' (suprii, p. 434a'^, 
which prevailed so long ever Europe, and is 
not yet entirely extruded. 
IT Arnold Schlick, Spiegel der Orgelmachcr 
vH Organisten (Mirror of Organ-builders and 
Organists), 1511, chap, viii., orders the Fifths 
FC, CG, GD, DA to be tuned as fiat as the 
ear could bear, so as to make the major Third 
FA decent. Then he tunes AE, BD in the 
same manner. Beginning again with F, he 
tunes the Fifths down FB^, B\y, E)^, sharpen- 
ing the lower note for the same reason. Then 
he tunes E\) A)^ and makes A\i ' not sharp, but 
somewhat flatter than the Fifth requires, on 
account of the proof (vmh das brifen), although, 
however, the Gi thus made is never a good 
Third or perfect Sixth to the Fifth E and Bfl 
for cadences in A.* He prides himself, how- 
ever, on the A)y or GjL and shews how to dis- 
guise inaccuracies. 'And he refutes those who 
would make Gji good for cadences in ii in the 
chord E Gjt B, by saying this produces weak- 



ness, and takes away the effect of good and 
strange consonances. For the rest, he tunes 
B Fji with the upper note flat, and apparently 
Fjj^ u( in the same way. This was ^ally an 
unequal temperament, and looks very like the 
meantone temperament spoiled, but that sys- 
tem was not yet discovered. Schlick*s editor 
(Rob. Eitner, in the MonaJtshefte der Miisik- 
Geschichte, monthly parts of the History of 
Music, part I., 1869) says that what Schlick 
claims for A\^ and Gji was supposed to be the 
invention of Barth. ' Fritz of Brunswick in 
1756, 245 years later. 

Giuseppe Zarlino of Chioggia, 50 yean 
after Schlick, in his Le Utitvtioni harTnoniehf 
(Institutes of Harmony), Venice, 1562, speaks 
of alcuni (some people) who seemed to think 
that the interval of the comma should be dis- 
tributed ameng the two nearest intervals, and 
the others left in their natural form (cap. 43. 
p. 128). This would give a meantone for the 
second of the major scale = } x (204 -t- 18S) =■ 
193 cents, but leave the others veiy dissonant, 



0sa 



8ECT. N. 



MISCELLANEOUS NOTES. 



547 



and to this Zarlino rightly ohjects. It would 
give the major scale CO, D193, £386, F498, 
O702, il884, B1088, cl200 cents, so that the 
Fourth D : G woald have 509 cents, and the 
Fifth D : A would have 691 cents, which com- 
ing in the midst of just intervals would he 
intolerable, and beyond the natural key it fails 
entirely. Zarlino* s remedy (chap. 42, p. 126) 
is to diminish every Fifth by two-sevenths of 
a comma, and he proceeds to shew how this 
affects the tuning. It preserves the small 
Semitone 24 : 25 = 70*678 cents. He says, 
p. 127, * although in instruments thus tem- 
pered consonances cannot be given in their 
perfect— that is, their true and natural form — 
yet they can be used when the chords have 
to be given in their true and natural propor- 
tions. I say this,* he adds, ' because I have 
frequently made the experiment on an instru- 
ment which I had made for the purpose, and 
the effect may be tried on any other instru- 
ment, especially the harpsichord and clavi- 
chord, which are well adapted for the purpose.* 
Then, in chap. 43, he proceeds to shew that 
this temperament is rationally constructed, 
and that no other is so {che per altro modo 
rum si possa fare, that is, r(igioneuolments). 
It is quite clear, then, that Zarlino, as has 
often been asserted, did not invent the mean- 
tone temperament, and did not consider equal 
temperament worth mentioning, even if he wds 
acquainted with it. 

Francis Salinas of Burgos in Spain, bom 
1513, died 1590, blind from infancy. Professor 
of Music in the University of Salamanca, 
Abb^ of St. Pancras de Bocca Scalegno, in 
the kingdom of Naples, in 1577 published his 
De Mtisica libri septern^ of which a very im- 
perfect, and, as respects temperament, in- 
correct account is given in Bumey & Haw- 
kins. Salinas says (lib. iii. cap. zv. p. 143, 
I translate his Latin) : — 

* From what has been said, in order that 
Tones should be rendered equal, the minor 
must be increased and the major diminished. 
It must be observed that this can be done in 
several ways, because the comma, by which 
they differ, may be divided in many ways. 
Of these, three have been thought out up to 
this time, which seem to me most suitable 
(aptissimi). Hence arise three ways of tem- 
pering imperfect instruments. The first is 
to divide the comma into three proportional 
parts, giving one to the minor Tone, and tak- 
ing two from the major Tone. This gives a 
new Tone, larger than the minor and smaller 
than the major. The decrement is twice the 
increment, and through the maximum in- 
equality the tone becomes equal.* 

The comma has 21*506 cents, hence 
^ comma has 7*169, and ^ comma has 
14*388 cents. Then 182*404 + 7*169 =189-572 
= 203*910-14*338 cents, which is what the 
above statement comes to, giving 189*572 
cents for the new Tone. Notwithstanding 
this very precise statement, Salinas ought to 
mean precisely the reverse. His object was to 
make the Tritone perfect, and to make it con- 
sist of three new Tones. Now a Tritone F : B 
consists of 2 major Tones and 1 minor Tone, 
— ^that is, 3 minor Tones and 2 commas, or 
590*224 cents, i of which is 196*741 cents, 
which is 182*404+14*338 and 203*910-7*169 



— that is, the reverse of the former result. By 
a singular error perpetuated in a figure (which, 
of course, being blind he could not see), Salinas 
makes the Tntone in this place consist of 
2 minor Tones and 1 major Tone — that is, 
8 minor Tones and 1 comma, having the ratio 
18 : 25, or cents 568*718, which is not the 
Tritone, but the superfluous Fourth, and may 
here be called the false Tritone. This mis- 
take seems to have arisen thus. The Octave, 
as he rightly says, has 6 minor Tones, 2 
commas, and a great DiSsis. ' The comma 
being divided into 3 proportional parts, if one 
is added to each minor Tone, 2 commas will 
be added to the six Tones, and one to three, 
equally distributed among them. From which 
distribution it will follow in this constitution 
of the temperament that the Tritone consists 
of three minor Tones and one comma, or IT 
2 minor Tones and one major,' whence he 
deduces the ratio 18 : 25. But he thus alto- 
gether loses sight of the great Diesis, and 
considers a Tritone to be half of an Octave 
after it has been diminished by a DiSsis. On 
p. 155 he again notices the Tritone as 82 : 45, 
the correct ratio. The false Tritonic tempera- 
ment therefore makes the Tone 189*572, the 
Fifth 694-786, and the false Tritone 568*718 
cents. But the true Tritonic system gives the 
Tone of 196*74, the Fifth of 698*37 and the 
true Tritone 590*22 cents. 

Salinas continues his account of the three 
temperaments thus: *The second [tempera- 
ment] divides the comma into 7 proportional 
parts, giving 8 to the minor and taking 4 from 
the major Tone.* This is Zarlino's tempera- 
ment already described, and preserves them 
small Semitone 24 : 25= 70*678 cents. *The 
third will arise from having the comma, 
giving half to the minor and taking half from 
the major Tone.* Then he adds (p. 164): 
* Wherefore any one of these three tempera- 
ments seems most suitable for artificial instru- 
ments ; nor have any more been as yet thought 
out (nequeplura adhuc excogitata sunt) ; * that 
is, Salinas, like Zarlino, utterly ignores the 
equal temperament. * The first, so far as I 
know has been laid down by no one.* From 
which it is to be inferred that it was his own in- 
vention. 'The second I have also found in 
the harmonic institutions of Joseph Zarlino of 
Chioggia,* as already given. ' The third was 
commenced, but not perfected, by Luigi or 
Ludovico FoUiano of M6dena,* who must have 
been Zarlino*s * some people * (alcuni). ' And U 
Joseph Zarlino has properly considered it in 
his harmonic demonstrations. But no one 
has previously acknowledged all three, nor 
observed upon their relation and mutual 
order.' 

It was Salinas who finished Folliano's 
work, and in chaps. 22 to 25 he describes 
the result thoroughly. As, therefore, we con 
sider Watt, and not the Marquis of Worces- 
ter, to have invented the steam engine, we 
must couHider Salinas, and not FoUiano, to 
have invented the meantone temperament. I 
give a comparative table of all three schemes 
in cents to the nearest integer, from E^ to 
G*jf^ distinguishing the true and false Tritonic 
and adding the Equal, which will shew the real 
relations of these three temperaments to each 
other. 



H v2 



548 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



Notes 


True Tritonic 


False Tritonic 


Zarllno 


Meantone 


£qiiAl ' 


C 


' 














C9 


89 


64 


71 


76 


100 


D 


197 


190 


192 


198 


200 


E\f 


305 


816 


818 


310 


300 


E 


898 


879 


388 


886 


400 


F 


502 


505 


504 


503 


500 


n 


590 


569 


576 


580 


600 


a 


698 


695 


696 


697 


700 


ot 


787 


758 


766 


773 


800 


A 


895 


884 


887 


890 


900 


B\> 


1008 


1010 


1009 


1007 


1000 


B 


1092 


1074 


1079 


1083 


1100 


^ 


1200 


1200 


1200 


1200 


1200 



fl- The true Tritonic, making the Tritone 
" 590*22 cents, necessarily differs very slightly 
from equal temperament, which makes it 600 
cents, while the false Tritonic, making the 
Tritone 568'716, or a comma too flat, ap- 
proaches very near to Zarlino^s and the Mean- 



tone, so that I think Salinas must have 
intended to use this one which he lays down 
so clearly, and that he accidentally made a 
mistake of a comma in estimating the Tritone, 
hy hastily neglecting the Diesis. For later 
usages see supr4, pp. 820, 821. 



4. The History of Equal Tem^amenL 



When once the Pythagorean division of 
the Octave had heen settled, and it had been 
observed that 12 Fifths exceeded 7 Octaves by 
the small interval of a Pythagorean comma 
(p. 482, art. 9), the idea of distributing this 
error among the 12 Fifths was obvious. 
Aristoxenus, a pupil of Aristotle, the son of 
a musician and a writer on music, is said to 
have advocated this. At any rate he stated 
that the Fourth consisted of two Tones and a 
f half, which is exactly true only in equal tem- 
perament. Amiot reports equal temperament 
from China long previously even to Pytha- 
goras. In later times Mersenne (Harmonie 
Universelle^ 1636) gives the correct numbers 
for the ratios of equal temperament, and says 
(Livre 3, prop. xii. * Des genres de la musique ') 
of equal temperament that it ' est le plus 
usiU et le plus commode, et que tons les prac- 
ticiens avoiient que la division de TOctave en 
12 demitons leur est plus facile pour toucher 
les instruments.' This should imply that 
there were numerous instruments in equal 
temperament, but I have not been able to find 
any noticed. B^dos (L'Art dufacteur d'OrgtteSj 
1766) knows only meantone temperament, 
which he gives directions for tuning. In Ger- 
many, Werckmeister {Orgelprobe, 2nd edit. 
1698) says that he can only recommend equal 
flj- temperament, and Schnitger of Harburg in 
'' Hanover, and afterwards of Hamburg, an sbd- 
mirer of Werckmeister, built the organ of St. 
Jacobi-Kirche in Hamburg in 1688, and tuned 
it in intentionally equal temperament. Herr 
Schmahl, who had been the organist there 
since 1838, never knew it otherwise tuned, 
emd could find no record of any change of 
intonation in the archives of the church, and 
he also could not recollect having ever heard 
of any other intonation in North Germany. 
His master, Demuth (died 1848) of St. Catha- 
rinen-Kirche, whose memory extended back- 
wards to 1810, also knew of no other tuning 
in North Germany. Of course the tempera- 
ment never was thoroughly equal, so that 
when Herr Schmahl practised on the St. 
Catharine's organ, the usual keys C and G 
were not so good as the unusual keys F$ and 



Df. Dr. Robert Smith, 1759, must have 
heard equal temperament, or else he could 
hardly have spoken of * that inharmonious 
system of 12 hemitones ' producing a ' har- 
mony extremely coarse and disagreeable* 
IHannonicSy 2nd ed. pp. 166-7), but it may 
have been only an experimental instrument of 
his own. 

As regards the recent introduction of equal 
temperament into England, Mr. James Broad- 
wood, in the New Monthly Maganns, 1 Sept. 
1811, proposed it, and gave the error of the 
Fifths as ^^ Semitone (=2^ cents), which was 
to him the smallest sensible interval. On 

1 Oct. 1811, Mr. John Farey, sen., shewed that 
this was too much (it should be 1*954, or about 

2 cents — that is, about ^ Semitone), and re- 
ferred to the article * Equal Temperament * in 
Rees's Cyclopedia, Hereupon, on 1 Nov. 1811, 
Mr. James Broadwood rejoined that he gave 
merely a practical method of producing equal 
temperament, * from its being in most general 
use, and because of the various systems it has 
been pronounced the best deserving that ap- 
pellation by Haydn, Mozart, and other masters 
of harmony.* Unfortunately he gives no refer- 
ences, and consequently this assertion can be 
taken only as an unverified impression. Haydn 
died 1808, Mozart 1791, but the Hamburg 
organs had equal temperament long before 
that time. Sebastian Bach (died 1750) is gene- 
rally credited with introducing equal tem- 
perament, but M. Bosanquet says * there is no 
direct evidence that he ever played upon an 
organ tuned according to equal temperament ' 
{Musical Intervals and Temperament^ 1876, 
p. 31). Bitter, however, states, in his life of 
Sebastian Bach, that he once played on the St. 
Jacobi organ at Hamburg, and expressed his 
approval of the tuning, and even applied for 
the post of organist. The wohl temperirtis 
Clavier, or well-tuned clavichord, the notes of 
which are very fugitive, was the instrument 
mentioned by Carl Philip Emanuel Bach, who 
died 1788. 

As regards Mr. James Broadwood's state- 
ment that equal temperament was in 1811 ' in 
most general use * — presumably in England — 



SECT. K. 



MISCELLANEOUS NOTES. 



549 



Mr. Hipkins has been at some pains to ascer- 
tain how far that was the case, and from him 
I learn that Mr. Peppercorn, who tuned origin- 
ally for the Philharmonic Society, was concert 
tuner at Broadwoods', and a great favourite of 
Mr. James Broadwood. His son writes to Mr. 
Hipkins that his father ' always tuned so that 
all keys can be played in, and neither he nor 
I [neither father nor son] ever held with making 
some keys sweet and others sour. ' Mr. Bailey, 
however, who succeeded Mr. Peppercorn as 
concert tuner, and tuned Mr. James Broad- 
wood's own piano at Lyne, his country house, 
used the meantone temperament to Mr. Hip- 
kins*B own knowledge, and no other. Not one 
of the old tuners Mr. Hipkins knew (and some 
had been favourite tuners of Mr. James Broad- 
wood) tuned anything like equal temperament. 
Collard, the Wilkies, Challenger, Seymour, all 
tuned the meantone temperament, except that 
like Arnold Schlick, 1511 (see p. .546d), they 
raised the G^ somewhat to mitigate the * wolf ' 
resulting from the Fifth E^ : G$ in place of 
E]^ : A)^. Hence Mr. James Broadwood did 
not succeed in introducing equal temperament 
permanently even into his own establishment, 
.and all tradition of it died out long ago. So 
far runs Mr. Hipkins*s interesting information. 

In 1812 Dr. Crotch {Elements of Musical 
Composition^ pp. 134-5) gives the proper 
£gures for equal temperament, shews how it 
arose, that its Fifths are too flat and its major 
Thirds too sharp, adding ' this will render all 
keys equally imperfect,* but says nothing to 
recommend it. Yet in 1840 Dr. Crotch (who 
died in 1847) had his own chamber organ 
tuned in equal temperament, as I have been 
informed by Mr. E. J. Hopkins, author of Ths 
Organ, dc. 

It is one thing to propose equal tempera- 
ment, to calculate its ratios, and to have trial 
instruments approximately tuned in accord- 
ance with it, and another thing to use it com- 
mercially in all instruments sold. For pianos 
in England it did not become a trade usage 
till 1846, at about which time it was intro- 
duced into Broadwoods' under the superintend- 
ence of Mr. Hipkins himself. At least eight 
years more elapsed before equal temperament 
was generally used for organs, on which its 



defects are more apparent, although not to such 
an extent as on the harmonium. 

In 1851, at the Great Exhibition, no 
English organ was tuned in equal tempera- 
ment, but the only German organ exhibited 
(Schulze's) was so tuned. 

In July 1852 Messrs. J. W. Walker & Sons 
put their Exeter Hall organ into equal tem- 
perament, but it was not used publicly till 
November of that year. Meanwhile, in Sept., 
Mr. George Herbert, a barrister and amateur, 
then in charge of the organ in the Roman 
Catholic Church in Farm Street, Berkeley 
Square, London, had that organ tuned equally 
by Mr. Hill, the builder. Though much op'- 
posed, it was visited and approved by many, 
and among others by Mr. Cooper, who had the 
organ in the hall of Christ's Hospital (the 
Bluecoat School) tuned equally in 1858. H 

In 1854 the first organ built and tuned 
originally in equal temperament, by Messrs. 
Gray & Davison, was made for Dr. Eraser's 
Congregational Chapel at Blackburn (both 
chapel and organ have since been burned). 
In the same year Messrs.* Walker and Mr. 
Willis sent out their first equally tempered 
organs. This must therefore be considered 
as the commercial date for equal temperament 
on new organs in England. On old organs 
meantone temperament lingered much later. 
In 1880, when I wrote my History of Musical 
Pitch , from which most of these particulars 
have been taken, I found meantone tempera- 
ment still general in Spain, and used in Eng- 
land on Greene's three organs, at St. George's 
Chapel, Windsor (since altered), at St. Katha- 
rine's, Regent's Park (see p. 484c'), and at 
Kew Parish Church ; and while many others U 
had only recently been altered, one (Jordan's 
at Maidstone Old Parish Church) was being 
altered when I visited it in that year. Hence, 
in England, equal temperament, though now 
(1885) firmly established, is not yet quite 40 
years old on the pianoforte, and only 80 
years old on the organ. 

The difficulty of tuning in equal tempera- 
ment led to the invention of Scheibler's tuning- 
fork tonometer. In Sect. G., art. 11, p. 489, 
will be found a practical rule for tuning in 
sensibly equal temperament at all usual pitches. 



5. Professor Mayer's Analysis of Compound Tonnes and Harmonic Curves. 



The following are two of the numerous 
acoustical contrivances of Mr. Alfred M. Mayer, 
Ph.D., Member of the National (American) 
Academy of Sciences, and Professor of Physics 
in the Stevens Institute of Technology, Hobo- 
ken, New Jersey, United States (see supr&, p. 
417c). 

1. New Objective AncUysis of Compound 
Sounds. The analysis of compound sounds by 
resonators has two disadvantages : first, that 
it is subjective, inasmuch as but one observer 
at a time is capable of hearing the results ; 
and, secondly, that the range of pitch reinforce- 
able by a resonator is too great for extreme 
accuracy in the estimation of the actual com- 
ponent sound present. Both of these disad- 
vantages were tnus overcome {Phil. Mag. Oct. 
1874, vol. xlviii. pp. 271-8, with a figure). 

A Greni^'s free reed pipe, of the pitch 
<7=128, had part of its wooden chamber re- 
moved and replaced by morocco leather, at 



one point of which 8 silk cocoon fibres were 
attached, having their opposite extremities 
attached to 8 tuning-forks tuned to C, c, g, c\ IT 
^' 9\ ^^'b» ^*'^ *' ***® point of the upper node in 
each where it divides into segments when 
giving its upper harmonic, so that this har- 
monic was el iminated. The cocoon fibres were 
stretched till they made no visible ventral seg- 
ments when vibrating. The reed was tuned 
accurately to the C fork (of 64 vibrations) by 
means of the g fork. The forks were placed 
on proper resonance boxes. When the reed 
was sounded each fork * sang out ' loudly, but 
if the prongs of any fork were only slightly 
loaded the fork was mute, and was so rapidly 
afiected that Prof. Mayer estimates (same vol. 
p. 519) that the effect of intervals such as 
2000 : 2001 (or '87 or not quite 1 cent) can be 
rendered sensible to the ear. On ceasing to 
sound the reed the forks continued to sound, 
and produced a tone of so nearly the same 



550 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XI. 



quality as that of the reed that it was easy to 
feel that the difference was due to the absence 
of partials higher than the eighth. By this 
means, then, the analysis and synthesis of a 
compound tone can be shewn to a large 
audience at once, and all doubt as to its ob- 
jective reality removed. At the same time the 
air in the resonance chamber of the reed acts 
on the leather cover as in hearing it would 
have acted on the drumskin of the ear, and 
the conduction of that vibration by the cocoon 
fibres replaces the complicated arrangements 
in the interior of the drum and the fluid of the 
labyrinth of the ear, while the forks themselves 
serve as the organs in the cochlea. Prof. 
Helmholtz^s physiological theory of audition is 
thus perfectly exhibited in a ' working model.* 
IT The action of the resonance chambers of the 
forks is simply to make the effects heard at a 
distance. 

2. Harmonic Curves (see p. 387d). In the 
Philosophical Magazine^ Supplement for Jan- 
uary 1875. vol. xlviii. pp. 520-525, Prof. Mayer 
gives curves compounded by six curves of sines 
(p. 23d'), representing six partial tones, where, 
for convenience, the amplitudes are taken to 
vary as the wave lengths, and to have the same 
initial phase. They are combined by taking 



the algebraical sum of their ordinates, which 
law would of course not hold true for the am- 
plitudes chosen (about one-third of the length 
of the wave). The resulting figure bean a 
most remarkable resemblance to fig. 25, supra, 
p. 846. There is the same sudden rise on the 
left and step-like descent on the right, but 
the steps are more rounded, and the upper 
crest more pointed, and there are five steps in 
addition to the crest. Prof. Mayer then com- 
bines two such compound curves, and thus 
produces the resulting curves of two compound 
tones forming an Octave (with one high aod 
one low crest, and also one high and one lov 
trough, and the steps uneven and reduced in 
number), a Fifth (with four crests, two with 
long and two with short descents, the shorter 
having only one step), and a major Third (with 
eight crests, two extremely small, two mode- 
rate, three intermediate between the two last 
kinds, and one high, the ascents being abmpi 
as before, the descents rather wavy than 
stepped). These had all been drawn on a 
large scale with several hundred ordinates, 
and were reduced photographically. They 
form an excellent practical illustration of the 
nature of harmonic motions. 



6. The presumed different Chivracters of Keys, both Major and Minor. 



See supri, p. 810c to Sllc. It is first neces- 
sary to know what is the presumed pheno- 
menon to account for. In the discussion of 
my paper * On the Measurement and Settle- 

1 ment of Musical Pitch ' {Jou/rnal of the Society 
of Arts, 25 May 1877, p. 686), Prof, (now Sir 
George) Macfarren, Principal of the Royal 
Academy of Music, spoke of ' the difficulty of 
representing the compositions of different eras, 
which had been written for different standards 
of pitch,' and added ' it was a marvellous fact 
that, while the pitch was felt to be changed, 
the impression of the character of the keys 
seemed to remain with reference to the nominal 
key, not to the number of vibrations of each 
particular note. Thus the key of D at the 
present day represented the same effect as was 
produced by the same key according to one's 
earliest recollections ; it did not sound like the 
key of E'^f although it might be of the same 
pitch. If Mozart's symphony in C were to 
be played a Semitone lower, to bring it to the 
original pitch, it would not sound at all the 

•j" same. How far this result was subjective — 
how much depended on the imagination of the 
hearer, and how much on the physical facts — 
was a deep, perhaps an insoluble question ; but 
it was one which really ought to be considered.' 
The Chairman (Mr. William Pole, F.R.S., 
Mus. D. Oxon), on the contrary, said : ' In a prac- 
tical point of view the French did an exceed- 
ingly good thing when they fixed on one pitch, 
. . . and they had practically done so, not 
only for France, but the Continent generally. 
He had the gratification some time a.go of 
hearing Beethoven's Sinfonia Eroica played 
at a Conservatoire concert in J^i^, as it should 
be, but he could not get rid of the idea, when 
he heard it played at the Philharmonic con- 
certs, that it was in Ef^.* 



The mention of the performance of sym- 
phonies by Sir G. Macfarren and Dr. Pole 
takes the whole question out of the action of 
individual instruments, in which there is no 
doubt of considerable variety depending on the 
tonic, but this can be traced in every ease to 
some defect of the instrument itself, as has 
been considered in the text (loc. cit.). The 
point of the long and short keys on a piano- 
forte, spoken of by Prof. Helmholtz, haft 
been well worked out by Mr. G. Johnstone 
Stoney, D.Sc, F.R.S. Dublin, in a paper read 
before the Royal Dublin Society on 16 March 
1888 {Sdentiflc Proc. R. Dublin Soc., p. 59), 
who calls attention to the fact that in .4 all 
the Fifths are on white digitals and the major 
Thirds on black digitals, while in A^ Uie 
Fifths are on black and the major Thirds on 
white digitals, and argues that this must 
make considerable difference in playing. Mr. 
Hipkins, however, gives it as his opinion that 
it is impossible to tell in the periormance of 
a first-rate player whether he is striking a 
white or a black key. That would relegate 
the difference to the degree of skill of the 
player. But this does not at all affect the 
organ, the harmonium, or the voice. And bv 
reference to symphonies we are constrained 
to consider the question independently of any 
particular instrument, as a simple acoustical 
fact. 

In order to ascertain what that fact is sup- 
posed to be, sbccording to recognised musicians 
of high standing, I give a condensed re-arrange- 
ment of the characters attributed to different 
keys in Mr. Ernst Pauer's Elements of the 
Beautiful in Music (Novello), p. 23, placing 
the major and minor keys in opposite columns* 
and proceeding by intervals of a Semitone, 



SECT. N. 



MISCELLANEOUS NOTES. 



661 



Presumed characters of 



Major Keys, 



C. Expressive of feeling in a pure, certain, 
and decisive manner, of innocence, powerful 
resolve, manly earnestness, deep religious 
feeling. 

Ci, Scarcely used; as D)> it has fulness 
of tone, sonorousness, and euphony. 

D, Expressive of majesty, grandeur, pomp, 
triumph, festivity, stateliness. 

E\f. Greatest variety of expression; emi- 
nently masculine, serious and solemn ; expres- 
sive of courage and determination, brilliant, 
firm, dignified, 

E, Expressive of joy, magnificence, splen- 
dour, and highest brilliancy; brightest and 
most powerful key. 

F. Expressive of peace and joy, also of 
light passing regret and religious sentiment. 

FJL Brilliant and very clear; as G)^ 
expresses softness and richness. 

O, Favourite key of youth ; expresses sin- 
cerity of faith, quiet love, calm meditation, 
simple grace, pastoral life, and a certain 
humour and brightness. 

A\}. Full of feeling and dreamy expres- 



sion. 



A. Full of confidence and hope, radiant 
with love, redolent of genuine cheerfulness; 
especially expresses sincerity. 



B\f. Has an open, frank, clear, and bright 
character, admitting of the expression of quiet 
contemplation ; favourite classical key. 

B. Expresses boldness and pride in for- 
tissimo, purity and perfect clearness in 
pianissimo ; seldom used. 



Minor Keys, 



C. Expressive of softness, longing, sad- 
ness, earnestness and passionate intensity, 
and of the supernatural. 

D^, The most intensely melancholy key. 

D. Expressive of subdued melancholy, 
grief, anxiety, and solemnity: 

E]j, Darkest and most sombre key of all ; 
rarely used. 



E. Expressive of grief, moumfulness, and 
restlessness of spirit. m 

F, Harrowing, full of melancholy, at 
times rising into passion. 

FJJL Dark, mysterious, spectral, and full 
of passion. 

O. Expresses sometimes sadness, at others 
quiet and sedate joy, with gentle grace or a 
slight touch of dreamy melancholy, occa- 
sionally rising to a romantic elevation. 

A}), Fit for funeral marches ; full of sad, 
heartrending expression, as of an oppressed 
and sorrowing heart. 

A. Expresses tender womanly feeling, 
especially the quiet melancholy sentiment of 
Northern nations; also fit for Boleros and 
Mauresque serenades ; and finally for senti- 
ments of devotion mingled with pious resigna- 
tion. 

Bk, Full of gloomy and sombre feeling, 
like JE)y ; seldom used. IT 

B. Very melancholy ; tells of quiet expecta- 
tion and patient hope. 



In reading over this Table it is impossible 
not to feel that the character, often contra- 
dictory, arises from the reminiscence of pieces 
of music in those keys, as the author indeed 
admits (ib. p. 22). Such a distinction as that 
made between Fjt and G)^^ which, in equal 
temperament, is a mere matter of notation, 
but is here made to yield incompatible results, 
shews that the writer was thinking more of 
treatment than of actual sound. This is con- 
firmed by his saying (ib. p. 26) : ' We shall often 
find that the general character of a key may be 
changed by peculiarities and idiosyncrasies of 
the composer ; and thus a key may appear to 
possess a cheerful character in the hands of 
one writer, whilst another composer infuses 
into it a melancholy expression; all depends 
on the treatment, on the individual feeling of 
the composer, and on his acute understanding 
of the characteristic qualities of the key he 
employs.* The writer then goes on to consider 
the effect of rhythm and time, and the different 
characters which he assigns to their varieties, 
independently of the key employed, clash so 
much with the preceding that it is difficult to 
know what is supposed to belong to one and 
what to the other. 

Now the acoustical facts, independently of 
any particular instrument or temperament or 
any errors of tuning or performance (both 
numerous but variable), are these. Whether 



we take just intonation, or that of any uni- 
form linear or cyclic temperament, carried on 
to a sufficient number of tones bo prevent the 
occurrence of * wolves * within the piece of 
music performed, the one thing aimed at is 
to have the intervals between the same notes 
of the same scale precisely the same, at what- 
ever pitch they are played, or however they 
may be conventionally noted. If there is any 
difference between the scales of, say, just Aj 
and -4^(>, which have a difference of 70 cents, 
or equal A and A^^ which differ by 100 cents, 
or meantone A and A\fj which differ by 76 51 
cents, or Pythagorean A and A^^ which differ 
by 114 cents, this difference must be due 
solely to pitch. There i» no doubt that on 
the piano, the organ, and each instrument of 
the orchestra, the difference will be consider- 
able and very appreciable, but that does not 
enter into consideration. What effect does 
simple difference of pitch in the tonic pro- 
duce ? In the human voice and in all instru- 
ments quality of tone varies together with 
the pitch, a' change of tonic implies a dif- 
ferent pitch for the most frequently returning 
sounds, and those most important to the 
nature of the key. Hence it produces a dif- 
ferent quality of tone, with a variation in the 
range of partials possessed, and consequently 
affects the distinctness of the delimitation of 
the principal consonances and dissonances of 



562 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. 



the keys, and by that means altera their audi- 
ble effect. For intervals so small as we have 
supposed this difference must necessarily be 
small, whereas the difference of the keys of A 
and ^1^ is said to be great. If so, it can only 
arise from errors of intonation or performance. 
In the days of the old meantone temperament 
in its defective state of 12 notes only to the 
Octave, there was a vast difference between 
the keys of A and A]y ; the first had all its 
chords correct (supposing G^ were not sharp- 
ened, suprd., p. 546<2), the latter had all the 
chords involving A^ and Dk (which had to be 
represented by Ok and Cfi) frightfully erro- 
neous. 

It seems to me that the feeling of a dif- 
ference in the character of the keys whose 

IT tonics vary but slightly in pitch was esta- 
blished at this time (in Sir George Mac* 
farren's younger days, b. 1813). Any differ- 
ence so slight as a Semitone would have been 
strongly felt (except in passing from A to £|^, 
the two extreme good keys). Whereas for 
differences of a Fifth there would generally 
not have been such violent distinctions (except 
at the extremes ^1 to ^ and B^ to EW), It 
would appear that these mechanical distinc- 
tions partly influenced composers in their 
choice of a key, and produced what has be- 
come an hereditary prejudice, for which there 
is no longer any ground, and which never ought 
to have existed in just unaccompanied singing. 
But even at that time we have composers ig- 
noring the difference. Handel composed his 
dead march in Saul in C, and having written 
an anthem (* O sing unto the Lord a new song') 

^for St. James* Chapel Boyal, in which the 



organ had a pitch one Tone higher than his 
own (see sect. H. p. 5035, under a' 474*1), he 
directed the singers, as the voice parts were 
too high, to take them a Tone lower, and the 
accompanying organ to play tivo Tones lower. 
Had Handel any idea of the innate difference 
of the character of keys ? and, if he had not, 
what does it all amount to ? Beyond those 
differences inevitable to varieties of pitch, 
already pointed out, and easily perceived by 
slowly playing up the major scale on any 
instrument from its lowest note, or singing 
it on any voice from the lowest note it can 
reiMsh easily (see p. 544<2) — beyond such differ- 
ences, all seems to be subjective, or due to 
hereditary feeling created by former defeetiTe 
temperaments, or at present to mechanical 
errors of tuning, stopping, or blowing, espe- 
cially in unusual keys. Possibly a composer 
at the present day would write a piece of a 
totally different character, as pointed out in 
the table, according as he made the signature 
F^ or Gi>, but that must have been a reaction 
on his own mind, for the tones he would play 
would be precisely the same in both cases. 

That tuners of the piano sometimes still 
intentionally tune unequally, and hence make 
the effect of A and A)j really very different, has 
nothing whatever to do with the matter. Those 
who do so have not leflmaed their profession. 
Similarly for players on a pianoforte who 
cannot equalise the effect of the long and short 
keys. But the singer knows very well when a 
piece of music falls upon his bad notes, and 
ruthlessly transposes the key, quite reckless 
of these presumed varieties of key-charactec 



7. Dr. TF*. R, Stone's Restoration of 16-foot C to the Orchestra. 



See p. 175c on the deepest tones which can 
be heard. The following is condensed from 
information furnished me by Dr. Stone. 

Dr. Stone has for some years endeavoured 
to restore to the orchestra the lower notes of the 
16-foot Octave, which appear to have been 
neglected of late. It seems to him a contra- 
diction that, while the organ possessed that 
Octave, and another, the 82-foot, below it, and 
while even an instrument of so comparatively 
feeble a tone as the piflmoforte could obtain 
these deep notes, they should be absent from 
the full band. Most of the great composers 
have employed them, especially Beethoven and 
^ Onslow. Many passages of their compositions 
had to be partially transposed, often (as in the 
Cminor Symphony of Beethoven) much to the 
detriment of the general effect In the Trio 
of this great work a scale psissage occurs 
several times for the double basses alone, 
beginning on the 16-foot O^. But this note 
being entirely absent on the ordinary three- 
string basses, as used in England, it was there 
customary to take it either altogether or in 
part in the Octave above. Some players, 
indeed, were in the habit of letting down the 
A, or lowest string, by a Tone to G, for this 
special passage ; but the resonance of a string 
thus slackened was far inferior to what could 
be obtained by more legitimate means. The 
fine part for the contrafagotto in the same 
symphony, descending to C^, was usually 
omitted, or played an Octave higher by the 
ophicleide. The Pastoral Symplwny likewise 



frequently contains F, natural, a note quite 
unattainable except on the four-string basses, 
whose lowest note is E, (p. 18c). 

It was obvious, in attempting to remedy 
this defect, that of the three modes by which 
vibrations in a stretched string may be 
slackened, two, namely, length and thiclaiess, 
were inadmissible. The first renders the in- 
strument so large as to be unwieldy and oat 
of the reach of an ordinary arm. The second 
was found to cause rotation of the string under 
the impulse of the bow acting at its periphery, 
and thus to generate false notes. The third 
remained, in increasing the specific gravity of 
the string without enlarging its diameter. This 
was satisfactorily accomplished by covering a 
gut string with heavy copper wire such as is 
used for the lowest strings of pianos. The 
note C, was obtained, and an instrument thus 
strung was exhibited in London in the Inter- 
national Exhibition of 1872. 

But it became clear that to give the new 
notes full power, and to prevent the danger of 
shaking the instrument to pieces, a means of 
strengthening the belly in the direction of 
strain was required, which should not unduly 
increase the weight of the sound-board. This 
requisite was ingeniously fulfilled by Mr. 
Meeson : — Four strips of white pine are glued 
on to the back of the belly, running its whole 
length, one on one side of the ordinary bass- 
bar, and three on its other side, thus corre- 
sponding in number, and to a certain degree 
in position, to the increased number of strings. 



8B0T. K. 



MISCELLANEOUS NOTES. 



553 



Two of them cross and intercept the usual 
/-shaped sound-holes, thus removing a weak 
place in the belly, and causing it to vibrate 
more homogeneously. They appeared on trial 
to add great power to the instrument through- 
out, and to remove the inequality and varying 
intensity of vibration which exists on most 
old instruments even by celebrated makers, 
and which musicians usually designate by 
the term * wolf \ The bars are curved to an 
elliptical shape to fit the hollow of the belly, 
and to give the greatest resistance to com- 
pression with the smallest quantity of mate- 
rial. Even in a double bass the quantity of 
wood required is very small, and from its 
lightness when perfectly dry it hardly exceeds 
an ounce in weight. From their shape and 
function they are termed elliptical tension 
bars. 

It appeared from subsequent experiment« 
that the same system was applicable to the 
smaller members of the viol and violin family, 
giving an increased sonority and firmness to 
the tone. It succeeds best with violins of 



sweet but feeble quality, and in some -of the 
older Italian instruments, where the progress 
of decay had to a certain extent diminished 
the volume of sound. 

The contrafagotto or double bassoon as 
made on Dr. Stone's designs by Herr Haseneier 
of Gobleuz, consists of a tube 16 feet 4 inches 
long, truly conical in its bore, and enlarging 
from J-inch diameter at the reed to 4 inches at 
the bell or lower extremity. It is curved on 
itself for convenience of manipulation, so 
that in actual length it is about equal to the 
ordinary bassoon. Its extreme compass is 
from C, to c', but its ordinary range is to g 
only, the other notes being difficult to bring 
out. Haydn gives a part to such an instru- 
ment in his Creation, Mozart uses it occa- 
sionally, Beethoven frequently, Mendelssohn 
sometimes. H 

Both of these instruments I have heard in 
use. Their tone is not perfectly continuous, 
but is ver>' good, and when played in conjunc- 
tion with other instruments, musically effec- 
tive. 



8. On the Action of Heeds. 



(See pp. 95 to 100.) Knowing the long, 
patient, and practical attention which Mr. 
Hermann Smith had paid to the action of 
reeds, I requested him to furnish me with an 
account of the results of his experience. He 
obligingly sent me a series of elaborate and 
extensive notes, which the space at my com- 
mand utterly precludes me from giving at 
proper length, and which I am therefore forced 
to represent by the meagrest possible outline, 
with the hope that they will appear elsewhere 
in suitable detail. Only passages in inverted 
commas contain Mr. Hermann Smith's actual 
words, the rest is my own necessarily imperfect 
attempt to condense his statements. 

Reeds may be classed as, 1. single, whether 
striking (in clarinet of cane, and reed-pipe of 
organ of metal) or free (harmonium and 
American organ, both of metal) ; 2. paired 
(bassoon and oboe, both of cane, in action 
compressible ; horns and larynx, both mem- 
branous, in action extensible) ; 8. streamifig 
(flutes, flageolets, flue-pipes of organ, all of 
rushing air, in action abstracting). The last 
kind has been partly considered, suprii, 
pp. 396-7. 

In the clarinet the reed is straight and 
very thin at the tip, but the edge of the sec- 
tion of the wooden tube against which it 
strikes presents a slight curve, whereas in the 
organ pipe the reed is curved and the edge 
against which it strikes is straight (p. 96c). 
The time of vibration consists (1) of the time 
of forward motion, which may vary slightly ; 
(2) of the time of rest, which may vary greatly ; 
(8) of the time of recoil, which does not vary. 
* When the reed is placed in the mouth, the 
air on both surfaces of the reed is of equal 
pressure, and on increase of strength in the 
wind, the tendency would be to separate 
the reed still further from the edge of the 
mouthpiece, were it not that a current of air 
quickly passing into a tube exercises suction 
at the orifice of entry; therefore the elastic 
reed yields in the direction of the place of 
suction, so that it is held there. The current 
of wind having been sent forward with im- 



petus, leaves behind it a partial vacuum, which 
is strongest close upon the inner face of the 
tongue. There, then, is a region of least 
pressure, which continues to exist during the 
transit of the pulse of compressed air to the 
first found point of outlet. When that point is 
reached, the external air rushes in and restores 
equilibrium, and in doing so causes the shock 
of arrested motion in which the reed recoils, 
and forthwith the action commences as before.^ ^ 

The clarinet should not be described as a 
stopped pipe, though both have unevenly num- 
bered partials and give similar pitch for simi- 
lar length, because * in the clarinet there is a 
propulsive current going through the pipe ; in 
the stopped pipe, on the contrary, there is an 
abstracting current acting outside by suction.' 
Too much has been attributed to the cylin- 
drical bore for producing only the unevenly 
numbered partials. ' An oboe reed fixed 
on the clarinet tube gives oboe pitch of tone 
and oboe partials.' The Japanese Hichi-riki 
has an inverted conical bore, that is, the dia- 
meter is the smallest at the point furthest 
from the reed. * Like the clarinet, it gives 
notes which are an Octave lower in pitch 
than would be calculated from it^ length. 
The first note after the fundamental is the 
Twelfth. The reed is broad, not single as on ^T 
the clarinet, but double and as the bassoon 
reed, differing, however, in having an enlarged 
base where it fixed into the tube. ... On 
substituting an oboe reed, the pitches of the 
notes correspond to those of the oboe and the 
first tone after is the Octave. ... If the end 
of the pipe is placed full within the mouth, 
and is blown through without the use of any 
reed whatever (and without any action from 
the lips), clear and powerful sounds are elicited, 
varying as the openings of the holes are varied, 
provided one of the upper holes is left open 
. . . it is indifferent whether the end of the 
wide diameter or that of the narrow is taken 
into the mouth, either way sounds are in this 
manner readily produced.' This effect Mr. 
Hermann Smith attributed to a stream reed 
from the open hole. 



554 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



AFP. XX. 



Bassoons and oboes have paired reeds, which 
touch down their outer edge, and do not vibrate 
length-wise but cross- wise, so that a transverse 
section through them has alternately the form 
of the outer lines in fig. 63, p. 387c, when 
they are open, and of two parallel lines when 
they are closed. The reeds are sections from 
a small hollow reed-plant of particular growth 
(arundo donax or sativa)j made very thin at 
the tip, and rendered supple by the moisture 
of the mouth. The player's lip restricts the 
size of the oval in notes of high pitch. ' The 
pressure of wind would keep the pair of reeds 
apart but for the influence of the suction when 
the current is thrown through. The vibration 
therefore is produced by the same kind of action 
as in the clarinet, but there is a new mechani- 

^ cal method for bringing it about.' 

The membranous reeds formed by the lips 
and vocal chords are reeds of extension, be- 
ginning to vibrate from a state of closure, 
contrary to all other reeds. In horns the cup 
acts as an exhaust chamber, and when it is 
too large the upper notes cannot be well pro- 
duced ; * that is to say, the necessary degree of 
vacuum cannot be brought about in time to 
coincide with the reciprocating return of the 
column of air in the tube.' In the larynx 
the ventricles ot Morgagni between the true and 
false chords probably act as exhaust chambers. 
The stream reeds have been already con- 
sidered (p. 396c'k but Mr. Hermann Smith 
has developed nis theory of displacement 
action, or the actual tone of air under cleav- 
age, deduced originally from observations of 
the different sounds of wind sweeping through 

cy the branches of leafless trees, in which tone is 
produced without a vibrating agent. Mr. Her- 
mann Smith found the common doctrine of 
friction unsatisfactory. In 1870 he had made 
a series of rods about 5 ft. long, the sides of 
each having same smoothness and of the uni- 
form width of 1^ inches, with a V-shaped or 
triangular section, and these he swept swiftly 
through the air like swords, sharp edge first. 
He found that, although the friction surface 
was similar on each, they developed different 
notes, which he discovered to be according to 
the thickness of the back, the pitches being 
inversely as the thickness. C 528 vib. re- 
quires a thickness somewhat less than half an 
inch. * Covering irregularly the tips of the rods 
did not affect the sound. Half an inch thick- 
ness of spongy felt fixed on the back of the 
rod, the same width being preserved, lowered 

^. the pitch a Fourth. The felt entangled air in 
' its pores, so that the vacuum by suction was 
less perfect. . . . With less speed of stroke the 
pitch is again lowered. ... In organ pipes, &c., 
in all wind instruments, a certain displacement 
of air must take place immediately near the 
agent of vibration, in which space a right de- 
gree of vacuum is requisite, else the right note 
will not follow. To this result all the devices 
of mouthpieces tend. This work of displace- 
ment in the origination of sound raises a ques- 
tion distinct from the transmission of sounds 
in waves.' 

The free reed is supposed to have been 
adopted from China. But the European and 
Chinese forms are different. The Chinese 
reed is stamped out in the same piece as the 
frame, with which it lies level. The reeds act 
upon tubes which (agreeing with M. W. Weber's 
law, though made long before its discovery) 



are three-quarters of the half- wave length. 
The harmonium reed is placed above the frame, 
and the end turns up from it. If it is set level 
with the frame it will not vibrate. To produce 
vibration a stream of air must pass between 
the tongue and the frame, producing a partial 
vacuum on the underside of the reed, and the 
amount of suction thus caused must be pro- 
perly graduated or there will be no action. 
The chief peculiarity of the free reed is that 
the pitch is only slightly affected by the 
cavities with which it is associated, but these 
boxes or cavities, according to their dimensioiis, 
and governed by the operation of partial occlu- 
sion, mainly determine the quality of tone. 

The reed is not properly compared to a 
vibrating rod, because the reed actually in use 
is not uniform. In a series, the low reeds 
are thickest at tip and thinnest at root; 
high reeds thinnest at tip and thickest at 
root. Hence they are affected differently by 
different pressures of wind, and alter their 
pitch differently. Expressive playing there- 
fore becomes playing out of tune. Only with 
a constant blast will a free reed maintain a 
constant pitch. The stronger blast flattens 
deep reeds and sharpens high ones, and from 
this cause arises much of the painful disso- 
nance of series of chords played on these in- 
struments. 

To remedy this defect the action of the 
wind on the tongue in the American organ is 
limited by making the frame very thin, which 
is * dished out ' underneath till the edge passed 
by the tongue, is barely thicker than the tongue 
instead of being 8 or 10 times as thick as 
on the harmonium. The suction in the har- 
monium is longer in time and stronger in de- 
gree, the tongue moves a greater distance, and 
more intensity of tone is produced. * The 
American reed cannot make a deep excursion* 
for the suction is spent as soon as the tongue 
gets below the edge of the frame.* It is there- 
fore not suited for expression, but produces a 
smooth and flexible kind of tone. 

Mr. Hermann Smith considers the harsh- 
ness of the free reed, resulting from its laiige 
number of partials, to be chiefly due to its pro- 
portions. * The tongue is inordinately long in 
proportion to its width, and hence under the 
stress of the wind (which necessarily shifts its 
incidence during the movements of the tongue 
and its re-course) there is developed a diagonal 
strain or torsion from one comer at the tip of 
the tongue to the opposite comer of the root, 
so that a lateral irregular motion is set up 
accompanying the longitudinal vibration.* 
Hence he concludes that * the long reed is a 
wrong reed,' and that, * in view of its liability 
to lateral torsion, the rectangular form is abou^ 
the worst. . . . Trial of various reeds shews that 
a long rectangular reed is strident in tone, that 
increase of width in reeds brings in increasing 
proportion smoothness of tone, and that the 
width may be increased till it equals the 
length.' 

In * voicing,' a bend is made across the 
tongue, turning the point upwards. This some- 
what checks lateral vibration. By an early 
plan of his, * reeds were yoked together by a 
bar across the middle of the length, and the 
improved quality of tone was obviously due to 
the fact that the two reeds were equivalent to 
one broad reed, and that the bar acroes hin- 
dered the operation of any diagonal strain or 



SECT. If. 



MISCELLANEOUS NOTES. 



555 



twist during vibration. . . . When a reed is much 
curved it is slow in speech, and a great amount 
of wind passes wastefully, compensated only 
by the smoother tone.* Mr. Hermann Smith 
says his * best toned reeds have been series in 
which, according to his design, the openings 
made by the curve given to the reed were filled 
up at the sides by arched blocks added to the 
top of the frame, following the line of curve. 
The discontinuity was therefore sharply de- 
fined, yet the tones were mellow and rich. A 
reed mounted on wood surface may have its 
quality greatly changed by an interposed pad 
of leather or felt between the reed frame and 
the wood, the etxreme harshness disappears 
and the tone is smoother altogether, shewing 
how much that is unpleasant is due to the 
jarring from arrested motion.* 

Mr. Hermann Smith's ' conclusions are that, 
in the making of free reed instruments, broad 
reeds should be used, and with broad channels 
or boxes or cavities of varied shape ; that within 
the large chamber small suction chambers 
should be placed below or beyond the reed 
tongue, in imitation of the ventricles of the 
larynx ; and if these afiord areas and cavities 
suitable for the displacement accordant with 
the pitches, the speech will be quickened and 
firmness given to the tones, or, in other words, 
the mechanical motion of air and reed will be 
steadied. The rectangular form of reed, except 
when stops of hard metallic quality are re- 
quired, should be abandoned, and broad shapes 
substituted, having tips semici roular, semi-oval, 
or ovate, or shapes to ensure a central line of 
strain. Weighting the tips of reeds should be 
avoided as much as possible.' 

Mr. Hermann Smith's latest device in the 
treatment of reeds is designed to overcome the 
difficulties of inordinately long or weighted 
reeds. His plan is ' to use metal or material of 



uniform thickness, and to get the degrees of 
flattening by drilling out or excising portions 
of material at or near the root of the reed, 
and then to fill such spaces as are thus made 
with other fixed pieces of metal that are neu- 
tral, and do not enter into vibration. Thus 
the sides of the reed tongues remain with the 
fibre intact, unweakened by thinning or scrap- 
ing, which takes the best vigour out of the 
reed. Any degree of flattening may be at- 
tained according as the excision is made to 
extend up the tongue. A like treatment of the 
half of the tongue forming the tip will pro- 
duce the opposite effect, sharpening pitch by 
lightening the tip ; the spaces left by the ex- 
cised portions are then covered with lighter 
material, such as goldbeater's skin.' H 

Mr. Hermann Smith states that his device 
of ' adding to the large cavities small exhaust 
chambers or cup-like cavities, fixed just below 
the tongue of the reed, causes the most un- 
manageable reeds, even those -in the 82-foot 
Octave, when made broad on the above plan, 
to render good musical service, to be free in 
speech, and to produce a full pervading quality 
of tone, devoid of the harshness of long reeds 
having heavily weighted tips.' Mr. Augustus 
Stroh (see Sect. M. No. 2, p. 542d) informs me 
that he has been led to a similar contrivance 
in a machine he has recently constructed. 

For further details of Mr. Hermann Smith's 
inventions respecting reeds, see Specifications 
to his Patents 1878, No. 227 and No. 4942; 
1880, No: 68 ; and 1884, No. 7777. A large 
amount of varied information may also be 
found in his treatise entitled ' In the Organ and H 
in the Orchestra,* now (1884-5) publishing in 
Musical Opinion, a monthly magazine. Of this 
treatise 25 chapters have already appeared full 
of interesting elucidations of instrumental diffi- 
culties. 



9. Postscript. 



Standard Musical Pitch in England. In 
consequence of a communication ,from our 
Foreign Office, due to the Belgian change of 
pitch (p. 5010^), Sir G. A. Macfarren, Prin- 
cipal ot the Royal Academy of Music, con- 
vened a public meeting of musicians, theorists, 
instrument-makers, and their friends, * to con- 
sider the desirability of a standard musical 
pitch for the United Kingdom.* It took place 
on 20 June 1885, and was well attended. 
Three resolutions were passed : (1) declaring 
uniformity desirable^ (2)recommending French 
pitch ; (8) declaring it advisable to take steps 
for its adoption in civil and military bands. 
A committee of 4 theorists, 15 musicians, and 
4 instrument-makers was appointed to carry 
out the resolutions. See the Times, 22 June 
1885, p. 7, col. 2, and p. 9, col. 8, and Musical 
Opinion, 1 July 1885, p. 498. 

Addenda to History of Pitch. In 1845 the 
pitch of the Philharmonic Society was a' 447*1, 
according to a fork tuned in the orchestra at 
that date by Mr. R. S. Rockstro. 

Herr Eduard Strauss, of Vienna, perform- 
ing at the Inventions Exhibition 1885, used 
a' 452-5, but the bandsmen said the pitch o^ 
the opera was nearly a Quartertone flatter, say 
a' 447. 

The band of the Pomeranian (Bliicher) 
Hussars performing at the same Exhibition 
used a' 460*8, or, as the bandmaster said, 



* exactly a Semitone sharper than French 
pitch.' 

Effect of Rust, dc, on Tuning-forks. See 
p. 445 d*. Mr. Rockstro possesses a fork which 
in 1859 was at French pitch, and now through 
rust (and possibly bad treatment) shews only 
a' 424*5, that is, has gone down by 42 cents, 
far exceeding any other fork examined. 

Flute Intonation. Mr. R. S. Rockstro, in 
June 1885, kindly brought me an eight-keyed IT 
flute, about 40 years old, an excellent instru- 
ment of its kind. This he played so as to 
preserve its natural intonation without cor- 
rection. Before striking any new note it was 
ascertained that g' 404 vib. remained constant. 
The a' 461 vib. was a quarter of a Tone too 
sharp. The result gave in cents, reckoning g' 
as 1200=0, & 488, c'jt 564, d' 678, d'jt 763, e' 
906, f 1000, f% 1098; g' 1200=0, ^'jj92, a' 
229, o'jf 292, h' 431 , c" 518, c"^ 666. This seems 
meant for meantone intonation, sharpening 
many of the sharps to pass as the flats above 
tbem. But even in this case the intonation 
was imperfect, and Mr. Rockstro thought it 
was rather due to a series of compromises. 

Mr. R. S. Rockstro brought at the same 
time the * Rockstro model ' flute, invented by 
himself, to have a more correct equal intona- 
sion than Boehm's. This was blown in the 
same way, but in this case a' was always 
brought to 452 vib. Result in cents, reckon- 



556 



ADDITIONS BY THE TRANSLATOR. 



APP. XX. 



ing a' as 1200=0, was c' 812, c'jt 406, d' 606, 
d'i 601, e' 697, f 801. f ft 896, g' 1001, ^i 1097, 
a' 1200=0, o'j 102, 6'^ 201, c" 804, </ft 404, 
This is very good, and may be better than 
the above numbers shew, as, on account of the 
difficulty of sustaining notes on the flute 
without variation, it was not possible to deter- 
mine the pitch of each note within less than 
1 vib. in a second. With regard to the lowest 
c' from the open end of the flute, Mr. Bockstro 
says he leaves it purposely too sharp in relation 
to a\ because it is easy, by management of 
lip, to blow it in tune, but if it were originally 
in tune, it would not sound sharp enough in 
very soft passages. 

Siamese Scales. The King of Siam sent 
over his Court Band with their instruments to 
5[ the London Inventions Exhibition 1885, and 
the Siamese minister obligingly allowed Mr. 
Hipkins and myself to determine the musical 
scale. Prince Prisdang told us that the in- 
tention was to divide the Octave into 7 equal 
intervals, each of which would then have 
171*48 cents. Hence the following comparison. 
The scales are given as usual in cents from the 
lowest note. 

Theoretical scale:— 0, 171, 848, 614, 686, 
867, 1029, 1200 cents, having a neutral Second 
171 lying between 100 and 200, a neutral Third 
848 lying between 800 and 400, a slightly 
sharpened Fourth 614 for 600, a slightly flat- 
tened Fifth 686 for 700, a neutral Sixth 867 
lying between 800 and 900, and a neutral 
Seventh 1029 lying between 1000 and 1100, 
but much nearer the former. As there is no 
harmonic interval but the Octave, and as the 
^ Siamese seem to tune by Octaves and single 
degrees, there is room for much variation from 
the ideal intonation, as shewn in the following 
observed scales. 

Hanat ek or wood harmonicon, fint Octave 
0, 208, 826, 687, 698, 888, 1048, 1206, second 
Octave (pitch of lowest note 882*6 vib.), 0, 200, 
869, 637, 711, 888, 1067, 1222, third (incom- 
plete) Octave 0, 198, 847, 649, 698 (two more 
bskrs, too high to measure). This instrument 
is tuned by lumps of wax mixed with some 
heavy substance stuck to the underpart of the 
bar. The tuning lump having fallen from the 
second bar of the flrst two Octaves, it was 
quite out of tune, and its proper pitch (regis- 
tered above) was determined by a comparison 
with other instruments. In the Banat, p. 618, 
No. 86, all the lumps had been removed, 
hence, it was entirely out of tune. 
^ Ran at t*hong or brass harmonicon (pitch 
of lowest note .:}82-6 vib.) scale 0, 200, 840, 
637, 699, 881, 1048, 1207. 

Ranat lek or steel harmonicon, first Oc- 
tave (the second bar absent), 0, 827, 619, 679, 
856, 1076, 1202, second Octave (pitch of low- 
est note, 886-6 vib.), 0, 160, 299, 447, 614, 748, 
960, 1179, third (incomplete) Octave 0, 90, 
222, 480, 609. 

Tak'hay or crocodile, a three-stringed in- 
strument with high frets, played with a conical 
plectrum, 0, 198, 362, 628, 720, 890, 1080, 1260. 
Hence 62 single degrees were examined, 
each of which should have had theoretically 
171*48 cents. In reality 6 were less than 132, 
8 between 140 and 169, 12 between 160 and 
167, 9 between 170 and 179, 8 between 180 
and 186, 6 between 190 and 198, and 9 be- 
tween 200 and 219. Hence only 16 approached 



to equal Tones, and only 2 approached to equal 
Semitones, both sets being clearly erroneous, 
while the 21 between 160 and 179 were toler- 
ably close approximations to the ideal. Bear- 
ing these variations in mind, it is probable 
that p. 618, Nos. 81, 82, and S3, at least, be- 
longed to this system of 7 intentionally equal 
heptatones, as they may be called. And this 
confirms the conception that Salendro, p. 618, 
Nos. 94 and 96, consists ideally of 6 equal 
pentatones. 

The instruments were beautifully and 
artistically ornamented, the execution by the 
musicians was florid and musicianly in accu- 
rate and varied rhythm, there was an obser- 
vance of light and shade, together with a clear 
conception of melody, but none of harmony. 
Besides the hax monicons there were kettles or 
gongs (k'hong), a three-stringed viol (saw t*bai), 
a two-stringed fiddle (saw Chine), the three- 
stringed crocodile (tak'hay) ; reed instruments, 
flutes, and drums. 

Japanese Scales, see pp. 619 and 622, Nos. 
110 to 189. In July 1886, Mr. Isawa, Director 
of the Musical Institute, Tokia, Japan, sent to 
the Inventions Exhibition several tuning-forks 
and tables. From the tables it appeared that 
the classical 12 Ritsu or Semitones resulted 
from tuning 11 perfect Fifth's up (or Fourths 
down), and then a Fifth too flat by a Pytha- 
gorean comma, giving the scale: 0, 114, 204, 
818, 408, 622, 612, 702, 816, 906, 1020, 1110, 
1200 cents. But the 18 forks sent had the 
following pitch (as determined by the Trans- 
lator), the number and name of the Ritsu and 
the name of the nearest European note at 
French pitch being prefixed: — I. Ichikotsu 
d' 292-7, n. Tangin d'Jf 305-6, III. Hiyojo 
fl' 826-2, IV. Shoretsu/' 348*1, V. Shimomu 
/'J866-7, VL Sojofif' 891-6, VIL Fush6^'j410-1, 
VIII. Waushiki a' 487, IX. Rankei a'J 460, 
X. Banshiki b' 491*6, XI. Shinsen c" 617*3, 
XII. Kamimuc"J 649*6, T. Ichikotsu d" 585*4, 
this gives the scale in cents : 0, 76, 188, 275, 
386, 603, 683, 698, 782, 897, 986, 1091, 1200. 

Mr. Isawa also sent forks for tuning the 
popular scale Hiradioshi (p. 619a, Nos. 110 to 
112), in two forms, old and new, both different 
from those already given. Old style in cents 
0, 102, 602, 706, 809, 1197, evidently meant 
for just 0, 112, 498, 702, 814, 1200. New 
style in cents 0, 86, 602, 708, 798, 1200, for 
Pythagorean 0, 90, 498, 702, 792, 1200. 

Mr. Isawa also sent a Standard Tuning- 
fork giving d 146*46 at 62'' F. French pitch 
d= 146-2 vib. 

There was also a monochord on which 
many scales were indicated, and two sets of 
reed pitch-pipes, which cannot be described 
for want of space. 

Modem Greek Scale. According to Me- 
shaqah, in Eli Smith (op. cit. p. 264, note §), 
the modern Greeks divided the Octave into 
4 X 17=68 parts, and form the scale by 12, 9, 
7, 12, 9, 7, 12 of these divisions. Since, then. 
1200 ^68=: 17*66 cents, the scale in cents will 
be 0, 212, 871, 494, 706, 866, 988, 1200, which 
again has a neutral Third and Sixth, 871. 865. 
If the scale had consisted of 12, 8, 8, 12, 8, 8. 
12 of these divisions, we should have got the 
precise scale of Villoteau (p. 620a' 1, 6), which 
is a singular additional justification of his divi- 
sion of the Octave into 17 equal parts. 



INDEX. 



The numbers refer to the pages ; the letters a, 6, c, d, to the quarters of a page, and, when there are double 
columns, of the first column, in which case a% b\ </, d'f refer to the quarters of the second column. 
* before the number of the page shews that the title of a book or paper is there cited. 
[ ] indicate notes and additions by the Translator. 



A, A, A°, see Vowels 

[Aalst, Van, on Chinese Music, 524c] 

Abdul Kadir, same as Abdulqadir, Persian, 
14th cent, 282a. his 17 tones, 282a, 5, and 
12 scales, 282 to 288 

Abdulqadir, 2816', c', 282d. [his 16 Fifths, 
281c'. his system, 282d, 864&, 523a] 

Accented note names, how related to pitch 
numbers, 16c 

Accidental Scales defined, 267a 

[Acoustical facts in change of key, 551(2] 

Acoustics, physical and physiological, 16, its 
connection with music, Ic. has hitherto not 
helped musical theory. Id. physical, a sec- 
tion of the theory of elasticity, Sc. physio- 
logical, investigates processes in the ear, 4a. 
its physical part, 46 

Added Sixth, chord of, 294(2, or imperfect 
minor triad, 344c 

Addition, algebraical, of waves, of velocities 
and displacements, 27d, note 

[Africa, Western, Balafongs, 5186] 

[Air-reed, aerial, or aero-plastic reed, 397c] 

[Alboni, her just intonation, 4786] 

Alexander the Great, 271d' 

Al Farabi, 282a [his Greek scales after Pro- 
fessor Land, 515c] 

[Alternative Intervals varying by Quartertones, 
in modem Arabic and Indian scales, 524c] 

[Amati of Cremona, 1596-1684, resonance of 
his violins, 876] 

Ambrose of Milan, a.d. 374-398, his authentic 
scales, 243a [doubtful whether they were 
really his, 242(2'.] his numerical notation of 
the modes, 2696. his ecclesiastical scales, to 
be regarded as essential, 2716, c 

Ambrosch, Chinese melodies, *258(2', 261(2' 

[Amels possesses Scheibler's Tonometer, 444a] 

[America, U.S., of, 511a] 

[American Organ Beeds, 5545'] 

[Amiot, * 95(2', 262(2, 648c] 

Amplitude, 10c, 346 

AmpullcBj see Ear 

Analysis of compound and composite tones 
into simple vibrations by the ear, 33. this is 
independent of power to analyse vibrational 
forms by eye, 34^. of air into pendular vibra- 
tions by sympathetic resonance, indepen- 
dently of ear, 42(2, objective, 48a, b. of sen- 
sations, its difficulty, 496. of compound into 
simple tones by ear, its theory, 148c 

Anche libret or free reed, 956 

Ansa^ presumed Indian tonic, see V&di, 2436 

Antony, *289(2 

Anvil, see Ear 

Appogiatura, always makes a Semitone, 2876 

Approximation in pitch, forms a musical con- 
nection, 3526 



Appunn, late of Hanau, his high pitch from 
forks, 18a, used by Preyer, 161c. his pipes for 
artificial vowels, 127(2, 128a. suggestion to 
Preyer, 167(2. his loaded reeds, 176(2, 177(2'. 
[their pitch, as determined by Translator, 
1776.] nisconical resonators, 878d. [his reed 
tonometer, 443a. his difficulty in tuning a 
series of perfect Fifths, 483(2] 

Aqtueductus vestibiilij its function, 136a 

Arabesques compared to music, 252c 

[Arabia and Persia, scale^^ after Professor Land, 
515(2. modem, after Eli Smith, 516(2. medie- 
val scales after Professor Land, with 7 and 8 
tones, 516a, 6, 519(2. lute, earlier notes after 
Professor Land, 5166, 520(2. medieval notes 
after ditto, 517a, 520a] 

Arabic Scales, 282 to 283. modern, of 24 
Quarter-tones, 2646. [according to Professor 
Land, 284 note] 

Arabic and Persian musical system, 2806 to 
2856 

Arabs have no pleasure in polyphonic music, 
1966 

Architecture, its analogy to musical composi- 
tion, 2c. the periods of its progress are the 
analogues of those of music, 285c 

Archytas first settles major Third as 4 : 5, 
262c, 3626, d 

Aristotle, on Consonance, 287a, 6, on variations, 
2376. his indications of a tonic, 240c, 241(2, d\ 
indications of a downward leading note, 242a, 
251c, d. the only writer who indicates a 
tonic, 2676. his conception of effects ot 
music, 251a. makes mese tonic, 268a, d. on 
descending leading note, 286c [d] 

Aristoxenus, his twelve Fifths, 271a [5486] 

[Armes, Dr., 502a] 

Art, works of, must not display their purpose, 
366c 

Artificial compound tones, 120c to 122(2 

Artificial production of vowels, or vowel synthe- 
sis, by, 123a to 124. [tabular statement of 
results, 124(2.] by organ pipes when the effect 
of difference of phase is not under investiga- 
tion, 127(2. Appunn's pipes for this purpose, 
128a 

Artusi blames Monteverde for using dominant*^ 
Seventh without preparation, 248(2 

Auditory apparatus, its advantage, 1346. the 
mechanical problem it has to solve, 134(2, 
how solved, 135a, 6, c. sand, 137a, stones or 
otoliths of fish, 139a, of crustaceans, 149c. 
ciliae of ampullee, in former editions sup- 
posed to be hearers of noises, 151a, 6, may be 
hearers of squeaking, hissing, &c., 151(2. hairs 
of Mysis, 150a. nerves, how excited, hypothe- 
sis, 5a. ossicles described, 131a, 6 

[Austro-Hungary, pitch, 604c] 

Authentic Scales of Ambrose of Milan, 242(2, 
243a; Glarean's six, 245c, (2, the first, 267a 



558 



INDEX. 



B 



[B natural and B fiat, ancient signs for, 312^ 

Bach, G. P. Em., hiseqaal temperament, d21c, 
considers equal temperament the most per- 
fect intonation, 823c [548e2'] 

Bach, J. Sehastian, down to his time final 
chords always major, or without the Thirds, 
217a. his suites, 2i5a. his use of closing 
minor chord, 296d. his use of the major 
Sixth in the ecclesiastical Doric or mode of 
the minor Seventh, 3045, d05a. [example 
analysed by duodenals, 304c, d, c'.] his use of 
the mode of the minor Sixth, 307c[508c,548d'] 

[Bagdad Tambour, its scale, after Prof. Land, 
617c] 

[Bailey, 549o] 

Bajazet, 282a 

Ball, struck up as it falls, its periodic motion, 
19<f, 21c, and fig. 9 

Barrow, *96d', 262d 

Basevi, 352c, *S52d 

Basilar membrane, 138a. Hensen and Hasse's 
researches on, 1456. its breadth probably 
determines the tuning, 1456. high notes near 
round window, low notes near vertex, 146c. 
breaks easily along radial fibres, not trans- 
versely, 146a. consequent mathematical 
theory,146&. its fibres formiapproximatively a 
series of stretched strings,146c. its behaviour 
for noises, mathematically investigated,403c, 
its vibration in the cochlea mathematically 
investigated, 4.06d 

Bass, figured, shews new view of harmony, 248c 

Bass notes with tinkling upper partials, 1165 

Bassoon, its tongue or reed, 966. conical tube, 
produces all harmonics, 99a [reeds, 554c] 

Bausch, his violin, 85c 

Beats, 5a, of simple tones, how distinguished 
from combinational tone8,159d. their origin, 
their frequency = the difference of pitch num- 
bers of generators, 164d. diagram of, 165a. 
examples, 1656, c. from upper partials as 
well as primes, 165c. rendered visible, 
165d. require the sympathetic body to be 
nearly of the same pitch as itself, 165d. 
what becomes of them when too fast to be 
counted, 166d. according to T. Young, they 
become the differential tone, 166d to 167a. 
objections to this hypothesis, 1676. [cheap 
apparatus for shewing, l&7d', use of Har- 
monical for shewing, 168d.] how best ob- 
served, 167c. their character, 168a, jarring 
like letter K, 16vS6. intermittent tones heard 
with a reed pipe or tuning-fork and double 
siren, 168c. produce intermittent excitement 
of auditory nerves, 1696. do not disappear 
from rapidity only, but also depend on in- 
terval, llOd. even 132 beats in a second are 
audible, 171 a. the character of the roughness 
alters with the number of beats in a second, 
171c. beats of a Semitone heard up to 4,000 
vib. per second, 171c, of a whole tone to 2,000 
vib. per second, llld. major and minor 
Thirds, smooth from 264 to 528 vib., are 
rough in bass, llld. their roughness does not 
depend solely on their frequency, 17 Id, 172ay 
but, in a compound manner, on magnitude of 
interval and frequency, 172a. on the siren 
will determine whether the note heard is the 
prime or an upper partial, 174d. from the 
upper partials of a single tone, 1786 [178(2']. 
of upper partialsof two compound tones,180a, 
examples, 180c. why consonances produce 
no beats, and why if they are slightly altered 
beats ensue, 1816. of disturbed consonances, 
how observed with double siren, 182c. of 
upper partials, their rapidity has a pre- 
ponderating influence on distinctness of 



definition, 1846. law for determining them, 
with tables, 184c, d. the amoant of dis- 
turbance of a consonance being the same, 
the beats increase with the higher numbers 
expressing it, 185a. table of, when consonan- 
ces are altered by a Semitone, 185c. due to 
combinational tones, 197c. of combinational 
tones, can alone distinguish consonance from 
dissonance of simple tones, 1996. of differen- 
tial tones cannot occur if consonant interval 
ratios are exactly observed, but occur instant- 
ly if they are not, 203c. peculiar character of 
those with bowed instruments, 2086. of the 
tempered triad, 8226, c. . their effect on its 
harmoniousness, 822d. variation in the pitch 
of the beating tones, 414c. calculation of 
their intensity according to the intervals of 
the beating tones, 415d. [how to count, 
444d'] 
[Beats and Combinational Tones, recent worls 

on, sect. L. see table of contents, p. 527] 
Beauty, subject to laws dependent on human 

intelligence, 366 
B^dos, Dom, *16c [his 4 old French foot pipe, 
16c note, 494d, 5b8a. knows only mean tone 
temperament, 548c] 
Beethoven [uses pianofortes by Slein, 77d], 
his use of the mode of the minor Sixth, 3066. 
his relation to equal temperament, 327c 
[Behnke, Emil, •lOOd', 'lOld', on registers of 

voice, 1016] 
[Belgium, pitch, 50id] 

[Bell, Graham, inventor of Telephone, finds 

and demonstrates double resonance in all 

vowels, 107d. his paper on Vowel Theories, 

*108d] 

[Bell, Melville, *106d. his vowel system, 105d, 

107d] 
Bellermann, *265<2' 

Bells, large, how set swinging by periodical 
efforts, 36d. their inharmonic proper tones, 
72c. why they beat, 73a. 
Bell -shaped glasses, broken by singers, S9d 
[Belly-bridge of piano, old single, lid. the 
divided, was introduced by John Broadwood, 
1788, 77c'] 
[Bender, 505a] 

Bemouilli, Daniel (1700-1782), on law of mo- 
tion of strings, 15a [441c] 
[Best, W. T., organist, 500c] 
[Bettini, 507c] 

[Bevington, organ -builder, 506c] 
[Bishop, organ- builder. 50i5c] 
[Bitter, Life of J. S. Bach, 548d] 
[Black Digital Scales, 5186, 5226'] 
Blade of air, blade-shaped lamina of air at 

mouth of fiue-pipe, its action, 92a, 395a 
[Blahetka, on Vienna pitch, 504d] 
[Blaikley, D. J., on velocity of sound in tubes. 
*90d. distance of plane of refiexion from end 
of flue-pipe, *91d. action of lips in blowing 
the horn, &c., 97d, office of the air in the 
tube in relation to the lips, *97d\ 98i, 99c, 
*c' d'. his account of the clarinet and its 
partials, 996, c. how brass tubes for horns 
are shaped and bent, 99(2. their shape not 
truly conical, 99(2. sounds harmonics on 
French horn in exact tune, 99(2'. form of 
trumpets, 100c. two lowest partials out of 
tune, 100c. length of French horn with its 
various crooks, 100(2. trombone, its shape, 
100c'. slide trumpets, 100c'. keyed horns 
obsolete, 100c'. piston horns, 100(2'. on side 
holes, 103(2, 2l6d, On horns being in jast 
intonation, 327(2. on the conical tubes, tried 
by Professor Helmholtz, 394(2, note, says 
there are no ideal brass instruments in prac- 
tice, 428(2. forks, 494(2] 
[Bodin, 508(2] 



INDEX. 



559 



[Boehm, Theobald, on flutes, *103d. English, 
edited by W. S. Broadwood, lOSd'] 

Boethius, on the old tuning of the lyre, S55c, 
266c 

Boltzmann, 9da 

[Boston Music Hall, 96d] 

Bosanquet [his resonator, 43<i', 37ic. on the 
measurement of intensity of sound, *75d. 
distance of plane of reflexion from end of 
flue-pipe, *91d. recent work on combina- 
tional tones and beats, 152d, 155^', 156d, 
157(2, 167d, *322d. his use of Mercator's 
cycle of 58, 328c, d, his arrangements, 329a, 
[3294i, d']. his manual, 429. his cycle, 
4366', its synonymity and intonation, 439. 
his generalised fingerboard and harmonium, 
479& to 4Sla. on beats and combinational 
tones, 523 to 538. on J. S. Bach's equal 
temperament, 6iSd] 

[Bosch, his Seyille organ, 5Ila] 

Bourget, J., •73<i' 

Bowed instruments, 19a. their musical tones, 
80c, 2075. their use in harmony, 207c. not 
suited for soft melodies or sustained chords, 
203a. their scraping character, 208c. harsh- 
ness in quartettes by good players not accus- 
tomed to play together, 20Sc. [one of its 
causes, 208d. develop combinational tones 
well, 208d'] see Violin, &c., 2076 

[Branchu, Madame, 508c] 

Brandt, cited, on Young's law, 536. modifica- 
tion of his experiment, 53c, *58(2 

Brassinstruments have sluggish attack,67a.not 
suited to harmonies except oiit of door8,210c 

Breguet, his watch-key resembles the articu- 
lation of anvil and hammer in the ear, 183a 

[Broadwood, James, in 1811, advocates equal 
temperament, 548c] 

[Broadwood, J., & Sons, 497a, 507^.] 

[Broadwood, John, introduces divided belly- 
bridge on piano, 1788, and uniform striking- 
place, 77c] 

[Broadwood, Henry Fowler, present head of 
firm of J. Broadwood & Sons, has introduced 
the |-length striking distance on all his 
pianos, lid'"] 

[Broadwood, W. S., his edition of Boehm,103d'] 

[Brown, Colin, on characteristics of Scotch 
music, 259(2 note, on WHl you go^ lassie, 
262d\ his Voice Harmonium described and 
figured, 326d', 470(2] 

[Browne and Behnke, on VoicBj Song, and 
Speech, •100(2'] 

Brumel, Anton, 296(2 

[Bryoeson, 5056, 5066, c] 

[Burmah, Patala and Balafong, 518a] 

[Byfield & Green, 506a] 

[Byfield & Harris, 506a] 

[Byfield, Jordan, & Bridge, 5066] 

[Byolin, 498a] 



Gaccini in 1600 invents recitative, 248c 

Cadence, complete and imperfect or plagal, 
2936, examples, 293c 

Cairo, Quartertones used there, 2656 

[Callcott on extreme sharp Sixth, *308(2] 

Canals, see Semicircular 

Canonic imitation developed early in 12th cen- 
tury, 244c 

Cactus firmuSf shews leading note, 287c 

Oarissimi, 307c' 

Catgut strings, their quality of tone, 806 

[Cavaill^-CoU, Aristide, organ-builder, his 
rules for finding pitch of flue organ pipes, 
*89c, (2. tried and abandoned free reeds, 
96c. builds Mr. Hopwood's organ, 96(2. on 



Boehm's flutes, 103(2'. first draws attention 
to the mode in which flue-pipes speak, 897a'. 
his * soufflerie de precision,' 4426, 494^', 508a 

[Cavallo, Signor, helps J. Broadwood with the 
divided bell^-bridge, 77c'] 

[Cell, harmonic, or Unit of Concord, 458c] 

[Centesimal Cycle. 4376^] 

[Cents or hundredths of an equal Semitone, 
41(2. how to calculate, App. XX. sect. C, see 
contents, 446c] 

[Challenger, 5496] 

Changing or passing notes, d58a 

[Chappell, 507(2] 

[Character of each tone in the major scale, 
according to Curwen, 279c, d] 

Characters of keys, are there any absolute? 
310c. differ on pianos and violins, why, 
311c, and on wind instruments, 311c. may be 
influenced by peculiar resonance of ear pas- 
sage, 311c. [presumed, after E. Pauer, 5506] 

[Chev^, Emile, 425(2, marries Nanine Paris, 
writes theory of Galin-Paris-Chevd method, 
his 29 division of the Octave, 425c', 436(2. his 
system contrasted with Tonic Sol-fa, 426(2] 

[Chev^, Mme., formerly Nanine Paris, 425c', 
her principles of teaching to sing, 4266'] 

[Chickering, 601(2] 

[China, scales from instruments and musicians 
at the Health Exhibition, 518(2, 5226] 

Chinese,their numerical speculations on music, 
229c. their pentatonic scales, 257c. learned 
heptatonic scales under Tsay yu, 258a. their 
pentatonic airs are dull, 258c. 260a. 2616. 
[their equal temperament, 548c. their free 
reeds, 554(2] 

Chladni, 1756-1827, his sand flgures on elastic 
plates, 416, 71(2, the proper tones of such 
plates, 72a 

Chord defined, 24a, 211c. of four parts = 
tetrad, 2226. rules for open and close posi- 
tions hitherto given had no theory, 224c 

Chords, growth of feeling for their relation- 
ship, 292(2, 293a, 2966. of the tonal modes 
with double intercalary tones, 297c, (2, with 
single Do, 2986, c. of Sixth and Fourth |, 
and of Sixth and Third f or Sixth only 6, 
213a. of extreme sharp Sixth, their Greek 
Doric cadence, 2866. Of the Seventh used 
to connect other chords, 3576. see also 
Closing Chords, and see Italian, German, 
and French Sixth, diminished Seventh, (fee. 

Chordal sequences, 355c 

Chordal relationship felt in 15th and 16th 
centuries, 369a 

Chrysanthus of Dyrrachium, Archbishop, de- 
clares Greeks have no pleasure in polyphonic 
music, and leaves it to the West, 1966, 
•196«2 

CilisB of ampuUee, see Auditory Ciliee 

Cithara, five-stringed lute, 257(2 

[' Clang,' used by Prof. Tyndall for compound 
tone, why not so used here, 24(2. Webster's 
definition of, 24(2] 

['Clangtint,' used by Prof. Tyndall for quality 
of tone, why not so used here, 246'] 

[Clark, Lieut., see Macleod] 

Clarinet, its tongue or reed, 966. cylindrical, 
with unevenly numbered partials, 98c. [D. 
J. Blaikley's account of the clarinet as not 
wholly cylindrical, 996, c] its peculiar 
action in forming chords, 210(2. experiment 
with it and just harmonium, 211a. [its 
tones, 892c. its reeds, 55dc] 

[Clavichord, strikes the string at end, 78(2'] 

Closing Chords, their development, 290c2. 
their five major forms, 291c. major chords 
in minor modes, 296d, 297a 

Cochlea^ see Ear 

Cochlean nerve, its expansion, 1896, c 



560 



INDEX, 



[Cohen, 6086] 

[Golbacchini, 510c] 

Gollard, 507d, 5496 

[Colour, used by T. Young for quality of tone, 
why not so used here, 24c'] 

Coloured lights, mixture of, different from 
mixture of pigments, 646 

Colourings, Greek, xp^a<t their reality, 2666 

Colours, primary, scarlet-red, yellow-green, 
blue-violet, 646, [d note] never seen pure, 
64c. power to distinguish generally absent, 
64d. analysis of, into three, by Waller, 94a 

Combinational tones, 5a. occur when the vi- 
brations of the air are not infinitesimal, 162c. 
result from all the partial tones, 1536. most 
easily heard when generators are less than 
an Octave apart; for harmoniums can be 
reinforced by a resonator, but in other cases 
not, 158c. [heard simultaneously with rattle 
of beats, 153c. from two flageolet fifes, 153d.] 
multiple, considered as of different orders, 
164(2. [not all audible, 155d'.] once thought 
to be subjective, and to result from beats be- 
coming too rapid to be heard separately, 166c. 
objections to this theory, 156c. they arise 
from the largeoess of the vibrations, 156d. 
condition for being well heard on harmonium 
and polyphonic siren, 157a, 6. may be gener- 
ated in the ear by unsymmetrical form of 
drumskin, 1586, and loose joint of hammer 
and anvil, 158c. produce tingling in the ear, 
and are strong when soprano voices sing 
Thirds, 158c. an accessory phenomenon by 
which beats are not interrupted, 1676. beat, 
197c. delimit consonances when the partials 
do not suffice, 2016. the most general cause 
of beats, 2046. important for the harmoni- 
ousness of a chord, 214c. those of major and 
minor triads, 215a, 6, essentially different, 
214c. their mathematical theory, 411d. their 
effect in Just, Pythagorean, and Tempered 
chords compared, 3146 [and note], their 
beats mathematically investigated, 4186 to 
419c. their origin, 419d, in the siren and 
harmonium, 419d, 420(2 

[Commas higher indicated by superior, lower 
by inferior figures, proposed by Translator 
and here used, 2776, c] 

Compass of instruments, [17(2], 18a, [186, c] 

[Compass of the Human Voice, 5446] 

[Composite and compound tones distinguished, 
38d'] 

Composition of simple tones, tone and its 
Octave, 306, c, tone and its Twelfth, 32. 
artificial, of simple tones how arranged, 120c 
to 122(2 

Compound tones, 22a, and see Tone 

Concatenation, or musical connection of tones, 
direct, 850(2, indirect, 3516 

[Concertina, Just English, 4706] 

Concords are consonant chords, 211(2 

[Condissonant triads defined, . 211(2', 338(2 
note +, 459a] 

Congregational singing, its results, 246c 

Connection, musical, or concatenation of notes 
in the scale, 850(2 to 352 

Consecutive Twelfths and Fifths, why forbid- 
den, 359(2 to 361c. Octaves, why forbidden, 
359c 

Consonances result from coincidences of upper 
partials, 182(2. tables of such coincident 
partials, 183a. also in musical notation, 
183(2. disturbed by the consonances next 
adjoining them in the scale, meaning of this 
expression, 186(2. defined, 1946. and disso- 
nances, their boundary, 2286, which has not 
been constant,228c.absolute,Octave,Twelfth, 
and double Octave, 1946. perfect, Fifth and 
Fourth, 194c. medial, major Sixth and major 



Third, 194c. imperfect minor Third and minor 
Sixth, 194(2. great diversity of opinion on the 
order of their relative harmonionanes, 196&. 
order of de Vitry and de Muris, Franco of 
Cologne, and Glarean's Dodecachotdon, 196c 
here it is based on their independent har* 
moniousness, 197a. their influen<3e on each 
other, tabular views, 187.' separately con- 
sidered, 187(2 to 1906 

Consonant intervals, why so* called, 181e. 
[their beating partials and the ratios of those 
partials compared, 1916, c] 

Consonant triads not exceeding an Octave 
examined, only six possible forms, 212d to 
217a. exceeding an Ootave, examined, 2176 
to 2226. effect of transposition, 218a-219& 

Consonants, tsnues and medicBt their charac- 
ter, 66a, 6. hisses, F V, <Scc., B and L, 
67(2 

Comu and Mercadier, experiments on violin 
intonation, *325d 

[Correlative Duodene, 4626] 

Corti, the Marchese, his formations, or arches, 
or rods, 1896, d to 141(2. seem most suited 
for sympathetic vibration, 1456. they in- 
crease in size as they approach the vertex of 
the cochlea, 145(2. their alteration of form, 
146(2. probably play only a secondary part 
in the function of the cochlea, 146(2. viewed 
as the means of transmitting the vibrations 
of the basilar membrane to the terminals of 
the nerves, 147a. may be 4500, or, throwing 
off 800 for extramusical tones, 4200 in the 
octave, 1476. how they may determine pitch 
continuously, 147a. mode in which they 
analyse tones, 147c ta 1486. may vibrate to 
two tones, and their vibrations may be com- 
pounded of them, 166e. attempt to estimate 
intensity of sympathetic vibration for in- 
creasing intervals of tones, n2c choice of 
hypotheses, 172(2. considered as explaining 
consonance and dissonance, 2276 

[Costa, Sir M., 502a, 507c, 556(2] 

[Couchet, Jan, Antwerp, harpsichord maker, 
knew that striking-place affects quality, 77c] 

Coussemaker, '196(2, •248(2', "244(2 

[Cramer, 5056] 

[Crawford, 526a] 

[Cross and Miller on American pitch, 494c] 

[Crotch, Dr., 5496] 

Crumples in vibrational form of violin strings, 
846 

Crustaceee, observations on their auditory ap- 
paratus by v. Hensen, 149c 

[Curwen, John, names of registers, 101c. his 
use of the character of a tone in singing, 
*279c, (2. on major Sixth of the minor scale, 
•801(2. his work with Tonic Sol-fa, 4246 to 
4256. his pitch, 496c] 

[Curwen, John Spencer, eldest son of John 
Curwen, President of the Tonic Sol-fa Col- 
lege, 424(2. his letter to the Times, 424a'. 
his Memorials of John Curwen, 425c] 

[Cycle of 53, how it arises, 465a] 

[Cyclic Temperaments, 436a] 

Cymbal um of 19 notes to the Octave, men- 
tioned by Praetorius, 320c. value of the 
notes, 320(2' 

[Czermak, on whispering, •108<2'] 



D 



d'Alembert, his theory of consonance, 282a to 
2386. his Pythagorean Sixth in major scAlt 
not allowed, 275a. says Bameau^s tuning 
was common in 1762, 3216. his explanation 
of the limits of the Greek heptachord, 351(2 

[d'Aligre, Marquis, 5086] 



INDEX. 



661 



Damping, rapid, of tones of air in mouth, 112c 

to 113a 
Damping of vibrations in the ear, 142c to 14dd 
Dance music in form of madrigals and motetts 
. in A.D. 1529, down to J. S. Bach and Handel, 

245a 
[Decad, harmonic, or Unit of Harmony, 4595] 
[de Gaus, Solomon, 509c] 
Deep tones require more power to make them 
audible than high tones, 1746. expeiiments 
shewing how weak deep tones are,1756. below 
110 vib. are more or less discontinuous on the 
siren, 178a. jar on harmonium below 182 
vib., 178a. pxx>duced by a string weighted in 
the middle, 176a. 37i vib. weak, 29^ vib. 
scarcely audible, 1766. Professor Helmholtz, 
with large forks of 24 to 85, and 35 to 61 
vib., found 30 vib. weak, 28 vib. scajcely audi- 
ble. 176c. on Appunn's reeds, Preyer's ex- 
periments, 176d. Author's conjecture, VI6d'. 
[Translator's experiments, 176d'] 
Deepest musical tone, how many vibrations it 

has, 174a 
Deepest practical orchestral tone, 41 ^ vib., 

175c 
[Degenhardt, 5026] 
[de la Fage, 494<2', 509a, 510c] 
de la Tour, Cagniard, his siren, 12c, [494(2', 

608c, d] 
Delattre, S62d 
de la Motte Fouquet, 105a 
Delezenne shews that first-class violinists play 
in just intonation, 325a, *325c, title, [his 
monochord, 441d', 494d', 508a, &, d] 
de Maris, Jean, his consonances, excludes 

Fourths, 196c 
[Demuth, organist, 54dd] 
[de Prony, 494d', 508a] 
de Vitry, Philipp, his consonances, excludes 

Fourths, 196c 
Diapason normal, 16d, [512^^] 
[Diapason work of organs, 98d'] 
Diaphony of HucbaJd, 244a 
[Dichord, 5286] 
[Dichordal or double diatonic scale of H. W. 

Poole, 344c, 477c to 478c] 
Didymus included major Third 4 : 5 in the 
syntono-diatonic mode, 228c. his tetraohord, 
263a 
Differential combinational tones (Sorge's and 
Tartini's), 153a. of usual harmonic intervals, 
154a. generated by upper partials, 154c. of 
different orders exemplified, 155a, b, c. [cal- 
culated, 155(2.] form a complete series of 
harmonic partial tones up to the generators, 
155c. [influence of this on consonance of 
simple tones, 155(2', 537(2.] their reinforce- 
ment by resonators, often small and dubious, 
157(2, may then arise from vibrations com- 
municated to resonator by drumskin, 158a. 
of the first order, their beats, 198a, b. beat 
only when upper partials beat and with the 
same frequency, 199a. of higher orders, their 
use in distinguishing Fifths and Fourths of 
simple or slightly compound tones, 201, [530a] 
[Digitals = finger-keys, 50(2'] 
Diminished Seventh, its chord and transform- 
ations of the same, 345c, d. [its chord has 
the just form, 10 : 12 : 14 : 17, considered, 
846c, (2. its transformations considered, 
346c', d'.] its usual just chord. 349& 
[Dionysius of Halicamassus, 240(2] 
Direct system, its chords, 342c 
Direction, the sensation of, is partly due to 

muscular sensations, 63(2 
Discant at end of eleventh century in France 
and Flanders, its nature, 2446. develops 
polyphonic music and musical rhythm and 
canonic imitation, 244c 



Dissonance defined, 1946, 2046. how it arises,, 
330c, whither it tends, 880(2. different for 
different qualities of tone, 205a. how char- 
acterised, 226c. and consonance, their boun- 
dary, 2286. not been always the same, 228c. 
unprepared, S54c 

Dissonant chords imperfectly represent com- 
pound tones, 3466. dissonant notes, 346c. es- 
sentially why used, 3586. intervals, why so 
called, 181c. considered, general view, S31d 
to 833(2. notes of chords of the Seventh, con- 
sidered, 8476 to d50a. tetrads, 341c. tones» 
how introduced, 3586. triad C E A^otCE 
6|, 213(2, [214(2]. triads, 3886 

Disturbance of consonances by adjacent con- 
sonances, meaning of this expression, 186(2 

Division of small intervals into equal parts by 
ear, 256a 

Dogs very sensitive to high e"" of violin, 116(1 

Dominant. Seventh, its chord not used in 16th. 
century, 246(2. [Duodene, 461(2] 

[Donoaster, Schulze's organ at, 96(2] 

Donders, first draws attention to noises attend- 
ing vowels, 67(2, 106c'. first discovered vowel 
resonances, *1086. how he estimated them,. 
108c. his vowel resonances compared with 
Prof. Helmholtz's, 1096, [•168(2'] 

Donkin's Acoustics, 877a 

Doric, national Greek scale, 242a. its scale^ 
267c, d05c. Glarean's, or ecclesiastical, 245c. 
considered as the mode of the minor Seventh » 
308c 

Double Octave, an absolute consonance, 1946 

Double Siren, see Siren, double 

Dove's polyphonic Siren, 18a, 14a 

[Driffield, Rev. G. T., 494(2, 6056] 

[Drilled Reeds, 5556]' 

Drum and Drumskin, see Ear 

Du Bois Reymond, sen., his vowel trigram> 
1056, *105(2 

Ductus cochledris, 137c 

[Duiffoprugcar(SwissTyrol,6ologna,andLyons» 
1610-1538), resonance of his violins, 876, c] 

[Duodenal, its meaning and use, 4656] 

[Duodenarium, the, 468a. how constructed, 
463(2. limits of, 4646] 

[Duodenation, 462(2] 

[Duodene, harmonic, or Unit of Modulation, 
461a] 

[Duodenes, musical, or the development of just 
intonation for harmony. Sect. E, see con- 
tents, 457(2] 



E 



Ear, its analysis of musical tones according to 
the law of simple vibrations, 496, 52a. espe- 
cially sensitive from 2640 to 3168 vib., e"" to 
g""f 116a. consequent effect when bass voices 
sing, 1166. how it apprehends and analyses 
compound tones, 128c. construction of, de- 
scribed, 129c to 142a. its labyrinth, 129(2, 
135(2 to 137a. fluid of the same, 1366. ita 
membranous labyrinth, 136(2. its hammer, 
or malleiLS figured and described, 1816. its 
anvil, or incus, 132(2, and its anvil's joint with 
the hammer, 1836. its stirrup, 183(2. figured, 
134a. its stirrup's attachment to the oval 
window, 184a, and excursions, 1846. its sac- 
ciilus.liGd. its ampullcB,136d. ita utrtculus, 
136(2. its sand, 137a. its cochlea, 1876 to 
142a. sensitive torf'f and its consequences, 
179a. contrasted with eye as to capabilities 
of perceiving waves, 29. compared with eye 
in its apprehension of compound vibrations, 
128c. ear can analyse, eye cannot ; eye can 
distinguish all forms,ear can only distinguish 
those which have different constituents, 128(2. 

00 



562 



INDEX. 



compared with eye in analysis of compound 
sensations, 148<2, and for intermittent irrita- 
tions, 178a, 6, c, compared with muscles for 
intermittent irritations, 173&. [compared 
with eye and muscles in timing a transit, 
17dd, d'.] its windows, see Oval and Bound 

Ecclesiastical scales of Glarean, with incorrect 
Greek names, 245c, d 

{Edison, T. A., his phonograph, 539a] 

Egyptian flute, interpreted by F^tis, 271d 

Eight-stringed Scales, Lydian,Phrygian, Doric, 
Hypolydian, Hypophrygian (Ionic), Hypo- 
doric (Eolic or Locrian), Mixolydian, 267c. 
[the same with the intervals in cents, 268c] 

Ekert, *807d' 

Eleventh not so pleasant as Fourth, 1896. 
[its partials compared with those of the 
Fourth, lS9d], 196a 

[Elliot, 607a] 

Ellis, A. J. [•led', lid, 66d, 66d', *68d, •68d', 
•105d', 114d, •147d. his Alphabet of Nature, 
1845, first makes mention of Willis's and 
Wheatstone's experiments and theories, 
•117d, •igid', 890a] 

Energetic tone of voice, how produced, 115c 

Engel, G., *112d 

[England, pitch, 505d] 

Enharmonic confusions occur in just intona- 
tion, S27d. [organ of Gen. T. P. Thompson, 
478c] 

Eolic mode, Glarean's, 245(2 

Eolic (Hypodoric) Greek scale, 267c 

Equal temperament, circumstances favourable 
to it, 8226. first developed on the pianoforte 
where much favoured, 823a. its defects on the 
organ, 328c, and harmonium, 824a, on violins, 
8246. not used in double stop passages, 824c. 
its influence on musical composition, 3275. 
Mozart and Beethoven, 827c. [its cycle, 4866. 
its intonation, 487c. its synonymity, 4886. 
its history, 548] 

[Erard, SGTJd] 

Eratosthenes, his method of tuning the older 
chromatic tetrachord, 262c 

Erse have learnt heptatonic Scales, 2586 

Essential scales, 2676 

[Esser, 504d] 

[Est^ve, 436d'] 

Esthetics, Musical, 16 

Esthetic principles modify physical in the 
formation of scales, 284 to 286. analysis of 
works of art, 8666 

Esthonian treatment of leading note, 288a 

Euclid on consonance and dissonance, 226d, 
[528a] 

Euler, Leonard (1707-1788), on law of motion 
of strings, 15a, on why simple ratios please, 
156. his theory of consonance and dissonance 
founded on integers explained, *229d to 2316. 
the gap he left filled by Prof. Helmholtz, 231c. 
[his determination of pitch numbers by a 
string and formula, 441c. 49id', 5l0d] 

Eustachian tube, 1306 

[Ewing, J. A., Il8d'. analysis of vowels by 
Phonograph, 538-542, see Jenkin] 

Exner, S., •151d, •3726 

[Experimental Instruments for Justin tonation, 
4666 to 483c, see contents, 4666. pipes, 506c] 

Extreme sharp Sixth, its chord and Greek 
Doric cadence, 2866, 808c 

Eye contrasted with ear as to capabilities of 
perceiving waves, 29 

F 

Fagotto, see Bassoon 

False cadence, 856c. relations forbidden, 

861c2, their meaning, 862a, often found in 

J. S. Bach*s chorales, 8626 



Farabi, same as Al Farabi, d. 950, 2B2a 

[Faraday, 5056] 

[Farey, J., sen., controversy with James Broad- 
wood, 548c'] 

Fessel, 122d, d77c, his resonance tubes, dimen- 
sions of, 877d 

F6t,\a*2S9d*240d\ •257d. adopts term tonalUy, 
2406. on pentatonic scales, 257c, 271d. his 
interpretation of an Egyptian flute, 271d, 
280c'. [his story of Lemmens, 280d'] 

Fifth, 146, not sensibly disturbed by adjacent 
intervals, 188c. [its pairtials compaj«d, 186d] 
a perfect consonance, 194c. of simple tones 
delimited by beats of differential tones, 200d. 
repetition in it presents new elements, 25^6. 
used in modern music, 254d. occurs in the 
scale, 255a. [indicated by +, 276c?'.] grave 
or imperfect and just, 8856. false or di- 
minished, 3d5c. superfluous or extreme sharp, 
885d. see also subminor Fifth 

Fifths, consecutive, why forbidden, 359e, d60d, 
3616 

Fifths and Fourths consonant and dissonant 
enumerated and considered, 8856 

Fifth and Fourth triad, 8386 

Fifth and Sixth triad, 8386 

Films of glycerine soap and water for shewing 
vibrations of air in a resonator, 374 

[Final, called tonic in text, 267d] 

Final Chords, see Closing Chords 

[Finlayson, 500a] 

[Fischer, 494(2', 5060, d] 

[Flatter or lower tones defined, lid'] 

Fldrcke, on vowel resonance, 108c', 109e 

Flue-pi^es of an organ open and stopped, 886, 

c. [tneir pitch according to Cavaill^-GoU, 89c. 

d. effect of temperature on pitch of, 89^, d'.] 
motion of air inside, for open pipes, 69c to 906, 
for stopped pipes, 90c. their reduced length, 
916. distance of plane of reflexion from the 
end of pipe according to Prof.Helmholtz,916, 
[according to Bosanquet, Lord Rayleigh, and 
Blaikley, 91(f|, motion of air at mouth, 926. 
narrower stopped cylindrical, have proper 
tones corresponding to the unevenly num- 
bered partials, the wider not so, and hence give 
prime tone almost alone, 94a, the blowing 
of them, 394a to 3966. see Organ pipes, flue 

Flute pipes, see Flue pipes 

Flutes, bad for harmony, joke on a Flute 
concerto and concert, good in combination 
with other instruments, 205(2. [old and new, 
their intonation, 555(2' to 556a] 

[Folliano, L., invents the mean tone, but not 
the meantone temperament, 547(2] 

[Foot, lengths of, in different countries, their 
effect on pitch, 5l2a] 

Force of tone, 10c. its measure, 10e2. of sonnd, 
its mechanical measurement, lOd, [75(2'] 

Forks, tuning, their sympathetic resonance, 
39(2, 40a. [generally have the second partial, 
54(2. conditions of not having any partials, 
55(2'.] purified from secondary tones by a jar. 
54(2, or a string, 55c see also Tuning-fork 

Forkel, '296(2, 821(2, •821(2' 

[Forster & Andrews, 5006] 

Forte and Piano, how produced on organs, 94c 

Fortlage, 807c 

Four-part chords, 2226 

Fourier (1768-1880), his law, 846. its acous- 
tical expression, 84c. what it shews and 
does not shew, 856. mathematically solves 
Pythagoras's problem, 229a 

Fourth, 14(2. chiefly disturbed by major 
Third, 1896. its precedence over major Third 
and major Sixth principally due to its being 
the inversion of the Fifth, 1896. a perfect 
consonance, 194c. why formerly not con- 
sidered as a consonance, 196(2. between two 



INDEX. 



563 



simple tones delimited by beats of differ- 
ential tones, 200a. , mode of, Greek lonio 
Eoclesiastical Mixolydian considered, 802c. 
[its predominance, 524er| 

[France, pitch, 508a] 

Franco of Cologne, end of 12th century, admits 
Thirds as imperfect consonances, 190a. his 
order of consonances, 196c 

[FranQois, 5086] 

[Fraser, his organ, first commercially issued in 
equal temperament, since burned, 5496^] 

Free Beeds, 956. [in Chinese Sh^ng, 65d. 
not used in English organ pipes, 96c. 
treated by Mr. Hermann Smith, 554d] 

French pitch, 16d. [Commission on pitch, 
494d'. Sixth, 461c] 

French horn, Me Horn 

Frequency defined, 11a, [11<2] 

FuUah negroes have pentatonic scales, 257c 

Fundamental major and minor chords, 212d. 
bass, 294c 

[Fiirstenau, M., 499] 



G 



Gabrieli Giovanni of Venice, composer con- 
temporary with Palestrina, 247c. what we 
miss in him, 2486, 296a 

Gaels have learned heptatonic scales, 2586 

[Gafori, treatise on music, 1480, *812d] 

Galileo (1564-1649) on laws of motion of 
strings, 15a 

[Galin, P., his book and system, 425<2. adopts 
Huyghens's cycle of 81, 425(2] 

Galin-Paris-Gheve system of teaching sing- 
ing, 425c. [its history and principles, 42&2 
note t] 

Galleries of cochlea, 1376 

[Gamelan or Javese band, how it plays, 526c] 

[Gand, 509a] 

[Gardiner, Tonic Sol-fa teacher, 427c] 

[Gameri, G., or 'Joseph* (Cremona, 1683- 
1745), also called Guamerius, resonance of 
his violins, 87c] 

[Gameri, P. (Mantua, 1701), resonance, of his 
violins, 87c'] 

Geigen-principal organ stop, 93a, c, d 

Gemshom organ stop, 94a, [94dr] 

Gerbert, •196d 

[German peculiarity of consonants, 66d, d'. 
habit of beginning vowels with the check or 
Arabic hamza, 104(2'. Sixth, 46 Lc. pitch, 
5096] 

[Gewandhaus concerts at Leipzig, pitch, 5106] 

Glarean sometimes allows tenor and bass to 
be in different keys, 245e2. his Dodecachordon 
and its order of consonances, *196c. his six 
authentic and six plagal scales with false 
Greek names, 245c, d, his names of the 
modes, 269a 

Glass harmonicon, 71a 

[Glazebrook*s electric method of determining 
pitch, 4426] 

Gleitz, organist, on Erfurt bell of 1477 and its 
tones, *72d 

Glottis, 98a 

[Glover, Miss Sarah, starts the system of 
teaching to sing developed as Tonic Sol-fa 
by John Curwen, 424a] 

[Glyn & Parker, maker of Handel's Foundling 
Hospital organ, 505d] 

Goethe, 1749-1882, relied on mixtures of pig- 
ments, 64d 

Goltz, his investigation of the ciliae of am- 
pullae, leads to suppose that they and the 
semicircular canals serve to give sensation of 
revolution, 1516 

[Got, M., pronounces out without voice, 68d] 



Goudimel, Claude, a Huguenot, master of 

Palestrina, 2476 
Graham, G. F., *25Qd\ 260d', 261d 
[Grave harmonics = combinational tones, 158c 

note] 
[Gray, Dr., helps J. Broadwood with divided 

belly-bridge, 77c^ 
[Gray <fc Davison, 606c, 507a. in 1854 first 

send out an organ in equal temperament, 

5496'] 
[Great Exhibition of 1851 had no English 

organ in equal temperament, 549a'] 
[Greatorex, 496c] 
[Greece, old tetrachords, 512(2, 519(2. ditto 

after Al Farabi, 512(2, 519(2. scales, 514 to 515. 

most ancient, 5156. later, and Al Farabi's, 

515c, 519(2] 
Greek Music, 287. tonal system, 262 to 271. 

later scale, 270c, 6. [scales 514 to 515a] 
Greeks had a certain esthetic feeling for 

tonality, but undeveloped, 242c 
[Green, 505(2] 
Gregory, Pope, a.d. 590-604, his settlement of 

the Liturgy, little more than established the 

Boman school of singing of Pope Sylvester, 

2d9a. inserts accidental scales among Am- 

brosian essential, 271(2 
[Griesbaoh, J. H., 499(2, 5056] 
[Grove, Sir G., •87(2'] 
[Grundton = fundamental tone or root of chord, 

24(2'] 
Guadanini, violin by, 85c 
[Guamerius, P., 87c', see Gameri] 
Gu^roult, 165(2, note and 414c, [487c] 
Guido d'Arezzo, b. about 990, 851c 
[Guillaume, 510(2] 
Guitar, 746 



H 



[Halberstadt organ, 1361, oldest pitch asoer- 
tamed, 5116] 

[Hall^, Oh., 502c] 

Hallstroem considered multiple combinational 
tones to be of different orders, *154(2, 41Sa 

Hammer, moved by water-wheel, its periodic 
motion, 19c, 21c. soft and elastic for pianos 
complicates the problem, 74c. a sharp-edged 
metallic, rebounding instantly, excites but 
one point and produces numerous partials, 
some more intense than the prime, 75a. of 
pianoforte, why felted, 75c. hard and soft, 
their different qualities, 78c. see also Ear 

Hammer-Purg^all, von, on Arabian Music, 
281c, d 

Hamulus of cochlea, 1376 

Handel sometimes concludes a minor piece 
with a major chord, 2176. his suites, 245a. 
his use of closing minor chord, 295a, 296(2. 
his use of the mode of minor Sixth, 807a, 6. 
[takes a chorus from Carissimi, 307(2 note f. 
his fork, 496c, 5056] 

Hanslick, E., on the Beautiful in Music, 26, 
250(2 

[Harmon, Mr. J. Paul White's, for the 63 divi- 
sion of the Octave, 4816] 

Harmonic music, modern, how characterised, 
246c. inducements for the change, 246c. 
distinguished from polophonic by the in- 
dependence of chords, 296a. relationship 
began in the middle ages, 868c. Seventh, see 
subminor Seventh, upper partials produced 
by the same peculiarities of construction of 
a body as allow combinational tones to be 
heard, 158(2, 159a. these always accompany 
a powerful simple tone, 169c. upper par- 
tials, why they play a leading part in the 
sensations of the ear, 204a 

oo2 



564 



INDEX. 



[Harmonical, an instrument for musical ob- 
servation, 6c. a specially tuned harmonium, 
its price and compass, 176, c, d. useful to 
shew the existence of partial tones, 22d. 
useful for shewing increasing frequency of 
beats with increasing pitch, 168d. full de- 
scription. 466c2] 

Harmonicons of metal, wood, and glass, 
71a, 6, c 

Harmonics, how they differ from harmonic 
upper partial tones, 24(2^ defined, 25d. 
of C66, table of partials of the first sixteen, 
to shew how they affect each other in con- 
sonances, 197c, d. of a string 45 inches long 
struck at } length, ISd. partials of a piano- 
forte string struck at one- eighth its length, 
545c. of a violin or harp, and fading har- 
monics of piano, 24d'. Seventh and Seven- 
teenth introduced into harmony, 464c 

Harmony, of the spheres, solely heard by 
Pythagoras, 229c, and plays a great part in 
middle ages, 229^2. i^ modem principle, 
249a^ 249c. not natural, but freely chosen, 
2496, gave rise to a richer opening out of 
musical art d69a. [absent in non-harmonic 
scales, 526c] 

Harmonium, its reeds, 956, 554a'. with 24 notes 
in just intonation, invented by Prof. Helm- 
holtz, its system of chords, 316c. its method 
of tuning, S16d'. [its duodenary arrangement, 
317c.] its system of minor keys, dl8a and d, 
its contrast with tempered, 319c. [just, de- 
scribed, 470a] 

Harmoniousness of combinations in different 
qualities of tone, 194a 

Harp, 746. with pedal, 8226 

[Harper, trumpeter, and his son, had a slide 
trumpet, 100c'] 

Harpsichord [its striking-place, 77^ 

[Harris, K., arches the upper lip of flue-pipes, 
897d', 605d] 

[Harris, T. and R., 505d] 

Harmonisation, the only point in which 
modem excels ancient music, d09a 

[Hart, violin-maker, assists in finding reso- 
nance of violins, 87c] 

[Hartan, monochord, 442a] 

[Haseneier, maker of Dr. Stone's contrafagotto, 
5636'] 

Hasse, C, proves that birds and amphibia have 
no Gorti's rods, 145(2', 146d 

Hauptmann, objects to a theory of consonance 
and dissonance by rational numbers that no 
sharp line can be drawn, *221d. Prof. Helm- 
holtz's reply, 228a. his Pythagorean Sixth 
in minor scale not allowed, *215d. his nota- 
tion for Fifths and Thirds, 276d, 277c. his 
reason for avoiding closing minor chords, 
295c, 295d\ S10d\ his opinion on the Second 
of the Scale, 298(2. his minor major mode, 
3056. denies that there is any difference of 
character to keys played on an organ 310(2. 
his system of tones, 315c, 340a. on consecu- 
tive Fifths, 360(2, 3616 

Hautbois, see Oboe 

[Haweis, Rev. H. R., assists in finding reso- 
nance of violins, 87c] 

[Haydn, 548c'] 

[HeaJey, Mr., assists in finding resonance of 
violins, 876', c'] 

Heidenhain's tetdnomotor, its action, 139a 

Hellcotrema of cochlea, 1376 

Helmholtz, Prof., *6c', 18(2. his Optics, 18(2', 
*91c, *98(2', 105(2, 106c', 109c, 110(2, (2'. '111(2, 
117(2, 123(2, ♦134(2, *152(2', 153(2, 195(2', 238(2'. 
his names for the modes explained, 269c. 
[taken to hear Gen. P. Thompson's organ by 
the Translator, 428c', and taken by the same 
to Mr. Gardiner's School to hear Tonic Sol-fa 



singing, 427c. his letter to J. Curwen aboat 
it, 427(2] 

[Helmholtzian Temperament, 435c] 

[Helmore, Rev. T., on Gregorian mode8,*266(2] 

Hell wag, Gh., 108c'. [on vowel resonance, 109e] 

Hemony of Ziitphen, 17th century, his require 
ments for bells, 72(2 

[Henfling's cycle of 50, 436(2'] 

Henle found where greatest increase of breadth 
of Gorti's rods fell, 146a 

Henrici, estimates upper partials of tuning- 
forks too low by an Octave, *62a 

Hensen, Y., researches on the basilar mem- 
brane, 145c, *145(2'. auditory apparatus of 
crustaoeflB *149c 

Hensen, 406(2 

Heptatonic Scales, 2626 

[Herbert, Geo., had organ tuned equally, 5490*] 

Herschel, Sir J., 117(2' 

Hervert, J., *9Sd\ see Mach 

Hexachord of Guldo d'Arezzo, 351c 

[Hichi-riki, Japanese, its reeds, 553c'] 

Hidden Fifths and Octaves, 361c. often found 
in J. S. Bach*s chorales, 3626 

High voices more agreeable than low, and 
why, 179c 

[Hilde brand of Dresden, 495c] 

[Hill, violin-maker, assists in finding resonance 
of violins, 876, c] 

[Hill, Thomas, organ-builder, his father tried 
and abandoned free reeds, 96c, 494d', 506c] 

[Hipktns, A. J., on harmonics of a Sceinvray 
piano string, 76(2. un striking-place of piano- 
forte, harpsichord, and spinet, 77c, noie. 
had not met with a striking-place at ^ length, 
77(2'. his experiments on harmonics of a 
string struck at ^ its length, *78d. and fur- 
ther experiments on its partials, *545c 
assists in finding resonance of violins, 87c', 
183(2, 209(2, d'. monochord, 442a, 507(2. assists 
in determining non-harmonic scales, 5146, c, 
on James Broadwood's equal temperament, 
549a. introduces equal temperament at 
Broadwoods*, 1846, 549c] 

[Hitchcock's, early, 18th century, spinet, its 
striking-place, 77(2] 

glolland, pitch, 5106] 
omophonic music, 237 to 243 

[Hopkins, E. J., on the oigan, cited, *33^, 57c', 
d\ 98c', (2', 94(2, (2', 96(2, 498(2, 5496] 

[Hopwood, of Kensington, his organ built by 
Gavaill6-Goll, 96d] 

Horn, function of the air in its tube in rela- 
tion to lips, 97c, [after Blaikley, 97(2'], long 
nearly conical tube, 99a, [not quite conical, 
99(2]. gives the harmonics only, 99(2, [upper 
ones true, 99(2']. action of hand in the bell, 
100a. [2 lower harmonics false, lOOe. its 
various lengths for different crooks after 
Blaikley, and error in reporting Zamminer, 
100(2.] keyed horns, 100a. [nearly obsolete, 
100(2'] 

[Hewlett, 496c] 

Hucbald, Flemish monk, at beginning of 10th 
century, 244a 

Hudson's Bay, pentatonic scales, 257c 

[Huggins, Dr., F.R.S., his observations of effect 
of increasin(( tension of hairs in violin bow, 
83(2. on position of touch for Octave har- 
monic, *84(2. on function of sound post of 
violin, *86c, d assists in finding resonance of 
violins, 87c. the resonance of his Stradivari 
of 1708, 87(2'] 

[Hullah, 239(2, 499(2, 5056] 

[Hutchings, Plaisted, & Go., 5116] 

Huyghens, 1629-1695 [knows that striking- 
place of string affects quality of tone, 77e. 
his harmonic cycle, 436c] 

Hypate, uppermost string in position, lowest 



INDEX. 



566 



in pitoh, answered to dominant, 242a. Greek 

music ended on it, 2426 
Hypodorio (Eolio or Locrian) Scale, 267c 
Hypolydian Scale, 267c 
Hypophrygian (Tonic) Scale, 267e 



Ineus, see Ear 

[India, Chromatic and Semitonic Scales 5I7c. 
partial Scales of Rajah R&m P41 Singh, 
517d] 

[Indian Quartertones, how produced, 265d'] 

Indirect or Reverted System of Chords, 342c 

Instrumental tones accompanied by distinctive 
noises, 686 

Instruments with inharmonic proper tones not 
suitable for artistic music, 7dc. effect of 
bowing and damping them. 73(2 

Intercalated tones, always Semitones, S52c 

Interference of sound, 160 

Intermittent excitement of nerves, its effect 
on ear and eye. 1696 to 170c 

Intensity of sound, how measured, 75d. [Bosan- 
quet's, with Preece and Stroh*s opinion upon 
this measurement, 75d, d'] 

Interval, [a sensation, measured by ratios or 
cents, ISa, their names distinguished in print 
by capital letters, ISd',] of Fifth and Fourth, 
14a, major and minor Third, 146, major and 
minor Sixth, 14c. all hitherto considered 
so arranged tiiat a pair of their partials shall 
beat 38 times in a second, 191a, 192a. [all, 
except Thirds and Fifths, indicated l^ ... or 
the number of cents, 276(i'. not exceeding 
an Octave, expressed in Cents, Sect. D, see 
prefixed table of contents, 451c{. neutral, 
525a. alternative, 5256] 

[Intonation, Tempered Pythagorean and Just 
compared, 81dc. unequally just, 465a. of 
vocalists and violinists, 486 to 7. of flutes, 
555d' to 556a] 

Inversions, first or chord, of Sixth and 
Fourth, I, second or chord of Sixth and 
Third, |, 21da. on what their harmonious 
effect depends, 214a 

Inwards striking reeds, 976 

Ionic, Glarean's, 245c. Greek, considered as 
mode of the Fourth, d02c. (Hypophrygian) 
Scale, 267c 

[Ions, 496dp 

Irrational intervals, ixojoj 264 a 

[Isawa, director of the Musical Institute, Tokio, 
Japan, 5226', 626c', 527a', 5566'] 

Italian melodies rich in intercalated tones, 
352c. [Sixth, 461c] 

[Italy, in 1834 officially adopts 6' [^56 repre- 
senting the arithmetical pitch c"512, 497d[, 
498a, prior pitch, 510c] 



[Japan, koto tunings, heptatonic scales, 

Biwa, 519a, 6, c, 522a', 6', c'. scales, 5566'] 
[Java, music, 71d, 231d', its pentatonic scales, 

257(2. Salendro Scales, 518c, Pelog Scaler, 

518c, d, 5226T 
[Jehmlich, 4996, 509(f) 
[Jenkin and Ewing, ilHd'. analyttis of vowels 

by Phonograph, 538 to 542] 
[Jimmerthal, 5(J2c] 
Joachim uses 4 : 5 major Thirds in melody, 

255d, plays in just intonation, H2fia 
John XXII., Pope, ▲.D. 1322, forbids use of 

leading note, 287c 
Jones, Sir William, preHura'^i ans'a to have 

been the Indian tonic, *213a, 6, c. see IVuii 



[Jordans, 5066] 

[Josquin, 225(1, 296(f] 
. [Jots, cycle of, 30103, 4d7a] 

Just intonation instrumen tally practicable, 
327(i. in singing, 422 to 428. [extreme close- 
ness of its representation by the cycle of 53, 
3296, c] the protest of musicians against 
it arises from their not haviug methodically 
compared Just and Tempered Intonation, 
■ 428c, possible in the orchestra, 428c. natural, 
428a. according to Delezenne, 4286. [ex- 
pressed in cycle of 1200, 440. experimental 
instruments for exhibiting, App. XX. Sect. 
F, 4666 to 48dc. see contents, 4666] 

Justly intoned Harmoniums, with two manuals 
arranged by the Author, 316c to 319c. instru- 
ments necessary for teaching singing, d27a. 
instruments, plan for them, with a single 
manual, 421a to 4226 



K 



Keppler could not free himself from musical 
imagination, 229(2 

Kettledrums, their secondary tones not inves- 
tigated, 736 

Key of polyphonic composition different for 
different voices, 245(2. [acoustical effects of 
change of key, 551(2.] Keynote, see Tonic 

Keys, have they special characters? 310c. 
[their presumed characters, 550c] 

[Khorassan, Tambour of, its scale, after Prof. 
Land, 5176] 

Kiesewetter, R. G., 236(2, *2816, c, 282(2' 

Kirchengesang, or congregational singing, 
•287(2' 

Kircher, Athanasius, finds both macrocosm 
and microcosm musical, 229c 

[Kirkman's harpsichord, 1773, its striking- 
place, 77(2] 

Kimberger tunes Baoh*s major Thirds sharp, 
321c 

[Kirsten, 5096] 

Kissar, five-string lyre of North Africa, penta- 
tonic according to Villoteau, 257c 

[Klang, 24c] 

Koenig, R. [when tuning-forks have no 
partials. 56d', 106(2'. on vowel resonan(;e, 
*109c', *109(2', 122(2'. on influence of dif- 
ference of pluise on quality of tone, 126(2.] 
with short sounding-rods has shewn that 
tones with 4000 to 40000 vibrations in a 
second can be heard, 151c, 152(2, 159(2, d\ 
167(2. recent work on combinational tones 
and beats, 152(2. experiments on forks with 
sliding weights, hU results, 1596, [159(2], 176c. 
makes resonators, 372(2. his manometric 
flames, 374a, 6. [his clock method of deter- 
mining pitch, 442c. his tuning-fork tonome- 
ters, price of various kinds, 446a, 6, 494(2'. 
on beats and combinational tones, 527 to 538] 
I Kosegarten, J. G. L., 282(2' 
i [Krebs, 510a] 

[Kummer, 5096] 

[Kiitzing, C, 1884, gives ^ length as suitable 
striking-place, but had met with f, *77c'J 



[Land, Prof. J. P. N., Gamme Arabe, ♦2¥jc', 
*281c. bis account of the Arabic scaler, -iHi 
note. Al Faraoi's Greek .Scales, -0 15c. Arabic 
and PerKian, 51 5d, Ditto Medieval and 
Ancient Lute, 5106. Tambours of Knora^^an 
and Kagdad, 5176, c, 623c': 

Larynx, ar^tion of, 9Ha 

I^at^r Greek .Scales, 270a, 6, c 



566 



INDEX. 



Leading note, conception of, 2855, between 
Seventh and Octave, not between Third 
and Fourth, 286a, but between Second and 
Third in the minor mode, 2866. not marked, 
but Bung, even in Protestant churches, to 
16th and 17th centuries, 287d. found in 
' CantusfirmuSt 287c. not sung by Esthonians 
even when played by the organ, 289a. exists 
only in two tonal modes, Greek Lydian and 
Hypolydian, 288a. causes alteration of 
Greek Phrygian mode to the ascendingminor 
scale, and Greek Eolic to instrumental minor 
scale, 2886. its general introduction leads to 
development of feeling for the tonic, 2886, c. 
effect of excessively sharpening, 815a 

Leaps, when they are not advisable, 8556 

[Lehnert, 509c] 

[Leibner, 508c] 

Leibnitz, 1646-1716, percipirt and apperdpirt 
= synthetically and analytically perceived, 

[Lemmens, preferred false intervals as a child, 
F6tis'8 story, 280d'] 

[Lemoine, 5086] 

[Lewis. 506c, 607a] 

Lichaon of Samos, 266c 

Light and Sound, analogies of their compass, 
186. [light extends over an Octave and a 
Fourth, 18c', d'] 

[Linear temperaments, 4S8a] 

Lips, as membranous reeds, 97c 

[Lissajous, i96d\ and Ferrand, 508c] 

[Listen, Rev. Henry, his organ, 4786] 

Liturgy, Roman, its singing, 239a 

Loorian (Hypodoric) Scale, 267d 

Low tones, see Deep tones 

[Lupot (France, 1750-1820), resonance of his 
violins, 87c] 

[Lushington, V., and daughter, assist in find- 
ing resonance of violins, 87(2] 

[Lute stop of harpsichord in 18th century, lid] 

Luther, his feelings on music, 246c 

Lydian Scale, Glarean's, 245(2 

Lydian Scales, Greek, 267c 



M 



[Macfarren, Sir G., sees right (just intonation) 
through wrong (tempered intonation), 846(2' . 
writes sight test for Tonic Sol-fa Festival. 
427c'. on character of keys, 550c, standard 
pitch, 555c] 

Maoh and J. Hervert's experiment with gas 
flames before the end of open flue-pipes, 986, 
♦93(2' 

[Macleod, Prof. H., and Lieut. Clark, their opti- 
cal method of finding pitch, *4426, 494(2'] 

Madrigals, 244(2 

[MahUlon, V., on Boehm's flutes, ♦103(2', 600(2, 
504(2] 

Major chords used as a close to minor modes, 
296(2, 297a 

Major or Ionic mode, its harmony well de- 
veloped in 16th century, 246(2. gives full ex- 
pression to tonality, 293c. its harmonic 
superiority, together with the minor mode, 
298c. considered, 302 

Major Scale, ascending, 2746 

Major Seventh, 837a. its chord in the direct 
system, 349c 

Major Sixth, a medial consonance, 194c 

Major Tenth better than major Third, 1956 

Major Tetrads, their most perfect positions, 
223c 

Major Third a medial consonance, 194c. not 

t easily distinguished by differential tones, 

"OOc, [(2']. just, with the ratio 4 : 6 included 

"Oidymus and Pbolemseus in the sjntono* 



diatonic mode, but not recognised as a con- 
sonance, 228c. that it was not considered a 
consonance was due to the tonal systems 
used, 228(2. not clearly defined and doubtful 
in pure melody, 255(2. indicated by -^ alter 
276(2.] just, 3346 

Major Thirteenth worse than major Sixth, 
196a 

Major triads, their combinational tones gener- 
ally suitable to the chord, 2156. their most 
perfect positions, 219c. their less perfect 
positions, 220c 

MallSus, see Ear 

Marloye makes pipe with additional piete a 
half length of wave, for experiment on plane 
of reflexion, 91(2. [explanations, 91<2'. d04i2, 
508a, 610c] 

Marpurg quotes Kirnberger on equal tempera- 
ment, d21c, [494(2', 510^] 

[Mason and Hamlin, 511a] 

Matheson, his Critica Mtuica, 1752, ♦321c 
says Silbermann*s unequal temperament is 
best for organs, 323c, [509(2] 

[Maxwell, Clarke, fundamental colours, 64(f) 

Mayer, Prof. A., observations on the duration 
of sound and numbers of audible beate, 417c 
and note, [his electrographic method of 
determining pitch, 4426. his lecture-ioom 
analysis of a reed-tone, 549c. his harmonic 
curves, 5506] 

[Mazingue, 5086] 

[Mazzini (Brescia, 1560-1640), resonance of his 
violins, 87c] 

[Meantone Temperament, 4S3d. its history, 
546c. used in 1880, in Spain, in Greene's 
organs, &c., 549c'] 

Meatus atiditdrius, 130a 

Mechanicjal problem of transference of the 
vibrations of air to labyrinth of ear, 134(2 

[Mediant Duodene, 462a] 

[Meeson, his elliptical tension bars, 552(2] 

Melodic relationship, original development of 
the feeling for, 3686 

Melodies in modern music supposed to arise 
from harmonies, 2536 

Melody is not resolved harmony, 289a. in 
simple tones, how appreciated, 2896 to 2306. 
expresses motion appreciable by immediate 
perception, 252a. goes far beyond an imita- 
tion of nature, 371a. does not arise from 
distinctive cries, 3716 

Membranes, circular, their sympathetic re- 
sonance, 40c to 41c 

Membranes, stretched, their inharmonic pro- 
per tones, 736 

Membranous tongues, how to make, 97a. 
[reeds, 5546] 

[Mental effects of each degree of the scale, 
279(2 note] 

Mental tune = OemUthsstimmung^ 250(2 

Mercadier, eee Gornu, ♦325(2 

Mercator's cycle of 53, 328c, [436c] 

[Merkel, 106c'. on whispering, ♦108(2'. his 
comparison of all opinions on vowel reso- 
nance with comparative table, ♦lODc, (2, llOi] 

[Mersenne, 494(2, 508a, 6, (2. spinet, 509a. on 
equal temperament, 548c] 

Mese, middle string, answered to tonic, 242c 

Meshaqah, ♦264c', 265(2. his modem Arabic 
scale of 24 Quartertones, 2646, 285(2', 5256,(2 

Metal reeds, 986 

Metallic quality of tone, 716 

[Meyerbeer, 499c] 

Middle- tone, see Mese 

[Millimetres, their relation to inches, 42(2] 

Minor chord, its treatment by older com- 
posers, avoided at close, 217a. its use at the 
close marks the period of modem music,d65(i. 
its root ociiindamental bass ambiguous,291c. 



IITOEX. 



567 



how avoided, 295a. on the second, a real 
modulation into the subdominant, 299a 

Minor-Major Mode, Hauptmann*d name, and 
its chain of chords, 8056 

Minor mode arises from fusion of Doric, Eolic, 
and Phrygian in Monteverde's time, 248d. 
does not give full expression to tonality, 2946. 
formerly closed with major chords, 296(1, 
297a. the harmonic superiority of this and 
the major mode, 298c 

Minor scale, ascending and descending forms, 
2746, c. instrumental form, 2886. the effect 
on its chords of using the major Seventh, 299c 

Minor Seventh of scale always replaceable by 
major Seventh, 2996, c. the effect of this on 
the chords of minor scale, 2^c. acuter or 
wider, 386c, d. chord of the, in the direct 
system, 849c 

Minor Sixth an imperfect consonance, 194d. 
[its partials compared with those of subminor 
Seventh, 1956] 

[Minor Submediant Duodene, 4626] 

Minor system inferior to major in harmonious- 
ness, 8016, c. this nowise depreciates its 
value, 802a. its capabilities in consequence, 
802a 

Minor Tenth, much worse than minor Third, 
196a 

Minor Tetrads, their best positions, 2246 

Minor Third, an imperfect consonance, 194<2. 
[indicated by - from 276d.] Pythagorean, 
8846. just, 8846 

Minor Thirteenth, much worse than minor 
Sixth, 196a 

Minor triad, false, 840a. [examples analysed, 
840<2.] not so harmonious as major triads, 
214c. their combinational tones do not be- 
long to the harmony, 216a. effect of such 
tones, 216c their most perfect and less 
perfect positions, 2216, c 

Mixolydian scale, Greek, 267^2. Glarean's, 
245(2. considered as mode of the Fourth, 802<2 

Mode of Fourth ascending form, 275a. of minor 
Seventh descending form, 275a, ascending 
form, 2756. of minor Sixth descending 
form, 2756. its chain of cords, 805c, d. its 
relation to the major scale, 8066. traces of 
its use by Handel, 807a, 6. by Bach, 807c. 
by Mozart, 80Sa, 6. by Beethoven, 8086 

[Modelet = rdginif 525c'] 

[Modem Greek scales, 556(2'] 

Modes, ecclesiastical, their system differed 
greatly from modem keys, 247(2. Professor 
Helmholtz*s names for, compared with 
ancient Greek and ecclesiastical, 269a. 
ancient Greek, tabulated with the same 
initial or tonic, 269a. the five with variable 
Seconds or Sevenths, in the new notation, 
277a'. see Tonal Modes 

MddVolus of cochlea, 1876 

Modulation in the modern sense, unknown to 
polyphonic music, 246a. rules for, 828a. [into 
the Dominant Duodene, 461(2. into the sub- 
dominant, mediant, minor submediant, 
relative and correlative Duodenes, 462] 

Mongolian pentatonic scales, 257c 

Monochord, 14(2. [liable to error, 15a], 746. 
used to train singers. 826a. [experiments 
with, by Messrs. Hipkins and Hartan, with 
Translator, 442a] 

[Monneron, 497c] 

Monteverde, Claudio, a.d. 1565-1649, invents 
solo songs with airs, 248c. first composer who 
used chords of the dominant Seventh without 
preparation, 248(2, 29Ca 

[Montal, 4986] 

[Moore & Moore, London, makers of Harmon- 
ical, 176] 

Moore, H. Keatley, 807(2, 811(2. [says Handel 



took a chorus from Garissimi, 807(2. explains 
action of short keys of piano on the character 
of the keys, 811(2] 

Motets, 245a 

Motion measures power in the inorganic world, 
26. periodic, illustrated, 86. undulatory, 9a 

Movements, musical, chiefly depend on psycho- 
logical action, 2c 

Mozart [uses pianofortes by Stein, 77(2]. some- 
times concludes a minor piece with a major 
chord, 2176. his use of chords in his Ave 
verum corpus, 225a. his use of closing minor 
chord, 296(2, 297a. his Requiem, 2976. his 
use of the mode of the minor Sixth, 808a, 6. 
his Protegga U giusto cielo seldom sung satis- 
factorily, 826a. lived at the commencement 
of equal temperament, 827c, [4966, 548c'] 

Mueller, Johannes (1801-58), starts physio- 
logical acoustics, 46. his form of membra- 
nous tongues, 976. his theory of the specific 
energies of sense, 148c 

Music, most closely related to sensation of all 
arts, 2(2. depends for material on sensation 
of tone, 8a. had to shape and select its ma- 
terials, 250a. expresses states of sensitive- 
ness, 250c, 251c 

Musical quality of tone, 676 

Musical tones, 7c, 106, c. without upper 
partials, 69c. with inharmonic upper par- 
tials, 70a. of strings, 74a. of bowed instru- 
ments, 80e. of reed pipes, 95a. on compound 
tones are chords of partials and hence repre- 
sented by chords, 8096 

[Musician's cycle of 55, 436(2] 

Mysis (or opossum shrimp) hears when oto- 
liths are extirpated, 149(2. tuning of its audi- 
toiy hairs, 150a 



N 



[Naeke, Herr and Frau, 494(2'] 
[Natural, the symbol {2|, whence derived, 812(2] 
* Naturalness * of the major chord, according 
to Bameau and d'Alembert, and insufficiency 
of such assumption, 2826, c 
Natural Seventh (see Subminor Seventh) 
Nasals, M, N, Ns, their humming effect, have 

peculiarities of U, 117a 
Naumann, C. E., 276(2. defends Pythagorean 

intonation, 814c, *Slid', 828(2 
Neidhard, equal temperament, 1706, *821c, (2' 
Nerve force has only quantitative, not qualita- 
tive differences, the different results depend 
on the different terminals, 149e 
Netherland system, its harsh polyphony, 2256 
Neumann, Clem., simpler way of observing 
vibrational form of violin string by a gratings 
•88(2' 
[Neuti&l Intervals, 525a. Third, Pzof. Land's 

name for Zalzal's Third, 281(2] 
New Caledonia, pentatonic scales, 257c 
New Guinea Papuas, pentatonic scales, 257c 
Newton (1642-1727), on laws of motion of 

strings, 15a 
[Nichol's Germania Orchestra, 5116] 
Nicomachus, his comparison of the seven tones 
to the seven heavenly bodies, 241a, [c', (2']. on 
the old tuning of the lyre, 255c, 257(2', 266c 
Nodes of strings, how to find those in a piano- 
forte, 47(2, 50(2, and how to touch, 51a. par* 
tials of strings which have no node in a cer- 
tain spot are silenced by touching the string 
at the node, 52(2. [exceptions, 78(2, 5406] 
Noise defined, 7c, (2, 8c. accompanying in- 
strumental notes, 67c. perception of, by 
cochlea, 1506 
[Northcote, Miss, blind organist of Gen. P. 
Thompson's Enharmonic organ, 423c'] 



I»68 



INDEX. 



Note, musical, its constructioD, 5c. used for 

any musical tone, 24a, d 
Notation, new, for distinguishing the relations 

of Fifths from those of major Thirds, 276a to 

2786. [substitute here used, 277c] 
Numbers, what have the ratios of the first six 

to do with music ? 2a. see Pythagoras 



Oval window o! labyrinth, ISOa, 1866 
[Overtones, used by Prof. Tyndall for upper 
partial tones, an error of translation, here 
avoided ; the term should never be used for 
partials in general, 25d''} 
[Overtooth, 25'd] 



O 



[Oberzahn, 2M'] 

Oboe, its tongues or reeds, 966, 554c. has a 
conical tube, and produces all harmonics,99a 

Observation, personal, better than best de- 
scription, 6a 

Octave, a collection of eight notes (usually 
printed with a small letter), unaccented, or 
4 foot, lod. once accented, or 2-foot, and 
twice accented, or 1-foot 16a. great, or 8- 
foot, and contra, or 16-foot, and 82-foot, 166 

Octave. [Octave meaning interval (usually 
printed with a capital letter), and octave 
meaning set of notes (usually printed with a 
small letter), ISd.] easy to make the mistake 
of, as Tartini^ Henrici, and others, 62a. 
gives no beats except those from partials in 
a single compound, 187c2. same for double 
Octave, l&Jd, greatly distorts adjacent con- 
sonances, 188a. an absolute consonance, 
1946. of simple tones, distinguished by the 
first differential tone, 199c. repetition in it 
presents nothing but what has already been 
heard, 26Bd. not allowed in composition, 
359c. why its key is identified with that of 
the prime, 8296 

£Octave divisions, their possible origin, 522d] 

Oettingen, A. von, his notation for relations of 
Thirds and Fifths, 277c. its modification by 
Translator here used, 277c note, report on 
Esthonian treatment of leading note in 
minor scales, *287d. his minor system, 
•SOBd, 8656 

Ohm, G. S., 1787-1854, his law, 886, c, 76c. 
completion of its proof, 56c. Seebeck's ob- 
jections to it, *58^ his experiment with a 
violin to shew fusion of note and Octave, 606. 
better form with bottles blown by stream of 
air over mouth, 60c 

Olivier. •108c' 

Olympos, B.C. 660-620, his pentatonic trans- 
formation of the Doric scale, 258a. his 
ancient enharmonic tetrachoid, 262c 

Open pipes, see Organ pipes, open 

Opera, one of the most active causes of deve- 
lopment of harmony in 17th century, 2486 

[Organ- builders' measurement of octaves by 
feet, 16d] 

Organ pipes, wide stopped, unsuited for har- 
mony, delimit consonance imperfectly, un- 
suited for polyphony, their use, 2056. flue, 
delimit Octaves and Fifths by paHials, but 
require combinational tones for the Thirds, 
205c. open, good for harmony and poly- 
phony, 206a 

Organ, its compound stops have fewer pipes in 
upper notes, 2106 

Organ stops, Qiiintaten, SSd. Twelfth, SSd, 
principal register tWeitgedocktf geigen register^ 
quintaten^ cornet^ compound, 676. [sesqui- 
altera, cornet mounted, did'.] The musician 
must regard all tones as resembling the 
compound organ stops, 58a. 

Organum of Hucbald, 244a 

Oscillation, length of, 86. period of, 86 

Ossicles, see Auditory 

Otoliths, ear stones, see Auditory 

£Ouseley, bir F. A. Gore, 603a] 

Outwards striking reeds, 97c 



[Pacific, South, Balafong, 518c, 5226] 

Palostrina, a.d. 1524-1594, under Pius IV., 
pupil of Goudimel, 2476. carries out sim- 
plification of church music, 247a. his use 
of chords, especially in the opening of his 
Stabat mater, 2256, 247c, 2486, 296a. c, 
[351d'] 

[Paris, Aim^ and Nanine, pupils of Galin, 
425c'. Alms's bridge tones, 4266] 

Partial tones in general and upper partial 
tones in particular, how distinguished, 22a. 
in musical notes, 22c. [partialt^ne = par- 
tial tones, 24c'.] partials, contraction for 
partial tones, 24c'. no illusion of the ear 
any more than prismatic colours are of the 
eye, 48c. those unevenly numbered are 
easier to observe, 49c. methods for observ- 
ing by ear, 50c. on piano, 50c. on strings 
generally, 60c to 51a. modes of observing on 
human voice, 516. [high upper, their exist- 
ence proved by beats with forks by Trans- 
lator, 56d',] partials fuse into a compoand 
tone, shewn by experiments, Ohm*a wibh a 
violin, Prof. Helmholtz'swith bottles, 606, c. 
[Translator's with tuning-forks and resonant 
jars, 6ld.] upper, their influence on quality 
of tone, 62a. inharmonic upper, 706. 
favoured on a piano whose period is nearly 
twice the duration of stroke, 76a. of a 
string-tone disappear which have a node at 
point excited, 76c, 77a. [not always when 
struck by a pianoforte hammer, 76d, 76c, 
5466.] shewn by flames seen in a revolving 
mirror, Koenig's manometrio flames, 374a, 
6. [of a pianoforte string struck at one- 
eighth its length, 545c.] upper, of human 
voice, difficult to recognise out heard by 
Kameau and Seiler, 1046. upper, perceived 
synthetically, even when not analytically, 
656. by properly directed attention they may 
be observed analytically, 65c. at any rate 
they effect an alteration of quality of tone, 
65c 

Passing notes, 858a 

[Patna, Balafong from, 518a, 521(2'] 

[Pauer, Ernst, on presumed character of keys, 
650d\ 551a] 

Paul, O., considers that Hucbald invented 
the principle of imitation, *244a 

[Pedals - footkeys, 50(2'] 

[Pellisov, see Schafhautl, lOSd] 

[Pelog scales, 5l8d, 526a] 

Pendular or simple vibrations, 23a. their 
law and form, 28c' 

Pendulum, its periodic motion, 19c how set 
swinging bv the hand, by periodically moving 
the point of suspension, 376 to shew vibration 
of membrane due to that of air in bottle, 42a 

Pentatonic scales in China, Mongolia, Ja\'a, 
Sumatra, Hudson's Bay, New Guinea, New 
Caledonia, and among FuUah negroes, 257c. 
Ave varieties, 259a, 6, c [259d. numeroos 
other, 5186. independent of heptatonic 
scales, 525d. do not arise from inability to 
appreciate Semitones, 5266] 

[Peppercorn, 496(i, 497a, 549a] 

Perception, synthetical and analytical, 62d 

Peri, Giacomo, in 1600 invents recitative, 
2456, 248c 



INDEX. 



569 



Periodic motions of pendulum/ 19c. of water- 
wheel hammer, 19c. of ball struck up when 
faUing, 19d 

Periods of musical composition, three, 236d 

Persian, see Arabic 

Persian music later develops 12 Semitones, 
285a. Kiesewetter's hypothesis, 2S5a, [d] 

[Phonograph, Edison's, used to analyse vowel 
sounds, by Messrs. Jenkin & Ewing, 539a] 

Phase, difference of, 846. its effects on forms 
of vibrational curves, 119^. on quality of 
tone, 120c. in compounded simple tones does 
not affect quality of tone, 124c to 127c. as 
seen in the vibration microscope, 126d, 127a. 
[its influence on quality of tone according to 
Koenig, 637a] 

Philolaus, 257d 

Phrynis, victor at Panathenaic competitions, 
adds a ninth string to his lyre, 269c 

Phrygian scale, 267c. Greek = mode of the 
minor Seventh, 303c. Glarean*s, 245(j, d05c 

Pianoforte, echoes vowels, 61c, [129<f|. strings, 
where struck, 776, [77c] . takes the first place 
among instruments with struck strings, 208d. 
the quality of its chords arising from the 
quality of its tones, 209a, c, d. bears disso- 
nances well, 2096. its strings, mathematical 
investigation of their vibrational forms, 380a. 
[its string struck at one-eighth its length, has 
the 8th harmonic and partial, 545c.] see also 
Hammer 

[Pichler, tuner at Berlin opera, 509cr| 

Pipes, their theory, 888 to 897. theory of blow- 
ing them, mathematically treated, 390 to 
8966. conical, calculated series of their tones, 
393c. [with remarks note * and 394d note *.'] 
iee also Organ pipes 

Pitch, 10c. number defined, 11a, [11(2]. de- 
pends only on the number of vibrations in 
a second, 18c. numbers of just musical 
scale, how calculated, 156, c. Scheibler's, 
16c. French, 16(2. numbers of the just 
musical scale, tabulated to a'440, 17a. of a 
compound tone, is the pitch of its prime, 
24a. its definite appreciation begins at 40 
vib., 177a. alters by definite intervals and 
why, 2506, 2526, d. of tonic undetermined, 
depending on compass of voice or instrument, 
310a. [numbers, how to determine, App. XX. 
sect. B, see contents, 4416. musical, de- 
fined, 4946. its histoiy, 495 to 513, sect. H. 
see contents, 493d. Church, lowest, 495a. 
low, 4956. medium, 499a. high, 50da. 
highest, 503d. extreme, 524. chamber low, 
495c. highest, 504a. mean of Europe for 
two centuries, 495d, 497d. compromise, 
497d. modern orchestral, 499a. when it 
began to rise, 512c] 

[Pitman, organist at Govent Garden Theatre, 
500d] 

[Pitt-Rivers, Gen., his balafong, 5186, 522a] 

Pius IV., Pope, A.D. 1569-1565, orders simpli- 
fication of church music, 247a 

Pt2;/tca^o of violin more piercing than piano 
tones, 67a, 746 

Plagal scales, Glarean's six, 245c. the fourth, 
267a, 271d 

Plastic arts address the eye as poetry does the 
ear, 2d 

Playford, *260d' 

Plectrum, 74c 

Plucking removes the whole string from its 
position of rest, 74d. the intensity of prime 
is greater than that of any partial, 75a 

Plutarch on the Scale, 2626. thinks the later 
Greeks had a preference for the surviving 
archaic intervals, *265d' 

Poetry, its aim and means mainly psychical, 2d 

[Pole, Dr. W., on characters of keys, 550c] 



Politzer, experiment on the round window, 
1366. produces drawings of beats by attach- 
ing a style to the columella (auditory ossicle) 
of a duck, 1666 

Polyphonic music generated by discant, 2446 
to 246. siren, description of mechanism for 
opening the several series of holes in it, 
413c 

Polyphonic siren, see Siren, polyphonic 

[Pomeranian (Bliicher) band, its very high 
pitch, 656d] 

Poole, H. W. [195d', 218d, 222d'. 228d, 323d', 
329d'. his dichordal scale, 844c.] his Enhar- 
monic Organ, *423a [c. his proposed finger- 
board, and theories of Seventh Harmonic, 
474a to 479a. writes to Translator from 
Mexico Ubout his latest fingerboards, 478d] 

Position of stroke that excites a string, 76c 

Positions of a chord not hitherto regarded in 
musical theory, 224c 

Poverty of tone, in what it consists, 756 

PrsBtorius mentions a cymbal um with 19 digi- 
tals to the octave, 320c, 320d\ on * wolves,' 
321a. [on early pitch, *4946, 494d, 497a, 
5096, c] 

[Preece and Stroh on quantity of sound, *16d\ 
124d. synthetical production of vowels, 542d] 

Preparation of dissonant notes, 863d 

Preyer, W., high pitch from forks, 18a, [•18d, 
ddd']. on distinguishable intervals, 147c, [*d]. 
by Appunn's tuning-forks has diewn that 
tones with 4000 to 40000 vib. in a second are 
audible, 151c, 167d. [his recent work on 
combinational tones and beats, 162d, *15dc, 
156d, 167d, ♦176d, d', 1776. d', 202d, 204d, 
205d. his experiments with two forks of 13*7 
and 18*6 vib., 177d'.] finds the difference 
between tones of tuning-forks and reels dis- 
appears at 4224 vib., 179c. his experiments 
with Appunn's weighted reeds, 176d. says 
as low as 15 vib. may be heard, 176d. Prof. 
Helmholtzinclined to think the tongues may 
have given double their nominal pitch, 176c'. 
[the Translator's experiments to determine 
the real pitch of these reeds, 176d'. 226d, 
229d', 23 Id', on beats and combinational 
tones, 528 to 688] 

Prime of a compound tone defined, 22a 

Princtpal'Stimmen of organs, 98c 

[Principal work of organs, 9Sd'] 

[Proch, 504d] 

Progression of Chords of the Seventh, 867d to 
858d. by Fifths, 356d. by Thirds, 8566. its 
laws are subject to many exceptions, 366d 

Protestant congregational singing, its musical 
results, 246c 

[Provost-Ponsin, Mme., pronounces last sylla- 
ble of hachis without voice, 68d] 

Proximity in the scale, a new point of connec- 
tion between tones, 287a 

Ptolemy included the major Third 4 : 5 in the 
syntono-diatonic mode, 228c. his tuning of 
the equal diatonic tetrachord, 2646 

[Pythagorean minor Thirds indicated typo- 
graphically by I , 276d. intonation in 15th 
century, 313d. temperament, 438a] 

Pythagoras (fi. B.C. 540-510), his discovery of 
law of consonance for strings. Id. extended 
to pitch numbers. Id. the physiological 
reason of his numerical law, 56. how he dis- 
covered his law of intervals, 14d. was the 
sole hearer of the harmony of the spheres, 
229c. his enigma, 'why consonance is de- 
termined by ratios of small whole numbers,' 
solved by discovery of partials, 229a, 249a. 
his tetrachord, 2636. first used 8 degrees to 
the scale forming an octave, 2666. nis dis- 
junct tetrachords, 266c. constructed his 
scales from a series of seven Fifths, 278d. 



1 



570 



INDEX. 



[or lather Fourths, 2796, c, note*.] his 
system used as foundation of temperament, 
822a 



Q 



Quality of tone, 10c, 186. defined, 19a, depends 
on form of 'vibration, 19&, 21d. its concep- 
tion, 65(2. must not be credited Tvith the 
noises of attack and release of tones, 66a, nor 
with rapidity of dying away, 66c. its strict 
meaning, 676. musical, 69a. of reed pipes, 
101a, iSid, [cf vowels depends not on the 
absolute pitch, but on relative force of upper 

gartials« 118d'.] recapitulation of results of 
hap. v., 116d to 119c. apprehension 'of, 
119d,lS66. independent of difiterence of phase 
in the partials combined, 124c to 127c. appa- 
rent exceptions, 127c, [which are thought to 
be real by Koenig, 126d, 687a] 

Quanten, £. von, his objections to Helmholtz*s 
vowel theory, 115d 

Quartertones, Arabic scale of, 2646. [noted by 
<| a turned |^, 2did'. temperament, 525a] 

Quartette playing, why it often sounds ill, 324d. 
singing of amateurs often just, 8266 

Quincke, *877d 

Quintaten (quintam tenentes) organ stop, 946 



B 



B lett^, its beats, 67d, 1686 

[Babdb, scale after Prof. Land, 517c] 

[Baffles, 626a] 

[BaginI, or modelets, 525d] 

[IMjD. P41 Singh, B4ja, his Quartertones, 266i2. 
his scales, blld] 

Bameau, 1686-1764, hears upper partials of 
human voice without apparatus, *516, 1046. 
his theoiy of consonance, *282a to 2886. com- 
plete expression not given to the new har- 
monic view till his time,2496. his assumption 
of an * understood ' fundamental bass, 25dc. 
his chord of the great or added Sixth, 294d. 
his fundunental bass, radical tone or root, 
809c. the tuning he defended in 1726, 821a. 
subsequently proposes equal temperament, 
8216. 821c, 861d. his law of motion of the 
fundamental bass by Fifths or Thirds, 855(2. 
when he allows a diatonic progression of the 
fundamental bass, 8666 

Bational construction of scales, 272c to 2756. 
differs materially from the Pythagorean, 278e2 

[Bayleigh, Lord, distance of plane of reflexion 
from end of flue-pipe, 91(2. his clock method 
of determining pitch, 442(2. his harmonium 
reed method, 4486] 

Becitative, invented in 1600, by Peri & Caccini, 
248c 

Becitation, musical, 289a. 

Beeds or vibrators of harmoniums, how they 
act, 95a, 6. how their quality of tone is 
modified, 95c. on organs and haimoniums 
for one note each, 98a. on wooden wind in- 
struments one reed serves for several notes, 
986. of clarinets, 966, oboes and bassoons, 
97a. striking inwards and outwards, 976, c. 
notes proper to them not used at all on 
wooden wind instruments, 98c. pipes, their 
musical tones, 95a. of organs, 96a. pipes, 
their quality of tone, 101a, 102(2. experi- 
ments to shew that they are modified by 
resonance chambers, 1026. with cylindricaJ 
pipes, 8916. striking inwards and outwards, 
391(2. metal, 892a. with conical pipes, 392(2. 
pipes, theory of blowing them, mathematic- 



ally treated. 890(2, &94a. [action of, by 
Hermann Smith, 6586 to 656c'. their kinds, 
658c. for clarinets, 558c. for Hichi-riki, 
658c'. for bassoons and oboes, 564a. mem- 
branous, 5546. stream, 644c. free reed, 
Chinese, 554(2. harmonium, 664a'. Ameri- 
can organ, 5646'. voicing of, 664(2'. suction 
chambers, 6556. drilled, 666a'] 

[Begister, used by T. Young for quality of 
tone, why not so used here, 246'] 

[Begisters of the voice in singing, from Lennox 
Browne and Emil Behnke, described, 100(2' 
to 101c. (2, c', (2'] 

Beissner's membrane, 187(2 

Belationship of tones in first and second de- 
gree, 256o. differs with the quality of the 
tone, 256c. due in melody to memory, in 
harmony to immediate sensation, d66d, be- 
tween tones more than two Fifths apart im- 
perceptible, 2796. of chords, its degrees , 2966 

[Belative Duodene, 4626] 

Besemblance, unconscious sense of, 3G9c 

Besonance of boxes of violin, violoncello, and 
vi61a, 866, [86d', 876 to c2']. of cavities of 
mouth, how to find, 104(2 to 106a. depends 
on vowel uttered independent of age and sex, 
1056. [difficulties of determining it, 105c.] 
of cavity of mouth, how it affects vowels, 
110c. its influence in reed pipes, mathe- 
matically treated. 888 to 890a 

Bos'onators for separating the musical tones 
in noise, 7(2. spherical and cylindrical. 486, c. 
Bosanquet's, 48(2'. advantages of a tuned 
series of, 446. use in finding partials, 61c. 
affect the prime tone of the voice as well as 
partials, their effect on reed pipes, 1126. 
sphericsJ, their advantages, 372d. formula 
for their . pitch, d78a. of glass, their dimen- 
sions, 378c. tin or pasteboard in double 
cones, 878(2. conical, 878(2 

[Besultant tones. Prof. Tyndall's name for 
combinational tones, 16dc] 

Besults of the whole investigation, 862a to 3666 

Betrospect of results in Parts I. & II., 226 to 
283 

Beverted system, its chords, d42c. serve to 
mark the key, 8446 

[Beyher, S., on vowel resonance, *108d, 109c] 

Bichness of tone, in what it consists, 756 

Biemann, Hugo, *366(2, *411c 

[Bitchie, £. S., 611a] 

Bobson, Messrs., built Gen. Perronet Thomp- 
son's Enharmonic Organ, 42da 

[Bockstro, W. S., doubts whether the authentic 
scales are rightly attributed to Ambrose, 
242(2. on Ecclesiastical scales, 266(2. on the 
Hexachord, •351(2'] 

Bockstro, B. S., intonation of his 'model* 
flute, 666(2 to 666a 

Bods, effect of their material on the quality of 
tone, 71a 

RohrftOte, organ stop, 946, [94(2'] 

Boman Catholic Church alters its music, 247a 

Boot or fundamental bass, 294c 

[Bossetti, Prof., 494(2] 

Boughness of intervals, referred to the same 
bass note calculated and constructed, 192c, 
discussed, 193 

Bound window of labyrinth, 130a, 1366 

[Budall, 108(2] 

Biidinger on the semicircular canals, 136(2 

Budolph II. of Prague, his cymbalum of 19 
tones to the Octave, 820c 

[Buggieri (Cremona, 1668-1720), resonance of 
his violins, 87c] 

[Bule for tuning in just intonation, 498c] 

[Bussia, pitch, 610(2] 

[Bust, how it affects forks, 565c] 

[B, uvular, where localised, Bid] 







f definition of a simple tone too liml- 
a. remotkHODObrn'sexperimeDtiSla. 

with Ohm that upper partiala are per- 

^* sjnthatioall;, 63a. disputes tneir 

■" jerceived analyticallj, 63a. 391ii note* 

pttrtiaU of a watchman's voice, 

LiMiIiile.. finds doga s< 

I . —v^" 116rf 

llWMWliiarcftoalBof the ear, 136n 

s. of hearing belong to physiological 
:^s, 3c. of sound defined, Tc. of 
. tonea and noises, how generated, 8c. 
ind, problem of theii analvEis, Gib. 
len usual, othemise difficult, 62c 
. harmoDj, 4t>4e] 
wimal Harmony, 464c] 
itea oharacteriaed by, not being ad- 
into theac&te determine the boundary 
1 consoaance and disgonanoe, 22Sb 
nth harmonic introdoced into har- 
164c] 
MS Harmonio, natoral, aubminor, 
miuor, dimiQished. mode of the 
considered, S03c. chords of the, 
irmed of two Consonant Triads, 341c. 
of Dissonant Triads, 342c 
and SecondH enumerated and con- 
836b 
I, Chinese view of, 229c 
imiuisbed, 336i. chord of the, upon 
and of a major Scale, !t4Tii. upon the 
of a minor Scale, S48e. apon the 
I of a major Scale. S48b to 349b. 
1 the Dominant, 34Tb, c chord of 
the tonic of the minor Scale, 3506 
harmonic introduoed into harmony, 

, 6496] 

or higher tones, lid'] 
, Schulze's organ at, 9Sd] 
hineEs, described, 95ifJ 

ranat, SlSb. Inatruments, music, 
ind intervals, S56a to 696b'l 
js of wind instruments, theory not 

out, Blaikley, Schafhautl, Boehm, 
ID, 103<i, d'] 

ging tests for Tonic Sol-fa, 427'''] 
in, A., 16781733, celebrated organ- 
hia unequal temperament, 323c, 
109c] 

nn, O., 49M, 496a] 
lay result from two sounds, 160ii. 
93 of, organ pipes, 161a. taning-forks, 

ausical tones, 69c. produced bv 
ce mathematically iaveatigaCed, 3770 

lee also Tone, simple 
ibrations, 23a 
e. Balafong, 51@a] 

heir former carslul training, 32Sa. 
tract ise to justlyiutonedineCTuments, 
,heir opinion of Oen. P. Thompson's 
27a. takenaluralThirdsandFitths, 

con trasted with speaking. 68(i' .] voice 
>t usually distinguish vowels well, 
forms the commencement and the 

school o[ music, 325c. intonation 
by pianoforte accompaniment, 326b 
stinguiehod from simple tones, S3d' 
, Seebeek's lie, Cagniard de la Tour's, 
tion of, 13b. o( Dove. 13a, Ha. in- 
playable on, 16M, 163d. conatruc- 

and beats on, 1636, c,<i. polyphonic 
lie, its great use in determining the 
of consonances, 182ti. electro-mog- 



572 



INDEX. 



netic driving machine for the, 3726. see 
also Polyphonic 

Sixth and Fourth, chord of, or first inversion 
of major and minor chords, 213a. major, 
more harmonious than fundamental, and 
these than Sixth and Third, 2146 

Sixth and Third, or Sixth only, chord of, or 
second inversion of major and minor chords, 
213a. minor more harmonious than funda- 
mental, and these than Sixth & Fourth, 214& 

Sixth, not included in consonances till the 
Idth or 14th century, 196c. [Italian, French, 
and German, 461r.] superfluous or extreme 
sharp, 3376. see also Major Sixth and Minor 
Sixth and Extreme sharp Sixth 

Skhisma neglected, its effect in producing 
identities, 281a, [46da] 

Skhismic Relation of eight Fifths down to a 
major Third, 2805, discovered by Prof. Helm- 
holtz, 316a. [temperament^ 2816, note*, 
4d5a] 

[Smart, Sir O., 507c. his pitch, 5lda] 

[Smart, H., 600c] 

[Smith, of Bristol, organ-builder, 496c, 5066] 

[Smith, Christian, organ-builder, 505d] 

[Smith, EU, 514c] 

[Smith, Hermann, his account of the Shdng, 
95(2. his account of Schulze's and Waloker's 
and Cavaill^-GoU's organs with scarcely any 
free reeds, 96d. his account of the striking 
reed, 96d'.] on the blade of air in flue-pipes. 
*395d. [his theory, 996d. on the Action of 
Reeds, 5536 to 555c'] 

[Smith, Dr. R., 494(2', 5106, 5486'] 

[Society of Arts, 494(2] 

Solidity, sensation of, analysed by stereoscope, 
6Sc 

Solo songs with airs invented by Monteverde 
and Yiadana, 248c 

Sondhauss, his formula for pitch of resonators, 
8786 

Sorge, German organist, 1745, discovers com- 
binational tones, *152(2 

Sound, velocity of. in open air, 90(2. [and in 
tubes according to Mr. D. J. Blaikley, 90(2] 

Soureck on the blade of air in flue-pipes, 395d. 
[his account, 897a'] 

[Spain, pitch, 611a] 

[Speaking contrasted with singing, 68(2'.] 
voice, more jarring than singing voice, 113(2 

Speech, its natural intonation, 238c 

Spheres, their Pythagorean harmony, 15a 

[Spice, R., 502(2, 5116] 

Spinet [its striking-place, 77(2] 

Spiteflt^te, organ stop, 94a, [94(2] 

[Spontini, 4976] 

[Staff Notation. 426(2'] 

[Stainer, Dr., 4976, 5056] 

Stapes^ see Ear 

Stark. Prof., 241(2 

Stefan, ♦377(2 

[Stein of Augsburg, knew nothing of a uniform 
striking-place for piano strings, 77(2. 504(2] 

Steinway & Sons of New York, their piano, 
76a. [strikes at ^j and ^ the length of string, 
76(2'. the 9th harmonic obtained by Mr. 
Hipkins, 76(2'. 507(2, 5116] 

Stereoscope analyses sensation of solidity, 63c 

Stirrup, see Ear 

[Stockhausen, 4956] 

Stokes, Prof., ♦383(2 

[Stone, astronomer, 173c'] 

[Stone, Dr. W. H., 494(2. his restoration of 
16-foot C, to the orchestra, 5526. his contra- 
fagotto, 563a'] 

[Stoney, Dr. G. J., on characters of keys, 560c'] 

Stopped pipes, see Organ pipes stopped 

Stops, compound, on organ, their use, 206c. 
also see Organ stops 



Stradivari, 1644-1737, his violins, 866. [re- 
sonance of the box of Dr. Huggins's Stradi- 
vari violin of 1708, 87c'] 

Straight lines and acute angles in vibrational 
forms, how produced, 34(2, 35a 

[Strauss, E., his pitch, 555(2] 

Straw-fiddle, a vrood harmonicon, 71a 

[Stream reeds, 654c] 

[Streatfleld, 497a] 

[Streicher, 502(2] 

Striking Reeds, 95c. how constructed, 96(2' 

Strings, their forms of vibration, how best 
studied, 456, c. number of nodes, 46c. in- 
finite number of forms of vibration, 46(2. 
different forms excited at the same time, 47c. 
experiment on, with a flat piano, 47c. [on a 
cottage piano, 47(2.] their tones best adapted 
for proving the ear's analysis of compound 
tones into partials, 62a. motion of, when 
deflected by a point, 53(2 to 54c excited by 
striking, 746. their musical tones, 7.4a. bow 
to experiment upon, 756. of pianoforte, their 
qualities of tone, 79c. theoretical intensity 
for difference of hammer and duration of 
stroke at f length of string, 79a, 6. m the 
upper octaves prime predominant, in lower 
octaves 2nd and Srd partial louder than 
prime , 80a. effect of th ickness and material , 
80a. motion of plucked, mathematically in- 
vestigated, 374^ to 877a. of pianofortes, 
vibrational forms of, mathematically investi- 
gated, 880a. see also Pianoforte 

[Stroh, *75(2', see Preece, 124. synthetical 
production of vowels, 642(2] 

Stroke, for exciting string, its nature, 74(2. 
duration of, 76c 

Subdominant chord, 293. [Duodene, 462a] 

[Subminor Fifth 5 : 7, its partials examined, 
195c] 

Subminor Fourteenth 2 : 7 much better than 
minor Thirteenth, 196a 

Subminor Tenth 3 : 7 much better than minor 
Tenth, 196a 

Subminor Seventh 4 : 7, 49(2'. often more 
harmonious than minor Sixth, 196a. why 
not used, 195a, 2186, c. its partials ex- 
amined, 1956 

[Subminor Third 6 : 7, its partials examined, 
195c] 

[Suction chambers, 6666] 

Sumatra, pentatonic scale, 267 

Summational combinational tones (Helm- 
holtz's), 153a. only heard on harmonium 
and polyphonic siren, 155c. exemplified^ 
156a. are very inharmonic, 1666. from 
polyphonic siren act on membranes, 167a. 
from harmonium act partly on resonators, 
157c. [reasons for doubting the two last 
conclusions, 157(2] 

[Supermajor Third 7 : 9, its partials examined, 
195(2] 

[Superminor Third 14 : 17, its partials exa^ 
mined, 195(2] 

[Supersecond 7 : 8, its partials examined, 195c] 

Suspension of dissonant note, 3646 

Sylvester, Pope, a.d. 314-335, established Ro- 
man school of singing, 239a 

Sympathetic oscillation and resonance, its 
mechanics, 366. of piano strings, 38(2. of 
bodies of small mass, d9c. of tuning-forks, 
39(2, 40a. of circular membranes, 40o-41c 
relation between its strength and the length 
of time required for the tone to die away, 
mathematically investigated, 406e 

Sympathetic vibration, the only analog[ue to 
the resolution of compound into simple 
vibrations by the ear, 129a. of expansion of 
auditory nerves, 1426. relation of amount 
of, to difference of pitch, 142c 



INDEX. 



573 



T 



[Tadolini, 51Gkf| 

[T&gore, Rajah Sourindio Mohun, *24dd, 
514c. Indian scale, 6l7d] 

[Tambour, Northern and Southern, their scales 
after Prof. Land, 517a] . 

[T&r of Cashmere, 522a] 

Tartini, 1692-1770, Italian violinist, discovers 
combinational tones, 152c. his theory of 
consonance, *282a. estimated all combi- 
national tones an octave too high, 62a 

[Taskin, Pascal, Oourt harpsichord tuner, 
5096] 

Taste, difficulties of perceiving analytically, 
636 

Taylor, Sedley, his Sound and Music^ 6c. 

Tempered fusion of just intervals, '6B7d, 

Temperament, relations leading to it, 8126, c. 
[App. XX. sect. A, see contents, 4d0d] 

Terms defined, 286, c, 24a 

Terpandisr, B.C. 700-650, 249a. his seven- 
stringed cithara, 257(2. his scale with a 
tetraohord and trichord, 267d 

\Terai suonit Tartini 's name for combinational 
tones, 152(2] 

Tetrachords, conjunct and disjunct, 255(i 

(1) ancient enharmonic of Olympos, 2626 

(2) older chromatic, 262c ; (8) diatonic, 262c 
(4) of Didymus, 268a ; (5) Pythagorean, 2686 
(6) Phrygian, 268c; (7) Lydian, 268c ; (8) un- 
used, 263d; (9) soft diatonic, 264a; (10) 
Ptolemy's equal diatonic, 2646 ; (11) enhar- 
monic, 2656. [old Greek, 512(2. Greek after 
Al Farabi, 512(2] 

Tetrads, or four-part chords, when consonant 
formed by taking the Octave of one tone of a 
triad, 2226, c, 22da. major, their most per- 
fect positions, 22dc 

Thebes in Egypt, flutes found there, 271<2 

[T^i2<tfn«=s part- tones or partial tones, 24c'] 

Third, lid, see Major Third and Minor Third 

Thirds, Pythagorean, looked on as normal 
Thirds to the close of Middle Ages, 1906. 
their tempered intonation is the principal 
fault of tempered intonation, 8156. not ad- 
mitted to be consonances till end of twelfth 
century, and then only as imperfect, 190a. 
[major and minor, their upper partials com- 
pared, 190(2] 

Third and Fourth triad, 8886 

Thirds and Sixths, consonant and dissonant, 
enumerated and considered, 384a. triad 
of dissimilar, 8386 

Thirteenths not so pleasant as Sixths, 1896. 
[partials of Sixths and Thirteenths com- 
pared, 1906] 

[Thomas's orchestra, Cincinnati, U.S., 5116] 

Thompson, Gen. Perronet [his life, 422(2]. his 
enharmonic organ, 422c. its effect, 428(2. a 
soprano voice singing to it and a blind man 
playing the violin with it, 4286. [his mono- 
chord, 441g{. notes on his organ, 473(2] 

[Thompson, Sir W., his electrical squirting 
recorder, 539a] 

Thorough Bass, had formerly no scientific 
foundation, 2c 

[Threequartertone intervals, 525a] 

[Timbre, its proper meaning, why not used 
here for quality of tone, 24c'] 

Timour, 282a 

Toepler and Boltzman, their experiments on 
the state of air inside flue-pipes, *93a 

[Tomkins, 494(2, 603a, 505c] 

Tonal keys of later times, 21Qc 

Tonal modes, five melodic, 2726. Greek, 
formed from a succession of 7 Fifths, 288c. 
only two possible for a close connection of 
all the chords, SOOa. the major is best, 8006. 



the minor is second, 800(2. as formed from 
their three chords, subdominant, tonic, and 
dominant, 298(2 to 294a. their chords with 
double intercalary tones, 297c, (2. with single 
ditto, 2986, c 

Tonal relationship, unconscious sense of, 
870a 

Tonality developed in modem music, 5c. the 
relation of aU the tones in a piece to the 
tonic (F^tis), 2406. Greeks hsbd an unde- 
velopea feeling for, 242. complete in major 
modes, has to be partly abandoned in other 
modes, 296(2. [absent in non-harmonic 
scales, 526c] 

Tones (meaning musical sounds), harmonic 
upper partial, 4(2. distinguished by force, 
pitch, and quality, 10c. sharper or higher, 
and flatter or lower, 116, [11(2']. musical, 7c. 
defined, 8a, c, 236. simple and compound, de- 
fined, 236. the term * tone * used indifferently 
for a simple or compound tone, 24a. consti- 
tuent, of a chord, 24(2'. composite, 56(2. com- 
pound, 57a. upper partial, a general consti- 
tuent of all musical tones, 586, c. the diffi- 
culty of hearing them does not depend on 
their weakness, 58(2. circumstances favour- 
able for di^stinguishing musical tones from 
different sources, 59c. old rules of composi- 
tion were designed to render the voice parts 
separable by ear, 59(2. without upper par- 
tials, 69c. with inharmonic upper partials, 
706. of elastic rods, 70(2. of bowed instru- 
ments, 80c. with a tolerably loud series of 
harmonic partials to Sixth inclusive,are most 
harmonious, 119a. their hollow nasal, poor, 
cutting, rough character, whence derived, 
119a, 6. their natural relationship as a basis 
for scales, 2566. related to dominant ascend- 
ing and descending scales, 2746, c. related 
to subdominant ascending and descending 
scales, 275a, 6. of voice, energetic, how pro- 
duced, 115c. [partial, 24G.] proper not gener- 
ally determinable, 55(2, but determined in 
circular platesand stretched membranes,56a. 
simply compounded, tone and Octave or tone 
and Twelftb, 306, 82(2. simple, 118(2. simple, 
how to produce by means of resonance jar, 
54(2 to 55c. combinational (see Combinational 
tones) 

Tones (meaning musical intervals), printed 
with a capital letter for distinction, 24c. and 
Semitones where used, 524(2 

Tongue [see Reed) 

Tonic, did any exist in homophonic music? 
2406. rules for finding it in the authentic 
scales uncertain, 2436. Greeks used any note 
as such, 268a. chord represents compound 
tone of tonic, 296c. chord, development of 
feeling for in 16th and 17th centuries, 2966. 
feeling for it, weakly developed in homo- 
phonic music, 243c 

Tonic Sol-fa. singers, 207(2. teaches to sing by 
the characters of tbe tones in the scale, 279(2. 
svstem of shewing relation of each note to 
the tonic, 352(2. society of, 4236. [history 
of, 428(2' to 425c' notes, festivals, 427c'] 

[Topfer, 509(2] 

[Translator, his additions in Appendix XX., 
480 to 556] 

[Trautmann, Moritz, on vowel resonance,109c', 
110(2] 

Triads, how formed, 2126, c. constant within 
the compass of an octave, 212(2. see Major 
and Minor triads, of two just major Thiitls, 
and their transformations, 388(2, 8896. with 
two dissonances, 339c, d. how they limit 
the tones ot the key, 3406, c. their pos- 
sible confusions, 841c. [cell and union, of a 
duodene, and condissonant triads, 459a] 



674 



INDEX. 



Tremor, sonorous, distiaot from motion of in- 
dividual particles of air, Sd 

Trent, council of, alters music, 247a 

Trichordal representation of harmonisable 
modes, S09d 

[Trichordals, harmonic, 460a] 

[Trines, major and minor, pure quintal, major 

■ i«and minor quintal, 459a] 

[Tri tonic temperament, true and false, 548a] 

Trombones, lengthening, 100a. [shape of, 

. 100c'] 

Tropes or scales of the best Greek period, 
essential, having hypate as tonic, 26&d 

[Trumpets, their shape, 100c. with slides, 
rare, 100c'] 

Tsay-yu, said to have introduced the hepta- 
tonic scale into China, 258a 

Tso-kiu-miog compares the five Chinese tones 
to the five Chinese elements, 229c 

[Tunbridge, A96d] 

Tune, mental = OemiUhsiimmung, 250d 

Tunes, popular, constructed from the three 
constituent major chords of the scale, 292a 

[Tuning. Sec. Q, se^ contents, 483^. its 
difficulties, 4B4d. examination of various 
specimens of, 484 & to 485£l. Translator's 
practical rule for tuning in equal and mean- 
tone intonation, 488d to 491c] 

Tuning-fork, its form of vibration, 20a, d, its 
tone, 796. has high inharmonic proper tones, 
70c. large, of 64 vib. gave 5 partials, 159a. 
[how to treat and tune, 443a', a', tonometer, 
invented by Scheibler, 44dc. best method of 
making 4ASd. how to use, 444a. the Trans- 
lator's, 4466'.] see also Forks, toning 

Twelfth gives no beats, except those from 
partials in a single compound tone, IQld. an 
absolute consonance, 1946. better than Fifth, 
195&. repetition in it presents nothing but 
what has already been noard, 2536 

Twelve Semitones introduced into China, 
2586 

Tj/nipdnwn, see Drum 

Tyndall, J., 'on sound,' 6c'. translated by 
Helmholtz and W^demann, 6c'. [his * tone, 
clang, clangtint, overtone,' 24, footnote. * re- 
sultant tones,' 16dc. finds beats do not in- 
crease the range of power of sounds, *179d. 
observations on gas jets, 395a, d] 



U 

U, its resonance cavity, 106a 

[Ueberzahn, 25d'] 

[UUmann, 504d'] 

Ulm, 964 

Unconscious apprehension of regularity, 3676 

Undertones, harmonic, defined, 44d 

Undulatory motion, 9a 

[Unequally just intonation, 465a] 

Unevenly numbered partials, easier to observe 
than the evenly numbered, 49c 

Uuison gives no beats except those from par- 
tials in a single compound tone, 187(2. greatly 
disturbs adjacent consonances, 188a 

Upper partials, eee Tones, upper partials, 586 

[Upper tooth, 25d'] 

Utrlciiltis^ see Ear 



[Vddit chief Indian note, 24dc'. or * ruler ' 

note, 526c, see ans'a] 
[Variability of Seconds and Sevenths, its 

efiect on the modes, 277c', d'] 
Vestibule of the labyrinth, 1354 
[Vianesi, 5004] 



Viadana invents solo songs with airs, 248c 

Vibrating forks, phases of, as compared with 
those of the exciting current, mathemflktically 
investigated, 4026 

Vibration microscope, 804.- curves shewn, 
826 

Vibrational form or form of vibration, simple, 
21a. for water-wheel hammers and struck- 
up balls, 21c 

Vibrations, 86. single, as reckoned in France, 
inconvenient for determining pitch, 164'. 
form of, 20a. for a tuning-fork, 206, c, 
pendular or simple, 2da 

Vibrator, see Beed 

[Vieth, G. U. A., first uses the term * combina- 
' tional tones,' *153c] 

Villoteau, believes the Kissar to be penta- 
tonic, *2574. [his thirds of Tone&, 2824. 
origin of his conception of thirds of Tones, 

. 5206, 55641 

[Vince, 1854] 

Vi61a box, pitch of its resonance according to 
Zamminer, 866, [864' note] 

Vidla di Ganiba, organ stop, 93a, [934] 

Violin string, its vibrational form, 836. crum- 
ples upon it, 84c. development of Octave, 
85c. box, the pitch of its resonance accord- 
ing to Savart, reported by Zamminer, 866. 
[according to Translator's observations, 876, 
c, 4.] condition for regularity of vibration, 
854. why old ones are good, 854. bowing 
the most important element, 86a. sound- 
post, its function, 866. [according to Dr. 
Huggin's experiments to communicate vi- 
brations from belly to back, *86c, 4.] effect 
of the resonance of its box on quality of its 
tones, 210a. intonation and experiments, 
3246, c. Comu and Mercadier, 8254, [486 to 
487]. strings, their motion mathematically 
investigated, 384 to 387 

[Violinists, their intonation as determined by 
Cornu and Mercadier, 486c. different for 
harmony and melody, 487c] 

VioUm-bass organ stop, 98a, [9Sd] 

Violoncello organ stop, 93a, [934] 

Violoncello box, pitch of its resonance accord- 
ing to Savart and Zamminer, 866, [864] 

Vis viva, insufficient measure of the strength 
of tones, 1746, 4, [754] 

Vischer, his * Esthetics,' 26 

[Vocalists, their intonation, difficulties in 
actual observation, 486a] 

Vocal chords or ligaments, 98a. their rate of 
vibrations not altered materially by air> 
chambers, their watery tissues, and variable 
thickness, 1006 

Vocal expression, natural means of, 3704 

Voice, well suited to harmony, 206c. effect in 
certain chords, with different vowels, 2064. 
[compass of the human, 5446] 

[Voice Harmonium, Colin Brown's, 4704] 

[Voiceless vowels, 684] 

[Voicer, the, his arts, 3974'] 

[Voicing of reeds, 5544"] 

Vortical surfaces, 8946 

Vowel qualities of Tone, lOSo. their charac- 
ter, lOBa. theory first announced by Wheat- 
stone, 1034'. produced by resonance of cavi- 
ties of mouth, 104c. trigram of du Bois 
Beymond the elder, 1056. resonance recom- 
mended to philologists for defining vowels, 
106e. [difficulties in doing so, 106c'. differ- 
ences of opinion of Helmholtz, Donders, 
Merkel, Eoenig, 1064'.] resonances in notes 
according to Helmholtz, 1106. their recogni- 
tion by resonators, 110c. their modifications, 
113a 

Vowels, A, 1056. O U, 106a, [106c. 4]. 0« 
and Ao, 1066. the above have only a single 



INDEX. 



575 



resonance, 106c. A, E, I, doable resonance, 
107a, 6, e. [Graham Bell finds doable reso- 
nance in all vowels, lOldJ] A, E, I, have 
their resonances too high for forks. Ilia. 0, 
U, 108a, b. U,*how Helmholtz determined 
its resonance, 110a. its degeneration into 
Ou, llObf their transitional forms dae to 
continuous alterations of resonance cavities, 
111c to 112a. better distinguished when 
powerfully commenced, 114d. their quality 
of tone, li5a. distinguished preponderantly 
by depending on the absolute pitch of the 
partials that are reinforced, 118c. their effect 
on harmony, 207a, [c, d]. practical direc- 
tions for their synthesis, 398a to 400c. [their 
new analysis by means of the phonograph by 
Messrs. Jenkin and Ewing, 538 to 542. Oh 
analysed, 589 to 541. Oo, Aw, Ah, analysed, 
541. their synthetical production by Messrs. 
Preece and Stroh, 542^2.] echoed from piano,. 
61c. vowels only, without consonants, heard 
from speakers at a distance, 63c 



W 

Wagner, R., his treatment of the chord of two 
major Thirds, 3396. [thinks in equal tem- 
perament, d39d'. his festival, 502c] 

[Walcker of Ludwlgsburg, had little experience 
of striking reeds, 96c] 

Waldeyer finds 4500 outer arch fibres of Gorti 
in the cochlea [giving 1 for each 2 cents], 1476 

Waller, R., 1686, reduces all colours to three 
fundamental, 64a 

[Walker, J. W., & Sons, organ-builders, never 
used free reeds, 96c. 50G6, 506c, 507a. in 
July, 1852, put the Exeter Hall organ in 
equal temperament, 549a'] 

Water-wheel hammer, its periodic motion, 19c, 
21c 

Waves of water, 96, d. generated by a regular 
series of drops, 10a. of rope, chain, india- 
rubber tubing, brass wire spiral, 9c. their 
composition, 256, c, 26a-d. of water or air, 
algebraical addition, 27d, 23c. periodic, re- 
sulting from composition of simple tones, 
306 to S2d. phases of, caused by resonance, 
400(2. mathematically investigated, 401a. 
of the sea, effect of their motion on specta- 
tors, 251a 

[Weber, Prank Anton von, 497a, 5096] 

[Weber, C. M. von, 498c] 

Weber, Dr. Fr. E., on function of the tiqucB- 
ductus vestibiili, 136a 

Weber, W., S90d 

Woitzmann, •269c, d, title 

Werckmeister (b. 1645), advocated equal tem- 
perament in 1691, 321c, 54Sc 

Wertheim, 3736 



Westphal, •265d', •263c, d 

Wetness, sensation of, compounded of un- 
resisting gliding and cold, 63c 

Wheatstone, Sir Charles, first announces a 
vowel theory, •lOSd. [repeats Willis's ex- 
periments on vowel reproduction, llld] 

Whispered vowels, pitch of, 103c. Gzermak 
and Merkel on, iOSd' 

[White, J. Paul, his Harmon, 228d, 329d'. 
described, 4816. his methods of tuning it, 
492c] 

Wiedemann, G., *6c' 

[Wilkies, the, 5496] 

[Willis, organ-builder, never uses free reeds, 
96c, 5066, 506c, 507a] 

Willis, Prof. R., ♦103d'. his reproduction of 
vowels by extensible reed pipes, 1176. his 
table of vowel resonance, 117c. his experi- 
ments with toothed wheels and springs, 118a. 
his vowel theory, 1186 

Winterfeld, von, •245d, ♦272i, 237d', *30Sd' 

[Withers, violin-maker, assists in finding 
resonance of violin, 876, c] 

[Wolfel, 5096] 

[Woneggar's abstract of Glarean, 196(2^] 

Wooden instruments are mobile in tone, 676. 
pipes have softer tone than metal pipes, 94c. 
reeds, 986 

Wood harmonicon, 71a 

[Woolhouse's cycle of 10, 436i] 



[Ynignez, Don, organist of Seville, 496a] 

Young, T., nd' 

Young, Thomas, 1773-1829, his law that excit- 
ing a string at a node destroys the harmonics 
corresp3nding to that node, 526. its proof, 
52c, 536, [883^, 5466]. his analysis of colour 
into 3 primaries, 148c, 149c. his theory of 
differential tones generated by beats, 166c2 



Zamminer, *62d. on pitch of resonance of 
violin, violoncello, and vi61a boxes, 866, 
[*S6d' note], length of horn, 99c. [error in 
reporting, lOOd note], 92Sd, 3906, 394a 

[Zalzal, lutist, introduces Threequartertone, 
26id\ 231(2, c', his two new intervals of 355 
and 853 cents, 281(2, 6', 5256] 

Zarlino assumes the tenor voice part to deter- 
mine the key. 245(2, 312a, 326a, fS51d'. [hU 
temperjiment, 546(2] 

Zillerthal, in Tyrol, scale of its wood harmon- 
icon, 270(2 

Zither, 746 

Zdna denticula'ta, 139(2 



l^^ 



A 



ABERDEEN : THE UNIVERSITY PBB88. 






HU-5.S7.0 

IjlMlilni MU.S^ 



181 



.J. 



i*;**"!"-!"-- 



lgx|NFORD UNIVERSITY LIBRARIES 



:--*• 
.«.,«. 



[HMD, CAUFORNIA 9430S-6004 



'-Ss-^4^ 
^'*^l^ 



>n <m 



-m^ 



